The Fallen Fruit Under the Paradise by Mongsu.
Chapter 1.

Under the bright sunlight and vast meadows, in the
charming resort city of Southwest, Marnia, where a gentle
breeze tickles the green grass. The mansion built on its
quiet outskirts was famous as the twenty-third mansion of
the Altahart family, known as the prestigious name in
Rechem. The building, constructed in a unique style by an
architect, was so magnificent that it was more akin to a
fortress than merely a ‘mansion’, reflecting the unparalleled
status of the Altahart family in the great nation of Rechem.
Despite its grand construction, the mansion constantly
emanated a cold aura year-round, attributable to three main
reasons. First, every member of the family resided in the
townhouses of the capital. Second, the Altahart family
owned more than twenty other mansions across the
country, excluding this one in Marnia. Lastly, Marnia was too
mundane and dull for the family to leverage their greatest
strength, their astronomical wealth accrued since the
ancient era that ended the White War, through their
unrivaled intelligence network. For these reasons, the
Marnia mansion had been left vacant for quite some time.
Yet, cobwebs did not form, nor did dust gather on the
windowsills, thanks to the ever-present staff employed to
maintain the place in the absence of the owner.
The staff unanimously agreed that this mansion was the
best workplace in the world. There was no employer
watching their every move with hawk-like eyes, and despite
the given freedom, their salaries were absurdly high
compared to other jobs. Whether they had come knowingly
or stumbled upon it by chance, everyone hoped to stay here
for life.
In the morning, a pleasant breeze would blow between the
chirping sparrows, and by noon, the clear chimes of the
town’s church would ring. At night, the starry Milky Way
would spread blue across the ink-black sky. Marnia mansion
boasted such beautiful and serene scenery. There’s a saying
that boredom is a sweet punishment from God, but it did not
apply here in Marnia. Boredom was a great blessing.
Mrs. Osborne, now in her third year of working at Marnia
mansion, wholeheartedly agreed. The repetitive daily
routine was a rightful happiness. She arrived promptly at
seven o’clock to inspect the mansion diligently for any
issues. Ten minutes before noon, she headed to the
bedroom on the third floor, holding the mail delivered by a
beret-wearing postman on his bicycle. Upon entering the
bedroom, she went straight to the desk, using a paper knife
on a refined stand to open the sealed mail for the owner.
Then, the sound that awakened the city’s vigor was heard.
Ding-dong.
It signaled noon as the church bell started ringing from afar.
The clear, pleasant sound resonated like waves into the
wide-open bedroom. The second ring sounded unusually
loud due to the annoyed groan coming from the bed behind
the drawn curtains. After finishing with the mail, Mrs.
Osborne clasped her hands and took a few steps back.
And at the third ring, the curtain was roughly drawn back.
First to touch the floor were the two muscularly split legs
beneath a disheveled nightgown. 
“…Madam.”
The man’s voice, who had just woken up and was in a foul
mood, crawled on the floor as he covered his face with his
hand.
“How much should I pay to make that bell stop?”
It had been a month already. Since coming down to Marnia,
the man had been consistently disturbed from sleeping in
by the bell. The church bell, rung as a greeting to God,
tolled twelve times before stopping. Yesterday, he endured
until the fifth toll, but today it was only three. At this rate,
he might wake up even before the bell rings tomorrow.
“Good morning, Master,” Mrs. Osborne said, bowing calmly.
The man rubbed his temples, likely from a mild migraine,
causing his splendid platinum blonde hair to slightly shake.
“Yes, damn good morning indeed.”
The brilliance of his hair made her squint, but his face
exerted an even more refined allure. Even just awakened,
with not a drop of water touching him, his appearance was
captivating enough to draw every woman’s gaze. No need
to look far; Mrs. Osborne herself was mesmerized. She had
never seen such a beautiful man in her life. When he first
appeared at the mansion, she dared to think he was not the
owner of this magnificent second house but a typical
wandering poet living off his looks, who sweetly wooed
wealthy ladies and expertly swindled them. Of course, that
misconception was quickly dispelled by the luxurious car
that roared like a beast and the land ownership certificate
for this place from the car’s trunk.
Indeed, the long-abandoned Marnia mansion had suddenly
regained its owner overnight. A month ago, for some
reason, the second son of the family, Ulrich Altahart, had
descended here before dawn without any attendants.
With a dreamy look of someone not fully awake, Ulrich lazily
brushed up his hair, reminiscent of the soft sand on a beach.
Then he got up from the bed, lit a cigarette, and took a
drag. His sleepy eyes fell on the mail Mrs. Osborne had
placed down. He flicked through the mail with his fingers,
soon grabbing a tabloid from the bottom.
“Hmm.”
His well-shaped lips let out a short sigh. It was clear what he
was looking at. Mrs. Osborne had also read the article this
morning. The article, titled “A Nobleman’s Outing? Who Is
the Stranger at the Abandoned Mansion?” had a small
picture attached beneath it. It was a cropped photo of
Ulrich’s face from a family photo that every citizen of
Rechem would have seen at least once.
“These photos were not distributed to be used as tabloid
fodder.”
Showing near-disgust, he stubbed out his cigarette on his
face in the photo. His splendid, flawless face turned back to
Mrs. Osborne.
“Anyway, could you call the lawyer?”
“Yes, Master.”
It was an expected outcome. With this, the total number of
newspapers sued by him in Marnia alone reached three.
Judging by the situation, it seemed this newspaper, which
had dared to publish his article, would also end up
dissolving without a penny in compensation.
“Why can’t people just respect someone’s right to live
quietly?”
“Considering the family’s status, it’s only natural for
everyone to be interested.”
“Annoying Altahart fame.”
Ulrich threw the cigarette butt into the ashtray and sat on
the bed. Mrs. Osborne clasped her hands calmly as he
languidly gazed out the window, savoring his freedom here.
“Master, there was a call from the capital this morning.”
“Didn’t I cut all the phone lines?”
“Yesterday around noon, you called the capital’s law office
to check if the village church could be sued for noise
pollution.”
“Oh, right.”
Sighing at his forgetfulness, Ulrich looked back at her.
“What did they say?”
“The same question as before. When do you plan to return
to the capital?”
“That’s enough.”
Cutting off the conversation, Mrs. Osborne politely inquired
about meal plans and any specific instructions before
bowing respectfully.
“Master.”
“Yes?”
“I have a personal request for permission.”
“What is it?”
“I need to take a leave of absence for a while.”
“Leave of absence?”
“Yes.”
In his eyes that turned to her, there was a mix of curiosity
and subtle reproach. The reproach asked who would take
over the duties if the person managing the mansion took
leave, and the curiosity wondered about the reason despite
knowing this. With such blue-grey eyes questioning her,
Mrs. Osborne bowed deeply.
“My daughter is getting married soon.”

Chapter 2.
His eyebrows twitched, raised, and then returned to their
original position.
“You are a wife and you have a daughter?”
“Yes.”
A smile like a flower petal hit by iron appeared on the
woman’s face.
Although they had only been together for a month, Ulrich
had realized that she had a very rigid personality. Whether it
was because of her role as a general manager or her
inherently rigid nature, her laughter was often so faint that
it was hard to tell if she was really laughing.
So, just seeing that rare smile, he could guess how much
she cherished her daughter.
“This time, she is officially getting married to her fiancé.
After the wedding, she plans to leave for a foreign country
with her fiancé, so I would like to take a leave to spend time
with her before that.”
Mrs. Osborne’s leave had been planned for quite some time.
There was no problem with the process.
Because the Marnia Villa, where she worked, did not have a
specific owner, it was not a big deal for her to leave her post
temporarily. In such cases, it was just a matter of calling the
relevant department of the main house, which supervised
the employment of the villa workers, and getting
permission.
However, coincidentally, the second son of the capital had
come down here. Since Ulrich was practically the owner and
employer, she felt it necessary to seek his approval first.
“Hmm, I see. Congratulations. It’s a family celebration.”
“Thank you.”
“But what about me?”
Ulrich raised his chin. His playful attitude, slightly wrinkling
his brow, did not allow the other person to feel any such
emotion.
In Ulrich’s pupils, an unwelcome expression surfaced.
He didn’t particularly like his surroundings to change. More
precisely, he didn’t prefer the environment he liked to
change without his consent.
Whether it was people or things.
Even though it had only been a month, Ulrich didn’t find
Mrs. Osborne to be too bad. She was quick-witted and wellbehaved, and didn’t particularly bother him in the
countryside villa where he came with no expectations.
Her leaving wasn’t the problem. The problem was the
possibility of someone replacing her whom he might not
like.
His question was short and quite self-centered, in line with
this thought process.
Mrs. Osborne couldn’t find words and just moved her lips.
She seemed flustered by the unexpected situation.
Watching her, Ulrich got up from the bed and walked to the
open window.
The sound of bells had long ceased. With that, the natural
sounds of the pure city were pushed by the wind and came
inside.
“Where are you planning to spend time with your
daughter?”
“I was planning to go to Misley since I was taking a leave.”
“Misley.”
Ulrich lightly nodded and spread his arms wide to grasp the
window frame. His broad shoulders seemed to fill the
window, emphasizing his presence. His manly physique
enhanced his delicate appearance, giving it a more
mysterious atmosphere.
“Hmm.”
Ulrich tapped his fingers on the window frame. Soon, he
turned around with a leisurely movement as if dancing a
waltz. Leaning diagonally against the window frame, there
was a sense of relief in his gaze toward her, as if he had
found a solution.
“Instead, how about calling your daughter here?”
“Pardon?”
“Marnia is also a suitable city for a vacation.”

“I think it would be nice for the mother and daughter to
spend good time together here.”
They said the world of the rich revolves solely around their
own comfort. Despite appearing generous, there was a
hidden selfishness aiming at their own benefit.
Ulrich was like that now. It was just that his elegant
demeanor filtered it in a way that didn’t seem crude.
Mrs. Osborne quickly caught on to this aspect.
She had already heard about it.
Following the second son of the family who arrived at the
dawn’s light to Marnia, his secretary had advised her that
Ulrich’s stubbornness was unmatched. Therefore, she was
urged to serve him well to avoid any unnecessary friction.
It wasn’t just words.
As a member of the wealthiest family in Rechem, her basic
salary had been tripled. Perhaps because it was a family
built on piles of greed, they could immediately grasp what
others desired and use it without leaving room for
complaints.
“If you agree, I will cover all the expenses for any leisure
activities you and your daughter do here.”
“It’s a very generous offer, but honestly, I don’t know if it’s
necessary for you to go that far.”
“You might not understand, but for me, this is the simplest
way.”
Ulrich crossed his arms and smiled lightly.
“It’s just about buying any possible variables with money.”
“…..”
“That’s the favorite solution of my family.”
There seemed to be a faint trace of disgust behind his
smiling face.
Mrs. Osborne maintained a calm demeanor, unsure whether
to be grateful or bewildered.
“I think it’s a very gracious offer. However, I should consider
my daughter’s opinion as well. Could I get back to you after
contacting her?”
“Sure.”
Ulrich, who was looking at the vast green plains outside,
nodded absentmindedly and then uttered an exclamation.
Mrs. Osborne, who was about to leave, turned to look at
Ulrich.
With a proud smile, he opened his mouth.
“What’s your daughter’s name?”
*
“Lisbell!”
It was a moment when the fresh laughter of the children
surrounding the classic piano filled the air.
From afar, a loud voice calling her could be heard.
Lisbell’s hands, which were energetically playing on the
keyboard, stopped first, and then her head turned towards
the door. At the end stood her fiancé, Theodore.
“Theo.”
She jumped up with a lively greeting, and the eyes of the
children around the piano followed her. In the next moment,
the group moved to the door with a loud cheer.
Theodore handed small candies to the orphans who quickly
gathered around him, smiling kindly.
“I’ve told you many times, if you all rush over like this, you
might fall.”
Theodore’s words made the children laugh even more. As
she watched with a smile, Theodore looked up as if he felt
her gaze. His light brown hair swayed in the wind blowing
through the door.
“Lisbell, let’s head to the station. Time is tight.”
“Yes, we should.”
“The kids asked you to play the piano again, didn’t they?
Really.”
“Don’t be like that. I offered to play for them.”
The children, who were watching the conversation with their
necks stretched, chimed in with “Yeah,” “She said she
would,” and “You always tell us off” competing to speak
first.
With so many of them, it quickly became noisy. Feeling
awkward, Theodore clapped his hands.
“Alright, your favorite Lisbell has to leave now. You can listen
to the rest of the music when she returns from her trip.”
Before the children’s demands got any longer, Theodore
took Lisbell out of the chapel. Her luggage bag, placed in
front of the chapel bench, was already moved by Theodore.
“Shall we go now? It’s quite tight to get to the station on
time.”
Holding Lisbell’s hand after taking the bag with one hand,
Theodore intertwined their fingers and lightly kissed his
lover’s cheek.
As they walked together, they chatted.
“Mrs. Osborne knows you’re leaving today, right?”
“Yes. I talked to her a few days ago.”
“I was really surprised. I thought she would come here, but
suddenly you’re going to Marnia.”
“Tell me about it. I was surprised too.”
Lisbell giggled.
Yes, who would have known she would suddenly go to
Marnia?
The reason for this change was not her or her mother, but
her mother’s employer, who had appeared out of nowhere.

Chapter 3.
A week ago, I received a call from my mother, who manages
an empty villa in Marnia.
The conversation lasted longer than expected, but the gist
was this:
A month ago, the villa’s owner had to come to Marnia
urgently. He expressed a desire for the caretaker not to
leave her position, and in that vein, he suggested that if it
was acceptable, why not have Lisbell come to Marnia and
spend some time together.
The subtle persuasion underlying this proposal was the
constant financial struggle that had accompanied the
mother and daughter up to this point.
In truth, Mrs. Osborne was skeptical about spending time
with her daughter before the wedding. It wasn’t that she
disliked spending time with Lisbell, but she was worried
about the expenses that would naturally follow.
The concern wasn’t lost on her daughter, Lisbell, who,
despite having a father who owned a fairly large factory in
their hometown, was still significantly disadvantaged as she
was raised in a modest single-parent household.
Mrs. Osborne had saved diligently for Lisbell’s college
education, and Lisbell had juggled various part-time jobs
during her semesters as a library assistant and as a tutor
during breaks, all to save for the future.
Despite their hard work, the thought of spending part of
their savings on making memories before the wedding was
a burden for Mrs. Osborne.
It seemed as if the villa’s owner had seen right through Mrs.
Osborne’s concerns. He offered to cover all expenses if they
spent time in Marnia.
My mother said it was up to me, but she subtly hinted that
she hoped I would follow the owner’s wishes. Understanding
her feelings well, I chose to go to Marnia.
“Did you say the villa owner is from the famous Altahart
family?”
“Yes.”
“Wow, that’s impressive. It’s incredible that your mother
works so closely with someone like that.”
“My mother has been at that villa for three years, and this is
the first time she’s seen him. She said she was quite
surprised when he showed up without any prior notice.”
“Well, nothing is really known about that family. Honestly,
before you mentioned it, I wasn’t even sure they were real
people. Although their business dealings flood the financial
news, there’s never any information about their personal
lives.”
Altahart’s family was famously wealthy, but very little was
known about its members.
The only public information about them was a single blackand-white family photo.
“Except for that odd rumor about the eldest son.”
“Odd rumor?”
“You know, the recent gossip about the Altahart eldest son
being gay. It caused quite a stir because it came out when
he was supposed to be engaged to the Schwaben family’s
daughter.”
I remembered that incident.
It was the first time a private matter about the family had
leaked. It created a buzz in places like the capital, Laurent,
and even in our quiet town of Misley.
Private newspapers didn’t miss the chance to spread the
story. I vaguely recalled seeing a similar headline on a
tabloid when I was at the square.
“But then the story disappeared overnight, leaving rumors
that someone envious of the family spread the gossip on
purpose.”
The social circles in the capital were ruthless, and Theo
shook his head as he looked at me.
“Anyway, Lisbell, you’re going to meet someone from that
amazing family.”
“I suppose so.”
Theo, curious and excited, kept chattering away, and I
responded with occasional smiles and nods.
We arrived at the Misley station by carriage. Theo was right;
we were cutting it close. As I took the bag he handed me, I
glanced at the main clock on the platform.
“Thanks for bringing me, Theo.”
In front of the open train door, Theo took my hand and
kissed my white knuckles.
“Travel safely, Lisbell.”
“Please convince your mother. I know you can do it.”
Knowing the purpose of my trip, Theo gave me his heartfelt
encouragement. His warmth reached me, and I winked at
him in gratitude.
“See you when I get back.”
Indeed, when I returned, our planned wedding would be one
step closer.
His eyes sparkled with cherry blossom-like excitement.
Feeling my heart flutter, I boarded the train.
I saw Theo waving outside as the train slowly departed. I
waved back with a bright smile.
The scenery blurred as the train gained speed. The platform
where the train had briefly stopped became a speck. Letting
go of the mixed feelings of regret and anticipation, I moved
to my seat as indicated on my ticket.
I carefully took my seat. Across from me sat two elderly
gentlemen who seemed to be traveling together. One wore
a fedora and was reading a newspaper, while the other, with
an unlit pipe, gazed out the window.
“Look at this.”
“Hmm? What is it?”
The man in the fedora handed the newspaper to his
companion, who leaned in to read. His eyes moved busily as
he took in the content.
“Ha, Altahart again?”
“Is there ever a financial page without news about them?”
“True… So, another hotel is opening in the capital?”
“It seems so, but they’re differentiating it from their existing
hotels.”
“Where, where…”
“Here, look at this part.”
“A special suite available only to VIPs?”
The man with the pipe sounded incredulous.
“The price is over three times that of a regular room. Who
would spend such a fortune for just one night?”
“If it’s an Altahart venture, it could work. Here, it says they
plan to link the accommodation with the Alstad department
store.”
“Targeting the wealthy, I see. Well, they say money begets
money, and there’s no lie in that.”
By chance, they were discussing Altahart. Their
astonishment showed how another venture by this
prominent family was expanding in a unique way.
It was no surprise. The foundation of every new business in
the capital had been laid by the Altahart family. They were
pioneers of wealth. Other families with companies were left
scrambling to catch up, tearing their pants in the process.
Altahart.
Leaning against the window, I whispered the distant name
to myself. Theo’s previous conversation and the reactions of
the gentlemen before me made the name ‘Altahart’ seem
like a surreal reality.
Everyone knows, yet no one truly knows.
That was the consensus and the general perception of the
name ‘Altahart.’
There was a clue in the conversation I had with Theo.
While everyone was aware of the comprehensive businesses
they ran and the enormous wealth they accumulated, very
little was known about the individual family members. What
was known was limited to a group photo, the names, ages,
and the business each member managed. That was the
extent of what the capital’s newspapers covered.
In other words, their private lives were never covered by
any major newspaper.
This indicated that the Altahart family had the power to
control the media in the capital.

Chapter 4.
They too were people who lived day by day, and indeed,
there was a life that existed. Especially because of the
prestige and value of the family, they must have attracted
countless curiosities.
Therefore, naturally, such a conclusion follows.
Despite the attention that would follow even the slightest
finger movement, the reality of no private life exposure at
all suggested that this was also their power and strength.
“Somehow… I’m getting nervous.”
Lisbell rubbed her side hair against the window.
Right now, the thought of meeting someone whose name
inevitably comes up no matter where you are in the country
made her heart thump lightly.
The train crossed rapidly towards the southwest.
Lisbell spent a long time on the train, taking brief naps,
composing a piano piece for the orphans at Misley, and
leisurely observing the outside scenery.
The distance to Marnia was quite far, so she had to transfer
trains once. Since it wasn’t a city with overnight operations,
she had no choice but to stay at a shabby inn near the
station and board the train again the next morning.
Just when her body could no longer endure the stiffness, she
finally arrived in Marnia.
Perhaps because it was a place known for being a resort
city, a pleasant breeze enveloped her whole body as soon
as she left the station.
Lisbell opened her luggage and took out a notebook. After
firmly memorizing the address she had carefully noted
during her phone call with her mother, she quickly walked to
where the carriages were.
The path she found by asking around wasn’t boring. The
sights of Marnia, which she was seeing for the first time in
her life, made it so. As she passed through the bustling city
streets lined with government offices responsible for the
city’s circulation and shops that enliven the residents, a vast
open meadow unfolded.
The green grass swayed slowly to the left and right in the
wind. It looked like a giant green wave. The landscape that
naturally made her curl her fingers into a fist was like a
scene from a fairy tale.
It wasn’t long before Lisbell got off the carriage.
Beyond a path that seemed to be led by trees, part of an
unmistakable mansion could be seen.
Keeping her eyes on that trace, she walked diligently, and
soon the path ended. At the same time, what appeared was
a huge iron gate surrounding the mansion.
And in front of it was,
“Mother.”
Perhaps because she had informed her in advance about her
expected arrival time, Mrs. Osborne had come out to meet
her.
With a smile, Lisbell ran towards her. Her mother, extending
her arms, embraced the daughter who had come a long
way. From the hands patting her back, a warmth that she
could always feel transferred.
“Have you been well?”
“Of course. It must have been hard to come all the way
here.”
“No, not really. On the way here, I thought it was rather
fortunate that you didn’t come to Misley. I had to transfer
trains and sit continuously, so my back got really stiff. I
think it was better that I came.”
“Did you? Let’s go inside first.”
Mrs. Osborne, who stroked her talkative daughter’s cheek,
took Lisbell’s luggage, which had been set aside for their
reunion.
Lisbell declined, saying she was fine, and took it back
herself. Then, she carefully began to speak.
“You seem to have lost a bit of weight since I last saw you at
the graduation ceremony. Are you feeling unwell?”
“I’m perfectly fine.”
Mrs. Osborne, calming her concerned daughter with a gentle
smile, headed inside the gate. Lisbell followed her.
“How is Theodore doing?”
“He’s fine. He wanted to come with me this time too, but it’s
a very busy period at the orphanage because of an
inspection, so we couldn’t both leave.”
“Haha, he’s still so diligent, isn’t he?”
“Yes, he kept asking me to convey his regards to you.”
Even just the land outside the gate seemed vast and open,
and the garden inside was no different. So, as Lisbell and
her mother chatted, she looked around here and there.
Noticing her daughter’s curiosity, Mrs. Osborne briefly
explained the layout of the garden.
The pavilion wrapped in decorative rose vines, the silverframed fountain with sparkling water flowing as if brought
from the sea, the statue with clear relief, and the greenishyellow car parked beyond.
And finally,
Droplets leaped into the air.
The lively spray felt refreshing and cool, and only when it
did she discover the swimming pool basked in full sunlight.
“We should greet him first.”
Mrs. Osborne pointed at the swimming pool with her eyes
and led the way. Lisbell swallowed nervously as she
followed.
The water surface moved as if alive.
The energy slicing through the water was powerful yet
relaxed. Broad shoulders and white skin supporting them
briefly appeared and then disappeared with the fierce
bubbles.
Soon, a sound of liberation echoed as someone emerged
from the water. The droplets that splashed made Lisbell’s
mind suddenly clear as if she were drenched.
The form gradually took shape over clear eyes.
Platinum blonde hair, still wet from the water, clung faintly,
and the well-defined abs of his upper body became more
prominent.
The noon sunlight made the water covering him sparkle.
Maybe that’s why he seemed to sparkle so much.
Finding his long hair cumbersome, the man brushed it back
to reveal his forehead and turned toward the source of the
sound.
Instantly, their eyes met.
At the same time, the massive bell sound rang out as if it
would shake the earth.
Although she knew it was the church’s device set to ring at
regular intervals, her heart pounded because the sound of
the bell and the shock she received felt similar.
He was an incredibly beautiful man.
If he had stayed still, she would have believed he was a
sculpture crafted by a god.
But he was undoubtedly real.
The playful action of scrunching his eyes and covering his
ears as if annoyed by the loud bell proved it.
Of course, Lisbell had already seen his face in the
newspapers.
But the feeling was completely different.
The small, black-and-white, low-resolution newspaper photo
couldn’t capture the man before her. Words like
“remarkable” or “handsome” that people said after the
photo was released were insufficient to describe him.
The man swam towards the safety ladder at the edge of the
pool. As he climbed up, his exposure, already leaving no
room for her eyes, became even more noticeable.
Despite standing in front of others with only his lower half
covered, he showed no signs of shrinking.
While Lisbell’s eyes rolled in embarrassment, Mrs. Osborne
quietly moved. She approached the man with a towel
prepared by the pool and draped it over his shoulders. The
man bent slightly to accept it naturally.
By then, the bell sound had been forgotten.
“Lisbell?”
The man, shaking his wet platinum blonde hair, approached
her. Hearing her name from his mouth felt surreal. As she
pondered his identity, the man casually extended his hand.
“Nice to meet you. I’m Ulrich Altahart.”
The elegant baritone voice created by his rolling tongue
awakened the bewildered Lisbell. Only then did she realize
he was offering a handshake and hurriedly accepted it.
“N-nice to meet you. I’m Lisbell Osborne. I was honored to
receive an invitation through my mother.”
Ulrich smiled, crinkling his delicate eyes at her timid voice.
He tightened his grip on her hand momentarily before
releasing it.


Chapter 5.
A gaze that was close to searching wandered across Lisbell’s
face.
“Miss Lisbell looks just like her mother.”
Ulrich monotonously whispered as he released the hand he
had once gripped tightly.
“Every time I see your mother, I think she has a very
classical beauty.”
“That’s too kind of you.”
It was Mrs. Osborne, not Lisbell, who responded to the
compliment, as if it were not something she could refuse.
Ulrich shrugged and turned his back after giving her a
glance.
He approached the pergola shaded by a thousand threads of
fabric, removed his towel, and donned a housecoat. Then,
he took a cigarette from the case on the table and lit it.
There was no urgency in his actions until he lit the cigarette.
He seemed accustomed to making the person waiting for
his next words endure, his every gesture exuding a leisurely
air.
“I don’t know how long you’ll be staying here, but I’ve asked
them to give you the best guest room, so please rest
comfortably.”
Leaning against the table, he exhaled smoke and gently
curved his mild eyes.
Lisbell quickly bowed her waist.
“Thank you for your consideration.”
“Don’t mention it. I heard you’re soon to be married to your
fiancé.”
“Oh….”
“Hm? Is that not the case?”
“Oh, no. That’s right.”
She was slightly surprised that her mother’s employer knew
such details. She had not expected an employer of
Altahart’s stature to be so caring as to know every detail
about his employees.
He smiled brightly at Lisbell’s confirmed answer, waving his
hands. He swept up his still-wet hair.
“When do you plan to have the ceremony?”
“Probably around August… I think.”
“August.”

“You’ll be a bride in late summer.”
He spoke softly as he stubbed out the cigarette in a crystal
ashtray after taking a few more puffs with a nonchalant
attitude.
“Congratulations on your wedding in advance.”
Ulrich, who had briefly concluded the conversation,
straightened his leaning body.
The muscles of his chest, faintly visible through the parted
robe, were taut. It was a wild aspect that did not match his
elegant and handsome appearance.
“Mrs. Osborne, after you take care of my meal today, feel
free to spend your time as you wish. It wouldn’t make your
daughter, who has come from far away, feel neglected.”
“Are you going to the study?”
“Yes. If the review of the documents is delayed any further,
Loisden will come down here to devour me alive.”
He turned toward the pool, muttering that it was best to
avoid troublesome matters. Then, he waved his hand to the
two women in a lighthearted manner more fitting for a child.
The grace he had exuded earlier momentarily disappeared.
Mrs. Osborne respectfully bowed to that leisurely figure.
Lisbell, standing beside her, followed suit, bowing
inadvertently. A faint chuckle came from the retreating man.
With the villa’s owner gone, Lisbell followed her mother into
the shaded mansion.
She had thought it was appropriately sunny for noon, but
inside the building, it felt slightly chilly.
The interior was just as luxurious as the exterior. Despite
having been neglected for a few years, the mansion had
been under strict management for the past month since its
owner returned.
“This is the room you’ll be staying in.”
“Where will you be staying, Mother?”
“I usually use the attached annex next door, but while
you’re here, I’ve been allowed to stay with you. It’s the
room right next door.”
Relieved, Lisbell set down her luggage and looked around
the room.
She realized that when they said they were giving her the
best guest room, it wasn’t just words. The room was
exceedingly luxurious for the daughter of an employee. The
selection and placement of the furniture, decorations, and
even the size of the room showed great care.
It was a room fit for a noble young lady coming to enjoy a
party, not just an ordinary person’s daughter.
“You must be hungry after the long journey. Shall I prepare a
meal?”
“Yes, that would be nice. Can we eat together?”
“After I serve the master. Can you wait until then?”
“Of course.”
Lisbell replied cheerfully and sat on the bed. Unlike the
dormitory bed from her college days or the orphanage bed
she currently stayed in, it made no creaking sound. It must
be very expensive.
“Mother…”
“Yes?”
Mrs. Osborne, who was closing the curtains to block the
sunlight from her daughter, turned her head.
“Is he really that Altahart?”
“Yes.”

“Why do you ask?”
“He feels a bit different from what I imagined.”
Lisbell lowered her gaze. Mrs. Osborne, guessing what her
daughter was thinking, silently smiled.
“Yes, I felt the same way.”

“Because there’s so little known about him, there are bound
to be preconceived notions. He seems a bit unique, but he
doesn’t seem like a bad person.”
“Yes. Just seeing how he cares for us.”
Lisbell looked at her mother. Her purple eyes, like frozen
purple blossoms, sparkled transparently.
“Is there anything I should be particularly careful about
while I’m here?”
“Well… I haven’t been given any specific instructions, but
we should avoid doing anything that might upset the
master.”
“Yes, I will.”
“You must be tired from the journey. Rest while I take care of
the master’s meal.”
Mrs. Osborne gently stroked Lisbell’s shoulder and left the
room. Lisbell approached the window.
While Mrs. Osborne thought this meeting was just to create
one last memory before the wedding, Lisbell had a different
purpose.
After marrying Theodore, Lisbell planned to move to another
country with him. They dreamed of establishing a primary
school in a remote area to teach the growing children.
It was a dream she had held since entering college. Even
when she kept it to herself, her mother, Mrs. Osborne, was
always part of that vision.
However, she realized it was just her own bright wish during
a conversation with her mother before graduation.
Her mother, who Lisbell expected would follow her, refused.
She declared she would stay in Marnia and continue
managing the villa.
“Why, Mother?”
“Your marriage is your future and hope, not mine. Lisbell, I
am very happy just knowing I raised you to this point. I think
it’s wonderful that you’ve grown up so well without a father.
So, when you create a new family independent of me, I want
to remain here as a place you can always return to. As your
hometown and starting point.”
At that time, Lisbell couldn’t understand why her mother
wouldn’t choose to live with her.
But over time, she began to understand.
Lisbell knew better than anyone the burden her mother bore
raising her alone. She knew it must have been a difficult
process, one that couldn’t be handled with ordinary
affection.
Her mother’s maternal love was still strong, and now she
couldn’t bring herself to burden her daughter.
As people age, the weight of life increases. There are more
places to hurt and more things to care about. Her mother
couldn’t shake the thought that all future hardships would
burden Lisbell.
As she began to understand this, she had to step back but
couldn’t completely give up.
After graduating from university last winter, Lisbell and
Theodore stayed at a small orphanage in Misley, constantly
pondering. She still wanted to take care of her mother
closely. Theodore agreed with her.
“I hope you can persuade her. You can do it.”
The encouragement Theodore gave at the station
strengthened her resolve.
So, Lisbell was determined to persuade her mother during
this trip.
“…Hah.”
But upon arriving and seeing Altahart’s villa, her
determination began to waver. As she had anticipated, it
was too good a workplace to give up just for relocation.
If the employer had been bad and ill-tempered, she could
have used that as a reason to persuade her mother, but
there was nothing unpleasant about the man she met today.
Rather, he was so kind that she felt naturally inclined to bow
to him.
There was no need to recall the recent memories; even her
mother’s words reflected it.
When a subordinate says, “He’s not a bad person,” it means
he’s truly good.
Lisbell pressed her forehead against the glass, staring
blankly.
Even the migrating birds flying across the sky seemed
peaceful. It felt like the first day at Altahart’s villa would
pass quite blandly.

Chapter 6.
Tweet Tweet
As the sunlight pierced through her eyelids, Lisbell
reluctantly woke up.
With a long yawn, she brushed her messy, tangled hair
aside. Her fine, curly hair often got tangled while she slept.
It was a feature she didn’t particularly like when she was
younger, but she didn’t mind it as much now.
“Why don’t you like it?”
“It takes so long to fix. Other girls can just smooth their hair
down with their hands, but I can’t do that.”
“I always thought it was adorable, like a little cloud.”
Ever since Theodore had said that with a shy smile, the curls
didn’t seem so bad. Though her hair was more like rain
clouds with its light ash color than fluffy white clouds, being
called cute made her heart flutter.
“Mmm…”
Stretching, Lisbell turned her head to look out the window.
It was the third morning in Marnia.
After a quick wash, Lisbell checked the time.
Seeing that it was still before noon, she knew her mother
would be busy with her duties as the villa caretaker.
According to what she had heard yesterday, today was the
day supplies were delivered, so her mother would be
occupied with sorting them all morning.
Although they had come to Marnia for a vacation together,
her mother had to continue managing the villa. The
employer, who wasn’t pleased with her mother’s absence,
had agreed to cover the expenses in exchange for this
condition.
It wasn’t an uncomfortable arrangement for Lisbell or Mrs.
Osborne.
This was a good deal for both Lisbell and Mrs. Osborne.
Having one more person at the villa didn’t significantly
increase her mother’s workload.
This meant that once the essential tasks were done, Mrs.
Osborne had plenty of free time.
Having dinner together until late into the night two days ago
and enjoying a barefoot walk along the beach yesterday
were results of this freedom.
I’m not sure, but…
He doesn’t seem to be a bad person.
Despite asking if there were any precautions she should
take upon arrival, Lisbell hadn’t seen the man since that
first day.
Seeing her mother occasionally leaving to attend to him
made it clear that he was staying at the villa. However, due
to different routines or perhaps to avoid disturbing their
mother-daughter time, they had not run into him even by
chance.
Looks like I have some time left.
Her mother’s tasks would take a bit longer to complete.
Wondering how to pass the time, Lisbell remembered the
library she had discovered while exploring the villa
yesterday.
She hadn’t been warned against entering any specific areas.
So, she decided that borrowing a few books wouldn’t be a
problem and left her room with enthusiasm.
The morning library was quiet.
Lisbell moved silently among the bookshelves. Thanks to
her studies in humanities, she recognized many author’s
names and titles.
She hadn’t expected much from the library of a villa, but
there were quite a few good books. Her initial plan to
quickly grab a few books turned into a full exploration,
examining each neatly arranged book.
“If you keep going, the day will break before you know it.”
Her hand, which was brushing the spines of the books,
froze. Lisbell quickly withdrew her hand and turned around.
The first thing she noticed was the bright platinum blonde
hair. Ulrich was sitting at a desk, backlit by the window,
gazing at her with his chin in his hand. Shocked to realize
someone else was there and then recognizing him as the
villa’s owner, whom she hadn’t seen for three days, Lisbell
pressed herself against the bookshelf.
“Oh, I’m sorry.”
He tapped the desk with a fountain pen and squinted at her.
“Did I say something to apologize for?”
“Well… it looks like you’re working, and I interrupted you.”
“You were moving so quietly, though.”
“…”
“I was just thinking you were like a cat.”
“…”
“If you had kept going, I might have checked under your
skirt to see if you had a tail.”
He must be joking, right?
Unsure of his intentions, Lisbell gave an awkward smile.
Ulrich responded with a faint smile as if acknowledging her
reaction.
He lowered his hand from his chin and crossed his arms.
“Is the selection not to your liking?”
“Pardon?”
“I thought I stocked it with quite rare books. Even some not
registered in the Royal Capital Library.”
“No…! As you said, there are many good books, so I was
just taking my time looking.”
“I see.”
Ulrich stood up from his chair. With a few long strides, he
was already beside her. 
It seemed he intended to choose books for her, running his
long fingers along the book spines.
The difference in their height was apparent. The fifth shelf
was the highest Lisbell could reach on her tiptoes, but the
third shelf was easy for him, and he could probably reach
the first shelf without effort.
“Mrs. Osborne must be busy?”
He asked, his voice resonating in the quiet room, making
her eardrums itch.
“Yes. Today is the day supplies arrive from outside…”
Ulrich chuckled. His eyes twinkled with mischief as he
looked at her.
“Someone might think you’re a worker here, Lisbell,
knowing things even I don’t.”
He picked a book and placed it in her arms. The title was
*Why Cats Raise Their Tails*.
“I heard it from my mother yesterday. She mentioned she’d
be busy all morning…”
“So, you came to the library.”
“Yes, that’s right.”
Tak, Tak
As she inspected the books he added to her pile, her
response became slightly delayed.
*The Nature of Cats*, *Things to Consider to Understand
Cats*.
Surely not, but Ulrich kept handing her books only about
cats. She had thought he was joking about the cat comment
earlier.
Unable to hide her confusion, Lisbell alternated between
looking at the books and the man in front of her, finally
speaking up.
“Um… I appreciate your recommendations, but…”
Ulrich, who had been grabbing another book, paused and
laughed. His laugh, which could have seemed frivolous,
didn’t come off that way due to his striking features.
Chuckling like a mischievous boy, he spoke in an
incredulous tone.
“Mr. Altahart?”
“What’s with that ridiculously formal title?”
“Well, um…”
“Why do you call me that?”
“Isn’t that how you should be addressed?”
“Well, yes, older business partners do.”
“…..”
“People your age call me by my first name.”
Ulrich watched her with amusement as she nervously bit her
lip, realizing he wasn’t entirely wrong.
Most people who called him by his first name right off the
bat had ulterior motives. They wanted to establish some
sort of connection, for social or business reasons.
In other words, Lisbell had no such hidden agenda. Instead,
she was clumsily drawing a line, maintaining a distance. Just
like a cat.
“You remember my first name, right?”
“Yes, of course.”
“Then use that.”
“…”
With his permission, there was no reason to hesitate, but
her lips felt heavy.
As she hesitated, Ulrich’s eyes narrowed. He began piling
more books into her arms. Eventually, he started pulling
them from the shelves in clusters.
It was clear what he wanted.
“Stop…! Ulrich, stop. That’s enough…!”
Only after hearing his name did he stop piling the books.
The stack of books was so high she could barely see his
face. Through her blurred vision, she saw him with a
satisfied, languid smile.
“Is this enough?”
“Yes, enough…”
As she answered, exhausted, he took the books back from
her arms.
“Why was that so hard? I’ve been calling you Lisbell from
the start, haven’t I?”
“…”
“By the way, Lisbell, your name sounds like a fruit.
Something easy to pluck and eat.”

“….What?”
“Your mother seems to have a talent for naming.”
I was dazed for a moment, wondering if I had heard
correctly. Ulrich’s face was suddenly too close, leaning
slightly towards me. Even from a distance, his appearance
was enough to make anyone lose their composure, so facing
him up close was unimaginably overwhelming.
“Your mother named you, right?”
“Oh, yes. That’s correct.”
“The name suits you well.”
“Thank you… very much.”
It felt like a storm had passed through my mind.
All I did was stand still and have a conversation, but why did
it feel so chaotic…
Eventually, everything returned to its place, and Lisbell, with
just a few books left in her arms, straightened her back.
Although it was done in a bit of a daze, she had chosen her
books. Just as she was about to say she would be leaving,
Ulrich reached out his hand. His beautiful finger even
tapped lightly on the book Lisbell was holding.
“Where are you going to read this?”
“Of course, in my room…”
“Why don’t you read it here?”
“What?”
Lisbell’s eyes widened like a rabbit’s.
“Why… why should I?”
She expressed her question as politely as possible,
wondering if there was any reason to do so.
“I’ve been getting a bit tired of working alone here.”
“…..”
“I think it would be nice if you could keep me company
occasionally, like now.”
“Me? Wouldn’t someone else be better suited for that?”
“Are you suggesting I bring in a servant? Then who would be
appropriate? Would Mrs. Osborne, who’s likely busy, be
suitable?”
His voice was as gentle as silk, but the underlying meaning
was quite different. His unyielding stubbornness was
beautifully wrapped, making it difficult to refuse.
After a moment of contemplation, Lisbell thought it was
better for her to spend time than to have her mother stand
guard, so she reluctantly shook her head.
Seeing her half-resigned demeanor, Ulrich smiled and led
her to the library table. It was placed in front of the desk
where he was sitting. He even pulled out a chair for her,
leaving no excuse for her to leave.
Lisbell was worried he might start spouting nonsense again,
but surprisingly, Ulrich focused straight on his work upon
returning to his seat. Glancing at him once or twice, Lisbell
cautiously opened her book.
Scratch, scratch.
Flip.
The sound of a fountain pen’s nib moving across paper and
the thin pages turning alternated. The breeze softly rustling
the closed window blended into the atmosphere, making
Lisbell feel why her mother always said over the phone,
“There’s no problem here.” She turned one page after
another, immersed in the tranquil environment.
At some point, the sound of the fountain pen stopped.
Realizing this subconsciously, Lisbell looked up and found
Ulrich staring at her. As soon as their eyes met, he asked,
“How do you feel about your upcoming marriage?”
Lisbell awkwardly scratched her neck, surprised by the
unexpected question.
“Actually… it still doesn’t feel real.”
She wasn’t just being coy. It was the truth. There was a time
when marriage felt like a distant matter, irrelevant to her.
When she occasionally thought about those days, it made
her feel detached from reality.
“Do you love your fiancé?”
The next question was rather direct. This time, she felt too
shy to speak.
But answers don’t always require words.
Ulrich expressed a faint gasp of amazement.
“Wow, you blush just thinking about him?”

“That’s quite pure love.”
Ulrich seemed genuinely fascinated by her visible devotion.
He rested his chin loosely on his clasped hands.
“How did you two meet?”
“We met during a university charity event.”
The two had no direct connection, being from different
departments, but the Misley Orphanage brought them
together. Instead of going home during the holidays, they
participated in charity work at Misley, and they grew closer.
At the time, Lisbell was responsible for basic math education
and music lessons using the piano, while Theodore handled
physical education and other tasks requiring strength.
Before they spoke, they were aware of each other’s
presence. One day, while Lisbell was secretly practicing the
piano in the chapel, Theodore approached her first.
From that day on, they greeted each other, dined together,
and had tea whenever they could, gradually developing
their relationship smoothly, as if it was destined from the
beginning.
“I heard you plan to leave the country with your fiancé after
the wedding.”
“Yes, we plan to run an elementary school there together.”
“An elementary school? So… you’re going to be a teacher?”
Lisbell laughed, slightly embarrassed, at Ulrich’s playful
tone, calling her “Teacher Lisbell.” Though shy, she didn’t
seem entirely displeased, as a faint blush appeared on her
cheeks. Ulrich, observing her healthy glow, chuckled softly.
“Do you like children?”
“Yes, of course.”
“Lisbell, you seem to have a lot of things you like.”

“The world must be enjoyable for you.”
The remark sounded a bit strange, causing Lisbell to stop
smiling and face him properly.
She wanted to read his expression, but it was difficult. The
light from the window behind Ulrich cast a shadow over his
face, making it look like a living shadow itself.
Feeling inexplicably parched, Lisbell hesitated before asking,
“Doesn’t that suit you more, Ulrich?”
Judging from the background alone, it seemed that way.
From her brief time at Altahart, Lisbell had vaguely grasped
the value and lifestyle it represented.
As the owner of such a luxurious estate, with many obedient
servants at his command and the ability to indulge in
whatever he wished whenever he wanted, it seemed like a
life lacking nothing.
It seemed too opulent for an ordinary person like her.
“Do I look happy?”

“Why do you think so?”

“Because I’m Altahart?”
He tilted his head slightly.
As the angle changed, the shadow covering Ulrich’s face
lifted. His expression was calm, almost disappointingly so,
making Lisbell’s concern about offending him seem
unwarranted. But it was so emotionless that it felt abrasive,
like sand covering a desert.
“Well, at least I have enough conscience not to say I’m
unhappy.”
Ulrich flipped over a document that had been on his desk.
“But Lisbell, do you know?”

“Curiosity and excitement stem from ignorance.”
His beautifully formed fingers gently folded the paper. Once
on one side, then the other, and several more times.
“Conversely, when ignorance disappears, it’s hard to feel
those things.”

“Everything in the world becomes trivial.”
After folding the paper for a while, he finally held it up. It
was shaped perfectly for flying.
Whoosh.
With a light flick, it floated through the air. The paper model,
fluttering aimlessly, landed between the pages of Lisbell’s
open book.
“When that happens, life becomes very…”
“…..”
“Very boring.”
The man’s compelling presence made it impossible for her
to look away, even from the paper model’s intrusion.
However, it was different from when she was simply
mesmerized by his looks.
Now, it was as if the subtly crafted smile reminded her of
earlier melancholy, appearing dangerously fragile. It was
hard to describe any other way.
“To the point where you’d want to kill yourself before turning
thirty.”
The calm remark turned her suspicion into certainty.
This present sense of despair was the abyss of a living man.
As if he wanted to hang himself out of sheer boredom with
the world, just as he said.

The atmosphere, which had changed in an instant, became
heavy, making her fingertips tingle.
An overwhelming wave of discomfort came over her. Her
thoughts dulled, unsure of what to say or how to respond.
Just as her lips were meaninglessly moving, trying to utter
something, the church bell chimed, marking noon,
enveloping the library.

It’s truly elegant.
Once again, doesn’t it seem as if my heart is being
helplessly crushed by that bell?
I felt strangely suffocated. No, it’s not even strange. After
all, the shocking words that would leave anyone stunned
came out of that noble-looking man’s lips with such
composure.
Didn’t he just say… suicide?
I didn’t hear it wrong.
The more I mulled it over, the clearer it became.
My chest tightened, as if a boulder I couldn’t possibly handle
had been placed on my outstretched palm, which I believed
would be light.
If Ulrich’s attitude had genuinely matched such heavy and
difficult emotions, things wouldn’t have turned so serious so
quickly.
He showed no significant change from earlier. His
indifferent, playful, somewhat relaxed and lukewarm
demeanor made it clear to Lisbell that he could carry out
what he said without hesitation.
As I couldn’t continue speaking, the bell kept ringing.
…Ten times, eleven times, twelve times.
The silence in the already quiet study deepened. The sound
of the bell filled the room, spreading widely and deeply, and
felt particularly stiff.
I reluctantly shifted my gaze from the window frame to him.
At that moment, Ulrich’s smile had completely changed.
From a cold sneer that felt icy even without touching it, to a
gentle form that seemed to carry the warmth of spring.
“It’s a joke.”

“Judging by your expression, I should choose my jokes more
carefully with you, Lisbell.”
He chuckled and shook his head.
The tension that had briefly filled me dissipated. Only then
could Lisbell manage an awkward smile in response.
“Oh, right. A joke.”
“Yes, a joke.”

“Bearing the name Altahart, I could never commit such a
disgraceful act.”
Flutter.
Ulrich’s tone, as he flipped through the documents, was
sharp. It seemed to carry a hint of subtle irritation, but his
smiling face made it hard to be certain. Lisbell had a feeling
that the man might be very adept at acting.
“By the way, it’s already noon.”
Ulrich, who had just signed the last document with a
flourish, rose from his seat. Lisbell also realized how much
time had passed and closed her book.
“I’ll go to my bedroom and get some sleep. I’ve been
getting up early for the past few days to catch up on work,
and my head feels constantly foggy.”
He yawned slightly, indicating it wasn’t just a comment.
“Could you tell Mrs. Osborne that I’ll be skipping lunch?”
“Oh, yes. I will.”
With a slight nod, Ulrich left the study first.
Hearing the door close, Lisbell stood up slowly, holding a
paper model she had taken out before closing her book.
She approached the desk, which had a peculiar order
despite appearing cluttered. Considering how well Ulrich
worked in this chaos earlier, there must be an unseen order
within the disorder. The ornate, gold-trimmed fountain pen
left uncapped was one such element.
Thinking vaguely, Lisbell carefully placed the folded paper
model next to it.
The shadow that fell to one side grew ominously dark.

The sound of the bells filled the chapel sweetly.
The rich array of notes blended with the light hitting the
stained glass, creating a dreamy sensation. This floating
feeling was the legitimate euphoria offered by the
mysterious power of religion.
On Sunday morning, I visited the church of Marnia with my
mother. We attended the regular service for Holy Week.
Lisbell wasn’t a particularly devout believer. If it weren’t for
following her mother today, she wouldn’t necessarily attend
Holy Week.
Unlike her, Mrs. Osborne was quite devout, which was
related to her status before she married.
Mrs. Osborne had originally been a nun at a convent in a
foreign country. She was abandoned there as a baby in a
basket, grew up in that compassionate environment, and
naturally walked the path of a religious devotee.
However, she became pregnant by chance.
Despite the religious doctrine that everyone is worthy of
love under God, certain strict rules were to be adhered to in
the life of a devotee. Nuns were required to remain celibate
to serve as vessels for God. Naturally, bearing a child was
considered sinful.
Upon discovering her pregnancy, Mrs. Osborne immediately
left the convent. She moved to a distant rural village and
gave birth to Lisbell, whom she had carried for ten months.
From that day on, Mrs. Osborne devoted herself to caring for
and raising her only daughter.
Many practical barriers made her life difficult. Having relied
on religion all her life, she was naturally ignorant of how to
earn money. But money was necessary. It was indispensable
for raising a child. Whether to fill the baby’s stomach or to
keep her warm in cold, rainy, or snowy weather….
To provide for Lisbell, Mrs. Osborne took on any job she
could find. She didn’t differentiate between what she could
or couldn’t do. She went anywhere that offered payment.
When she couldn’t leave the baby behind because she was
too young, people would click their tongues, calling her
tough.
Despite this, she endured and lovingly cared for Lisbell. She
raised her through harsh and bitter times, shielding her
under a small canopy from the wind and snow.
As Lisbell began to babble and speak, they became
inseparable friends. Mrs. Osborne would smile as if she
owned the world at the child’s simple words and gestures.
Though their world wasn’t warm, it wasn’t cold either. It
offered a small warmth that could thaw frozen hands and
feet.
Some memories were hazy, others clear as day, allowing
Lisbell to understand the hardships her mother had
endured. Learning about her own background, she also
came to know her mother’s original profession.
With that knowledge, an affectionate guilt began to form in
her heart.
Her mother hadn’t disliked being a nun. The soft smile she
wore when talking about her life there was proof. Therefore,
it was entirely because of Lisbell that she had to leave that
comfortable community.
If only I hadn’t existed.
Lisbell had begun to have such thoughts so long ago that
she could no longer remember when.
Ironically, this guilt was mutual. Her mother always felt
sorry for having brought her into a life where she had to
face unnecessary hardships. For instance, enduring
relentless poverty and hardship.
Lisbell couldn’t understand her mother in this regard. Yet, at
the same time, she did understand. The more she thought
about it, the clearer it became. It was as obvious as looking
into a mirror. They shared the same feelings without an
ounce of difference.
In other words, their mutual incomprehension stemmed
from a place of deep affection.
And this affection created a sense of dissonance.
After going through a phase where they shared every detail
of their day, they started keeping things to themselves,
thinking it better not to say certain things out loud. They
became cautious, fearing that even a small misstep could
shatter their delicate relationship like a glass jar.
Their love and care for each other, while well-intentioned,
didn’t always manifest healthily or beneficially.
Excessive consideration can sometimes cause pain, just as
their relationship became a very thin glass wall. It’s possible
to tap on it, but any more than that and it might break.
Questions that could easily be asked between mother and
daughter were internally censored first, and they both
pretended to be unaffected to avoid worrying the other.
It was a consideration that couldn’t simply be blamed on
one person.
This is why they had never talked about her father
Fearing that the presence might hurt her mother, she
avoided it, and it became a kind of taboo word. Her
mother’s love was so abundant that she never really felt any
lack in that regard.
“Hello, Sister Helen.”
It was near the end of the service.
Someone approached and spoke to her mother. Unlike
Lisbell, who was visiting for the first time, her mother
seemed quite familiar since she attended every Sunday.
A woman, who looked somewhat worried and wore a
mantilla like a devout believer, held her mother’s sleeve.
Mrs. Osborne interrupted her and looked at Lisbell standing
beside her.
“Lisbell, it looks like this conversation might take a while.
Could you wait outside?”
“Yes, I’ll do that.”
Lisbell nodded at the approaching woman and exited the
chapel first. Sitting in front of a flower bed with tiny stones,
she watched the bright yellow buttercups planted inside.
Soon, Mrs. Osborne approached.
Lisbell shook her head at her mother’s apology for making
her wait and pointed outside the church.
“Mother, I saw a lovely coffee house in front earlier. How
about stopping by there before heading back to the villa?”
“Shall we?”
The coffee house they went to was quiet, as it was not yet
noon. In the distance, a cheese-colored cat, presumably
owned by the house owner, waved its tail and meowed.
Lisbell took a seat by the window where the sunlight poured
in warmly, with her mother.
“So, how much more time do you need?”
“Pardon?”
“You have something you want to say to me, don’t you?”
Lisbell, startled, chuckled almost in resignation.
“Really, Mother, I can’t win against you. How long have you
known?”
“It’s obvious when you’re lost in thought every time we’re
together. Please understand my situation of pretending not
to notice even though I did.”
Mrs. Osborne smiled and sipped the coffee she had ordered.
Lisbell, feeling embarrassed, straightened her posture.
“I still want to be close to you, Mother.”

“Even after I get married.”
Though she said it with determination, her mother didn’t
seem particularly surprised. In the next moment, the calm
look on her face made Lisbell realize that her mother had
vaguely anticipated this topic.
“I’m very glad you think of me that way.”

“But I clearly told you before. My thoughts haven’t
changed.”
“Mother.”
“Lisbell, I have no intention of becoming a burden in your
future.”
“Why do you think of yourself as a burden?”

“How could you ever be a burden to me….”
Her mother’s warm smile felt like an unbreakable fortress
today. No matter how hard she tried to break it down, it was
a barrier she couldn’t cross. Feeling dejected, she bowed her
head slightly, and a gentle hand rested on hers.
“Leaving here doesn’t mean saying goodbye forever. Just
like now, you can see me whenever you want. We’ll meet
before your wedding too. Even if we live apart, we can still
stay in touch by phone or letters if the situation makes calls
difficult.”
“But….”
“Everything I have built is here. Moving to start a new life
there would be overwhelming and difficult. I worry it might
become a burden for you during that process.”

“So, I want to stay here and be your foundation. You need to
look forward rather than backward. I raised you with the
hope that you would move forward.”
Lisbell bit her lower lip.
Her mother’s resolve was firm, but the underlying affection
was palpable.
How could she insist further?
It was sad to hear her mother describe herself as a ‘burden’
or ‘past,’ but it paradoxically conveyed her true feelings.
Indeed, experience couldn’t be ignored. Her mother had
unknowingly persuaded her. A corner of her heart ached.
“Besides, I can’t give up such a great job like managing the
Marinia villa.”
Patting Lisbell’s hand, her mother made an awkward joke.
Lisbell, whose eyes were slightly red, paused before
deliberately smiling brightly.
Their ordered drinks slowly dwindled as they engaged in
conversation. They talked about Lisbell’s school days, her
teary moments before starting dorm life at university, and
other trivial memories.
Spending such harmonious time together, Lisbell reaffirmed
her belief.
Being her mother’s daughter was incredibly happy.
Though her mother often felt guilty about what she couldn’t
do, Lisbell’s memories were filled with the happiness her
mother provided. Moments of appreciating and enjoying the
happiness her mother brought.
The sun shining at their feet was a brilliant orange.
After a brief rest, they returned to the villa. Lisbell’s eyes
caught on something unusual. Beside the familiar greenishyellow car, there was a strange black sedan.
Who could it be?
Her curiosity was short-lived. Lisbell walked into the villa.
Returning to the guest room, she untied the ribbon at her
neckline and noticed a book on the wooden table. It was one
she borrowed from the study two days ago. She decided to
return it and left the room with the book in her arms.
The corridor leading to the study was long like a maze. As
she walked on the soft carpet, she heard a bang!
A gunshot.
Her instincts reacted before her rational mind. She stood
frozen, her heart pounding.
Bang!
Bang! bang!
The destructive sound that could shatter the peaceful world
continued. Lisbell quietly moved towards an open window.
Another bang rang out as if to shoot her down.
A long shadow cast on the ground.
It wasn’t a false déjà vu.
The man who sent her a folded paper in the past was the
one making these aggressive sounds.
It was Ulrich.
His profile was balanced and solid. His relaxed stance, the
rolled-up sleeves of his shirt revealing muscular arms with
bulging veins, and the black protective gear on his
shoulders were striking.
Bang!
A bullet flew at incredible speed and hit the target.
A distant target was set up. Lisbell wasn’t walking this
corridor for the first time. She had never seen such a target
here before. It seemed like an improvised shooting range.
Even after firing, Ulrich didn’t lower his arm. His
experienced stance showed he was no novice.
His straight back and firmly planted legs were steady. He
resembled a fierce hunter who never missed his prey.
Yet, there was an inexplicable nobility in his actions. The
gun, a symbol of violence, became a luxurious accessory in
his hands. Despite the loud, fierce sounds, he remained
calm and emotionless, creating an air of cold elegance.
But it was only for a moment.
A crease formed on his previously untroubled brow. He
lowered the arm he had been holding up towards the target,
frowning. The hand not holding the gun rose to massage his
shoulder, which was strapped with a protective pad. It
seemed that the recoil had made his muscles sore.
Now she noticed there was another person in the courtyard.
While Ulrich was firing at the target, a man who had been
standing to the side approached him as he stopped
shooting.
He was a stranger.
Though he wore a shirt and trousers, unlike Ulrich, who
looked more relaxed without a tie or vest and with rolled-up
sleeves, this new man wore a tie and cufflinks, giving him a
much more formal and respectful appearance.
The two men moved towards the shaded area of the
courtyard.
A long table stood there, neatly arrayed with guns spaced
evenly apart. The two men exchanged words. To be precise,
Ulrich spoke, and the new man diligently took notes in a
small notebook.
Suddenly, the black sedan near the fountain came to mind.
Perhaps he was from the capital. Judging by his attentive
demeanor, it seemed likely that he was Ulrich’s secretary,
assisting with his business affairs.
“Well, he did seem extremely busy.”
Ulrich’s busy schedule was something she had already
witnessed in the study. The towering stacks of documents
had seemed precarious, as if they might topple over at any
moment.
He handled the piles of paperwork as if such a workload was
nothing unusual, reviewing the documents with the same
impassive expression he had when he hit the bullseye.
“Ah.”
She involuntarily let out a small sound.
Ulrich, who had been talking with the man presumed to be
his secretary, was now looking up at Lisbell. With a formal
yet endearing smile, he waved at her. She didn’t know when
he had noticed her, but there was no surprise in his
demeanor. The secretary had vanished like smoke.
“Lisbell, what are you doing up there?”
“I was heading to the study when I heard gunshots. I was
curious about what was going on.”
“Ah, sorry. It must have been noisy.”
He glanced at the gun in his hand, then at her face, and
raised his arms in a gesture of mock surrender.
Lisbell felt her ribs tighten. It was a sign of tension. She
quickly recalled why she felt this way.
“I’d rather die before I turn thirty.”
Those words had lingered heavily in her mind.
Though he had immediately brushed it off as a joke to
lighten the mood, it was hard to fully accept his
reassurance.
Ulrich, who had undoubtedly reached his current position
through numerous business relationships, was undoubtedly
skilled in dealing with people. His eyes sometimes gleamed
with an unnerving clarity, suggesting he had an innate
ability to read situations.
So when he had downplayed the seriousness of his
statement, she couldn’t help but wonder if there was some
truth behind it.
Regardless of his true intentions, the fact remained that he
had spoken of suicide, a topic that pained her to even think
about, with a casual smile while holding a gun.
What if he suddenly turned the gun on himself and pulled
the trigger without hesitation?
The thought, which had nagged at her, now felt like a sharp
stab in her chest.
While Lisbell was lost in these unspoken thoughts, he
gestured calmly for her to come down. After a moment’s
hesitation, she nodded.
First, she went to the study to put the book back in its place,
then hurried down the stairs. Knowing someone was waiting
for her made her steps on the hallway carpet a bit more
urgent. Though she wasn’t running recklessly, she wasn’t
walking leisurely either when she arrived at the courtyard.
By then, Ulrich had removed the shoulder pad he had been
wearing like an epaulet.
Beneath the shirt, which clung perfectly to his frame, his
muscles moved dynamically. She knew what lay beneath the
fabric; she had seen his bare torso with her own eyes. The
scene of water droplets trickling down his chest and abs was
still vivid in her mind.
“Are you here?”
She nodded, and Ulrich’s hand suddenly reached toward her
face. Startled, she stepped back.
Ulrich’s eyes widened. Then he laughed softly and removed
a leaf stuck to her hair. He waved it playfully in front of her,
signaling that there was no need for her to be so wary.
Feeling embarrassed by her exaggerated reaction, Lisbell
murmured her thanks.
“I heard you went to the city with Mrs. Osborne.”
“Yes, we attended morning prayer together. We just
returned to the villa a short while ago.”
“Ah, church.”
After a brief response, he naturally changed the subject.
“Have you ever shot a gun?”
“No, never.”
It was her first time even seeing one in person.
“Would you like to try?”
“Me?”
Lisbell’s eyes widened.
Ulrich chuckled at her surprised reaction.
“Yes, you.”
“No, I’d rather not.”
“Why not?”
“…”
“Are you scared?”
“Yes.”
“There’s nothing to be afraid of. You saw it earlier, right? I’ve
already tested all of these. There’s nothing defective among
them. One had a bit of a strong recoil, but my secretary
already took it away.”
Despite his reassurances, she still felt uneasy. After all, she
knew these were weapons designed to harm others.
Sensing her hesitation, Ulrich sighed softly.
“You never know.”
The corners of his mouth stretched into a long, snake-like
grin.
“There might come a time when you want to shove a gun in
your husband’s mouth.”
He was clearly skilled in social interactions, but sometimes
his comments were so unpredictable and unsettling that she
couldn’t tell if he was just teasing her. Lisbell looked at
Ulrich, who could make such bizarre and disturbing remarks
as easily as he breathed, unsure whether to laugh or frown.
“Come here.”
Ignoring her reaction, Ulrich pulled her wrist.
“It’s not hard. As long as you hold it correctly and maintain
your stance, nothing will go wrong.”
His deep voice wrapped around her ears, making her think
of the hand that had just removed the leaf from her hair.
Ulrich positioned Lisbell beside him, pressing his body
against hers as he placed a pre-selected gun in her hands.
The cold metal felt strange against her palm.
“See, the trigger guard fits your hand perfectly. It felt a bit
tight on my fingers.”
“Am I holding it correctly?”
“Yes. And your other hand goes here.”
She was startled, not by the unfamiliar object in her hand
but by Ulrich’s natural embrace as he adjusted her stance.
She hadn’t expected such contact. The unfamiliar weight
made her eyes widen. Her heart tightened and then
released, sending blood rushing through her body. The
sudden increase in circulation made her vision blur
momentarily.
“Focus.”
Ulrich’s voice was calm and detached, as if to emphasize
that his touch was purely instructional.
His gaze was similarly detached, fixed intently on the target.
Lisbell was flustered.
It was clear that only she was overly conscious of the
situation.
She took a deep breath, trying to regain her composure.
Ulrich’s fingers brushed her shoulder, lightly squeezing and
then releasing, before slowly trailing down her waist to her
side.
The hand was over the blouse. The large palm moved across
the fabric, yet the warmth that can only be felt with skin-toskin contact seeped through.
Was it because the cloth was too thin, or was it because the
man’s touch was too slow and lingering?
In the midst of this ambiguous sensation, the air grew
sharp. The tension was so high that one wrong breath might
cut through it.
“Your waist.”
Perhaps her posture had slightly shifted due to tension.
Ulrich’s hand, now resting near her pelvis, applied strong
pressure.
Instinctively, she tried to pull away, but her body
straightened, finding its proper posture. This brought them
even closer, almost as if they were hugging if seen from
afar. Closing her eyes tightly from the intense tension, she
heard a low chuckle near her ear.
“It’s shooting practice, Lisbell.”

“You shouldn’t close your eyes.”

“Open them.”
At the quiet command, she lifted her eyelids, revealing thick
eyelashes. In front of her was the sleek muzzle of a gun
aimed at a round target.
“Don’t take your eyes off it.”
His voice, though soft as if it could melt, carried an
undeniable authority. It exuded a suffocating arrogance as if
it were natural for him to have others underfoot.
“Take a deep breath.”
The fear remained. Perhaps that’s why she was compelled
to follow his instructions even more rigorously.
Lisbell took a small breath in.
“Straighten your back.”
She straightened her spine, already stiff from the tension,
even more.
“Keep your legs steady.”
She pressed her feet firmly into the ground as if to brace
herself.
“Now, pull the finger you have on the guard inward.”
She squeezed her finger on the trigger.
Immediately, she felt a tremendous recoil. Her body, cradled
as if in his embrace, couldn’t withstand it and stumbled. Her
shoulder throbbed as if it were being crushed. The loud
gunshot left a slight ringing in her ears.
For a moment, her heightened senses gradually calmed
down, leaving only a stinging numbness in her palm.
“How was it?”
“Haah…”
“Doesn’t it feel refreshing?”
In a way, it did.
For a moment, she felt as if her body was floating in the air.
It felt like her heart had plummeted, similar to the sensation
of every nerve in her body screaming. It wouldn’t be strange
to believe that the bullet had hit her instead. Gradually, the
tension unwound, bringing a sense of relief.
But it wasn’t just refreshing. A tingling aftershock lingered in
her mind and body, reminding her that this was indeed a
lethal weapon.
It was a terrible relief.
“The result is pitiful.”
At his words, she quickly lifted her head.
What? Lisbell wondered. She had definitely aimed and fired,
but there was no new mark on the target. Ulrich glanced
towards something with his eyes. Not the target, but a tree
trunk where a mark had appeared.
Realizing she had damaged an innocent tree, Lisbell was
speechless. Ulrich took the gun from her hands, smiling.
“To think you didn’t even hit the target…”
“Well, it’s my first time. Unless someone has an exceptional
sense, that’s how it usually goes.”
“Did you… go through the same?”
“Hm.”
He laughed awkwardly.
“I managed to nick the edge of the target.”
“…You must have had quite a natural talent.”
Ulrich, checking the magazine, smiled brightly. It was a
compliment she accepted with a bow. Despite not expecting
much, the dismal result left Lisbell alternating glances
between the target and the tree, before focusing on the
target’s center.
“Still, you must have practiced a lot.”
“Hm?”
“All your shots earlier hit the center.”
“Oh, well. I practiced occasionally when I had the time.
Besides, the main house isn’t exactly a place where I can
practice comfortably.”
“Why not?”
It seemed there should be no difficulty in setting up a
makeshift target in the courtyard like now. Puzzled, Lisbell
asked, and Ulrich smiled wryly as if recalling something.
“My mother has a fit when it comes to fguns.”
Bang!
As he finished speaking, he quickly raised the gun in his
hand, took aim, and fired. A faint haze rose in the air. The
makeshift target among the thick branches trembled.
Again, the center.
There was no missing.
“One time, I showed her this, and she nearly fainted,
clutching her forehead. Her acting is so convincing that I’m
still not sure if it was real or not. As a result, my prized gun
was confiscated that day. It was a specially commissioned
piece with gold plating on the slide, one of the few in the
world.”
Lisbell blinked slowly.
It seemed like an exaggerated complaint, but given his
evident frustration, it made her think his mother might have
overreacted. Then again, she knew nothing about his
circumstances and could have just brushed it off as some
trivial noble matter.
But maybe… his mother knew something too?
Consciousness accumulates like sediment. His desire to die
didn’t come overnight. It might have emerged gradually,
adding weight over time until it could be discussed so
casually now.
Parents are often more sensitive about their children. They
tend to notice subtle hints that others might miss.
Perhaps that’s why his mother was so terrified and took
away the gun.
“Still, it seems you’re not entirely without talent. My college
friend couldn’t even hit the makeshift target. He was all
bluster and ended up firing into the ground. Those are the
kinds of people who shouldn’t talk about having a ‘sense’.”
“Haha…”
“How about it, Lisbell?”
“Yes?”
“Would you like to learn to shoot from me while you’re
here?”
He handed her the gun again. Feeling its weight in her
hands, Lisbell quickly shook her head.
“No, no, it’s fine. I don’t think it suits me. Honestly… I’m still
scared. My heart feels like it’s going to burst. It’s even worse
now that I’ve tried it. The fear of accidentally hurting
someone…”
“You’re quite timid.”
“It’s a gun. Any woman would feel the same. Besides, I’m
not staying here long enough… I’ll be returning to Misley
soon.”
Ulrich, who had been brushing his hair in the breeze,
paused.
“Lisbell, are you leaving soon?”
“Yes, I think so.”
Returning to the villa with her mother today, Lisbell decided
it was time to return to Misley. Her resolve, which was
almost like a mission, was bent by her mother’s gentle
persuasion, and she was increasingly worried about
Theodore, who was waiting for her alone in Misley.
“This vacation had a purpose. I wanted to persuade my
mother to move with me after my marriage. But… she’s
quite fond of this place. She firmly stated she wouldn’t
leave, so I can’t insist anymore.”
“I see.”
“Yes. Oh, by the way…”
“Hm?”
“Do you know of any good dress shops in town?”
During the morning service, she noticed her mother’s
sleeves were frayed. The fabric had been mended multiple
times, with the stitches clearly visible.
Having not lived a life of abundance, Mrs. Osborne disliked
spending money unnecessarily. She always taught Lisbell to
use it wisely and only when necessary.
And now, Lisbell believed that buying her mother a new
dress was precisely that necessary expenditure.
“A dress shop?”
“Yes, I’d like to buy my mother a dress before I leave….”
“Ah.”
He nodded as if he understood.
“A dress shop in town…”
He fell silent, his gaze distant. Soon, a charming smile
appeared on his face.
“Shall I go with you?”
“Pardon?”
“Let’s go together.”

“I’ll join you.”
A familiar smile approached her.
She had felt it before, but he often behaved in this friendly,
informal manner. He seemed well aware that his outward
appearance was a powerful weapon, and he didn’t hesitate
to make direct eye contact and draw close to people.
Even now, as he made this mysterious suggestion, it was
the same.
“Aren’t you too busy to be so concerned about me?”
Surprised, she asked belatedly, and Ulrich shrugged his
shoulders.
“Taking a day off won’t ruin my business.”

“Well.”

“Hm?”
Even a mute puppy wouldn’t beg like this.
Lisbell stared at Ulrich awkwardly.
She wanted to refuse, feeling it would be a bother in many
ways, but something held her back.
Something that still lingered in her mind.
A disturbing comment she had heard, something that had
stuck with her ever since.
It was a chilling remark that sounded like it came from
someone suffering from long-term depression….
Although she was not a medical expert and knew nothing
about clinical psychology, she understood that people with
such symptoms required careful handling. It was especially
bad to confine oneself to a limited space and reduce one’s
range of activity….
Unfortunately, the place where she heard talk of suicide was
a very secluded study. The scratchy sound of the fountain
pen she heard that day still echoed in her ears.

Ulrich coldly smiled inwardly as he watched the woman in
front of him deep in thought. He could easily guess what she
was thinking.
When he watched her standing in the hallway through the
glass earlier, she looked as worried as if watching a child
near water. And it had been like that for a while.
She had openly shown anxiety about suicide since the day
she overheard him talk about it.
Or perhaps not openly.
She thought she was hiding it well, but it was easy for Ulrich
to see through.
Maybe it was the inherent angelic syndrome common
among those aspiring to be teachers, or perhaps it was her
naturally caring nature. Whatever the reason, she seemed
concerned about him.
She didn’t seem to believe his casual attempts to pass it off
as a joke.
Which was true, in a way.
Talking about leaving the world before turning thirty had
been a frequent refrain since Ulrich graduated from
university.
Everyone is born ignorant.
Like a pristine, untouched snowfield. Like a blank page
without a single doodle.
A small dot marks the surface.
That is the primordial desire.
A tiny dot-like desire, curiosity, germinates within. Achieving
those desires one by one, learning about success and
failure, and understanding the accompanying pleasures and
displeasures.
Life is a long journey of fulfilling these conflicting desires.
The problem lies in that process.
As common desires are fulfilled one by one, they inevitably
lose their potency. The pleasure of the first experience fades
through repetition and learning. And the second and third
pleasures gradually lose their strength.
In the end, life filled with repetitive, uninteresting acts
reaches a point of transcendence. Nothing can excite or
interest anymore….
Sadly, this described Ulrich perfectly.
Having indulged in all sorts of stimuli since childhood, he
felt his post-university life had been exactly that. The world
had not lost its flavor suddenly; rather, his mind had gone
dull. Otherwise, how could everything in life seem so
monotonous, boring, and dry?
The comment about having no attachment to such a tedious
life was more than just a reaction; it was a habitual
utterance now, almost as natural as breathing.
Even in his family’s mansion, people used to panic
whenever he mentioned it. Initially, it provided a novel
amusement, but even that thrill faded, and now it was
dismissed as mere nonsense.
His mother, who once wept at such words, now merely
clicked her tongue, saying it was another of his bad spells,
while Gwen Altahart mockingly suggested he should write a
will to transfer hotel and department store shares to his
elder brother before kicking the bucket.
Determined to spite him, Ulrich resolved that if he were to
leave a will, it would state that he would sell all his shares
and donate everything to charity.
Anyway… setting aside his crazy family circumstances.
It had been a long time since anyone had shown such frail,
almost touchable concern for him.
It was vibrant.
A living reaction.
But the more he thought about it, the more he laughed.
The problem was the person showing the concern.
She was just a commoner. A trivial girl who should worry
about her own affairs rather than him.
Every time he saw himself reflected in her pure, innocent
violet eyes, the emotion called ‘pity’ surfaced
simultaneously.
How audacious and presumptuous. It was like a small mouse
licking a thorn stuck in a beast’s paw. The thought alone
made him laugh.
Yet, there was a refreshing novelty in her attitude.
Not just her behavior, but his own impulse to act childishly
in response to her pity was equally novel.
He wanted to test how much she could accept him. If he
said he wanted to die and asked for a blowjob, would she
hesitate like now and then comply?
The impulses came sporadically, like his damaged frontal
lobe twitching, mixed with mischievous and devilish urges.
“If you’re willing to do that….”
Accepting so readily, despite finding it uncomfortable to
even breathe in the same space, was just presumptuous
pity.
Thinking it was a rare opportunity to receive a commoner’s
pity, Ulrich let a bright smile touch his lips.
“Today’s timing is a bit awkward. It might take some time at
the tailor’s, so how about tomorrow?”
Lisbell nodded vigorously. It seemed like a response to his
smile.
The voice of the past, dreaming of becoming a teacher,
echoed.
Ulrich wrinkled his eyes and smiled as if scowling.

The center of Marnia’s city, Boilek Street.
A greenish-yellow car approached smoothly. It was a unique
color, flashy enough to catch the eye without being
overwhelming. Comfortable luxury.
A man stepped out of the driver’s seat.
He wore a light beige vest over a white shirt, with no sign of
a constraining tie. His casual, unfussy attire perfectly
matched the car’s comfortable luxury.
He walked around the bonnet and opened the passenger
door.
A woman hesitated as she stepped out.
Her outfit didn’t look particularly good, with a rather modest
underblouse and a demure goreskirt. Thin silk stockings and
brown flats showed no sense of aesthetic harmony, a
haphazard combination.
But her face was different. With finely chiseled features on a
slender face, her appearance was anything but ordinary.
Despite having the same eyes, nose, and mouth as anyone
else, her beauty was undeniable.
Most striking were her violet irises, capturing and focusing
attention.
Her outfit was plain, but if she dressed according to current
fashion trends, she could easily attract any man’s interest.
Ding-a-ling.
A clear bell rang through the tailor shop like a bird’s song.
Lisbell, following behind Ulrich, hesitantly stepped into the
upscale tailor shop.
“Excuse me, madam.”
Even before they entered, the madam had been watching
the car stop in front of her shop. “Oh my,” she exclaimed,
covering her lips. She seemed excited, as if seeing someone
rarely encountered here.
“We have a reservation under the name Victor Loisden.”
The madam’s anticipation visibly faded. Lisbell easily read
her change in mood. It seemed she had recognized Ulrich
from his newspaper photos, given her keen eye due to her
profession.
While she recognized him correctly, Ulrich’s nonchalant
demeanor, confidently using his secretary’s name, was
convincing enough to fool anyone, even Lisbell.
“Welcome. I’ve been expecting you.”
The madam soon regained her business composure, smiling
politely and leading them inside. People who earn money
often have a keen sense for potential profit, and the madam
of the tailor shop was no exception. After quickly assessing
the obvious differences in attire between the two, she
naturally gravitated towards Ulrich.
Of course, it wasn’t just about money.
Her faint blush indicated a clear romantic interest. Ulrich
was a man who naturally attracted such feelings.
“The customer here today is this lady.”
With practiced ease, Ulrich displayed his social skills, pulling
Lisbell’s wrist and subtly hiding behind her, making her feel
less out of place in the tailor shop.
“I’ll sit on the sofa, so take your time looking around,
Lisbell.”
“Oh, okay.”
The madam’s gaze quietly shifted between the two, then
she smiled meaningfully and led Lisbell further inside.
Meanwhile, Ulrich headed to a sofa by the window. Crossing
his legs on the plush velvet sofa, he picked up a catalog
prepared for waiting customers. The looks displayed,
claimed to be the latest trends here, had mostly already
swept through the capital.
Daring and glamorous trends always originated in the
capital’s social circles. Thus, a tailor shop in this dull, small
town confidently presented slightly outdated fashions as
trends. Ulrich leisurely flipped through the catalog,
reminiscing about the nostalgic relics.
“If it’s too difficult, why not ask the gentleman?”
The madam, bustling about earlier, now subtly suggested.
Knowing there was only one gentleman here, Lisbell
naturally turned her head.
As expected, both women’s eyes were on him.
“Is there a problem?”
“The lady is having trouble deciding.”
Hmm. Ulrich rested his chin on his hand.
Indeed, Lisbell looked overwhelmed, given too much
information at once. She was confused by the various
fabrics and different sleeve samples in her hands.
“You said you’re here to buy a gift for Mrs. Osborne?”
“Yes, that’s right.”
“How about trying it on yourself, Lisbell?”
“Me?”
“You two are about the same size.”
Before Lisbell could react, the madam clapped her hands,
agreeing it was a good idea, and quickly brought out sample
outfits.
Pushed to the back of the shop, Lisbell tried on the outfits
one by one and stood before Ulrich. She felt a vague sense
of shame, as if she wanted his approval. His gaze was more
serious than when reviewing business documents.
“What do you think?”
After a few fittings, the madam turned to the sofa.
In the sunlight, Ulrich, more radiant than the light, finally
spoke.
“The buttons are generally too many.”

“I prefer something easy to take off.”
At that moment, his usual elegance and dignity were
useless. It was such a crude comment that even the
madam, eager to sell her goods, was speechless.
“Maybe underwear would be better, madam.”

“It was a joke, but no one’s laughing.”
“The second one was the best.”
“Oh, my. I thought so too! It seems the gentleman and I
have similar tastes.”
The madam, recovering slightly, added a flattering remark.
Lisbell recalled the second outfit he mentioned.
It was a classic puff blouse with a high neckline and slightly
voluminous sleeves. It felt stifling just wearing it briefly, but
it suited her mother, who lived in a strict convent before
having her. His advice was appropriate, and since he was
her mother’s employer, anything he liked would surely be
fine.
“Shall I put the payment on my tab?”
Ulrich asked, seemingly ready to leave.
“No! I’ll pay for it.”
“Hmm? It’s fine.”
She remembered his offer to cover all expenses in Marnia.
However, she didn’t expect him to cover such individual
expenses.
She admired him anew. Though she hadn’t seen the bill, the
high-end tailor shop would be costly. Yet, for him, it was a
small sum he could easily cover. His confidence and ease
were second nature, showcasing the true power of Altahart.
“It’s a gift for my mother, so I should pay.”
Gratitude was gratitude, but fairness was fairness.
Ulrich didn’t argue further, letting her have her way.
“Alright then. Madam, we’ll take the second one. Lisbell, I’ll
wait outside.”
The madam, hoping he would visit again, bid him farewell.
Ulrich responded with a courteous smile and exited the
shop.
Lisbell paused as she was about to change back.
“…Excuse me.”
“Yes?”
“Can I buy this too?”
“Which one?”
“This…tie.”
“Of course. We’ve selected colors and patterns that are
currently in vogue.”
In an era where bespoke items were a luxury, factory-made
products like ties became popular.
A tie was fitting for this era. Unlike clothes, it didn’t require
size adjustments.
Since he’s been so considerate…
It seemed nice to give Ulrich a gift too, not just for his
kindness over the past few days but also as a token for
taking good care of her mother in the future.
She recalled the light beige vest he wore today.
The empty spot where a tie should be made it easy to
imagine. Considering the various light tones, Lisbell picked a
tie.
It was a deep, dark black, like the night.
Clack.
Putting down the receiver, Lisbell lowered her shoulders,
which had been tense with excitement. The voice of her
fiancé, who she had just finished speaking with, lingered
deep inside her.
She turned to look beside her, gently touching her earlobe.
While exchanging greetings with Theodore over the phone,
the sun had already set. The intense dusk that had crept
over the ground vanished, giving way to the quietly
spreading evening sky.
It had always been like this, a fairy-tale place. It was like a
piece of art framed by the window.
Today was the last day for enjoying this beautiful scenery.
When she mentioned she would return by train tomorrow
morning, Theodore was as purely happy as a child.
Three days had passed since she went to town with Ulrich.
And yesterday, Lisbell visited the tailor shop alone to pick
up the blouse she had ordered for her mother and the tie
she had bought separately.
Even though she had received an estimate earlier, when the
time came to actually pay, she felt suffocated. The endless
wealth of the man who generously offered to charge
everything to him was truly astonishing.
She gave the blouse to her mother as soon as she returned.
Her mother, though wondering why she had bothered, was
clearly pleased.
After a late lunch with her mother, they walked along the
meadow path outside the villa, discussing the types of
flowers. Lisbell had just finished a phone call with Theodore
upon returning.
The world was quiet under the darkening sky. In a rural
small town, the day was practically over as the sun set.
Returning to the room where she had stayed for the past
week, Lisbell took out a box she had stored under the bed.
Inside the box, with a calm navy blue background featuring
the tailor shop’s name, was a simpler tie.
There had been many opportunities to give it, but now she
was feeling nervous and kept avoiding it. She had chosen it
without much thought, but now that she had it, all sorts of
worries came to mind.
Would he like it?
Is the color too plain?
What about the design? The length?
Is it too plain without any decorations?
Was the price appropriate?
While she had been optimistic at the time of purchase, now
she was only seeing flaws.
More than anything, remembering Ulrich’s usual attire made
her hesitate. Even Lisbell, who wasn’t well-versed in fashion,
could tell his clothes were of high quality. Though he often
wore them casually, the finishing touches, the detailing,
even a single button, were all meticulously crafted. The
meticulousness of the clothing translated into its high cost.
His clothes were undoubtedly top-notch.
So she worried.
What if it doesn’t meet his standards? What if he thinks it’s
too low quality?
Given Ulrich’s personality, he wouldn’t show any
dissatisfaction, but still….
She knew that the essence of a gift was the thought behind
it rather than the object itself, but that only worked with
someone who had ordinary circumstances. She couldn’t
shake the worry that she might be burdening someone who
already had everything.
But, today was the last day she would see him.
If they had to face each other constantly, the gift might
become an awkward reminder for both of them, but she was
leaving Marnia tomorrow. It was pointless to worry about
how Ulrich would handle the gift. Even if he threw it away
immediately, she wouldn’t know, so it wouldn’t matter
much.
Or even if she did find out…
Lisbell was not someone important enough for Ulrich to care
about.
Alright, just give it to him since it’s bought.
Holding the gift box, Lisbell left her room. Recalling that he
was in the study earlier, she headed in that direction but
found him outside the window. It was an open pavilion near
the meticulously maintained garden and the ever-flowing
silver fountain. His silhouette was faintly visible against the
pavilion’s railing and steps.
Lisbell quickly changed direction and descended the stairs.
Outside, the sound of branches rustling in the wind could be
heard. The fairy-tale-like place had a distinct atmosphere
between day and night.
Sensing he was enjoying some solitary thought, she
instinctively quieted her steps. However, she couldn’t
completely muffle the sound of her footsteps, so Ulrich
noticed her as she approached the pavilion.
His eyes widened slightly in surprise at seeing her in an
unexpected place, then returned to their usual relaxed
shape. His lips curved into a subtle smile.
“Lisbell.”
He called her softly, chuckling lightly.
Was it because it was night? He seemed unusually relaxed.
If he were a ribbon, he usually maintained a tied form, but
now he seemed almost completely untied.
Lisbell soon noticed the glass in his hand.
“What brings you here?”
He asked, tilting his glass back and forth.
Lisbell scratched her cheek.
“Well, I wanted to give you something.”
“To me?”
Ulrich leaned back slightly, gesturing to the seat beside him
with his eyes.
“Why don’t you come up here instead of standing there?”
His manner of offering a spot beside him was without
hesitation. Then again, he always behaved this way,
unbothered by social cues. Even if she tried to avoid him,
his blatant persistence would always place them in the
same space.
Anyway, since she intended to give the gift, Lisbell climbed
the stairs with a calm heart.
“Would you like a drink?”
“Is it alcohol?”
“Yeah.”
He casually used informal speech. Though he occasionally
used a comfortable tone, he had never spoken informally
before. Clearly, he was a bit tipsy.
“No, thank you. I’m not good with alcohol.”
“Have you tried it before?”
“Yes.”
Oh, he softly exclaimed.
“Must be a bad memory.”
“Um, yes. I felt very sick the next day.”
“That happens when you drink too much.”
He chuckled and didn’t press her further, pouring another
glass for himself. Lisbell glanced at the outdoor table in the
pavilion. Besides the glass he was holding, there were spare
glasses, a bucket of fresh ice, and….
“What’s this?”
She asked, more out of concern than curiosity. Scattered
around his glass were a few pills. Seeing what Lisbell was
staring at, Ulrich pressed the pills with his fingertip.
“Drugs.”

“I’m kidding.”

“Lisbell, you faint if you hear two jokes. You always get so
serious. Is it rude if I say you’re the perfect type to tease?”
How could she not be serious when a man who had once
talked about suicide was seemingly playing with drugs?
Lisbell stared at him with a complicated expression, knowing
he was someone who made light of everything. He shrugged
his shoulders, still laughing.
“It’s sleeping pills.”
“Do you have insomnia?”
“A bit. Probably because my schedule gets mixed up a lot.”
Though she knew the nature of the pills, it didn’t bring much
relief. Even without medical knowledge, Lisbell understood
that combining such pills with alcohol was dangerous. It was
common sense. And surely, Ulrich knew this too. Yet, he was
doing it anyway, knowingly engaging in such reckless
behavior.
It was contradictory. His light-hearted jokes clashed with the
precarious undertone in his actions.
“Then wouldn’t a warm tea be better than alcohol?”
She suggested cautiously.
She was careful, thinking this might also trigger some deep
part of him.
Ulrich remained silent. Without immediately responding, he
continued pressing the pills with his fingertip. His eyes fixed
on Lisbell’s face as if hooking onto her expression.
Soon, he gave a subtle smile.
“Lisbell, did you say you wanted to be a teacher?”
“Yes? Yes.”
“Hmm.”
He furrowed his brows slightly, as if considering something
difficult, then flicked the pills off the table.
“It doesn’t suit you.”
“Pardon?”
“Being a teacher doesn’t suit you, Lisbell.”
Lisbell was taken aback.
No matter how straightforward and unfiltered one’s nature
might be, was it really acceptable to blurt out every thought
that comes to mind directly to someone’s face?
However, Ulrich was so confident and composed that it was
impossible to call out his rudeness. Even his arrogance
seemed to be part of his inherent power. Judging by the
atmosphere, she felt as if she should actually be grateful for
receiving such advice.
“…Why?”
Fundamentally, she was curious.
While he often said things that made no sense, this didn’t
seem like one of those times. Sometimes, his words and
actions seemed so calculated that it was as if he had
foreseen the ripples they would cause. It made her wonder
if he was a masterful actor.
So, she couldn’t dismiss his comment as mere nonsense.
In all honesty, she was curious why he thought that way.
Becoming a teacher had been her long-held dream. Many of
her envisioned futures revolved around it. Thus, hearing
that she wasn’t suited for it was quite a shock.
“Why is that?”
Ulrich simply added another enigmatic question and
chuckled softly, sipping his drink. She had a feeling getting
a clear answer would not be easy.
“More importantly, what did you bring me?”
He skillfully changed the subject.
Though she wanted to know the reason, it felt too difficult,
so Lisbell gave up and picked up the box she had set beside
her.
Ulrich raised his eyebrows, his expression momentarily
brightening with curiosity.
“I bought it at the tailor shop we visited last time. I wanted
to give it to you as a gift.”
“For me?”
“Yes. I’ve been indebted to you for a few days. Thanks to
you, I was able to spend a comfortable time with my mother
after a long while.”
“Can I open it?”
“Of course.”
She swallowed nervously.
Her heart beat a little faster. The lingering anxiety and the
anticipation that came with giving a gift coursed through
her body.
Ulrich’s long, slender fingers untied the ribbon around the
box. He lifted the lid, revealing a neatly folded tie in the
center of the box.
“A tie?”
“Yes. I didn’t know your taste, so I bought the most classic
one.”

“You might already have something similar… If you don’t
like it, you can give it to someone else or not wear it often. If
you really, really don’t like it, you can just throw it away…
Since it’s a gift I gave on a whim….”
The longer Ulrich stared at the box, the more Lisbell
rambled on.
Eventually, Ulrich moved.
He unfurled the neatly rolled tie and draped it around his
neck. Then, he adeptly tied it beneath his open shirt collar.
Just moments ago, he had seemed lazy and indulgent, but
with just a tie, he appeared much more tidy and neat. Yet,
the sensual vibe he exuded was undiminished.
“How does it look?”

“Is it pretty?”
It was a childish question, but she couldn’t argue with it.
It suited him much better than she had anticipated.
Though she didn’t know why he hadn’t worn a tie before, it
almost made her resentful for a moment, it suited him that
well. Given his perpetually languid appearance, she thought
a relaxed look would suit him best, but this look had its own
charm. Whether dressed up or down, he had an irresistible
allure.
“Is it bad?”
When Lisbell remained silent, Ulrich lowered his head as if
to inspect himself.
“No! It looks very good on you.”

“So much so that I can’t stop looking.”
Her worries melted away. She was glad she chose the most
basic one. With his naturally good looks, even something
unusual would have suited him, but the simple colors and
design transformed into something special and elegant
because of him.
Seeing her waving her hands as if worried about a
misunderstanding, Ulrich smiled. He then grabbed the
longer part of the tie and kissed it. His seductive action
made Lisbell momentarily hold her breath.
“Thank you, I’ll cherish it.”
Ah, she finally found the perfect word to describe him.
Seductive. Yes, that was exactly it.
Until now, the literary meaning of the word hadn’t quite
made sense, but now she understood its origin firsthand.
She didn’t need to look far. The strange warmth spreading
through her ears proved it.
“Lisbell, are you cold?”
He gestured with his eyes towards her light pink blouse,
suitable for the warm afternoon but not the cool evening
breeze.
Indeed, it was a bit chilly outside as the evening wind blew.
Ulrich’s gray-blue eyes traced the inside of her blouse’s
collar, unbuttoned for comfort, almost revealing her
cleavage.
“Your skin is very white.”

“Like a snowflake.”
He spoke again, this time more softly. It was hard to tell if he
was talking to himself or to her. She couldn’t respond,
feeling a peculiar sensation. Suddenly, something warm
touched the back of her neck. Realizing it was Ulrich’s
finger, Lisbell flinched.
Watching her reaction, Ulrich pulled the tie off and wrapped
it around her neck instead.
She was too flustered to move.
Sssk, sssk.
The sound of fabric brushing against fabric filled the close
distance.
Lisbell swallowed reflexively.
She didn’t know why he was doing this or why she couldn’t
move, but she felt she shouldn’t. Her palms sweated from
the inexplicable tension.
In the stillness, their eyes met repeatedly, each time
sending a shiver down her spine.
And then, she thought of Theodore.
Her fiancé, soon to be her husband, her lifelong companion.
No matter how she described him, he was a constant source
of comfort.
But now, it wasn’t the familiar, comforting feeling. It was as
if her chest was hollowing out. A discomfort impossible to
describe with words she had acquired throughout her life…


Their eyes met again.
In Ulrich’s light-colored irises, a fierce spark beyond that hue
flickered. Dangerous whirlpools stirred in the blue waves.
It was a moment.
Ulrich grabbed the tie around her neck and pulled her
towards him.

Lisbell instinctively raised her hand to block his lips.
It was close.
Had she hesitated a moment longer…
Her heart pounded erratically.
Her eyes trembled as she tried to calm her racing heart. His
lips, blocked by her hand, continued to gaze at her intently.
She felt as if she might be devoured. One moment of
carelessness and she would be swallowed whole.
Her throat tightened painfully.
Denying it was useless. The angle of Ulrich’s face as if about
to kiss, her own hand blocking his lips, and their actions to
prevent and cause danger were undeniably the same.
They both felt it.
The tie squeezing her neck hurt and burned. But she
couldn’t focus on that. Her heart pounded loudly. The fierce
vibrations shook her entire body. It was hard to collect her
thoughts. Knowing she had to, the more she tried, the
dizzier she became.
It was bad.
The more she thought about what almost happened, the
clearer Theodore’s image became, and the harder it was to
describe her feelings.
Only a beat later could she fully define it.
Guilt.
This was unmistakably guilt.
Thus, Lisbell firmly defined one of his characteristics. He
was a man with a rather impulsive side. Otherwise, nothing
he was about to do made any sense.
In the distance, the moon sparkled. Its clear and transparent
light was as vivid as Theodore’s eyes watching her.
Her heart, which she had barely managed to calm,
plummeted to the ground.
This cannot happen.
Something felt dangerous. She couldn’t maintain this close
distance any longer.
She had to put distance between them.
She had to get away from him immediately.
From him…
“It seems you’ve had too much to drink.”
She had to push him away.
Lisbell hurriedly shifted her hips backward, as if to negate
what had just happened.
The distance, close enough to feel each other’s breath,
widened, and the necktie loosely held in Ulrich’s hand
slipped down.
Lisbell brushed her hair back. She was so flustered that it
felt as if someone had grabbed her head and shaken it.
The most incomprehensible thing was Ulrich’s behavior. He
knew she had a fiancé. With those delicate lips, he had
congratulated her on her engagement the first day they
met. He had even asked when the wedding was and
mentioned she would be a bride by late summer, offering
something akin to a blessing.
Despite that, why on earth…?
Doubts poured in, but Lisbell did not delve deeply into any
of them. The thought that this must not happen remained
strong.
Lisbell removed the tie loosely draped around her neck and
placed it in a box. Then she quickly stood up.
“I’ll be going now.”
“…”
“The night breeze is chilly, so don’t stay outside too long.”
Without checking if her words were appropriate for the
situation, she hurried out of the pavilion.
Perhaps she was still shocked, as the wind on her face felt
hot. The man’s eyes she had faced up close remained
disturbingly vivid. Trying to shake it off, she bit her lower lip
hard until it bled. But even that pain did not wake her dulled
senses.
Back in her room, Lisbell tossed and turned, unable to sleep
for a long time. The late night eventually gave way to dawn,
and then to daylight.
It was a night that felt like being bewitched by something
unknown. There was no other reason for her to be so
restless. Her inexplicably disturbed mind tormented her
inside and out.
Yes, it was truly a tormenting sensation.
Since she couldn’t sleep anyway, Lisbell got up early and
hastily prepared to leave. Her mother, who started work at
seven o’clock sharp, came to her room to see her off. Her
mother looked surprised to see her daughter already up and
ready.
Holding her luggage, Lisbell followed her mother out of the
villa. Her gaze, which had become accustomed to the
garden in just two weeks, stopped at one spot. It was the
outdoor swimming pool, emptied for cleaning. She recalled
the image of transparent water droplets splashing.
“Lisbell?”
“Yes, let’s go.”
She snapped back to reality and hurried her steps. At the
gate, barely open enough for a person to pass, she briefly
hugged her mother.
“Call me as soon as you’re ready. I’ll come to Misley.”
Her mother coughed briefly.
Worried, Lisbell adjusted her mother’s shawl, wrapped
hastily due to the early hour.
“Yes, I will. But mother, are you okay?”
“Yes, it seems I caught a light cold due to the change of
seasons.”
“Don’t neglect it just because it’s light. Make sure to take
medicine, okay?”
“I will. You might miss your train. Go on.”
“I’ll call when I arrive.”
“Okay.”
After hugging her mother again, Lisbell glanced at the
garden. The pavilion’s aesthetic curves caught her eye,
making her flinch as if burned. Her mother, noticing
something strange, stepped back.
“I’ll be going now.”
Before her mother could ask anything, Lisbell quickly turned
and left, feeling like a fugitive rather than someone ending a
vacation. The lingering situation stuck in her mind like a
persistent stain.
The confusion of the night weighed heavily on her.

Having seen her daughter off safely, Mrs. Osborne began
her usual day.
Handling the tasks scheduled from seven in the morning
without delay, she went back to the gate to receive the mail
from the delivery boy.
Crossing the garden, she checked her pocket watch,
noticing there was still some time before noon.
Before heading to the master’s bedroom, Mrs. Osborne
stopped by the guest room where her daughter had stayed.
“Oh my.”
Knowing her daughter well, she expected the room to be
impeccably clean. Contrary to her expectations, the guest
room was still somewhat untidy, suggesting a hurried
departure.
With a small sigh, Mrs. Osborne took the opportunity to tidy
up the guest room.
She straightened the wrinkled bedspread, opened the halfclosed window to air the room, and folded the towels in the
bathroom. Turning around, she noticed a light pink blouse
hanging on a golden hanger.
“How distracted must she have been?”
What could have made her rush so?
Pondering the situation, she took the blouse and draped it
over her arm.
After tidying up, it was nearly noon. She left the room and
walked down the corridor to the master’s bedroom.
A sudden fit of coughing bent Mrs. Osborne’s back like an
old woman’s. The persistent cough painfully rattled her
lungs and throat.
Leaning against the window sill, she noticed blood in her
spit. The metallic taste spread under her nose. Her head felt
dizzy. She stood still, leaning against the window.
At least her daughter hadn’t seen this.
Whenever Lisbell asked if she was unwell, her heart sank
but she managed to pull herself together.
Not yet.
If Lisbell found out, she would feel compelled to take care of
her.
“I still want to be close to you, Mother.”
Her daughter, who couldn’t imagine her having any health
issues, already made such endearing proposals. If she knew
about her condition, she would insist even more on taking
care of her. 
Lisbell had always been that way.
She would pick pretty flowers from the hill to show her
mother, got good grades without burdening the family
financially by not mentioning college, and during college,
she always called on the same day, at the same time, to
check in and share updates.
What the monastery deemed a sinful existence was a
source of pride for Mrs. Osborne. She too wished to spend
her remaining years with her daughter but didn’t want to be
a burden.
Her daughter had grown up wonderfully despite her
inadequacies as a mother. She didn’t want to be a burden
any longer. Discovering the warning signs of her health
issues was fortunate.
Her dizziness cleared a bit. Mrs. Osborne straightened up,
realizing she had spent more time than expected, and
hurried her steps.
Seeing that the church bell hadn’t rung yet, it seemed it
wasn’t noon. The master’s bedroom would still be as quiet
as a night with a crescent moon.
With this thought, she opened the door.
“….”
Unexpectedly, the master was already awake.
Leaning against the window with a cigarette, he gazed
outside. The church bell still hadn’t rung.
The master had risen before the church bell rang
“You’re up early.”
Mrs. Osborne left a brief indication of her presence for her
master, who seemed lost in thought and didn’t even glance
in her direction. She headed towards the desk, placed the
mail she had brought with her on one side, and picked up a
paper knife.
Ssssh, ssssh.
The sharp edge of the knife made a slicing sound as it cut
through the paper.
Even after completing her task, the master continued to
stare out the window. Only now did she become curious
about what he was looking at so intently.
Could there be a problem outside?
Mrs. Osborne followed his gaze with her own.
Despite this, her curiosity remained unsatisfied. All she
could see in the direction he was staring was the pavilion in
the garden. The man was intently observing this ordinary
structure, as if expecting to find something or someone
unusual there.
“Madam.”
“Yes, master.”
“Has Lisbell woken up?”
He asked soon after.
“Yes, she left the villa early this morning.”
Ulrich finally turned around.
“She’s already gone?”
“Yes. I heard she said her farewells to you yesterday.”
“Farewells….”
He laughed.
For some reason, the face he showed her was chilling.
“Yes, she’s gone….”
He stubbed out the cigarette he hadn’t even properly
smoked in the ashtray. His hand brushed his platinum blond
hair. At that moment, the distant sound of church bells
began to ring.
“What would you like for breakfast?”
“I’m not really hungry. Just some coffee, perhaps….”
As Ulrich walked to the desk, he glanced at Mrs. Osborne.
Today, his gaze felt particularly warm as it passed over her
face and moved to her wrist.
Then he suddenly stopped.
“…That.”
“Pardon?”
Mrs. Osborne grew tense at her master’s sudden reaction.
He was pointing at the blouse draped over her arm.
“Oh, I was just tidying up the guest room where my
daughter stayed. She seemed to have forgotten it in the
bathroom in her haste to get ready this morning, so I
brought it with me.”
Expecting this explanation to suffice, she noticed his gaze
still lingering. It was as if he were trying to dissect the
pavilion in the garden earlier.
“Master?”
“Leave that here.”
“Pardon?”
Ulrich tapped the desk.
Mrs. Osborne hesitated, unsure of how to respond. She
glanced between the blouse on her arm and her master’s
face.
Meanwhile, Ulrich was examining the stack of mail. He was
a man who, despite his capricious nature, always followed
through on his decisions. His current demeanor made it
clear that his earlier request was sincere.
…This?
Why?
Although curious, questioning him would be out of place.
Her duty was to follow his instructions without complaint.
Mrs. Osborne placed the blouse on the desk.
“I’ll bring you some coffee and a light brunch. Coffee on an
empty stomach can be unsettling.”
“Fine.”
Mrs. Osborne left the room, closing the door behind her.
Alone, Ulrich pulled out the chair attached to the desk. He
sat down, crossing his legs, and set aside the mail he had
been reading.
He tilted his head slightly. The blouse lay on the desk like a
discarded skin. He reached out and touched the limp sleeve.
It was a bright, sunny day, but a breeze that seemed fit for
nightfall swept through his fingers.
He didn’t need to look far.
It was last night.
Last night was replaying at the tips of his fingers.

Ulrich propped his chin on his hand and played with the
sleeve for a long time. His eyes didn’t see the blouse; they
were looking at something beyond it. It was as if he were
recalling a memory.
He remembered the moment he was blocked.
That same restraint had stopped him from impulsively
kissing her.
Ulrich slowly stood up. Still holding the sleeve, the blouse
hung limply from his hand like a dead body.
He spread the thin fabric out on the desk.
It matched. Lisbell had worn this when she came to the
pavilion last night.
“Hmm.”
He took a shallow breath.
“She seemed to have forgotten it in her haste to get ready
this morning, so I brought it with me.”
Mrs. Osborne had explained, somewhat bewildered. Ulrich
himself didn’t see Lisbell as someone who would carelessly
leave her clothes behind. As someone who aspired to be a
teacher, she seemed to have a meticulous and thorough
nature.
So, she must have been so agitated that she left her clothes
behind.
“Then it makes even less sense.”
Being agitated means being shaken, doesn’t it?
It meant that the strange atmosphere of last night wasn’t
something only he had felt. It wasn’t just his solitary
tension. The electrifying atmosphere that felt like it would
collapse with a single misstep was something both he and
she experienced.
But it was blocked.
Despite being captivated by the atmosphere, Lisbell had
rejected him.
And then she fled.
Leaving traces behind, like this.
This was a first in Ulrich’s life.
Being pitied by a mere commoner, and being rejected so
insultingly by such a wretched being.
He slowly lowered his hand.
Despite her conservative habits, the buttons of her blouse
had been fastened all the way to the top. Ulrich’s fingers
played with the topmost button. Then, suddenly, he flicked
it open.
The neckline opened easily. As he gazed down at the
unresisting fabric, he finally understood the source of the
discomfort he had been feeling since last night.
Ah, this is what I wanted to do.
“It’s Lisbell!”
It was just as she was about to step into the orphanage with
its wooden nameplate.
One of the children gathered in a small flowerbed turned her
head and shouted. The lively announcement caused the
children to jump up and rush over to Lisbell.
“Yes, yes. I’m back. Have you all been well?”
Lisbell crouched down to meet the children’s eyes, calling
each one by name. The named children’s cheeks blushed
with lively hues. They all clamored to speak at once, making
it difficult to understand them, but their joy was
unmistakable.
Only then did she feel like she was truly back in Misley. And
the little ones who made her feel this way were incredibly
endearing. Moments like these made her proud of her
dream to take care of children.

Her hand, which had been caressing a child’s cheek,
paused.
A sudden thought came to mind.
“Being a teacher doesn’t suit you, Lisbell.”
At the time, she had dismissed it lightly. But now, as it
resurfaced, it seemed she hadn’t entirely let it go.
Why did he say such a thing to me?
When she heard it, she had been more curious than
offended and had even asked why he thought that. He had
simply laughed and asked why she thought he would think
that, leaving the matter unresolved.
Lisbell was still curious about the reason.
But part of her didn’t want to know.
She was afraid.
In her life, the harsh reality she had to face repeatedly
involved financial issues. During this vacation, she had
unexpectedly met the wealthiest man in Rechem. To Lisbell,
money was the most daunting problem, which this man
effortlessly resolved and even used as a tool.
Perhaps because of that, he seemed like a god with absolute
power to her.
And what about Marnia, where he resided?
It was like a flawless fairy tale setting.
That’s what she had thought.
But her perspective had shifted slightly.
It wasn’t a fairy tale. Marnia was just an ordinary small
town. There must be people struggling day by day, just like
herself. It couldn’t be a dazzling fairy tale for everyone.
Only one person could experience such enchantment.
Paradise.
In other words, it was Ulrich’s paradise.
Sometimes lazy, sometimes diligent.
Changing one’s behavior according to one’s desires,
enjoying an economic freedom that others can hardly attain,
naturally accepting the luxuries that come with it, and
purely owning the background created by that luxury for
oneself.
No matter how you look at it, isn’t he like a god enjoying a
beautiful paradise?
Perhaps that’s why when he says something, it feels like an
absolute mark will be stamped deep inside. Hearing why he
said she wasn’t suited to being a teacher, she was secretly
afraid that it would harden her consciousness in that
direction.
“…Lisbell?”
She heard her name from afar. When she looked up, her
fiancé, Theodore, whom she hadn’t seen in about two
weeks, was standing there. He must have come out to see
what the commotion was about and found this scene.
Lisbell gave him a bright smile. Theodore, who had been
standing frozen as if he saw something he shouldn’t, came
running with a radiant smile like the children a moment ago.
“When did you get here? Why did you come so early? I
thought I wouldn’t see you until the afternoon.”
“I woke up early and took the first train.”
“I see… Let me carry your luggage.”
Theodore extended his arm. When Lisbell tried to hand it
over, the children playfully clung to the suitcase. Theodore
laughed heartily and then pretended to be stern.
“You rascals. Lisbell has just returned from a trip. She must
be very tired. Should you be bothering her like this?”
Nooo. The children replied, their mouths like little beaks
pecking. Theodore’s playful scolding spread waves of
laughter. Amidst the laughter, Lisbell followed Theodore
through the children as he grabbed her wrist and led her
away.
Fortunately, another teacher came out soon, having noticed
the commotion. Lisbell greeted and informed her of her
arrival, then headed to the dormitory with Theodore.
The room was filled with familiar sights: an old bed with a
wooden frame, a table with chipped paint, and a small vase
on the shabby windowsill. Seeing these familiar sights made
her feel at ease. It felt like she had returned to her proper
place. The guest room she stayed in at Marnia was
luxurious, but it always felt awkward and burdensome.
Once inside the room alone, Theodore pulled Lisbell close.
His tender kiss on her palm made Lisbell smile softly.
“I thought I was dreaming for a moment. Seeing your lovely
hair in the sunlight like a cloud…”
“Didn’t you expect me today?”
“I told you earlier! I thought you’d arrive in the afternoon. It
feels like I’ve received a surprise gift. Look, my heart is still
racing.”
He placed her hand on his chest. Lisbell, thinking he was
just expressing his happiness at seeing her sooner than
expected, felt the slightly faster rhythm of his heartbeat
through her palm.
Lisbell’s eyes widened like a rabbit’s, and Theodore laughed
innocently like a boy.
“So, did you have a good trip?”
“Yeah.”
“I’m sorry to hear you couldn’t persuade your mother.”
“Mother’s will was too strong.”
“But I understand her too. The villa is so spacious and
beautiful.”
Lisbell nodded while opening her suitcase on the bed.
Theodore perched beside her, his eyes sparkling.
“Come to think of it, you haven’t told me about that
person.”
“That person?”
“The owner of the villa. The nobleman of Altahart.”
Lisbell’s hands paused as she took out clothes from the
suitcase. Theodore continued without noticing.
“He’s the one who invited you to Marnia, covered all your
expenses there, and even wanted your mother to continue
working. He doesn’t seem like a bad person.”

“How was he? Did he seem alright?”
“…Yes, he was kind.”
Lisbell gave a brief reply and continued hanging her clothes
in the closet. Theodore naturally helped her. Despite her
lukewarm response, Theodore kept talking about Altahart.
“What did he look like?”
“Huh?”
“After you left, I looked up the capital newspaper. He looked
quite handsome in the photos. Was he the same in person?”
The image of his appearance, etched in her memory like a
new shock, resurfaced.
“Yeah, he looked like his photos.”
Lisbell busied her hands aimlessly and replied shortly. Her
responses were continually curt.
“That’s incredible. Really? He’s got all that money and even
perfect looks? That’s so unfair.”
“Unfair… Oh?”
Lisbell looked around. Theodore, crossing his arms and
clicking his tongue, turned to her.
“What’s wrong?”
“I can’t find my blouse.”
She went to the bed and checked her luggage. She sighed
after searching through her belongings.
“I think I left it at the villa.”
“What kind of blouse?”
“A light pink one.”
“Oh, that one. Isn’t that your favorite?”
Theodore squinted sympathetically. It would have been
possible to retrieve it if it were nearby, but it was a whole
day’s train ride away. She had to reluctantly give up.
Theodore comforted her, suggesting they visit the town
square’s clothing shop together.
“More importantly, Lisbell, I have news for you.”
“News?”
“It has finally arrived. From Renbruck.”
Lisbell’s eyes widened.
Renbruck was Theodore’s hometown. There was only one
thing they could have sent.
The wedding dress they needed for their wedding.
The wedding venue was naturally decided to be the chapel
of the Misley Orphanage, where they first met.
Theodore’s parents were initially disappointed and tried to
persuade them to change their minds. But both Lisbell and
Theodore were firm. They were determined to have the
ceremony at the place where their relationship began.
His parents eventually conceded but insisted on sending the
wedding dress. It was the dress his mother wore when she
married his father, a timeless design.
Theodore had said they could get a new dress if she
preferred, but Lisbell liked the idea. She knew it was a
handmade piece crafted from expensive silk specifically for
his mother by the factory his father owned. It would be far
better than a hastily made dress.
Besides, she was also worried about the cost. It was
essential to make the wedding special, but spending so
much for one day was daunting.
So there was no reason to refuse the wedding dress from
Renbruck.
“There’s really not much time left now.”
Theodore’s excited voice echoed as he brushed back her
hair and cupped her cheek. The warmth of his hand, his
calm eyes, and his resolute voice filled with anticipation
transferred to her, making her lips quiver.
His fresh green eyes looked down at her. In the suddenly
serene atmosphere, he tilted his head sideways. Their
shadows lengthened on the windowsill, drawing closer.
“…Huh?”
Just before their lips met, Theodore sensed her pushing his
chest and opened his half-closed eyes. His puzzled voice
came out naturally.
Up close, Lisbell looked more surprised by her own actions.
“Ah, I… I just got here and haven’t washed yet….”
I might smell…. she added in a small voice. Theodore was
momentarily silent before bursting into laughter.
“What are you talking about? There’s no way you smell. And
even if you did, so what?”
“Still….”
“Alright, alright. I was being insensitive, keeping you up
when you’re tired.”
He sat her on the bed and kissed her forehead. Lisbell
closed her eyes slowly in his affectionate gesture.
“I’ll bring your dinner to your room later. Rest until then. I’ll
tell the director you came back in your place.”
“Yeah, thanks, Theo.”
“No need to thank me.”
Theo patted Lisbell’s shoulder once before leaving the room.
Lisbell, staring at the closed door, collapsed onto her back.
As she blankly stared at the ceiling, she raised her fingers to
her lips.
Why…
Pressing her plump lower lip, she belatedly felt a sense of
doubt.
Why at that moment…
When Theo tried to kiss her, Lisbell remembered blue-grey
eyes. No, they came to mind. It wasn’t intentional; it was
instinctual. And instincts couldn’t be controlled—they were
close to the subconscious.

The confusion she thought she’d shaken off on the train ride
back rushed over her again, as if she had been mistaken all
along.
In fact, this consciousness had been ongoing since earlier.
“…Yes. He’s a kind person.”
Kind, but strictly speaking, a bit precarious and somewhat
strange. He would make silly remarks that sometimes didn’t
sound like jokes, which was peculiar.
“Yeah, he looked like his picture.”
It was a lie.
The moment she saw him, she was inwardly amazed,
thinking he was incomparable to the photo. He was the
most strikingly beautiful person Lisbell had ever seen.
Thus, in front of Theodore, she tried to avoid mentioning
that man.
As if she were guilty of a crime.
She didn’t understand it.
Although there had almost been an incident at the pavilion
that day, ultimately, nothing happened. So, she had nothing
to hide. She hadn’t done anything improper with another
man while engaged to be married.
So why did she feel so uncomfortable?
As if she’d done something wrong and was hiding it like a
child. In reality, nothing had happened between her and
Ulrich, not even a minor incident, yet why…
Lisbell turned over to face the wall.
The fingers that had been hovering near her mouth touched
her neck softly.
The man’s gaze had first swept over her like a lick, then his
tie had been gently tied. Their eyes had met horizontally.
Though usually his eyes were drowsy, whenever he looked
intently, his clear, bright eyes would shimmer intensely.
When she couldn’t even breathe before the vast wave-like
gaze, the tied tie was pulled tight…
Her throat tickled.
It felt like a dull needle was pricking the base of her throat.
Lisbell slowly rubbed her chest.
It felt uncomfortable and anxious, as if something was
weighing on her.

“My goodness.”
Theo, who had been watching her with more concentration
than when he took his college exams, exclaimed purely.
Lisbell, feeling embarrassed for some reason, lowered her
head. Seeing the orphanage teacher laugh at Theo’s
transparent expression made her even more embarrassed.
It wasn’t anything special. He was reacting this way in front
of Lisbell, who was trying on a wedding dress.
“I thought an angel had descended.”
“Theo…”
When she hinted for him to refrain from such comments in
front of others, Theo chuckled before inspecting her
seriously.
“There’s no need for alterations. It suits you perfectly,
Lisbell.”
Theo, who had risen from the chapel’s pew, approached. He
was also dressed in a fitted black suit.
Lisbell clenched and unclenched her tingling hands.
Standing face to face in such attire, and in a chapel no less,
made it feel like the real ceremony was about to take place.
Even though she knew it wasn’t the actual event, she felt a
fresh wave of nervousness.
Above all, Theo’s unwavering gaze on her brought a
pleasant exhilaration.
A late-summer bride.
A phrase someone had left in her mind suddenly came to
her.
“Sorry to break the mood.”
The teacher who had helped with the dress fitting cleared
her throat.
“But the waist needs some alteration. Lisbell’s frame is
small, so even when tightened, there’s still a lot of room.
This doesn’t look nice, and it would be uncomfortable for
Lisbell. A visit to the dress shop is necessary.”
“Really?”
Theo, as if waking from a dream, responded quickly. While
they were talking, the teacher left to answer a call from
outside.
Left alone in the chapel, Theo quietly cleared his throat. He
seated Lisbell, who was holding up the hem of her long
dress, on a nearby chair.
“Theo?”
With a gentle hand, he lifted the hem of the dress. Her shoeclad foot rested on his knee. Theo removed the shoe.
Lisbell flinched slightly as her pale, round foot was exposed.
Theo smiled and lifted something. It was a white shoe,
matching the dress she was wearing. It fit her perfectly, as if
prepared for her.
“When did you…”
“I prepared it while you were away from Misley.”

“You said you’d wear what mother had, but I wanted to get
you something of your own.”
The pink jewel on the edge of the shoe sparkled. It reminded
her of the day he proposed.
It was the day they graduated from college.
Under the falling cherry blossom petals, he shyly but
confidently confessed that he wanted to spend the future
together.
Even then, it didn’t feel real. But now, it did. Her heart
pounded. It was no longer something distant; their wedding,
their future, and all the dreams they had envisioned
together during college were just around the corner.
“It reminds me of the old days.”
“The old days?”
Lisbell whispered, touching the shoes as she bent over.
“The day you carried me back to the orphanage.”
It was during a vacation when she stayed at the orphanage.
They hadn’t officially started dating then. Though they
hadn’t formally dated, it was clear from the atmosphere and
vibes that they had feelings for each other.
They had gone to the square together due to a lack of toys
at the orphanage. Lisbell had collided with a child running
from the opposite direction and fell, twisting her ankle.
Unable to stand due to the pain, Theo had bent one leg and
shown his back. A signal to get on.
That day, as she was carried on his back to the orphanage,
they were drenched in the red sunset. They officially
became a couple from that day.
“That time.”
Theo began nostalgically.
“I was surprised by how light you were.”
“Liar.”
“It’s true.”
“Then why were you sweating so much?”
“It was hot.”
It was a sweltering summer.
“Even though my whole body was sticky with sweat, I didn’t
feel bad, which was strange.”

“That’s when I knew. This must be love.”

“And I made up my mind. No matter what, I would marry
you.”
His voice, filled with conviction, was confident. When Lisbell
laughed, saying, “What’s that,” Theo jokingly furrowed his
brows, insisting he was serious. Soon, his leisurely gaze
scanned Lisbell’s appearance.
“Look. See what you’re wearing now.”

“A wedding dress.”

“Our wedding is right around the corner, Lisbell, just as I
wished.”
Theo was genuinely happy.
After changing her other shoe to the new one, he kissed her
slightly exposed instep. Before she could protest that it was
dirty, it was already done. When Lisbell’s hand pushed his
shoulder away, Theo laughed heartily.
His laughter burst like fireworks in the chapel.
The warm noon sunlight poured down on the two of them.
In the afternoon, they went to a dress shop near the square
to have the dress altered. Taking advantage of being out,
they bought gifts for the orphans, explored new shops, and
enjoyed a pleasant leisure time at a café terrace.
It was a smooth day.
Amongst it all, Lisbell felt a relief no one else knew.
The turmoil she had felt on the day she returned from her
holiday in Marnia had now mostly faded. She still didn’t
understand why she felt that way, but since it had subsided,
she saw no need to dwell on it.
Gas lamps along the street began to light up.
Walking along the brightened path, she and Theo returned
to the orphanage. Distributing the candies they had bought
as gifts to the children, Lisbell entered the orphanage.
“Lisbell, are you back now?”
“Yes, Director.”
Thanks to her frequent visits since college, the orphanage
director was fond of Lisbell and Theo. It was entirely for this
reason that they were allowed to hold their ceremony in the
chapel, which was not usually permitted for personal use.
“Is something wrong?”
“A letter arrived for you, Lisbell.”
“A letter?”
“Yes. I left it on the table in your room.”
“Thank you for letting me know.”
After thanking the director, Lisbell headed to her room. She
placed her belongings down and approached the table. For a
moment, she thought it might be from her mother, but then
she realized her mother would have called the orphanage
directly instead of using such a cumbersome method.
As she picked up the letter, Lisbell paused. There was a
government seal on the edge, indicating it was an official
document.
The sender was from Marnia.
Lisbell hurriedly opened the envelope.
Her purple eyes quickly scanned the contents.
The official document was concise, with each paragraph
succinctly detailing the facts. A theft incident had occurred
in Marnia, and the local police were handling it. Helen
Osborne had been identified as a suspect and was currently
detained, with plans to bring her to trial in the capital. The
notice urging the procurement of legal representation was
brutally straightforward.
In essence, it meant her mother was involved in a theft
case. Not as a victim, but as the perpetrator.
It was a bolt from the blue. Lisbell reread the lines, unable
to comprehend what she was seeing. But no matter how
many times she read it, the meaning didn’t change. It
consistently conveyed the same information, wreaking
havoc in her mind.
“What is this….”
It made no sense.
Her mother, a thief?
Impossible. The mother she knew would never commit such
an act. Before she had Lisbell, she was a devout believer,
living an honest life. Even after being expelled from the
convent for having Lisbell, her mother had maintained her
integrity as a devout person.

Lisbell felt momentarily dizzy.
Was it three days ago? They had spoken on the phone about
the upcoming wedding expenses. When Lisbell complained
about the unexpected costs, her mother had expressed
concern.
Could it be…?
Lisbell quickly left the room, headed to the director’s office,
and asked to use the phone. But no matter how many times
she dialed, she couldn’t get through. As her eyes anxiously
darted around, she read the part of the letter stating that
the suspect was detained.
That meant her mother wasn’t at the Marnia villa. Realizing
this, Lisbell’s hand holding the receiver dropped.
What in the world was going on?
She had no way of knowing if her mother had actually done
such a thing. If it were true, what had she stolen to warrant
such a trial? If it were all a misunderstanding, how had she
ended up in this predicament? Lisbell had no way of finding
out.
At least, not in Misley.
Her mind racing, Lisbell returned to her room. She opened
her bag and quickly packed her things. Theodore, who had
come to ask if she would be having dinner, was surprised to
see his fiancée suddenly preparing to leave.
“Lisbell? What are you doing?”
“Theo, I think I need to go to Marnia for a bit.”
“What? What are you talking about?”
As she packed her small bag, Lisbell sighed. She hesitated
before handing Theodore the letter. Reading it quickly,
Theodore was as stunned as Lisbell had been.
“What is this…. Mrs. Osborne, you mean….”
“My mother would never do something so foolish.”
“Of course not! I believe that too. But did you try calling?”
“Yes. But… I couldn’t get through.”
Lisbell sighed deeply.
“I don’t know what’s going on, but I need to go to Marnia to
find out.”
“Right, of course…. Are you sure you’ll be okay alone?
Should I come with you?”
Despite being just as shaken, Theodore offered his help.
Lisbell gave him a faint smile and shook her head.
“No, I’ll go alone. It won’t take long.”
“Alright. Let me know as soon as you find out anything.”
Nodding, Lisbell hurried to the train station.
Far off, the sun was slowly setting.

Lisbell took a deep breath as she stepped off the carriage in
front of the path. Pushing through the small wooded area,
she soon saw part of the imposing villa.
It feels so different.
When she had walked this path before, she had been filled
with a vague excitement of being in a new city. Now, the
serene scenery didn’t register as her mind was in turmoil.
Not just that, it felt heavy and burdensome. Each step
seemed to add more weight to her feet.
Her fingers instinctively curled.

She finally reached the front of the villa.
Lisbell was taken aback. When she had visited with her
mother on vacation, the iron gate had been tightly shut.
Now, it was wide open as if welcoming someone.
She unfolded the paper she held. Having looked at it
countless times on the way here, the edges were curled,
and there were creases all over. Lisbell quickly glanced at
the address written on it.
“Rather than here, why don’t you try the villa?”
Before coming here, Lisbell had already been to the Marnia
police station.
“The key issue in cases like this often comes down to
leniency. Since the victim is the employer of Helen Osborne,
it might be a good idea to meet them directly and seek their
leniency. If the victim agrees, the police can close the case
without it going to trial.”
Judging by the investigator’s demeanor, it seemed the theft
had indeed occurred. If so, the suggestion wasn’t entirely
misplaced. If all these circumstances were true, Ulrich’s
leniency could resolve everything.
“Haah….”
The investigator had sent her to the villa, and the once
tightly shut gate was now wide open. It felt like she was
being invited into a well-orchestrated stage, making her
uneasy.
Lisbell swallowed hard and stepped through the gate.
Due to the summer that had quietly crept in over the past
month, the garden was filled with blue Queen of night
flowers. The topiary, sculptures, and garden arches were
adorned with contrasting red roses in full bloom.
The vibrant colors were almost overwhelming.
But perhaps that was just a narrow perspective.
Paradise.
Was this really paradise?
To Ulrich, this was probably just one of the many villas his
family owned. From what she had read in the newspapers,
his family owned over twenty second houses across the
country.
And most importantly, there was the capital.
A hotbed of gossip and culture.
The center of industrial advancement.
The pinnacle of high society where prominent families
gathered.
To Lisbell, Marnia had always been a place of admiration,
seen through the frame of a beautiful painting. If even this
place felt so impressive, what would the far more advanced
capital be like?
It must be even more splendid and magnificent.
And Ulrich would undoubtedly wield significant influence
there. In the center of a city driven by business, his solid
wealth and power would hold great sway.
Ultimately, both here and there were his paradises.
Her long musings returned to the harsh reality. The thought
of seeking leniency from such a formidable person left a
bitter taste in her mouth. Lisbell was like a small pond
compared to the vast ocean that was Ulrich.
But still…. There might be a chance.
She recalled her meeting with Ulrich a month ago. Although
he had his peculiarities, he was generally a man of mild
demeanor. His mannerisms were refined, and his language
and expressions carried the typical poise of a noble.
Despite their strained relationship, he didn’t seem like
someone who would mercilessly drive a person away.
…Or would he?
No matter how much she pondered, it was meaningless. She
had to confront him to get any answers.
With this resolve, she clenched her fist.
“Who are you?”
Lisbell stopped in her tracks. She saw a black sedan parked
next to the fountain. The voice belonged to a man standing
in front of the car. He had neatly groomed hair as black as
obsidian.
The face wasn’t unfamiliar. While he might not know her,
she recognized him. He was the man who had been
watching Ulrich practice shooting in the villa’s courtyard.
She had assumed he was Ulrich’s secretary.
The recollection existed solely for Lisbell. Naturally, the
man’s scrutinizing gaze made sense as he sized up the
unfamiliar intruder. Realizing this, Lisbell quickly bowed.
“Hello. I’m Lisbell Osborne.”
“Osborne?”
The man furrowed his brow.
His gaze fixed on her innocent face before he let out a small
exclamation of realization.
That wasn’t all. He lifted his hand from the car, tousling his
neatly groomed hair, and glanced somewhere in the villa,
his eyes narrowing as if encountering a bothersome
situation.
Lisbell, who had been puzzled, soon became terrified.
If this man was indeed Ulrich’s secretary, he might have
handled the theft that occurred here.
Could that be why he was acting this way?
Could it be why he shuddered at the mere mention of the
suspect’s name, ‘Osborne’?
Having not yet met Ulrich, Lisbell felt that the reaction of
this man, presumed to be his secretary, mirrored Ulrich’s
own. It was a situation that naturally instilled fear of
repercussions.
“I am Victor Loisden. I currently work under Master
Altahart.”
The man’s complexion changed in an instant. With an
emotionless expression, as if all feelings had been washed
away, he introduced himself and extended his hand for a
handshake.
“I have been waiting for you. Please follow me, I will guide
you.”
Although he didn’t seem like someone who had been
waiting, Lisbell silently followed Victor.
The corridor they walked through was quiet. It felt like an
invisible weight was pressing down on her. She knew she
needed to ask the secretary various questions to properly
understand the situation, but she couldn’t bring herself to
speak.
The only difference from the last time was not just the
atmosphere she felt.
Her position.
Her position in coming here had completely reversed.
From a guest to an unwelcome visitor.
Lisbell anxiously bit her lip, feeling like her clean neck was
exposed.
Victor stopped walking after a while. They were in front of a
large double door. He opened one of the doors and stepped
inside. Lisbell hesitantly followed his shadow.
The interior was closer to a reception room. The curtains
swayed in the open window. A gentle breeze blew in like the
breath of nature from afar.
Amid such a serene scene, there he was.
Ulrich Altahart.
She swallowed hard, feeling like the saliva stuck in her
throat was poison. It felt like evidence, burning her throat.
“Master, Miss Lisbell Osborne is here to see you.”
His platinum-blonde hair moved slightly, as if he had been
looking at some documents.
Sitting on the sofa, Ulrich turned to the door. Victor Loisden
took a step back and bowed his head as he saw Ulrich
acknowledging this.
“Then I will leave.”
“No need for tea.”
“Yes, sir.”
Just as there was no embellishment in the words announcing
her arrival, Victor left the reception room without any
unnecessary actions. Left alone in an instant, Lisbell wiped
the sweat from her palms on her skirt.
“You’ve come, Lisbell.”
A low voice addressed her, but she couldn’t lift her head,
her mind in turmoil. His tone was as calm as when they
parted ways.
Gathering her courage, Lisbell looked up.
At a glance, his expression seemed the same. Despite
harboring the family of someone who stole from him,
Ulrich’s face showed no strong emotion. It was calm and
moderate, like the surface of a lake. Even after a long look,
she could not find any sign of anger or irritation.
“Why don’t you come over here instead of standing there?”
He gestured with his head, his neck probably stiff from
looking her way. Lisbell quickly moved her feet.
She carefully sat on the multi-person sofa beside him. As
usual, documents were piled around him. Ulrich placed the
document he was holding on top of the pile and rubbed the
back of his neck. His relaxed demeanor, in stark contrast to
her nervousness, tightened her insides.
“I received the letter on my way here.”
Ulrich, crossing one leg over the other, gave her a listening
look. Encouraged by this, Lisbell forced her stiff tongue to
move.
“They say my mother has committed… some wrong.”
“Hmm.”
He extended a finger from the hand supporting his chin and
tapped his cheek.
“It’s a simple story. A few days ago, a ring kept in my
bedroom disappeared. It was a ring my mother meticulously
designed and ordered when I came of age.”
“…”
“It’s practically an antique to me now, something I rarely
wear… but it’s still quite valuable, so I couldn’t just ignore
its disappearance. So, I ordered a search of the villa.”
“…”
“Guess where it was found?”
Though posed as a question, it was not really one. With the
answer so obvious, it couldn’t be considered a question.
“Oddly enough, it was in Mrs. Osborne’s wardrobe.”
Lisbell’s fingers curled on her lap. Her skirt was pulled and
wrinkled like her troubled mind.
“My mother…”
Her tongue, even stiffer than before, moved reflexively, but
she couldn’t continue speaking. Her mind was swirling. An
overwhelming confusion was like a storm cloud.
As Lisbell struggled to speak, Ulrich calmly added.
“To be honest, I didn’t intend for things to escalate this
much. Would I, who came here to escape the noise of the
capital, really blow this out of proportion over a missing
ring? It’s more of a hassle for me, too.”
“…”
“But in our family, the principle is to report everything to the
household. Anything that happens within my vicinity must
be reported to the main house. That’s how my mother heard
about it. She’s the type who needs to take action on
anything, so things turned out this way.”
No wonder.
Despite it being a minor theft compared to a grave crime
like murder, talk of a trial in the capital had already
surfaced.
Punishing a servant for attempting to steal from the master,
if it was a family matter, wasn’t impossible. His family was
no ordinary one. To clear her foggy mind, Lisbell dug her
nails into her palm.
“My mother…”
“…”
“May I see her?”
Ulrich wiggled the foot of his crossed leg.
Lisbell glanced up and met his gaze.
A cold wind brushed past.
It wasn’t the breeze coming through the open window. It
was the enigmatic gaze she had seen under the starry sky
of the pavilion at night. His eyes were calm, yet they evoked
a tension as if they might snap at any moment.
Her heart pounded. Feeling guilty, she quickly lowered her
gaze.
“I believe there is some misunderstanding. The mother I
know would never do such a thing.”
“Hmm. People are multi-faceted, Lisbell. There’s a reason
they are described as three-dimensional beings.”
“…”
“A desire hidden from her daughter might have manifested
differently. Isn’t that possible?”
Snap, the center of the hope she had held shattered.
“Frankly, I am quite disappointed. Although I didn’t know
Mrs. Osborne well, I believed she was diligent and honest.
Not only that, but she was also neat and perceptive… It’s
infuriating the more I think about it.”
As he continued speaking, Lisbell felt any chance of leniency
from the him slipping away.
Of course, it was understandable. He had raised her
mother’s salary for her good work, even covered the
expenses for her daughter’s stay here, only to be betrayed
like this. Ulrich’s indignation was entirely justified.
Yet, it still didn’t make sense to her.
Even amidst the rapidly unfolding situation, Lisbell’s faith in
her mother remained unwavering. It was built over a long
time and couldn’t be shattered in a moment. That was their
relationship and their love.
Lisbell closed her eyes tightly and then opened them.
“Somehow, just once, even briefly, could you allow me to
speak with my mother…?”
Instead of responding, Ulrich leisurely smiled and tilted his
head. Despite using words like disappointment and
infuriating, his demeanor was playful. Yet, his gaze
remained probing. It felt like she was being examined under
a predator’s sharp claws. Every nerve in her body felt on
edge.
“I want to hear about the situation directly from her. The
mother I know is not a greedy person. Even if she had
desires, she wouldn’t achieve them through unjust
means…!”
“Does that mean….”
The low voice that flowed like water cut off Lisbell’s protest.
“Are you saying I’m lying?”
Startled, Lisbell straightened up.
The temperature in his gaze dropped. His cold stare felt like
a dagger digging into her.
Goosebumps rose all over my body. It was a slip of the
tongue caused by the chaos. Regardless, it was my fault. In
a position where I had to plead for mercy, I was guilty no
matter what attitude the man took.
Lisbell was frozen and couldn’t move for a while, then she
finally stirred.
Ulrich’s eyes fell solemnly. They followed the woman as she
knelt beneath the sofa.
He raised an eyebrow with interest.
“That’s not what I meant. I couldn’t believe my mother did
such a thing… If I offended you, I sincerely apologize.”
“Try.”
“…Pardon?”
“Apologize.”
The tip of his pointed shoe wavered. Kneeling before him,
Ulrich’s shoe was near Lisbell’s face. If it swung wrongly, it
could hit her ear. It suddenly served as a means to prove his
and her positions, and the darkness grew before her eyes.
“Come to think of it, those pretty lips have never apologized
before.”

“Didn’t you come here to beg for my mercy?”
He pressed coldly with eyes that had turned icy, questioning
how she could even think of not moving her lips in
supplication.
His behavior was generally dignified, and his tone was calm
and deliberate, never hurried or excited. Ulrich was still
Ulrich. Like a statue stimulating aesthetic consciousness, he
was beautiful and refined.
Yet, she couldn’t understand why he felt so vulgar. The
invisible force emanating from him made her lungs ache as
if they were being squeezed.
“I’m… I’m sorry.”

“I’m truly sorry. It pains me that I can only express this in
such a pitiful manner. I sincerely apologize. I’m really sorry
to have caused you unnecessary trouble over such a
matter.”
Her voice trembled. Instinctive fear gnawed at her hands
and feet. Lisbell wanted to grovel on the floor and beg if she
could. She could actually do so. She could do it repeatedly if
it could smooth over this situation.
While Lisbell’s delicate voice shook like a trembling aspen in
her apology, Ulrich observed her with calm eyes.
The man’s beautifully grown eyelashes fluttered. His eyelids
blinked slowly, giving the impression of drowsiness, yet the
focus in his pupils was too sharp for that. They seemed to
hold a bluish glint, as if on the edge of anger.
Lisbell felt every bit of his intensely focused gaze on her
skin. She thought rolling over a bed of thorns would be
better than this. The coldness settled into her like a wound
that bled all over her body.
She didn’t understand.
Why she kept feeling this chilling sense of foreboding….
DongAt that moment, the sound of a large bell covered the
drawing room where the two were seated.
The sound of a church bell.
Before they knew it, the time had shifted from morning to
afternoon.
The shadows of the two people lying on the floor grew
longer. Lisbell couldn’t even lift her head and traced only
their shadows. Before the bell finished ringing, Ulrich rose
from the sofa. His shoe, which had been threateningly
hovering in the air, was now placed right next to Lisbell’s
hand on the floor.
Although there was some distance between them, the sense
of oppression made it feel like the sole of that shoe was
pressing her down with an unbearable weight.
“Do you want to save your mother?”
Lisbell lifted her bowed head. The man standing right in
front of her was looking down at her arrogantly.
The deafening bell sound rang in and out like a tinnitus.
Reality seemed to drift far away.
“…Yes.”
“How much?”

“How much do you want to save her?”
It was a strange question.
But she had to answer. Instinct told her so. Lisbell hastily
moved her dry tongue.
“Enough to try everything I can…”
“Hmm.”

“So, you’ll do anything.”
The man pulled his chin back and smiled. Unfortunately, the
backlight made it impossible to read his expression except
for his smiling lips. Lisbell stared up at him, trying to read
the emotions behind it.
She soon realized she didn’t need to.
Ulrich bent down and grabbed Lisbell’s chin. The grayish
backlight that had cast over his face disappeared, replaced
by the bright noon light.
But that light was murky.
The light that should have been radiant and brilliant from
the sun was inexplicably gloomy.
Soon, she realized.
It wasn’t the sunlight that was murky and gloomy.
“…Hmph!”
It was the moment the bell tolled twelve times, like the final
judgment.
His lips pressed against hers.
Lisbell’s eyes widened as if they would pop out.
Instinctively, she tried to push him away, but Ulrich, who
had anticipated this, overpowered her with his dominant
strength. Her body toppled backward without resistance.
The sensation of her vision flipping was similar to the world
turning upside down. Above her, his much larger frame
loomed.
“Ah!”
Ulrich’s tongue invaded her open mouth. The wet flesh
fumbled inside her lips. The realization that another man’s
tongue, not her fiancé’s, was stirring her insides made her
body go numb with shock.
“Hmph! Urgh…!”
As soon as she grasped the situation, she raised her arms to
push against his chest. But Ulrich didn’t budge.
On the contrary, he chuckled as if amused by her futile
resistance and adjusted his grip to make it easier to suck on
her chin. When she shook her head to shake off his hand,
his grip on her jawbone tightened as if to break it. A painful
groan escaped as her cheeks were crushed.
From then on, he was completely absorbed in the kiss,
tilting his head to deepen it. He chewed her flesh until it
swelled, then slipped his tongue in to explore her palate.
Every time his tongue brushed against Lisbell’s, which was
trembling in shock, he rubbed against it more firmly. Their
saliva thickened, hotly wetting each other’s mouths. Her
throat grew moist, while her chest turned cold.
“Mm… Urgh…!”
Lisbell’s legs lifted and her skirt slid down as she lay
sprawled on the floor. Ulrich’s fingers naturally followed the
path her skirt had taken. Shivers ran down Lisbell’s spine as
his fingers grasped her knee and slid up to the inside of her
thigh.
“Ugh, mm…!”
She struggled fiercely, but overcoming his strength was
impossible. Her violent movements hit the table, causing it
to shake. A stack of papers on it tumbled over the two of
them.
That was the moment Ulrich removed his mercilessly glued
lips from hers.
He pushed himself up with his forearms on either side of
Lisbell, licking his lips as if savoring a taste. It was a gesture
as if he were relishing the flavor of some food.
“Ah, as I thought.”
Thud.
Lisbell’s body, which had been heaving to catch her breath,
stiffened. Something pressed and rubbed against the inside
of her thighs. A man’s crotch occupied the space between
them. Unable to turn her gaze to it, Ulrich smiled a fragrant
smile at her.
“This is it.”

“This is what I wanted.”
There was an overwhelming heat in his voice, making it
difficult for Lisbell to handle. Trying to calm her wildly
beating heart, she spoke hesitantly.
“Are you… perhaps drunk…?”
“I haven’t touched a drop of alcohol today.”

“I’m completely sober.”
He played with Lisbell’s gray hair sprawled on the floor and
then lowered himself again. As his face came close again,
Lisbell shrank back. He chuckled and changed his direction.
His lips curved generously as they touched Lisbell’s ear.
“One more thing.”

“I was perfectly sober that day too.”
Thump Thump Thump.
Her heartbeat was so vivid she feared it might burst out of
her mouth.
Lisbell slowly turned her eyes toward him from where they
had been staring into space. His slightly relaxed eyes
glowed with a wild intensity, staring sharply at her.
Yes, this is it.
This was the ominous feeling I had.
Unlike Lisbell, who was frozen as if bound by invisible ropes,
Ulrich was like a free bird. He was a hawk capable of
catching and devouring a mouse that only knew how to run
away.
His lower body, which had been rubbing and pressing
against her legs as if to make his presence known, slid
further into the intimate space between her thighs. His
groin, which had swollen considerably, now completely
interlocked with her crotch.
Then, he thrust his hips.
With that light movement, Lisbell flinched, her eyelids
trembling. Ulrich, ensuring their lower bodies stayed
connected, rubbed his clothed manhood against her,
bringing his lips to her neck.
“No… Ugh, don’t, Ulrich…!”
Lisbell begged, struggling like an animal caught in a trap.
“Please, don’t do this. Don’t…”

“No, please. Don’t…! I’m getting married soon!”
Her pleas poured out desperately. It had to be that way.
Ulrich, who was now overtly driven by rising lust, seemed
ready to go all the way right here.
Chapter 23.
Lisbell’s eyes welled up with transparent tears out of sheer
fear. Meanwhile, the pressure sucking on her neck was
intense.
“Ulrich! Please, I have… Ah! I have someone who promised
me a future…!”
In the midst of her breaking sobs, Theodore’s bright, smiling
face flashed in her mind.
It was driving her crazy. Regret kept washing over her.
She should have just accepted Theodore’s offer to come
with her. She should have come to Marnia with him. If she
had done that, she wouldn’t be in this situation now…
“Ugh…”
Suddenly, a soft laugh echoed in her ear.
Lisbell, with tear-drenched eyes, turned her head clumsily.
Ulrich, unable to completely stifle his laughter, lifted his
head from her neck.
Lisbell stared at him in horror.
She was crushed under the weight of despair, caught
between hell and reality, while Ulrich bore a nonchalant
smile, causing a mild dizziness. If she had been standing,
she might have staggered.
“Is this about keeping your premarital chastity no matter
what?”
“…”
“My goodness. Lisbell, you’re living centuries ago. Who
cares about that these days?”
Still unable to contain his laughter, he chuckled
intermittently even as he spoke.
Lisbell, pinned under his sleek but undeniably intimidating
frame, feared what new danger might arise from this
sudden pause.
Ulrich’s fingers brushed up Lisbell’s slender neck. A red
bruise, freshly left by his lips, lay there like the seed of sin.
“I’ve changed my mind.”
Each word he dropped felt like a signal of impending doom
to Lisbell. Her throat tightened, making her swallow bitterly.
She stiffened her cheeks.
“You asked for my mercy, didn’t you?”
“…”
“Then come to the room next to the study.”
“But that’s…”
“That’s my bedroom.”
He got up from his position. Lisbell, as if her mind had shortcircuited, lay on the floor staring at the ceiling. It was only
moments later that she realized the weight pressing her
down was gone, and she scrambled to her feet.
In the meantime, Ulrich had returned to the sofa and lit a
cigarette. Despite his lower half still prominently aroused,
he smoked with an air of casualness. It was a skill to carry
such an appearance without seeming crude.
“What do you mean…”
Lisbell managed to ask as Ulrich exhaled a puff of smoke.
“It means come to me voluntarily.”
“…”
“Abandon your loyalty to your beloved fiancé and come to
me yourself.”
The darkness in his smile as he glanced at her seemed to
dim the sunlight itself.
Something dark and slimy lurked in his tone.
“I’m curious to see if your steadfast devotion can really do
that.”
It was like the saliva dripping from the tongue of a devil.

“I’ll wait patiently until sunset.”
“…”
“If you don’t come by then, I’ll consider that you’ve given up
on my mercy.”
Ulrich left the drawing room after leaving those words
behind, abandoning Lisbell, who had slumped down from
the chaotic situation.
Lisbell remained a statue until the scent of the cigarette he
had smoked faded away completely. The first thing she did
after regaining her senses was to hastily cover her exposed
neckline with trembling hands.
“Ha…”
A long sigh escaped her lips.
He had left, but his words lingered in her ears. Lisbell
rubbed her ears frantically, trying to erase them. But it was
in vain. Those words were etched in her mind, not her
hearing.
“To my bedroom.”
There was no way she could misunderstand the meaning. It
was an extension of the act that nearly happened here. He
intended to…
Lisbell abruptly stood up and forced her trembling legs to
move toward the door. She felt the cold touch of the
doorknob in her hand.
She had to grab it, open it, and leave.
She had to get out.
Just as the man who left without any hesitation, she too had
to leave without looking back.
But.
But if she did…
If she did, what would happen to her mother…?
The thoughts overlapped like a malfunctioning machine.
What would happen to her mother?
The answer appeared too clearly in her shaken mind.
Her mother would become a clear-cut criminal.
Is that all?
If the case escalated beyond the local police to the capital
court, she might have to hire a lawyer as her mother’s only
family.
Although she had never been involved in such matters, she
knew that lawyer fees weren’t something you could casually
mention. She didn’t have that kind of money. Even if she
did, it would be at the expense of the bright future she had
dreamt of with Theodore.
It would mean giving up her future.
But if she didn’t give up that future, her mother might end
up in prison. The opponent was the Altahart family. They
had the power to make her mother rot in jail for the rest of
her life for stealing a single ring.
Mercy.
No matter how she thought about it, that was the only
solution. It was the simplest and most effective way. One
word from Ulrich could end this situation quickly.
And the condition for that mercy…
Why?
A chilling question arose.
Why is this happening to me?
Unable to open the drawing room door, Lisbell slid down in
front of it. She barely supported herself with her palms on
the floor. The cold touch of the bare floor chilled her. Her
body and heart continued to cool.
She wanted to run away. Her heart pounded wildly, driving
her mad.
The image of Ulrich kissing her, the sensation of a stranger’s
weight crushing her, the slimy hot tongue licking her neck—
all of it was so vividly alive it was terrifying.
The ritual she had desperately avoided the night before she
left the pavilion had materialized.
Guilt…
The guilt of having done such a thing with another man,
despite being engaged to another, formed like ice in her
heart. The more she dwelled on it, the stronger her urge to
run away became. There were no physical barriers
preventing her escape, but invisible shackles held her
ankles.
Mother.
If she ran away now, her mother’s fate would be sealed.
“…Ugh.”
It was a cruel weighing of scales.
“Huff…”
To keep her promise to Theodore, she would have to
abandon her mother. Conversely, to save her mother, she
would have to betray Theodore.
Why did it have to be like this?
Why did she have to be stuck in such a dreadful situation,
caught between the two people she loved most in the
world? How did she end up at such a cliff’s edge?
How?
As Lisbell stared blankly at the ornate design on the door,
her upper body slowly leaned forward.
Her forehead touched the cold floor. A silent scream
escaped her open mouth. A single ray of sunlight fell warmly
on her outstretched foot. The uncomfortable warmth
scratched at her, reminding her of the last memory
fragment of Marnia left in the dust.
It hadn’t been long since the bell rang at noon, but the sun
had set too quickly.
No, it was that Lisbell hadn’t been able to make a decision
swiftly.
It was a painful time.
Like a praying person, she lay on the floor for a long time,
unable to move, before she slowly got up and wandered
aimlessly around the drawing room. She repeatedly grasped
the doorknob she had given up on turning, and sat idly on
the sofa, staring at her feet.
It was a battle between what she couldn’t endure now and
what she might not endure in the future.
After long contemplation, Lisbell chose the present. She
decided to save her mother, who was in immediate danger.
After all, her mother’s situation was already a reality, but
her future with Theodore hadn’t happened yet.
She just needed to secure Ulrich’s mercy. That way, she
could save her mother and end this situation here. It was
undeniable that her own sacrifice was the fastest and
easiest path.
The “act” with Ulrich tonight would be dreadful and
disgusting, but as long as she wasn’t caught, it was a risk
she could take.
If Theodore never found out…
She painfully realized that just considering such a secret
meant she was starting to deceive him, but she forced
herself to ignore it.
She couldn’t abandon her struggling mother.
In the isolated space, Lisbell reached a conclusion that
gnawed at her heart.
Of course, just deciding to do it didn’t make the situation
any easier. My fingertips trembled as I barely managed to
turn the doorknob to the reception room.
Is this the right thing?
Is this the right decision?
As I stood in front of his bedroom door, next to the study,
the mental conflict continued to gnaw at me. My lungs felt
like they had turned to stone, and my breathing was so
erratic I wasn’t sure how I was even getting air. The tension
and overwhelming resignation made my chest tighten.
Knock, knock.
I knocked as if I were knocking on the gates of hell.
I heard a response from inside, but my head was so fuzzy I
couldn’t make out the words. Assuming it was an invitation
to come in, I turned the doorknob.
Ulrich was sitting on the edge of his desk, the receiver
wedged between his ear and shoulder. While I had been
curled up on the floor, consumed by my wretched worries,
he had been calmly dealing with business.
He glanced at me with just a flick of his eyes.
“Finished worrying?”
He asked as he ended the call. It was both a question and a
prompt. He was urging me to make a decision as I stood just
outside the room. Lisbell bit her lip to keep from crying,
forcing herself to wake from her dazed state.
“Mercy…”
“Hmm?”
“Will you promise me mercy?”
“Oh.”
Ulrich, as if suddenly recalling it, put down the receiver and
straightened his back. The intense twilight slowly creeping
in behind him was a terrifyingly grand sight.
“Alright, fine. A promise.”

“Should I pinky swear?”
His casual attitude, regardless of the situation, seemed
almost deliberate. Lisbell shook her head quickly, putting
strength into her voice.
“No. A proper, a proper promise.”
Ulrich chuckled and said, “Yes, yes.”
“With evidence.”
His delayed understanding was almost infuriatingly cold. As
I stared at him with sorrowful eyes, Ulrich gestured for me to
come closer.
As I walked slowly towards him, he pulled out a document
and a fountain pen. He bit off the pen cap with his molars,
then scribbled something on the back of the document with
the sharp nib. He then handed it to the approaching Lisbell.
It was the letter of clemency she had desperately wanted,
detailing his promise to show leniency towards Mrs. Osborne
as a victim of the incident, signed in Ulrich’s own hand. 
As she reached for it, Ulrich’s hand withdrew it just a
moment before she could grasp it.
“Not yet.”

“Our deal hasn’t even started.”

“We can’t have both mother and daughter branded as
thieves, right?”
Ulrich stood up. Lisbell could only watch anxiously as the
paper was placed in the third drawer of his desk.
Returning to her, he loosened his tie, which suddenly caught
Lisbell’s attention.
In this situation, it was a realization of no help.
She hadn’t known in the reception room. It would have been
better if she had continued not knowing…
The tie he was loosening was the one Lisbell had given him.
If only she had never known…
He stood before Lisbell, casually toying with the loosely
knotted tie, looking far too refined to be proposing such a
lowly deal. Unlike her, who had been driven here with a
heart full of despair, he remained impeccably composed,
almost bringing her to tears.
Yes, even after today, he would remain unchanged. Unlike
her, who would be personally destroyed, Ulrich Altahart
would continue his life as effortlessly as ever.
Seeing her swallow her boiling tears, he smiled. His
beautiful smile only made her feel as if the ground were
sinking beneath her feet.
His appearance suggested that women might voluntarily
kneel and approach to warm his bed. Given his convenient
and efficient looks, it was unfathomable why he would
demand such unjust and despicable actions from someone
promised to another. If she could understand it, she
wouldn’t be here.
Ulrich reached out. His touch, surprisingly warm, made
Lisbell flinch.
“Why are you crying already?”

“I don’t like women who cry outside the bed.”
It was only upon hearing Ulrich’s words that Lisbell realized
she was crying. Her tears were hot, so hot it felt as though
they might melt her spirit. She almost wished they would, so
she could avoid this situation. She wished she could become
dust and disappear from the world.
Ulrich, who had been rubbing her pale, frozen cheek,
grasped her slender chin.
He lifted her face, bringing their lips close. Unlike in the
daytime reception room, he leisurely licked her wet cheek.
The unusual contact made her flinch.
“Ugh…”
Lifting her chin higher, he extended his tongue, licking away
her tear tracks. It was a meaningless gesture, as his saliva
replaced the tears. Watching him lap at her like a starving
man, it was clear there was no kindness in his actions.
His tongue wandered her cheek before finally covering her
lips.
When Lisbell instinctively tried to pull away, he wrapped an
arm around her waist, pulling her onto the bed.
Feeling like a sacrificial offering, Lisbell lifted her upper body
before he could fully pin her down. With Ulrich’s upper body
immediately over her, they maintained an awkward angle.
Ulrich attacked with an open mouth from the start. Sucking
her lower lip until it lost color, he then licked the seam of
her upper lip as if exploring its taste.
“Mm, mmph.”
Unable to breathe, her hand trembled. Ulrich pushed his
tongue deep into her mouth. Lisbell’s back arched. When
she tried to turn her head, Ulrich grabbed her nape firmly,
signaling he wouldn’t allow it.
“Ahh… mmph…!”
His fierce tongue explored every corner of her mouth, slick
saliva overflowing. Ulrich seemed determined to make her
swallow it, slipping his tongue to the edge of her throat.
Helpless, Lisbell could only gulp down his breath and saliva.
Ulrich’s tongue thoroughly coated hers, licking and sucking
it before releasing it. A silver thread extended between their
parted lips, both thoroughly soaked.
“Clumsy.”
“Ha, ahh…”
“I’ve never had such a poor kiss before.”
It was exasperating, but at least novel.
“A woman with a fiancé…”
Despite her engagement, her body reacted vulnerably to
every new $exual stimulus. It was as if she had never
experienced such touches.
It was obvious.
The man she was to marry must be just as dull and
lukewarm. They were perfectly matched.
“What’s your fiancé’s name?”

“Your fiancé’s name, Lisbell.”
Gently stroking the back of her neck, he coaxed an answer.
Lisbell kept her mouth shut. Already feeling sinful about
being in this bed, she didn’t want to bring up Theodore,
even in passing. For tonight, she wanted to bury everything
about her fiancé deep within herself.
But rebellion didn’t work with Ulrich.
“Ah!”
The once gentle hand suddenly grabbed a handful of her
hair.
“Name.”
“Ugh…”
“Do I need to ask three times?”
Impatient with her stubbornness, he pressed another kiss
onto her with a slightly irritable demeanor.
Chapter 25.

A kiss is supposed to be a romantic act, but this one only felt threatening, as if it intended to force its way in if resisted.

 

It was no mere illusion.

 

Ulrich bit down hard enough on his own lips to draw blood. The bitten corners of his mouth split open. The sting spread without resistance from the torn flesh. Swallowing back sobs, Lisbell spoke in a deeply immersed tone.

 

“Theodore….”

 

“Theodore.”

 



 

“What exactly did you do with Theodore?”

 

As expected, even that name had become a means to push the current humiliating and degrading situation further. The name of her fiancé, slipping from his sinful lips, was horrifying.

 

Unable to respond, Ulrich pressed his fingers against her tear-streaked cheek and then withdrew them.

 

“If this is how you kiss, it’s obvious you haven’t had sex.”

 

A strange spark flickered in the man’s eyes as he muttered lowly.

 

Lisbell recognized those eyes.

 

On a chilly night when the wind blew across the lawn, he had playfully tied her necktie in the pavilion. During that nerve-wracking moment, Ulrich, while tying the tie, had soon….

 

“Ah!”

 

Like this, he had tried to kiss roughly.

 

The previous kiss now seemed like child’s play as Ulrich frantically sucked on her lips. His grip on the nape of her neck tightened, preventing any escape. His excitement throbbed within, pinching and stirring his core.

 

“Uh! Mm…!”

 

His tongue plunged into Lisbell’s mouth, threatening to take over, stabbing deeply as if to control her breath. Unlike the tender bird kisses she’d shared with Theodore, which were light and fleeting, this was seething with terrifying passion.

 

From the start, he twisted his tongue around hers, teasingly violating her, then later pulled her entire tongue into his mouth to suck. Her face grew hot, and her mouth filled with saliva. Their overlapping, parting lips were already a saliva-drenched mess. The scene was unbelievably obscene.

 

“Ha….”

 

He leisurely rolled his tongue, savoring every corner of her wet mouth. His kiss was erratic, switching from fast to slow, urgent to leisurely, showcasing excessive indulgence like an unpredictable jest.

 

Whatever it was, her chest swelled as if it would burst. She had never felt so suffocated in her life. It felt as if an invisible hand was strangling her.

 

“…Huh!”

 

Lisbell’s delicate violet eyes quivered. Ulrich’s hand boldly slid inside her skirt, tracing the line of her underwear on her thin thighs. His touch was so explicit that she felt humiliated.

 

“Ha….”

 

Withdrawing his head, Ulrich released her tormented lips.

 

Breathing heavily, he groped inside her skirt while staring her in the face. Despite his neat, shining face, his hand gestures were vulgar.

 

Lisbell flinched repeatedly. The weight pressing subtly on her lower abdomen was unsettling. When they had tumbled together on the sofa in the parlor, she had felt Ulrich’s erection stiff against her.

 

“Ah!”

 

His hand, which had been probing between her legs, circled around to grab her buttocks. Squeezing hard enough to make her twitch like having a fit, the obscene touch was unprecedented. The intent behind his touch was clear and it made her skin crawl.

 

“Uh, mm.”

 

As he spread her buttocks apart and rubbed the cleft connecting to her intimate area with his long middle finger, the touch was excruciatingly stimulating. Even though he wasn’t touching her bare skin, just rubbing over the cloth, it felt as if her skin was being rubbed raw.

 

“Your butt is small. It fits in one hand.”

 

“Mm….”

 

“Are your breasts this small too? Then there’s nothing to fondle.”

 

Muttering self-assessed remarks, he bent his head forward.

 

He caught the ribbon tied at her blouse neckline between his teeth and pulled without hesitation.

 

The fabric slid smoothly.

 

He took the top button between his teeth. Somehow, after a few chews, the button popped open.

 

As he unbuttoned the second one, his hand continued to relentlessly rub her perineum. His intense desire to penetrate beyond the fabric was palpable. Lisbell felt utterly suffocated as he blocked her from all sides.

 

“Uh…!”

 

Then a sharp moan escaped all at once.

 

He had undone the buttons down to her cleavage and pulled back the thin fabric. Her breasts, with their pink tips, lay almost weightlessly in his hand.

 

“Small breasts and even smaller nipples.”

 

Lisbell’s body shuddered once more. He grabbed the tiny breasts firmly, as if trying to gather up the small flesh. His strong grip felt like it would tear off her flat chest.

 

“With this, I doubt there’s any pleasure in biting.”

 

“Ah…!”

 

Muttering discontentedly, he enveloped the small mound with his mouth. The dreadful sensation shot painfully through her limbs.

 

Unintentionally struggling, Lisbell’s nipple got caught painfully. She let out an incoherent moan and shook her head wildly. Her pale feet kicked the sheets fiercely.

 

“Ha, ha…!”

 

No matter how flat, a breast was still a breast. Enveloped in hot, wet saliva, the nipple stiffened to a point. The prickling sensation spreading below her waist was strangely peculiar. The unfamiliar feeling surged, making her want to flee.

 

Ulrich greedily sucked on the small flesh filling his mouth, holding Lisbell’s arms to immobilize her.

 

The pale coral-colored nipple was soaked in his saliva. As his tongue flicked against it, it swelled and darkened slightly. He persistently rolled his tongue, savoring the hue. Each time, Lisbell’s limbs trembled as if in torment.

 

He had never seen a woman whose nipples weren’t erogenous. Realizing she was feeling it, Ulrich laughed softly and sucked a mouthful of her breast.

 

“Ah, stop…! Please, stop…!”

 

With tear-filled eyes, Lisbell begged. Ulrich ignored her. He merely tapped her buttocks lightly, while still hungrily suckling her breast.

 

Despite their modest size, her breasts were soft, with a comforting scent that made him want to bury his nose in them. It was a scent that imprinted not just on his nose but in his heart.

 

He continued his vulgar teasing, licking her nipples, and eventually freed her other breast from her bra.

 

By then, Lisbell’s blouse was barely hanging on, exposing her breasts and navel. It couldn’t even be considered as being worn.

 

After mashing his face against her flat breasts, Ulrich finally lifted his head. His large hands grabbed both her breasts at once. The nipples, helplessly rubbed by his tongue, stood erect, looking ripe and enticing. He liked how they had swollen, making them perfect for tormenting.

 

“Your nipples are hard.”

 

Dropping the remark as if to inform her, Lisbell, who had been hiding her face with her forearms, trembled. Even his casual flicks at her protruding nipples made her cheeks tremble. Her lips, exposed under her arm, quivered repeatedly. The unfamiliar contact was overwhelming. She desperately wished for it to end quickly.

 

“Just….”

 

Unable to bear it any longer, her crumpled lips parted.

 

“Just do it… Please….”

 



 

“Not this, anything but this.”

 

“Anything but what.”

 



 

“Just shove it in?”

 

His voice lowered, as if annoyed by the interruption of his amusement.



Chapter 26.


A low, rumbling voice sharply pierced her ears.

 

Lisbell nodded with trepidation. A faint chuckle slipped from his lips and fell to her face.

 

“If that’s what you want.”

 

Without hesitation, Ulrich, who had made it clear this was all foreplay for her sake, lifted her skirt. At his brazen gesture, Lisbell inhaled sharply.

 

“Move your arm.”

 



 

“If you do something distasteful one more time, I’ll make sure your breasts are so swollen by tomorrow they pop out of your clothes.”

 

At this chilling warning, Lisbell swallowed the saliva pooling in her mouth and reluctantly lowered her arm. Her vision, blurred with moisture, reflected the man’s image. As she blinked against the stinging of her eyelids, a tear traced down her cheek.

 

Only then did the man’s face, slightly harder than his voice, become clear. His evident displeasure gripped and shook her heart. Even then, Ulrich’s hands steadily worked, removing the underwear concealed beneath her skirt.

 

“You’re wearing so many things.”

 

He grumbled in annoyance, tossing the garments entwining her limbs onto the bed. Then he spread her legs wide. The unsettling clarity of his eyes, now seemingly focused on a tiny spot that had possibly just appeared, made her shudder.

 

His fingers brushed and rubbed against her vulva. Lisbell curled up like a wary animal.

 

“Even here, it’s so small.”

 

“…Ugh…”

 

“Still, it’s cute. Not a single blemish…”

 

Saying it was pinker than her nipples, he pushed aside the clitoral hood like a cover. As he rubbed the soft flesh, he suddenly slipped his fingers inside. It was a direct friction at the entrance.

 

With just one knuckle in, the dry flesh contracted, expressing mild pain.

 

Lisbell bit her lip. She couldn’t believe a stranger, someone other than her fiancé Theodore, was touching a place even he had never touched. She vaguely lamented her situation, wondering how it had come to this, when the sound of rustling fabric reached her ears.

 

Thump.

 

Something pressed firmly against the entrance. The dizzying contact caused her head to drop involuntarily.

 

Oh, a faint moan escaped Lisbell’s lips.

 

Before she knew it, Ulrich had opened his trousers and pulled out his erect cock, fixing his gaze on her vulva before looking up. Seeing her shocked expression, he smiled gently.

 

“Yes, I’m circumcised.”

 



 

“Is it that fascinating? You can’t take your eyes off it.”

 

Lisbell’s shock wasn’t due to this unexpected characteristic.

 

Though his smooth, hairless genitalia were surprising, what truly stunned her was the size. She couldn’t imagine anyone jokingly agreeing to take it.

 

Just brushing it with her palm revealed an unusual bulk. The engorged veins and its impressive length, striking her navel, were formidable. It was a weapon that didn’t suit his handsome face.

 

“Now I’m going to insert it, so stop looking. It’s time to focus below.”

 

“Ugh…!”

 

Suddenly, he spread her lower parts. Her virgin entrance, tightly closed, resisted the invasive force, contracting tightly.

 

Ulrich frowned slightly at the strong grip that seemed like it could snap off his glans. Despite her intense clenching, her flesh persistently clung to his skin, showing a fierce determination to adapt to intercourse with a man.

 

“Sorry, but I’m in a hurry.”

 

“Ugh, ah!”

 

With a cursory apology, Ulrich thrust his length in all at once.

 

Shhhlk. The tight, wet space expanded excessively.

 

Lisbell’s eyes filled with tears.

 

Her insides felt squeezed and twisted. Her internal systems, normally unbothered, were in chaos, delivering immense pressure. The pain was a bonus. It felt like she was being torn apart. The burning, stinging sensation was unbearable. Tears flowed uncontrollably.

 

“Ah, ah… ugh…!”

 

“You’re not that wet… but, after a few thrusts… it’ll get wet on its own.”

 

His voice, strained between quick breaths, sounded rough. Consumed by excitement, he showed no concern for Lisbell’s state, beginning to thrust his hips.

 

“Ack! Wait… ugh, ahh…!”

 

Her pained moans rolled off her tongue. Lisbell struggled like a person desperate to survive. Each deep thrust felt like a harpoon piercing her body.

 

She had never experienced such intimate, delicate agony.

 

It felt like her insides, not the outside, were being damaged.

 

It felt like her body was splitting in half. Lisbell tried to close her legs in a desperate effort, but he stopped her. With her legs hooked over his arms, Ulrich slammed deep into her.

 

“I told you…”

 

“Ugh, ahi Ah…!”

 

“I said I’d suck your breasts…”

 

His voice, hoarse and low, was scolding. He seemed to be blaming her for rushing him to penetrate instead of continuing the foreplay.

 

But Lisbell barely heard any of it. She was too busy trying to steady her breath, feeling as if she might die.

 

What was this?

 

How could such an act exist in the world? Wasn’t this torture? She had heard that sex was meant to be a pleasure between a man and a woman, but that was a lie. This was a nightmare. It was like experiencing hell while still alive.

 

“Ah…! Ugh…!”

 

“You’re so tight.”

 

Unlike Lisbell, who was in agony, Ulrich groaned in pleasure, enjoying the tight friction. His hand slid down to cup her hollowed-out knee. Leaning his body close, he bent her legs gently, thrusting his hips obscenely.

 

Squelch, squelchi 

 

His smooth shaft moved in and out, tearing her apart. It was like a white serpent eating through flesh. As a result, Lisbell’s vagina, stretched wide, was already red and swollen.

 

“Why don’t you relax? What’s the point of showing off your strength here?”

 

“Ugh, ah…! Ugh…”

 

When he lightly smacked her ass, her entire inner wall shook. The penis lodged inside twitched in response. Its suction was incredible. Clinging tightly, her flesh seemed to devour every bit of his vitality.

 

Whenever she let go and fully received that sensation, a melting pleasure pierced her brain.

 

Ulrich showed no mercy, piston-thrusting in and out. The speed gradually increased until the sound of his thrusts against her perineum echoed like relentless, cruel blows.

 

Lisbell curled up each time, feeling like she was truly being whipped. Sometimes her mind would go numb. Her belly felt unbearably hot, as if she’d swallowed fire, and the constantly opening and closing entrance seemed about to fall out. The sensation was shocking. That was all she could think.

 

Clearly experienced, Ulrich skillfully rotated his hips, driving his penis deep. He lowered his head, looking down at her pubic mound, slightly hairy, where her small hole was struggling to swallow his length. Feeling a pang of sympathy, he let his spit dribble down, spreading it with shallow thrusts, stirring her sticky insides.

 

It was firm enough to feel constriction, yet not entirely unpleasant.

 

And most importantly…

 

“You haven’t even done this with your fiancé, right?”

 

“Ugh, Ah…!”

 

“Then, is this… your first night with someone?”

 

Lisbell opened her eyes dazedly. Her body kept jerking uncomfortably. Her crotch was constantly being rubbed, and the tender flesh throbbed from the unending penetration.

 

She felt like her stomach was being raked with claws as she looked up at Ulrich, who was smiling. It was the grin of a devil.

 

“If that’s true, then…”

 

“Ugh, Ah…!”

 

“Shouldn’t we… be the ones getting married?”

 

His low, spreading laughter was filled with mockery.

 

Unable to hold back, Lisbell let her tears flow.



Chapter 27.


“Continuous thrust seemed to have loosened up your inner walls a bit compared to earlier.”

 

“Uh… Ah! Ahh! Mm! Hah!”

 

Catching his breath, he grabbed Lisbell’s ankles again and deftly plunged inside her. The massive, swollen object throbbed as it entered, hitting deep within her walls.

 

Whami It felt like being punched. Lisbell’s buttocks clenched hard as evidence. Ulrich thoroughly pinned her down and rapidly moved in and out of the narrow passage. Each time his swollen flesh pounded and squelched inside, her limbs and body shuddered. It was an act that truly controlled her entire being.

 

The robust penis moved in and out incessantly, raising the hot, embarrassing heat. Lisbell, now short of breath, lifted her chin and contracted below her navel.

 

Amidst the overwhelming pain, there was a faint sense of arousal. But the pain still dominated. Lisbell’s eyes, now out of focus, wandered in the air. Ulrich kissed her half-dazed mouth.

 

Their bodies stuck together, racing toward the peak.

 

His forearm-sized cock relentlessly pumped below, creating obscene sounds all around. The once tight and constricting inside gradually loosened under the relentless thrusting.

 

Soon, he filled her mouth with his tongue and climaxed. The semen, which he hadn’t released alone for a long time, poured out thickly. Their joined lower bodies became soaked without any chance to hold back.

 

As if regretful, he continued to move his hips, stimulating below even while ejaculating. The creamy fluid, tinged with light crimson, oozed out as his flesh invaded every intimate corner. The distinct, acrid smell of blood lingered somewhere.

 

“Huh… Hah.”

 

The pent-up breath finally burst out of her mouth.

 

It was over.

 

Finally, it was over.

 

Lisbell, her mind in shambles like a collapsed ruin, grabbed the sheets with trembling hands.

 

As he slowly lifted his torso, having stayed inside for quite a while, he barely moved in time. Her clothes were already torn and disheveled, just barely clinging to her body rather than being worn.

 

She suddenly tensed her buttocks and flinched.

 

She felt something trickling down from her sore, swollen opening. It burned and stung, clearly indicating tears without needing to check. It had been an excruciating time.

 

But at least… it was over.

 

Lisbell thought she had endured well, fighting the urge to vomit, as she wriggled out from under him.

 

“What are you doing?”

 

“Ah…!”

 

But just before she could completely pull away, her ankle was seized, dragging her back to her original position. The shadow as dark as ash seemed to engulf her. Lisbell looked up in confusion.

 

Unlike her, laid bare like an open gift box, Ulrich hadn’t removed a single piece of clothing during the entire sex. Now, he was loosening the tie around his neck.

 

“It’s over, right…?”

 

“Over?”

 

Ulrich sneered as he pulled out the tie.

 

“Who said so?”

 

His voice was harsh.

 

No, his voice was still as smooth as silk. The intention conveyed to Lisbell within it was insidious.

 

In the sudden jolt of despair, Lisbell froze like an ice statue and slowly shook her head.

 

“Once… once was enough.”

 

In a desperate plea, she managed to utter, but he only chuckled as he began unbuttoning his shirt one by one. The image of his half-naked body at the pool, basking in the sun and radiating sensual allure, flashed before her eyes.

 

Fear and confusion pooled at the edge of her reason. Tears, which she had forgotten in her pain, welled up again.

 

“I thought… it was just once, and it’s over…”

 

“Ha, where do you get such cute ideas?”

 

The mockery was clear.

 

Do I have to go through this again?

 

Do I have to endure this countless times?

 

Panic washed over her.

 

The act was so shocking that her consciousness seemed on the verge of breaking. The mere experience of being taken by a man she had never imagined a future with made her feel as if the world had collapsed. It was the first time she endured for the sake of her mother.

 

Lisbell knew she couldn’t handle the repeated torment. But when she lifted her tearful face and met his eyes, she realized it was a forlorn hope.

 

Ulrich was smiling.

 

A dangerously beautiful smile that could devour her in an instant. His eyes, gleaming with excessive lust, were the most frightening. They were eyes that couldn’t be reasoned with.

 

The warning lights in her head flared.

 

Lisbell, forgetting her aching body, hurriedly moved her limbs. But before she could escape the bed, her hair was seized.

 

“Ah!”

 

The pain felt like her scalp was tearing, bringing tears to her eyes. Her fragile body swayed before collapsing onto the sheets. The familiar weight pinned her down, making her nauseous.

 

Feeling the churning in her stomach, Lisbell struggled frantically. She didn’t know what she was saying, only that she was begging to be released.

 

“Keep your mouth shut, don’t spoil the mood.”

 

“Huh, huh… No, no…!”

 

“I’m in a really good mood after such a long time, you know?”

 

Her delicate legs bore the imprint of his grip. Matching those marks, Ulrich resumed his earlier brutal actions. The unexpected resistance made him click his tongue in annoyance.

 

Glaring menacingly for a moment, he calmly moved his hands like a predator targeting its prey.

 

“Huh…!”

 

A perilous gasp escaped Lisbell’s mouth.

 

She instinctively shook her head, only to choke herself further. Her limbs froze as she realized that Ulrich had tied her neck to the bedpost with the very black tie she had gifted him.

 

The more she thrashed, the tighter the tie constricted her airway. The thought that her life was in jeopardy made her hesitant, her hand movements faltering.

 

“Mm… It’s suffocating, isn’t it?”

 

Ulrich looked down at her trembling body, pressing her knees together. The swollen entrance, unable to handle the thick shaft, had torn, spilling out semen tinged with light crimson.

 

“I mean… Hah…”

 

“Huh, huh…!”

 

Despite everything, her inner walls secreted some lubrication, making his glans slick. He rubbed it against her wet entrance before slowly inserting it. The flesh entered more smoothly than before, aided by the slickness of the expelled semen.

 

Watching the penetration with intense eyes, he inhaled deeply and thrust hard, as if to scramble her insides.

 

Lisbell’s body twisted in response. He pinned her hands to the sheets, interlocking their fingers in a tender yet cruel bind.

 

“Stay still.”

 

“Huh, huh…”

 

“Unless you want to choke to death…”

 

Her legs, spread wide around his sturdy body, trembled and turned pale. Each spasm made her insides grip him tighter.

 

Ulrich let out a satisfied groan. His breaths, soft and sweet, filled the room with the obscene sounds of flesh slapping against flesh. Beneath it, Lisbell’s sobs of despair softly echoed.


Chapter 28.


It hurts.

 

The first thought that came to mind as she woke up was that. Lisbell huddled her shoulders and let out a small cough. Her whole body ached and shivered as if she was about to come down with a severe fever. She lifted her unusually heavy eyelids to find herself in an unfamiliar environment.

 

“Gasp…!”

 

It didn’t take long for her to realize where she was and what had happened the previous day.

 

Lisbell hurriedly sat up and stifled a silent scream. Her arms, legs, shoulders, waist—there wasn’t a single part of her that didn’t ache. Especially her lower back, which made her dread the idea of sitting down for the rest of the day.

 

“Ugh….”

 

She barely held back a groan and turned to look behind her.

 

And once again, she had to stifle a silent scream.

 

The man who had seemed like a living devil last night was now sleeping with an angelic face.

 

He didn’t wake up even with her movement; his breathing was calm as he lay there.

 

Lisbell, her face pale with fear, watched him for a moment before quietly getting out of bed. She couldn’t suppress a painful groan as she moved, but the thought that he might wake up made her forcefully swallow the sound. As soon as she tightened her vocal cords for his sake, a sharp pain hit her.

 

Her whole body felt like a wreck.

 

Realizing she was naked, Lisbell quietly got out of bed to find her clothes. She stiffened as she felt a liquid trickling down between her legs.

 

She didn’t need to look to confirm it. She didn’t want to. It would only make the memories of last night more vivid.

 

Lisbell looked around and found her clothes scattered around. She picked them up and sneaked towards the bathroom attached to the bedroom.

 

“…Ah….”

 

A lost sigh escaped her lips.

 

Her reflection in the mirror was worse than she had imagined. Her face was swollen from the tears she had shed all night.

 

But what caught her attention more was her neck. It was bruised and discolored from being choked and rubbed by a tie all night. The pain she felt when she swallowed might have been from these wounds.

 

“Ugh….”

 

As soon as she touched her neck, pain shot through her. Lisbell blankly stared at the bruises encircling her neck before she slumped to the floor. Even though the ordeal was over and it was now morning, her heart still pounded. The pain left on her body caused these dreadful aftershocks.

 

Don’t think about it, don’t think about it….

 

It’s over now.

 

There’s no need to think about it anymore.

 

Last night, she secured a promise of mercy in exchange for her ordeal. She would resolve her mother’s issues and return to Misley, where Theodore was.

 

Then she could live as if nothing had happened.

 

That’s how it should be….

 

Even though her life could never be the same, at least she hadn’t suffered to an unbearable extent….

 

A wry smile formed. She knew better than anyone that repeating these words to herself in a corner was a poor consolation.

 

But regret was futile. She had ultimately betrayed her trust with Theodore. It was a path she chose herself. Even regret was deceitful.

 

Her eyelids stung. Tears welled up again from the accumulating thoughts. Lisbell wiped her tears with the back of her hand and quickly turned on the faucet.

 

She hastily cleaned herself under the running water. It would have been nice if everything could just wash away, but it wasn’t that simple. Struggling for a while, Lisbell eventually used her hand to part her buttock and push down on her lower abdomen. Only then did the thick semen start to slip out. It felt horribly disgusting, like expelling something abnormal.

 

Seeing herself in the mirror like this, a wave of humiliation hit her. Fresh tears welled up, but the gushing water hid them. Under the warm water, Lisbell rubbed her eyes repeatedly.

 

After hastily washing herself as if someone were chasing her, she quickly dried off and put on the clothes she had brought. The memory of the letter of mercy Ulrich had neatly signed yesterday came to mind as she buttoned her blouse.

 

Yesterday, definitely….

 

It was in the third drawer.

 

She had endured all that just to get it.

 

Lisbell left the bathroom and approached the desk. Glancing at the bed, she saw Ulrich still sleeping peacefully.

 

Click.

 

She opened the third drawer. Contrary to her expectations, it was empty. Her hand on the drawer handle froze in confusion.

 

She was sure he had put it there yesterday.

 

Was it not here?

 

Feeling bewildered, she hurriedly opened all the drawers above. But they were all empty. No matter how hard she searched, she couldn’t find what she was looking for.

 

It was then.

 

“Pfft.”

 

A chill ran down her spine.

 

Lisbell froze in place and slowly turned her head. Ulrich, who had been sound asleep just moments ago, was now awake and looking at her. Still lying comfortably, his arm draped over his forehead, he looked at her with languid eyes, as if enjoying the morning.

 

“Stealthily.”

 



 

“You’re moving like a cat again today.”

 



 

“I didn’t see a cute tail last night, though….”

 

Ulrich yawned lightly, making nonsensical comments.

 

Lisbell, crouched in front of the drawer, couldn’t move. The air had turned sharp from the moment he laughed, but seeing the carefree man, it seemed only her air had stiffened.

 

A weak nausea rose inside her. The reason he could be so relaxed after such a degrading night… could only be because he had experienced many such nights before.

 

“It’s not there.”

 



 

“I moved it, of course.”

 

Ulrich, slowly stretching his neck side to side, spoke quietly. Unlike her, who had been frantically covering herself and heading to the bathroom, he unabashedly displayed his naked body without a hint of shame.

 

Lisbell quickly turned her head away. When she had seen him at the swimming pool before, she couldn’t find a place to look. Now, she turned away because she feared the memories of last night would resurface.

 

Ignoring her reaction, he put on a robe from the wing chair. Tying the belt loosely, he barely covered himself and approached the desk where Lisbell was sitting with a cigarette in his mouth.

 

“I figured you’d look for it first thing with red eyes.”

 

“…Isn’t your business with me finished?”

 

“Did you sleep well?”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“Aren’t you hungry?”

 



 

“Let’s go down for breakfast.”

 

Am I talking to a person or a wall? 

 

Lisbell glared at Ulrich, who shamelessly ignored her words.

 

He, standing right in front of her, slowly bent his knees and squatted down.

 

“Oh dear.”

 

With a cigarette in his mouth, he clicked his tongue as he reached out to touch her neck.

 

“Your pretty neck is a mess.”

 



 

“Sorry. I tend to lose sight of everything when I get excited.”

 

His approaching hand looked like a dark abyss. Reflexively, Lisbell slapped it away. The sound echoed through the spacious bedroom, breaking the silence and making the air feel sharp.

 

Lisbell was more surprised by her actions than anyone else.

 

She had never treated anyone like this before, making her own reaction unfamiliar and causing her to resent Ulrich for making her feel this way.

 

She bit her lip and then let go.

 

“I’m fine…I don’t need breakfast”

 



 

“Please give me the letter of mercy.”

 



 

“It’s really over now. I just want to go back to Misley. Please.”

 

She wanted to shout and demand it right away, but she didn’t have the letter in her possession yet. As long as it was in Ulrich’s hands, she had to be compliant. Given his unpredictable behavior, who knew what bizarre act he might commit if his mood soured.

 

Ulrich, looking down at his slapped hand, smiled.

 

Lisbell, avoiding his eyes, flinched when he suddenly grabbed her chin firmly. His face drew close, startling her.

 

“I said, let’s have breakfast first.”

 



 

“Don’t make me repeat myself. I really hate that.”



Chapter 29.


It was not a force that could be escaped by sheer will alone. Even without the problem of physical strength, Lisbell could not refuse this touch. The mockery, with the letter of mercy as its price, continued from night into the morning.

 

Lisbell looked at the man with tearful eyes. His formerly indifferent expression softened, and he released her slender jaw. The same hand that had forcibly spread her legs many times yesterday gently caressed her cheek.

 

“I’ll give it to you after breakfast.”

 



 

“Come down with me.”

 

Without waiting for a response, Ulrich got up and headed for the door. Lisbell, who had been sitting listlessly like she did in the reception room, finally pushed herself up from the floor after a delay.

 

Her legs trembled. Her whole body felt as if it had been bitten by a beast, and she was overcome with a slight nausea. The thought of having to eat in front of this man only made her symptoms worse.

 

But she couldn’t give up the letter of mercy, so she quietly followed him. As they descended the stairs, she became acutely aware of the dire state of her body. The thought of returning to Misley in this condition felt overwhelming.

 

The dining room was absurdly large for a space meant for just one person. Lisbell sat beside Ulrich, who took the head seat. As soon as they were seated, a servant, who seemed to be a long-time employee like a mother, quietly served the meal.

 

Lisbell stared at Ulrich without touching her food. He noticed her gaze as he took a sip of coffee to wake himself up and smirked.

 

After calling a servant and giving instructions that Lisbell couldn’t hear, the door to the dining room opened, and Victor appeared.

 

“I brought what you asked for.”

 

Victor placed the paper in front of him. Lisbell immediately recognized it as the letter of mercy she had been desperately searching for since morning. As she watched it, Victor leaned over and whispered in Ulrich’s ear.

 

“And she just returned.”

 

“Really?”

 

“What should I do?”

 

“What else? She should report immediately.”

 

Ulrich laughed softly as he noticed her lack of interest. He motioned for Victor to come closer again and whispered more instructions. Victor glanced at Lisbell, sighed, and nodded.

 

After the secretary left, Ulrich picked up his glass.

 

“Eat something. You haven’t had a proper meal since last night.”

 

He pointed at Lisbell’s untouched plate. His apparent concern was infuriating. He was the one who had robbed her of her appetite.

 

“I’m not hungry.”

 

“Why not?”

 

The man who knew better than anyone else still asked. It became clear that his question was a command.

 

Lisbell reluctantly picked up her fork. She speared a grilled mushroom, which looked easy to swallow, and pushed it into her mouth. The mushroom’s unique flavor spread, but her nausea persisted.

 

Forcing down a few bites, Victor returned. He placed the items he brought beside Ulrich and left. One was Lisbell’s luggage, left in the reception room yesterday, and the other was a neat white scarf.

 

After placing the luggage under her chair, Ulrich unfolded the scarf. He reached out to Lisbell.

 

Startled, her eyes met his cold, sharp gaze. It was a silent warning. If she swatted his hand away like before, he wouldn’t let it slide. So, she didn’t move as he tied the scarf around her neck.

 

Her hand holding the fork trembled. Memories of yesterday flooded back. What if he choked her with this scarf like he did with the tie last night?

 

While she struggled to calm her shaking mind, Ulrich’s hand withdrew. The scarf hid the bruises on her neck. Lisbell touched the scarf with a bitter expression.

 

“Why…”

 

“Hmm?”

 



 

“Oh.”

 

He answered with a smile in his eyes.

 

“Because I thought you’d want to cover it?”

 

Cover what? From whom?

 

Puzzled, Lisbell stared at him.

 

Knock, knock. The sound of someone knocking broke the silence.

 

“Come in,” Ulrich said in his characteristic low voice. Lisbell’s gaze turned involuntarily towards the door.

 

And then.

 

And then….

 

“Motheri”

 

Mrs. Osborne stood there.

 

She paused, surprised to hear her daughter call her. Her expression showed she had no idea why Lisbell was there.

 

Before the mother and daughter could speak, Ulrich intervened.

 

“Madam, did you have a good trip?”

 

“Yes, sir. I completed the errand you assigned and returned. But why is Lisbell here…?”

 

What?

 

Lisbell couldn’t believe her ears.

 

Errand? Completed? Returned? What is this all about?

 

A dreadful thought briefly crossed her mind.

 

Surely not…

 

No way.

 

To resolve this absurdity, Lisbell looked at him. Ulrich was smiling handsomely as usual. He addressed Mrs. Osborne while looking at Lisbell leisurely.

 

“Lisbell said she had left something at the villa. Since you were away, I received her in your stead.”

 

“My daughter must have been a bother.”

 

“Not at all.”

 

Lisbell froze amidst their casual conversation. The reality of the situation dawned on her. Yet, it was too unbelievable to speak.

 

If what I think is true…

 

Then what have I….

 

“Madam, have you eaten?”

 

“Yes, I had a simple meal on the way back.”

 

“Then you should unpack first.”

 

Mrs. Osborne read the subtle hint to leave and bowed. Her gaze met her daughter’s across the table.

 

Sadly, their eyes did not connect. Lisbell only stared at the man beside her.

 

“I’ll be back soon. Lisbell, wait a bit, okay?”

 

“Don’t worry about Lisbell. I’ll take good care of her.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

She left the dining room, knowing nothing.

 

Lisbell regained her senses after her mother exited. She looked back at the door her mother had just gone through. The questions she hadn’t asked came pouring out.

 

Mother, why are you here?

 

I thought you were under house arrest. How are you moving freely?

 

And why do you greet this man so casually?

 

I knelt and cried, begging this man more desperately than anyone. How could you….

 

“Didn’t I tell you before?”

 



 

“That being a teacher doesn’t suit you, Lisbell.”

 

Lisbell’s head turned awkwardly towards him.

 

Ulrich stabbed a cherry tomato on his plate with a fork. The fruit burst, splattering red juice everywhere. He seemed to be toying with it rather than eating it.

 

Their eyes met.

 

Cutting the almost-squashed tomato in half, he spoke.

 

“You’re too naive…”

 

Lisbell suddenly stood up.

 

Her chair fell back with a thud. Her luggage toppled over as well. Everything was a mess, but Lisbell knew for sure. The biggest mess here was herself.

 

“How…”

 

Her voice trembled as if her vocal cords were being twisted.

 

“How could you do this…”

 

She didn’t know what tricks he had used, but one thing was clear. The whole thing was a lie. The theft accusation against her mother was fabricated.

 

Which means I begged this man pitifully for something that never happened. Worse, I betrayed my fiancé and ended up with this man….

 

“Ugh…”

 

Lisbell felt genuinely sick and staggered. She couldn’t hold onto the table and collapsed. Her mind boiled with anger, frustration, and helplessness. The shameful, hateful night left a deep scar on her heart.


Chapter 30.


Her body sharply honed senses heightened her awareness.

 

The stinging feeling when she swallowed, the lingering discomfort as if something remained inside whenever she moved his lower body… the marks that clung to her body could not be easily washed away with water. Like an indelible brand that couldn’t be removed no matter what she did.

 

“…Let goi”

 

That’s why Lisbell furiously shook off Ulrich’s grip on her wrist. His expression once again bore a sharp warning, but Lisbell, her emotions equally intense, paid no attention to it.

 

Ulrich stared impassively at Lisbell, who was glaring at him furiously. Even the customary smile he usually wore was absent. Lisbell thought that perhaps this was his true face. The gap between when he smiled and when he didn’t was so vast.

 

“You looked pretty when you were crying in bed.”

 



 

“Not at all now, though.”

 

Ulrich whispered in a complaining tone, making a light gesture. Something fluttered and fell into Lisbell’s arms. It was a letter of Mercy that he tossed at her.

 

“Here, take it.”

 



 

“You spread your legs for it, so stop glaring at me.”

 

As she looked at the letter that brushed past her chest and fell to the floor, Lisbell let out a dry laugh.

 

What use is it now?

 

The letter was necessary to save her mother. Yet, the mother who appeared before her was perfectly fine, not hindered in any way. She was not treated as a criminal and was still serving excellently as an employee of this mansion.

 

In other words, the theft incident that had flown to Misley via mail never happened. Therefore, even this letter of Mercy was utterly useless to Lisbell. The black letters on the white background seemed to mock her.

 

Lisbell steadied herself, pressing her trembling hands on the floor, and stood up. She placed the crumpled letter conspicuously on the dining table and picked up her fallen luggage.

 

Even now, her body, which had endured an ordeal all night, creaked and screamed in pain. She stifled a groan, clenching her teeth, and turned her back.

 

There was no reason to stay any longer. More precisely, she didn’t want to be in the same space as this man. The only reason she faced the man she didn’t want to see was to get the letter of Mercy. Now that it was all useless… there was no reason to endure the disgust any longer.

 

To be honest, she had many things she wanted to argue about.

 

She was unfairly treated and felt indignant.

 

She felt like crying out of frustration.

 

But… would anything really be resolved by venting those feelings?

 

She had already lost her purity, it was her choice, and this man was still Altahart.

 

Look, what could have made the non-existent incident seem so real?

 

It was the power he held.

 

A family known to manipulate the capital’s press at will would easily handle the local government like the tongue in their mouth.

 

Could she possibly compete with such a person?

 

If she tried to escalate the issue, nothing would be resolved. Reality was always harsher than dreams. Hence, Lisbell turned without saying a word.

 

She just wanted to return to Misley as soon as possible. She wanted to see Theodore’s face, be held in his broad arms, and be reassured that such an incident would not affect her life or future. Staying here, with this man, might drive her crazy first.

 

“Will you tell your mother?”

 

As she headed toward the door, a voice coiled around her ankle like a snake slithering through the bushes.

 

Lisbell doubted his humanity, mentioning her mother even at the last moment. She once considered him not a bad person. With a bitter smile, she just turned her head.

 

“…Do you still want to act like a benevolent master?”

 

So now, was he trying to silence her?

 

Why bother?

 

Did he like her mother as a subordinate that much? But could such a valuable subordinate be used in such a lowly manner? Perhaps he had a different standard for handling people, one that didn’t adhere to common sense. He might not feel any guilt using people as tools.

 

“Who?”

 



 

“Me?”

 

Her guess wavered. Ulrich’s reaction, as if asking what nonsense she was spouting, confused her.

 

“What do I care about how the subordinates see me?”

 



 

“I’m just curious. Whether Lisbell will talk or not.”

 



 

“Probably not.”

 

Lisbell clenched her fist. She felt her nails dig into her flesh but didn’t relax her grip.

 

She wanted to refute him, but unfortunately, even she couldn’t easily conclude. Her mother was unexpectedly fine and had seen her suddenly appear in Marnia. So, naturally, she would need to explain everything. She would likely ask what she left behind that made her come back.

 

Then there was another crossroads.

 

She could tell her mother everything or hide it.

 

In fact, until she put down the letter of Mercy, she intended to tell everything. Because she had clearly witnessed Ulrich’s disgusting nature. She was genuinely concerned about her mother living with such a vile person.

 

So, she planned to confess and persuade her to quit.

 

But….

 

“Why… do you think that?”

 

“Will you do it?”

 



 

“No, you can’t.”

 

Ulrich never resolved curiosity all at once. What she previously saw as polished manners now seemed like mere vile hobbies.

 

“You can’t do it.”

 

“So…i”

 

“A kind-hearted daughter like Lisbell couldn’t do that, could she?”

 



 

“Could you tell your mother that you were raped by another man while you had a fiancé?”

 

He laughed heartily, as if even saying it was ridiculous. His platinum hair, shaking along with his tilted head, reminded her of a spider web catching the sunlight. Her limbs stiffened as if tied up, helpless.

 

The word he uttered, the sentence it formed, the blatant intention beneath it… the overt mockery.

 

Everything gnawed at Lisbell.

 

Only when the taste of blood spread in her mouth did she realize she had bitten the inside of her cheek hard. And that it reflected her inner state accurately.

 

The situation and her position were strange. When it came to causality, she was clearly the victim. She was forced to give herself to Ulrich Altahart, who blackmailed her using her mother’s false safety.

 

Then why was she so anxious and uneasy?

 

Why was she… while this man brazenly held his head high….

 

“I will tell her.”

 



 

“Everything, everything….”

 

Her trembling voice was wet. No matter how hard she tried to force strength into her throat, she couldn’t shake off the dampness. Ulrich, noticing the sob in her voice, smiled pityingly. Twisted as her feelings were, even that smile felt like mockery.

 

“Really?”

 



 

“Then go ahead.”

 

Ulrich calmly smoothed his unstyled hair and opened a gold-framed case next to a tall candlestick. He took out a cigarette, his actions devoid of any embarrassment or similar emotion.

 

Even her declaration to reveal everything didn’t faze him; he remained composed as if it were someone else’s business.

 

“Only Mrs. Osborne will be pitiful.”

 

He was not just composed… he seemed indifferent.

 

Only then did Lisbell realize that to him, last night’s events were merely a trivial joke. And that the aftermath of it didn’t matter to him at all, as if it were a non-issue.

 

Unlike Lisbell, whose inner self was breaking, he was still and would always be the untarnished Altahart.

 

Those pretty eyes.

 

Those pretty yet repulsive eyes.

 

Those eyes spread out like an endless sea….

 

Unable to endure any longer, Lisbell ran out of the dining room.


Chapter 31 .


Lisbell ran down the hallway without stopping, like someone who only saw what was in front of them. Today, the unusually quiet and eerie mansion resonated only with the sound of her heavy footsteps. She broke into a cold sweat as if she was running toward a destination that would never come. By the time she barely escaped the mansion and crossed the garden, her vision was already soaked. Tears blurred her eyes, soaking her cheeks every time she blinked. She raised her arm and roughly wiped her face.

 

“Lisbelli”

 

She halted abruptly, as if her roots were planted in the ground. In a landscape she could no longer see, a familiar voice that brought peace stopped her in her tracks. She stood there, staring down at her shadow stretching across the ground.

 

Soon, someone grabbed her shoulder and turned her around.

 

“Lisbell, dear.”

 

“…Mother.”

 

“Oh dear, what’s happened to your face….”

 

Mrs. Osborne was at a loss for words upon seeing her daughter’s disheveled and tear-streaked face. Her dry fingers touched Lisbell’s pale cheek.

 

“What happened, dear?”

 

Mrs. Osborne, who had rarely seen her daughter in such a state, was quite alarmed. She had just unpacked at the servants’ quarters and was on her way back to the main mansion. If she hadn’t accidentally seen her daughter running out of the mansion like a panicked person, she wouldn’t have had this chance to catch her.

 

“Stop crying… and calmly tell me what happened. You said you came here because you forgot something.”

 

Hearing her mother’s gentle voice that seemed to wrap around her, Lisbell’s eyelids fluttered wearily. Undrying tears ran across her cheeks.

 

The worried expression, the anxious voice, and the warm, affectionate touch of her mother made Lisbell struggle to move her tongue.

 

“Mother.”

 

“Yes.”

 

“I have a favor to ask.”

 

“A favor?”

 

“Please stop working at this mansion.”

 

Oh, Lisbell sighed inwardly.

 

She couldn’t tell her mother about what happened last night, not even if it killed her. This might play out exactly as Ulrich had predicted, but it wasn’t a matter of pride.

 

“What?”

 

“Please.”

 



 

“I’m begging you.”

 

“What’s this all of a sudden….”

 

“Any other job is fine. You don’t have to move to another country with me. But not here. Anywhere but here.”

 

Mrs. Osborne’s wavering expression turned sharp for a moment.

 

“Did something happen with the master?”

 

Her mother’s fingers, which were holding her, twitched and curled. Lisbell looked down at that hand silently, then forced a smile after a long while.

 

“What happened…..”

 



 

“Just… staying here for a day, I got a bad impression of him. He seems to treat people rather carelessly. He may respect you for now, but who knows when his attitude might change.”

 



 

“So….”

 

She felt like an utter fool for not being able to say more, but she had no other choice.

 

“A kind-hearted daughter like Lisbell couldn’t do that, could she?”

 

“Could you tell your mother that you were raped by another man while you had a fiancé?”

 

She knew she must seem strange, and the situation unfolding as Ulrich had foreseen was excruciating, but none of that mattered compared to the pain her mother would feel if she learned the truth.

 

So ultimately, this matter was.

 

“Just this once, please listen to me.”

 

It’s something I must endure alone….

 



 

The weather turned hot.

 

The lush summer had arrived.

 

Since Marnia was a small town with many nature-friendly elements, the seasonal changes were more pronounced. The leaves, originally a fresh green, turned a vivid green under the sunlight, and the flowers blooming along the stems became vibrant and colorful.

 

“The construction of the Alstad Hotel’s second branch is now in its final stages. If everything proceeds as planned, it should be smooth. Once construction is completed, we will need to run a trial operation, so please provide a guest list for the trial run, and we will send out invitations accordingly.”

 

Thud.

 

Ulrich moved his bishop diagonally one square, pressing it with his index finger.

 

Victor, who was checking something on a document, suddenly grabbed a chess piece. With a mountain of work to deal with, even thinking about where to place the pieces made his brain feel overloaded.

 

But he had to comply quietly whenever he had the chance to keep Ulrich engaged in this way. It was a kind of custom boss management know-how he had developed after serving him for several years.

 

After Victor’s turn, it was Ulrich’s turn again. He crossed his legs and stared at the chessboard. His eyes, lost in thought, looked as if he was completely absorbed in the game. Victor doubted if he was even listening to the business report he was giving.

 

Despite his doubts, Victor continued his report.

 

“And regarding the Alstad Department Store, the shipping costs on the northern coast have recently increased abnormally, so we will inevitably need to adjust our support for delivery costs. However, since the adjustment will be uniform, we may face backlash from other suppliers.”

 



 

“Also, we have received the list of stores that will be newly contracted and opened. Gwen has initially reviewed it.”

 

“Why him?”

 

That guy, suddenly reacting.

 

Victor looked incredulous as he reached for a chess piece during his turn. Given the topic, he somewhat understood the sudden change in demeanor. If he had known he would react so well, he would have brought up Gwen Altahart’s topic from the start.

 

“Since the department store is jointly managed by both of you, it’s only natural to cross-check with him.”

 

“Joint management?”

 



 

“Who decided that?”

 

Ulrich lifted the queen, asking in a soft low voice. He fiddled with the well-defined chess piece, raising his eyebrow.

 

“Hasn’t he sent the written waiver of his shares yet?”

 

“No… not yet….”

 

Ulrich chuckled softly at Victor’s deflated response.

 

“My brother is more persistent than he seems.”

 



 

“He should learn to give up gracefully after losing a bet.”

 

“…You need to speak clearly. Don’t you know who made him act so petty?”

 

“You mean me?”

 

The answer was obvious, but the question was annoying. Victor looked like he wanted to thump his chest.

 

“Really, why did you spread rumors about Gwen’s personal life…i”

 

“He was going to pretend it never happened.”

 



 

“Gwen was the one who broke the brotherly bond first.”

 

Victor felt a throbbing headache and rubbed his face dryly.

 

It had been four years since he graduated from university and started working as an aide to this nobleman.

 

Victor Loisden first met him at university.

 

When he got into a prestigious university, known to be difficult for commoners, he felt like he had the world at his feet. But that feeling didn’t last even a month after enrollment.

 

He encountered a world he hadn’t known at university. Talented people who made him feel like a frog in a well, a grain of sand on the beach, simply by their presence.

 

In a world with a social hierarchy, ‘talent’ referred to those with noble lineage or those who, even without such noble status, had grown wealthy enough from profitable businesses to be respected by nobles.

 

Ulrich Altahart was at the top of that human pyramid. He had been since before any relationships or friendships formed. His last name, ‘Altahart,’ established his position.

 

Even now, it seemed he was destined for fame. Besides inheriting wealth from a lineage of international bankers, he had an extraordinary appearance.

 

His exceptional qualities, combined, made him a center of attention and admiration throughout university.

 

Victor got to know him through a shared class. They started talking because they sat close to each other, leading to the current situation.

 

Damni

 

Victor cursed himself for not running away back then.

 

Of course, being in this position was undoubtedly an honor. Without a noble title or bourgeois background, Victor Loisden was a florist’s son from a small village. Becoming a secretary for Altahart, the nation’s foremost banker, was a village-level event.

 

The problem wasn’t the position of secretary.

 

The problem was his employer.

 

He had noticed some unusual traits during university but had dismissed them. The salary offered with the secretary position was too significant to decline just because of personality.

Chapter 32 .

However, everything in this world comes at a cost.

 

Tasks that are given astronomical amounts of money have a reason for it.

 

From serving under his peer closely, Victor realized that not only Ulrich but his entire family was a den of madness.

 

Do the rich always play around like this?

 

Every time an incident occurred, he couldn’t help but think about how grand the scale was. The grotesqueness was a given, and sometimes it was accompanied by a repulsive discomfort.

 

In other words, they did not hide the obscene and blatant instincts underlying human consciousness. This seemed related to their family background… Perhaps because they could obtain anything easily from a young age, even the elements to alleviate their boredom were extraordinary. Drugs and gang rapes were trivial, so what more could be said?

 

Victor stopped pondering about their humanity. Perhaps it was right after he saw Ulrich mingling with a married woman in a lounge at a charity event hosted by the Iroo family.

 

The lady, with her slender legs wrapped around Ulrich’s waist and moaning loudly, was clearly the hostess of the Iroo family that hosted the event that day.

 

That wasn’t all. The entire family, including Ulrich, was completely depraved. They were devoted to corrupting the customs with all their might. Perhaps it was lucky that they had the power to control and manipulate the media, allowing them to hide such aspects.

 

“Should I sue him?”

 

“What?”

 

“It’s clearly a breach of contract. Don’t you think we could do it if we got a lawyer?”

 

Ulrich, as if he was about to reach for the phone, twitched his fingers resting on his knee. Victor covered his face with his hands, hoping he would refrain.

 

“So, are you planning to form a family lawyer team?”

 

“If possible.”

 

“And then sue Young Master Gwen? Do you think that makes sense?”

 

“Things that don’t make sense often do, when money is involved.”

 

Nothing about serving a nobleman was easy, but recently, the most troubling issue was this. The disputes between the Altahart brothers, who were always at each other’s throats since childhood, only intensified as they grew older.

 

The reason Ulrich ended up at the secluded Marnia villa was also related to this.

 

It started with a trivial bet.

 

The Altahart family’s business had diversified into several fields over time.

 

Under the leadership of the Altahart matriarch, who took over the international banking sector following her late husband, the two brothers each carved out their own business territories based on their interests and positions.

 

The eldest son, Gwen Altahart, who was set to become the head of the family, took control of the oil industry, which showed great potential following banking. Ulrich, on the other hand, took charge of the hotel business in the capital, which he had steadily developed since coming of age. Other sectors like the jewelry and wine industries were also divided under their names.

 

The only business they shared jointly was a department store in the capital.

 

The department store, with five floors built along the main street next to the square, boasted much higher profits than expected. It could leverage various family businesses, was useful for managing connections, and had a bright future.

 

The department store, which both brothers coveted, had not been clearly divided, and thus had been jointly operated. During this time, they relentlessly tore each other apart.

 

In Victor’s view, Ulrich was the more talented businessman. He had an instinctive sense of how to roll money to make it grow.

 

In contrast, Gwen, the eldest, was greedy but lacked skills. The profits from his projects were largely due to the inherent profitability of the business rather than his ability. If Ulrich had taken on those projects, the profit margins would have been at least twice as high.

 

Gwen wasn’t a particularly good manager. However, being an Altahart, he was also prideful. He had big dreams and was greedy.

 

Naturally, he interfered with the department store business frequently.

 

When problems arose due to his interference, he never reconsidered his decisions but instead blamed his subordinates. When frustrated, he would call in high-class prostitutes and lock himself in his bedroom for days, indulging in drugs and merrymaking.

 

Gwen was neither responsible nor thoughtful.

 

In contrast, Ulrich only interfered when necessary, and though he found everything a bother, he saw tasks through to the end. This wasn’t always the case; he seemed to find pleasure in watching money grow based on his decisions as he inherited more of the family’s business.

 

The bet over the department store management rights stemmed from such trivial disagreements.

 

“You crazy bastard… Ulrich, do you even think? The new tenants on the third floor must be the finest whiskey from the Hohen Kingdom. Are you going to stash that precious cash cow somewhere?”

 

“Gwen, did you plug your ears? We’re planning to clear out the store and turn it into a tea room. The construction schedule is already set, and we’re about to start. What nonsense are you talking about?”

 

“Tea room? Tea roooom? In a department store where people come to spend money? Do you want them to sit and listen to orchestras and laugh? Is this a party hall? Are you not planning to sell goods? It’s more profitable to increase tenants and salesi”

 

“Wanna bet?”

 

“What?”

 

“Whether the department store’s total sales will increase or decrease after the tea room is established.”

 

“Hah, look at this lunatic. Fine, let’s bet. I bet it will decrease.”

 

“I bet it will increase.”

 

“The deadline is three months after the construction.”

 

“Fine.”

 

“What will you give up if I win?”

 

“The management rights of the department store.”

 

“What?”

 

“I’m sick of this constant bickering. Let’s settle this once and for all. The loser steps back.”

 

“You short-sighted fool… Fine, let’s end thisi”

 

In the end, Ulrich was the winner.

 

The tea room, established in a department store with no suitable gathering place, became a new social hub for the upper class.

 

The upper class’s desire to show off could not be overlooked. People who used to visit the department store casually began to spruce up their appearance. They gathered in groups, eager to find something that made them stand out.

 

The most notable thing was the shopping list, of course.

 

People engaged in subtle competitions to show who had the deepest pockets by buying the most expensive items. As a result, the department store’s sales skyrocketed.

 

Thus, the department store became Ulrich’s.

 

At least, that’s what Ulrich and his secretary, Victor, thought.

 

The variable was Gwen.

 

Despite his loud declaration to settle things, Gwen played dumb when the results didn’t favor him. It was a cowardly stance, but since the promise was verbal, there was no tangible evidence.

 

But Ulrich didn’t back down easily. Every morning, the first thing he did was send a letter of renunciation of joint management rights to his brother’s bedroom. Gwen, of course, ignored him.

 

After more than twenty letters were ignored, Ulrich’s patience ran out.

 

“…Oh my god.”

 

One morning, Victor, while sipping strong coffee and reading the newspaper, spat out his drink.

 

What the…?

 

He couldn’t believe his eyes as coffee dripped from his lips.

 

Altahart’s eldest son. The heir of the family. Gwen Altahart. Homosexual. Prostitute. Male prostitute. Orgy. Drugs. Sex scandal. Engagement. Schwaben family.

 

All kinds of obscene and dirty words adorned the front page of the capital’s tabloids.

 

Naturally, the family was in an uproar.

 

Investing an enormous amount every quarter to manage the media was to ensure that such sordid personal lives were never exposed.

 

They had so tightly controlled the flow of information that not a hint of truth had ever leaked, maintaining an image of nobility and mystery. Despite the sordid reality, the Altaharts were revered as wealthy elites by the people of Rechem.

 

The perfect sandcastle they had built was now on the verge of collapsing.

 

Victor was particularly shocked.

 

It was only natural.

 

The one who had leaked this horrific scandal was his own boss, Ulrich.


Chapter 33.


As soon as Victor regained his senses, he was summoned to the mansion.

 

Dragged before his employer, Victor reported everything he knew. Meanwhile, Gwen Altahart crumpled up tabloid papers with his face plastered across them, cursing loudly, and their mother, Lady Altahart, rubbed her temples with an exasperated look.

 

“So, in the end…”

 



 

“Are you saying this mess all started from a bet?”

 

“Yes, ma’am…”

 

“Unbelievable, I’m at my wits’ end.”

 

Lady Altahart, the current head of the family, was at a loss for words at her two adult sons, behaving no better than seven-year-old children.

 

Gwen, seething with anger, shouted from the side.

 

“Motheri Please issue a summons for this wretch immediatelyi”

 

“Gwen, calm yourself.”

 

“How can I calm down? We’ve always maintained strict privacyi It’s a principle our family has upheld meticulously since our ancestors’ times. This rascal has gone too far. Such a disgraceful method is intolerable as an Altaharti”

 

“And is your behavior as the loser of the bet acceptable as an Altahart?”

 

“Motheri”

 

“Enough, keep your mouth shut. Right now, it’s not Ulrich tarnishing the Altahart name but your vulgar lust, shamelessly showing itself without regard for men or women.”

 

Lady Altahart sternly reprimanded her eldest son and sighed deeply. The young handsome man standing behind her cautiously patted her shoulder.

 

Gwen laughed at the sight. To criticize his preferences while his mother selected the most handsome men from the capital as her bedmates wasn’t much different.

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes, ma’am.”

 

“You need to go to Ulrich.”

 

Ulrich had utterly shattered the family’s principle of secrecy and leisurely left the capital at dawn. It was a swift escape, anticipating this mess.

 

But then again, when hadn’t he been like that?

 

He was never in the present. Sometimes fearfully, sometimes tenaciously, he glimpsed beyond with meticulous precision.

 

Anyhow, the ensuing chaos continued to this day.

 

Victor found himself caught in the middle of this mess. The capital was demanding Ulrich’s return urgently, but his boss showed no intention of returning. Instead, he seemed to be settling in this place called Marnia, enjoying the tranquil days.

 

“This isn’t fun.”

 

Or maybe “enjoying” wasn’t the right word.

 

Checkmate.

 

Victor’s king was surrounded on the chessboard. Ulrich flicked the king over with a finger, toppling the surrounding pieces.

 

With a perfect visual victory, Ulrich lit a cigarette with a bored expression.

 

“What about the investigation I asked for?”

 

Victor sighed. This wasn’t the time to discuss such trivial matters, but it was better to appease him than to irritate him.

 

He retrieved some documents from a pile.

 

“You wanted information on Theodore Motier and his family.”

 

He found and handed over the desired paper. Ulrich, adjusting the cigarette in his mouth, flipped through it. Watching him read, Victor voiced his ongoing doubt.

 

“They run a small factory in the Renbruck industrial complex. Is there a problem with them?”

 

“They keep coming to mind.”

 

“Excuse me? What keeps coming to mind?”

 

Ulrich fell silent again.

 

Victor, accustomed to his unilateral silence, continued to search for any remaining reports.

 

“A textile factory?”

 

Ulrich, exhaling leisurely, muttered the words written on the paper.

 

“Yes? Ah, yes.”

 

“Is there a large farm in Renbruck?”

 

“There are fertile fields on the outskirts of the city. They contract with those farms to procure raw materials.”

 

Ulrich nodded faintly.

 

He continued reading with frightening concentration until more than half of his cigarette was gone.

 

Actually, with each line he read, different thoughts filled his mind.

 

“Ugh, ugh…!”

 

“I thought it was just once, and it was all over….”

 

His thigh stung. He was so deep in thought he didn’t notice the cigarette ash falling on his leg. He just stared at the mark and muttered.

 

“It keeps coming to mind.”

 

“…What keeps coming to mind?”

 

It was petty revenge.

 

Repaying a rejection at the pavilion with a forcefully obtained one-night stand. He wouldn’t deny the underlying selfishness, but more vividly, it was the desire to restore his wounded pride.

 

Using Lady Osborne as a means, blackmailing her with maternal love, and indulging in the delicate body as he pleased for a night.

 

Ulrich felt no moral guilt from these actions. The injury she might suffer was nothing compared to his need to relieve his unpleasant mood.

 

All his relationships were like that. He valued his own emotional fluctuations more than a person’s life.

 

And he thought once was enough for such a ruthless solution. After resolving the irritation, he expected his peace to return.

 

But it kept…

 

“Her crying face was beautiful.”

 



 

“So it keeps coming to mind….”

 

Victor had a puzzled look, not understanding a word. Before he could ask more, there was a knock on the closed door. After a brief wait, Lady Osborne appeared.

 

“I brought new refreshments.”

 

“Ah, thank you.”

 

Victor thanked her and clumsily cleared the document-filled table. Meanwhile, Lady Osborne approached and set down the tray.

 

Ulrich shifted his gaze from the papers to her.

 

Lady Osborne had submitted her resignation a few days ago. She didn’t specify the reason, but Ulrich had a good guess.

 

Lisbell must have persuaded her.

 

But her attitude showed no sign of contempt or discomfort, suggesting she hadn’t told her everything.

 

See, I told you.

 

She couldn’t bring herself to speak about it.

 

A woman who tears up at the mere mention of her mother wouldn’t dare reveal such intimate details. Ulrich chuckled. Lady Osborne glanced at him while pouring the drinks. He shook his head to indicate it was nothing.

 

He turned his gaze to the window.

 

The sunlight was harsh, and the occasional wind that stirred the leaves and buds was hot.

 

Marnia was in the midst of a full-blown summer.

 

Summer at its peak would gradually lose its heat.

 

He had never regretted this before, even despising the heat, wishing each year for it to pass quickly… but now he wanted time to slow down.

 

Because there was a bride for late summer.

 



 

Ulrich lowered his eyes.

 

Without realizing it, he had crushed the cigarette between his fingers.

 

The small bits of cigarette dirtied his fingers.

 

He stared at the mess, brushing it off with his thumb as if he had discovered something strange. Victor, puzzled, handed him a handkerchief. Accepting it, Ulrich repeatedly wiped and examined his fingers.

 

Finally, when his hands were clean, Ulrich spoke.

 

“Ma’am.”

 

“Yes, sir?”

 

“Late summer will be here soon.”

 

“Excuse me?”

 

“Is Lisbell’s wedding preparation going well?”

 

“Ah… yes, I believe so.”

 

Hmm, is that so?

 

It wasn’t welcoming news.

 

“Where is the wedding going to be held?”

 

“Misley.”

 

“Misley, in the east.”

 

Ulrich repeated, smiling lazily.

 

It had always been a lingering doubt.

 

Even now, it was vague, but one thing was clear.

 

The reason he didn’t want late summer to come.

 

“It’s not as far as I thought, which is good.”

 

He wanted to ruin Lisbell’s wedding.

Chapter 34.


Mrs. Osborne tilted the coffee pot, releasing a stream of steam. The faint aroma of coffee intensified, filling the room. The foil-adorned coffee cup floated in her hand, just before it was placed on the table.

 

Crashi

 

Victor, who had been tidying the pile of papers, looked startled. He stood up immediately upon seeing the shattered cup on the floor.

 

“Madam, are you alright? Did any shards hit you?”

 

“Oh, no. I’m fine.”

 

“This is unfortunate. It’s completely broken.”

 

“I’m sorry. It was my mistake…”

 

Victor nodded as if he understood and bent down. Warning her to be careful of the sharp fragments, he began clearing the larger pieces.

 

Meanwhile, Ulrich remained motionless, simply observing the scene. His deepening gaze was fixed on Mrs. Osborne, or more precisely, on her hand that had been holding the cup.

 

“Madam.”

 

“Yes, Master.”

 

“Did your hand shake just now?”

 

To Ulrich’s knowledge, she did not suffer from tremors. Thus, the earlier movement seemed very unnatural. To him, it signified only one thing.

 

“Is there something wrong with your health?”

 

“No, nothing at all. I’ll prepare a fresh pot of coffee immediately.”

 

Though she tried to maintain a professional demeanor, Ulrich noticed her hesitation before grabbing the pot again, a sign that the earlier tremor was involuntary.

 

Come to think of it…

 

He recalled the errand he had sent her on the previous day.

 

A fabricated incident involving bribing the Marnia officials and other related tasks. Mrs. Osborne needed to leave the villa temporarily to deceive Lisbell.

 

Despite Victor’s presence, Ulrich had insisted on sending Mrs. Osborne on the errand.

 

She took longer than expected.

 

It was a simple task—delivering an entrusted item to a foreign family with whom they had long-standing ties. For Victor, with a family-provided carriage, it would have been a day’s job. But Mrs. Osborne took longer than anticipated, making it barely in time to avoid ruining everything.

 

Timing worked out, so Ulrich hadn’t questioned it then. But now, he understood that her health might have delayed her.

 

“Is your health the reason you submitted your resignation a few days ago?”

 

Mrs. Osborne looked up as she set the hastily brewed coffee in front of Ulrich. He smiled at her before turning to Victor.

 

“Victor, is there a doctor we can summon from the city?”

 

“A doctor?”

 

While Victor questioned this, Mrs. Osborne quickly straightened, realizing Ulrich’s intention.

 

“Master, I appreciate your concern, but I assure you I am fine. There’s no need to worry.”

 

“To me, this isn’t even a concern, Madam.”

 

“But…”

 

“Consider it my kindness before you resign.”

 



 

“Our meeting here is fate, after all.”

 

Fate.

 

Ulrich smirked, unwilling to listen to any objections. He unfolded a paper, savoring the word. It felt pleasant on his tongue.

 

He smiled quietly, a serene smile that subdued the fierce summer sun.

 



 

Giggles, giggles.

 

Listening to the children’s innocent laughter, Lisbell leaned back. She sat on an old bench, the only shaded area behind the orphanage. Recently, the summer had deepened, causing sweat to pour out just by standing outside for a moment.

 

“Oh…!”

 

Something touched her cheek as she sat absentmindedly.

 

Startled, she straightened to find Theodore, who had been playing with the children, approaching. He held a reddish flower and smiled brightly.

 

“You scared me. What’s with the flower?”

 

“It’s a trumpet vine. I brought it to show you since it bloomed inside.”

 

Theodore sat beside her and placed the flower behind her ear, making her laugh. He then gently touched her forehead.

 

“How do you feel?”

 

“Much better.”

 

“Still, you should rest today. There’s no need to push yourself.”

 

Hesitating, Lisbell took his hand from her cheek and shook her head, indicating she was fine.

 

She knew why he was worried.

 

Since returning from Marnia, Lisbell had been ill for a week.

 

It started with muscle pain. Seeing Theodore at the train station, her tension melted away, and her whole body ached. Every step felt heavy and painful.

 

Back at the orphanage, she developed a fever. Her body rebelled, realizing it was finally home.

 

For days, she suffered a severe fever, her white skin blooming with heat rashes.

 

Theodore took care of her devotedly, cooling her with cold hands, wiping her sweat, and holding her when she felt nauseous.

 

After a week of care, she recovered. By then, the wound inflicted by Ulrich had also improved. Luckily, Theodore thought she had a simple fever.

 

“I should inform Madam. She was very worried about you.”

 

After three days of fever, when she could finally speak, Lisbell answered Theodore’s pressing questions.

 

The events in Marnia were just a misunderstanding, she said.

 

Everything was resolved.

 

Her mother was safe.

 

There were no problems….

 

Half-truths and half-lies.

 

When she finished, Theodore hugged her tightly. In his arms, she vaguely realized it was more about convincing herself than him.

 

Feeling his gentle touch, Lisbell sensed her heart pounding with foreboding.

 

A heavy burden had settled in her heart.

 

She now had a secret she could never share with Theodore.

 

Ulrich’s presence had changed everything. Now, she had something to hide from Theodore.

 

She returned to Misley longing for his warmth, but every embrace made her anxious. The burden in her heart grew.

 

“The weather is so hot; it must be uncomfortable not tying your hair.”

 

Theodore tucked her grey hair behind her ear, his touch lingering on her exposed white neck. The sensation made Lisbell flinch.

 

“I-it’s fine. This much is okay.”

 

But the evidence of what she tried to hide remained.

 

The bruise on her neck.

 

The scarf Ulrich had given her had hidden it from her mother. But she had thrown it away the moment she left the villa, unable to bear it.

 

So, Theodore saw the bruise. She blamed it on a fall, but even she knew it was a weak excuse. Her poor condition had deflected further questions.

 

“Lisbell, by any chance….”

 

Theodore began to speak after a moment of silence.

 

Thud, roll.

 

Something rolled to Lisbell’s feet.

 

A bright red apple. 


Chapter 35.


A round shape cast a long shadow behind it.

 

Lisbell held her breath.

 

It had been like this ever since she started seeing those dismal shadows. After witnessing someone’s cruel nature in the shadows that must form as brilliantly as the afternoon light, she often found herself like this.

 

“Lisbelli”

 

A girl with short hair and a petite frame, Mary, suddenly appeared. The world that had momentarily stopped for Lisbell resumed its normal pace.

 

Mary picked up an apple that had rolled to Lisbell’s feet and held it out to her.

 

“It’s a fallen fruit.”

 

Lisbell blinked and then laughed.

 

“Is this for me?”

 

“Yesi”

 

“Thank you. But weren’t we all harvesting together? What if you get scolded later for giving this to me secretly?”

 

Behind the orphanage, there was a small garden and a modest apple orchard. The apples were used for the children’s education, for their meals, and were even sold at the market near the port.

 

Teachers and children had gathered here early in the morning to harvest the ripe apples. Lisbell had come out to experience the bustle firsthand.

 

“Well, the teacher said this was a fallen fruit, so it’s not needed.”

 

“Ah…”

 

Lisbell looked at the fruit in Mary’s hand. Mary, clinging to her knee, asked,

 

“Hey, Lisbell, what’s a fallen fruit?”

 

“It’s a fruit that falls from the tree before it’s harvested.”

 

“I see. But why isn’t it needed?”

 

“Well… When a fruit falls to the ground, it gets bruised or dirty, so its value decreases.”

 

Though she explained it logically, Lisbell also found it hard to understand. Looking around, the apple only had some dirt on it, and seemed otherwise fine.

 

But to think its market value dropped just because it fell before proper harvesting.

 

It seemed unfair to the fruit, which probably didn’t fall on purpose. Lisbell rubbed the apple’s surface with her sleeve, revealing a transparent red hue.

 

“Thanks. Even if it’s a fallen fruit, it’s a precious gift to me.”

 

“Really?”

 

She patted Mary’s head as the girl, with a flushed face, asked again. Mary, who had been chattering while leaning on Lisbell’s knee, dashed off as soon as she heard someone calling her from afar.

 

Lisbell looked down at her knee where the child’s warmth had vanished. An apple and a single trumpet creeper blossom lay neatly on it.

 

“Do you like it that much?”

 

“Huh?”

 

“You couldn’t take your eyes off it.”

 

“Just…”

 

Looking at it brought her peace. Her turbulent mind calmed, and the inexplicable anxiety subsided. Perhaps it was the warmth she had always felt in Misley.

 

So, is this my sanctuary?

 

As Lisbell toyed with the vibrant red petals, she glanced to the side.

 

“By the way, wasn’t there something you wanted to say earlier?”

 

“Oh.”

 

He awkwardly scratched the back of his neck.

 

“Well… I was wondering if something happened in Marnia.”

 

The hand playing with the petals stopped.

 

“Since you came back, you seem to be in a daze more often.”

 

“…Nothing happened.”

 

“Really? Maybe it’s just travel fatigue since you had to rush back and forth. The distance between the two regions is quite significant.”

 

“Yeah, probably.”

 

Her mind seemed to short-circuit for a moment.

 

She couldn’t think about what expression she was making or how it might look to Theodore.

 

“Theo, sorry if I made you worry.”

 

“It’s finei We’re about to get married, so it’s natural for me to take care of you.”

 

“…Right.”

 

“Wow, time really flies. It feels like just yesterday when we told the director together. Don’t you think so?”

 

Looking up at the sky, Theodore reminisced as he pushed her long hair back and stroked her cheek. His hand felt warmer than before.

 

No, her skin had cooled that much.

 

Or perhaps it was her heart….

 

“Anyway, we can’t fall behind the kids. I’ll join in and finish quickly. Lisbell, if it gets too hot, don’t push yourself and go rest insidei”

 

Lisbell watched Theodore’s lithe figure as he shouted and dashed off. All that remained was the pounding of her heart.

 

As she stood there, she noticed a crushed flower petal. The wrinkles from being squished looked grotesque. She couldn’t even remember when it had ended up in such a state.

 

That was the problem.

 

Her sanctuary had started to crack.

Time passed quickly.

 

Day by day.

 

Each morning, her mood changed. Some days she was excited, some days overwhelmed. Some days she felt suffocated as if the future was invisible, and other days she was calm, believing things would work out somehow.

 

The one thing that lightened her heavy heart was the recent news from her mother.

 

Her mother had officially submitted her resignation and would stay on as a caretaker only until the end of the month.

 

Despite returning safely to Misley, many things were still bothering her. Among them was her mother’s safety, who was still working under Ulrich Altahart. She had always been uneasy about it. There was even a bit of resentment wondering why her mother hadn’t listened to her pleas to leave.

 

So, hearing the news about her resignation was a small relief amidst the misfortune. Lisbell reminded herself that there were only a few days left until she would no longer need to call that villa.

 

Everything was slowly getting sorted out.

 

Her mother would soon be free from that devilish man, and she would marry Theodore and leave for another country. The emotional turmoil she felt here would soon be resolved.

 

With the wedding date approaching, the preparations were in their final stages. Today, she and Theodore had chosen plumbago to decorate the venue after much discussion. The blue hue of plumbago, often associated with summer, made her heart flutter thinking about the decorated venue.

 

When they reached the orphanage, Lisbell’s steps stopped involuntarily.

 

“So… Lisbell?”

 

Theodore, who had been talking with gestures, turned his head curiously. But Lisbell couldn’t meet his eyes.

 

A sedan was parked in front of the orphanage. Its presence was unsettling in this rural village, where such a car was uncommon.

 

“Oh, whose car is that…. Is there a visitor?”

 

Theodore mumbled, following Lisbell’s gaze. She couldn’t respond. In fact, she couldn’t react at all.

 

No way….

 

It can’t be.

 

A sharp sense of foreboding hit her chest. A tense feeling crept from her toes. This feeling wasn’t entirely unfamiliar; she had felt it before.

 

When was it?

 

Perhaps it was….

 

“You’re finally here!”

 

A teacher noticed them and waved from a window. Lisbell looked at her with a pale face. The teacher, looking unusually excited, pointed inside.

 

“Lisbell, you have a visitor. Hurry to the reception roomi”

 

“A visitor?”

 

Theodore tilted his head.

 

“Lisbell, were you expecting someone today?”

 



 

“Lisbell?”

 

“Uh? Oh, well, I guess I’ll find out when I go.”

 

Her vision blurred again. As Lisbell entered the orphanage, she clenched and unclenched her fists. Despite the lingering heat of summer, she felt a strange chill.

 

The usually short-seeming corridor seemed unusually long today. When they arrived at the reception room, Theodore opened the door. The slowly widening gap felt like the entrance to a swamp.

 

And her fear was confirmed.

 

“Oh.”

 

The person inside turned toward the door. Platinum hair that remained bright even under the dim lighting.

 

“You’re finally here, Lisbell.”

 

Her anxious heart finally stopped.

 

Ulrich, he was right there.


Chapter 36.


The man had grown up properly.

 

While Lisbell stayed in Marnia, she had never seen him wear a tie properly. Additionally, she found out yet another fact she was not curious about. That black tie was not only a gift from her but also the very thing that had brutally strangled her neck that night.

 

Instinctively, Lisbell touched her neck. The bruises had healed to the point where they were no longer visible. There was no reason for her to feel pain, yet it hurt as if it hadn’t healed at all.

 

Why is this man here?

 

Lisbell thought and thought again. But she couldn’t figure it out. No matter how much she racked her brain, she couldn’t understand why someone she thought she’d never encounter again had appeared in front of her.

 

Of all times.

 

“Who… who are you?”

 

Of all times, when she was with Theodore.

 

Since she couldn’t readily speak, Theodore voiced it instead. Ulrich’s blue-grey eyes, which had been fixated on Lisbell since his appearance, shifted slowly.

 

He smiled a smile beautiful enough to make any man tremble.

 

“Theodore Motier, I presume?”

 

“Yes, that’s correct.”

 

Ulrich approached with the grace of a swan gliding over the water and extended his hand.

 

“Nice to meet you. I’m Ulrich Altahart.”

 

“Alta…”

 

As Theodore reflexively extended his arm for a handshake, his eyes gradually widened.

 

“Al, Altahart?”

 

“Yes.”

 



 

“Are you refusing to shake hands?”

 

Ulrich remained calm in front of the stunned Theodore. The composure he exhibited in Marnia was unchanged here in Misley. Theodore, urged by the noble pressure to hurry up and shake hands, quickly responded.

 

Lisbell gazed distantly at the two men shaking hands.

 

It was a surreal scene. But it didn’t last long. The moment Ulrich’s gaze returned to her, she was dragged back to this dizzying reality.

 

“Lisbell.”

 

Ulrich called her name as if he were very glad to see her. Even the playful laugh at the end, where he rolled his tongue, remained the same.

 

He was, as expected, himself. Unlike her, who was anxious, his calm demeanor was chilling. Lisbell, frozen, quickly noticed Theodore’s eyes turning towards her and hurriedly snapped out of it.

 

“What brings you here…?”

 

“Sorry for showing up unannounced. I have something urgent to tell Lisbell.”

 

He smirked. It was as if he was mocking her cautiousness. Seeing that, the guilt that had corroded black in her chest came alive, unmistakably vivid.

 

Whether this rhythm would quicken or slow was entirely up to Ulrich’s deceitful lips.

 

So, it was appropriate to send Theodore away quickly.

 

There was a risk that Ulrich might drop a bombshell in his presence. However… she hesitated because she didn’t want to be alone with Ulrich. And Ulrich seemed to sense this too, tilting his head thoughtfully.

 

“Shall I bring it up with Mr. Motier here? I don’t particularly mind.”

 

Her heart twisted. Despite being its owner, it felt as though her heart was in another’s grip. Ah, it was because this was an unmistakable threat. Ulrich was subtly pressuring her to send Theodore away.

 

If she didn’t…

 

“Theo.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Could you… leave us for a moment?”

 

Theodore’s eyes widened. He was astonished not only by the fact that someone with the name Altahart had come here but also by the implication that Lisbell knew him well enough to talk privately.

 

“Ah, sure. I’ll be outside, so please feel free to talk.”

 

Theodore bowed his head and exited the reception room. The sound of the door closing felt like a thin barrier between Ulrich and herself breaking. It was as if the protective layer that had provided some comfort by merely existing had crumbled.

 

“How have you been?”

 

Lisbell flinched at the warmth touching her cheek and stepped back.

 

Her back hit the closed door with a thud.

 

Ulrich’s hand, which had naturally cupped her cheek, found itself awkwardly suspended in the air. He looked at his empty hand and clenched and unclenched it. Soon, he laughed as if it were amusing and withdrew his arm.

 

He turned and walked to the dresser in the reception room. He began to fiddle with the frames, nameplates, and figurines displayed there as if examining them. While he leisurely explored the interior, Lisbell stood frozen by the door.

 

“I hear this chapel is your wedding venue?”

 

“…Did you investigate me?”

 

“Investigate?”

 

His response indicated it was preposterous.

 

“I learned it all here. When I mentioned your name, the person who guided me here eagerly shared information. It was quite bothersome, listing things I wasn’t interested in.”

 

Shaking his head slowly as if expressing fatigue, he would occasionally let out a deflated laugh.

 

“How could you think of holding a wedding in such a shabby place…”

 



 

“But it oddly suits you, so I can’t complain.”

 

Lisbell clenched her fists tightly. She wondered why she had to listen to such evaluations from a man like him.

 

“Please answer me now.”

 

“Hm?”

 

“The reason you came here.”

 

“Ah, that.”

 

Despite the gravity of the subject, his demeanor remained nonchalant. Even when addressing the most crucial topic, he acted as if it was of no importance. His playful gestures with the antler-shaped figurine reflected this.

 

“Mrs. Osborne has collapsed.”

 

He said it with such a casual attitude that it was hard to accept.

 

“…Pardon?”

 

“To be precise, she collapsed and had to undergo emergency surgery. I covered the entire cost.”

 



 

“She’s currently in a hospital in Marnia, but there’s no sign of her regaining consciousness.”

 

Lisbell doubted her ears.

 

“Wha… What are you…”

 

“The doctor said she seemed to have been suffering from symptoms for quite some time. Did you not know?”

 

“Mother collapsed…”

 

No matter how many times she chewed over the sentences, they were hard to accept. But contrary to her mind, her chest stirred as if she had already understood.

 

Briefly, a hairline of doubt surfaced.

 

Could it be true?

 

Given that it was Ulrich delivering such tragic news, it was only natural to doubt. He had once deceived her using her mother. There was no reason he couldn’t do it twice.

 

Suppressing the tumult within, Lisbell stared directly at him.

 

“I’m sorry, but I can’t believe you.”

 



 

“My mother was healthy when we last met. Just a week ago, we talked on the phone.”

 

“That would make sense. She collapsed four days ago.”

 



 

“Previously, when she tried to bring me coffee, her hands shook and she broke the cup. Considering she never had tremors, it seemed odd. So, I intended to call a doctor from the capital. You know better than anyone that she recently submitted her resignation. I thought it was a final gesture of kindness.”

 

Kindness.

 

The word he used reeked of insincerity.

 

“But she refused, saying it was too much of a fuss for a mere favor. She found it burdensome. Like mother, like daughter; both fuss over trivial matters.”

 



 

“Anyway… she refused, and eventually, an accident happened. The doctor said if my secretary had found her any later, it would have been disastrous.”

 

What was he saying?

 

Though he kindly explained, Lisbell’s mind grew emptier. The only thing that came to mind was her mother’s complexion, which she had to ask about each time they met.

 

Saying she was fine, nothing was wrong. Her mother’s assurances had made her overlook the signs, thinking nothing more of them…

 

“I need to contact her.”

 



 

“I need to contact my mother.”

 

“I told you she’s unconscious.”

 

“You’ve already deceived me like this once beforei”


Chapter 37.

The shrill voice filled the reception room.

 

Despite being just a single sentence, Lisbell was out of breath. No, maybe she was suffocating. She couldn’t tell. It was that suffocating. If there were no eyes on her, she would have clutched her chest long ago.

 

But she didn’t want to show any weakness in front of Ulrich, that man. She wanted to hide it so he would never see it. Because his wickedness would dig into each of those aspects and try to use them as a weakness.

 

Ulrich clicked his tongue as if to be heard, looking at the resistant Lisbell.

 

“I understand you don’t trust me, but if you try to be hostile to the person who came all the way here to deliver this news, only Lisbell will be at a loss.”

 



 

“Even if you vent your meaningless anger here, it won’t bring your mother back to consciousness.”

 

He threw a heart-piercing statement and headed to the sofa in the reception room to pick something up. It was a bouquet that Lisbell hadn’t noticed, so focused was she on his presence.

 

Tuberose with long green stems and layers of pure white petals.

 

As he walked over, holding it in one hand, Lisbell reflexively stepped back. But her back was already against the door. There was nowhere else to retreat.

 

The remaining distance was just a step. He could touch her with a slight lift of his hand. Lisbell stiffened completely in astonishment. Ulrich grabbed her chin, lifting it so their eyes could meet.

 

“Why are you trembling like this?”

 



 

“I haven’t done anything…”

 

His subtly flowing tone wrapped around her limbs like a snake with fangs.

 

Ah, a strong sense of déjà vu.

 

It wasn’t much different from when she saw him in the backlight, kneeling. Knowing she couldn’t match him, yet having to face him, the psychological pressure crushed her insides. Like facing a vast ocean that threatened to swallow her whole if she made one wrong move…

 

“Listen well. I won’t say it three times.”

 



 

“Your mother is currently hospitalized at a hospital in Marnia after surgery, and I came here to inform you as her family.”

 

He tightened his grip on her chin.

 

Pulling her face to a slightly better angle, he kissed her pale cheek.

 

“If you don’t believe me, Lisbell can go to Marnia herself and check.”

 



 

“Oh, and this is a gift.”

 

He handed her the bouquet he was holding. The closer scent of the flowers was overwhelmingly strong. Was that why she felt so dizzy? Or maybe…

 

With those words, Ulrich left the reception room. Lisbell, left with the bouquet in full bloom, scrubbed her cheek with the back of her hand until it hurt. Yet, she couldn’t get rid of the feeling. Knowing nothing was actually there, she still couldn’t stand it.

 

“No.”

 

It must be a lie.

 

“That can’t be true…”

 

Mother was healthy.

 

There were no problems at all.

 

He might be trying to deceive her again and drag her into danger.

 

It must be.

 

It must be…

 

Lisbell, standing there, threw the bouquet he handed her to the floor.

 

With a thud, the loosely wrapped flower stems scattered around. The white petals lay scattered at her feet, looking both beautiful and miserable. Lisbell staggered, looking down at the sight.

 

No, no, no.

 

Repeating it to herself did no good. There was a thin thread of anxiety welling up, pushing through the narrow gaps of her consciousness.

 

What if it’s true?

 

What if, as he said, her mother suddenly collapsed and underwent surgery?

 

And what if she still hasn’t regained consciousness?

 

What then?

 

In a moment of weakness, her energy drained. Despite the intense contemplation, the conclusion was surprisingly clear. There was no other way. Unless she went to Marnia herself, she couldn’t confirm it.

 

Believing her mother would be fine while ignoring the increasingly thin face she’d seen from time to time, and as her guardian, she should be by her side if any problem occurred.

 

So, in the end.

 

I have to go to Marnia… again.

 

Lisbell’s head slowly dropped.

 

The white petals scattered around looked just like snowflakes. Was it summer or winter now? The seasons briefly overlapped, confusing her. Why was her whole body growing so cold if it was summer?

 

“Lisbell?”

 

Suddenly, her arm was grabbed.

 

Lisbell shuddered as if in a fit. The recollection of a night in Marnia made her react hypersensitivity.

 

“Ah, The, Theo.”

 

Her wildly shaking focus found its place only after confirming the person was her fiancé.

 

“What’s wrong? Why are you like this?”

 

The voice, genuinely worried about her, finally reminded her it was summer. A distinct warmth approached and embraced her. Lisbell looked at him with a melancholy heart.

 

Theodore’s palm cupped her cheek.

 

“More importantly, what’s this about Altahart? Isn’t he the owner of the villa where your mother works? Did you have such a close relationship for him to come looking for you? What was so urgent between you two?”

 

“Theo.”

 

Lisbell took a shallow breath and spoke slowly.

 

“I need to go to Marnia.”

 

“What?”

 

“I have something to confirm.”

 

She grabbed his hand, which was on her cheek, and pulled it down. Theodore, who seemed to follow gently, soon changed direction and grabbed her shoulder.

 

“Lisbell. Did something happen?”

 



 

“Your complexion is too pale. What did that man say to you?”

 

“I’ll tell you…”

 



 

“I’ll tell you everything when I get back.”

 

She didn’t want to share her burden of worries with Theodore when her mother’s situation wasn’t confirmed yet.

 

The future also depended on this situation’s outcome. For now, she assumed her mother would be safe, but if not, there were many things to consider.

 

If her mother required intensive care… Lisbell might have to reconsider this marriage for financial reasons.

 

Though her situation was one thing, she knew well how much Theodore had looked forward to this wedding. She couldn’t let him be rooted in anxiety for something that wasn’t yet certain. Hadn’t she caused him enough worry last time? She didn’t want to push him into another period of anxious waiting.

 

“So, can’t you wait for me?”

 

“Lisbell…”

 

“I know the wedding is soon. I promise I’ll be back before then.”

 

The strength left his hands on her shoulders. Feeling this, Lisbell bit her lip. The sensation of her body being roughly kneaded was vivid. Anxiety spread like a disease.

 

“Okay.”

 

His touch didn’t completely leave her. Instead, he moved behind and hugged her tightly.

 

“Okay, so calm down.”

 



 

“You’re still shaking.”

 

His voice, reminding her of her unnoticed state, was full of concern. Lisbell, who hadn’t reacted for a moment, buried her tear-streaked face in his comforting embrace.

 

I also want to stop trembling now.

 

I want to stop being driven by this unknown dread…

 

Words she couldn’t voice piled up inside her. They were as murky as a sewer.

 



 

Even with urgent thoughts, she couldn’t change the physical distance.

 

Clunk, clunk. It was unclear whether the shaking was from the train or her insides.

 

In such a state of anxiety, she finally arrived in Marnia.

 

As she hurried out of the station, she noticed a familiar figure cutting through the morning light.

 

Victor, the man she had briefly been introduced to in the garden of the villa last time, was standing by a stopped car, looking her way. It was as if he had come to pick her up. Confirming her suspicions, he bowed his head slightly in greeting.

 

“Master sent me.”

 

With a short explanation of his presence, he opened the back door of the sedan. Lisbell clenched her sweaty hands once, then released them.

 

Though she didn’t want to accept his kindness, she knew better than anyone that such resistance would be futile. She had to head to the hospital anyway, and this car would take her there. Moreover, she had to find traces of Ulrich Altahart, and his secretary was right in front of her.

 

Lisbell silently got into the car.

 

As it started moving, the small scenery of Marnia flowed in like liquid through the window.

 

It had become so blurry that it no longer looked beautiful to her.


Chapter 38.



It was a small city, so they arrived at the hospital quickly.

 

Lisbell followed Victor, who was leading the way.

 

The hospital in the morning was quiet. Every time she saw a patient lying in bed, she flinched. She feared that someone with their face hidden by the blanket might be her mother, a fear that lingered instinctively.

 

Victor didn’t stop walking for quite a while. He finally halted deep inside the hospital, in a secluded area. He opened a closed door and stepped aside as if to tell her to go in.

 

Lisbell didn’t step forward immediately but raised her head first.

 

Beyond the doorframe, like a boundary, sat a man in front of a window where a gentle breeze blew.

 

His golden hair, easily swayed by the slightest breeze, his straight posture, crossed legs, and the book in his hand created a refined appearance that seemed unbelievable for someone who had once trampled on her dignity.

 

He sensed her presence and lifted his head. Upon seeing Lisbell at the door, he closed the book with a soft “Ah.”

 

By then, Lisbell’s gaze had already shifted.

 

Her eyes, lukewarm when directed at the man, now trembled. Her face turned pale. She crossed the threshold, her cautious steps betraying the wariness that had kept her standing. Her dragging steps resembled someone being pulled by the nape.

 

“Uh…”

 

Her legs nearly gave out several times. Despite her staggering, Lisbell headed inside the room, determined to reach the one lying in bed.

 

“Mother…”

 

Reaching the bed, Lisbell collapsed. She couldn’t believe it, couldn’t accept that her mother was lying there like a living corpse, as the man had said. Her vision blurred with tears.

 

Lisbell pulled back the blanket and touched the hand beneath it.

 

She tried to feel the warmth of life, but it was different from her expectations. It was cold, like touching a corpse. Shocked, she quickly covered the hand with the blanket again. Covering it didn’t change anything, but she couldn’t face the reality. Lisbell, her face stained with tears, stared blankly at the bed.

 

“Why…”

 



 

“How much pain were you in…”

 

She could hardly breathe.

 

She hadn’t known her mother was in such a state until now, and the man who had taken care of her mother, who had been so dangerous, was the same one who had dragged her into this abyss. Now, he was the only one who could verify her mother’s condition.

 

The layered despair tightened around Lisbell’s throat.

 

“It seems the problem started with her bronchial tubes.”

 



 

“It would have been good if something had been done then, but it was neglected and spread to other organs, resulting in this critical state. I heard she was suffering from several illnesses even before she collapsed.”

 

Ulrich placed his book aside and approached the bed. He crouched next to Lisbell, who was sitting beside the bed, meeting her eyes.

 

“If you don’t believe me, I can call the doctor who operated on her to speak with you directly.”

 

His sharp gaze was another form of intimidation.

 

Accusing her of disbelief to her face, challenging her to deny the reality before her eyes.

 

Lisbell felt as though her nerves were coiling like they were facing a giant wave. Instinctively, she turned her head away, only for her chin to be grabbed and pulled back sharply.

 

“So, you should say thank you.”

 



 

“If it weren’t for me, your mother might be in a grave by now.”

 



 

“Despite me saving your mother’s life out of goodwill, Lisbell doesn’t even say thank you.”

 

It wasn’t a mere criticism but a quiet reprimand. Once elegant, now it wasn’t. In the room with just two people and a living corpse, he showed his true nature without hesitation.

 

Lisbell, her face soaked with tears, trembled. Ulrich smiled at her pitiable state. He wiped her wet cheek with his fingers, an act that felt almost coercive, forcing Lisbell to respond.

 

“Th-thank you.”

 



 

“Thank you for saving my mother.”

 

The man who instilled deep-seated fear within her, she had to thank him. The reality was wretched. She hated him for diluting her hatred in this way. With a twisted heart, Lisbell expressed her gratitude.

 

Could anything be more ambivalent?

 

The man who had temporarily crushed her was the same one who saved her mother. She had no choice but to thank him. It was like kneeling before resentment. The nauseating contradiction returned as invisible arrows tearing at her heart.

 

Satisfied with Lisbell’s compliance, he smiled serenely. His hand remained on her face, and so did his gaze. Ulrich’s eyes bore into her tear-streaked, distorted face.

 

When his gaze became unbearable, he finally withdrew his hand.

 

Lisbell quickly raised her arm to wipe her face.

 

From now on, she needed to pull herself together. Knowing her mother’s condition was so severe, there were many practical matters to consider.

 

In truth, she wanted to escape Ulrich’s realm as soon as possible. She couldn’t bear him grasping her weaknesses one by one.

 

“I will never forget this favor. I will take care of my mother from now on…”

 

“Who said you could?”

 

“…What?”

 

“Who said you could take her away?”

 

“What do you mean…”

 

“The surgery costs, the hospitalization fees…”

 



 

“You can’t be so naive. Are you so unaware of the ways of the world?”

 

Lisbell’s expression stiffened.

 

Yes, he was right.

 

It was a considerable amount of money that Ulrich had spent on her mother’s treatment, a sum that was meant for Lisbell’s family.

 

Knowing this, it was still hard to conceal her bitterness.

 

While in Marnia, he had willingly paid for even her personal expenses. She knew it was improper, but this amount wouldn’t even dent his finances. Yet, mentioning costs now was…

 

“Are you saying I should repay you?”

 

“Everything should be accounted for.”

 



 

“If word gets out that I let someone off without paying, what will happen to Altahart’s reputation as a businessman?”

 

Resigned to the inevitable, Lisbell closed her eyes tightly. Unwiped tears rolled down her pale cheeks. Ulrich watched her as if he might lick away the traces and then stood up.

 

He handed her a document from a table. With trembling hands, Lisbell took it.

 

The detailed figures made it clear it was an estimate from the hospital.

 

But the amount was much larger than she expected.

 

How could she pay this?

 

Even if she abandoned her wedding plans and used all her savings, it was doubtful she could cover it. Moreover, if she used all the money for the surgery, what about the future treatment costs for her mother?

 

The more she thought, the more hopeless it seemed.

 

Each clash with reality extended her thoughts into pathetic directions. Finally, she had to speak.

 

Could anyone in Rechem boast of wealth before this man? She rationalized, telling herself now wasn’t the time for pride, and her flimsy justifications became her only solace.

 

“I’m sorry, but I don’t have the means to repay…”

 

“No money.”

 



 

“Then what else?”

 

Was he talking about valuables? Lisbell, who had lived as a commoner with no interest in adornment, had none.

 

“I don’t have any.”

 



 

“I have nothing.”

 

“You have nothing?”

 



 

“You have your body.”

 

Before her hesitant words could reach him, Ulrich’s fingers touched her body. His hand moved to her chest, an area too intimate for anyone else to touch so casually.

 

“You have this body.”


Chapter 39.


Tap.

 

With a firm push, his playful gesture nudged her body backward.

 

Thus, Lisbell understood his hidden intention a beat too late. But even understanding didn’t mean she could act immediately. In reality, she was frozen with another meaning, unable to blink an eyelid.

 

“I could do it right now.”

 

The corners of the man’s eyes folded like a hawk’s wings. Smiling leisurely and beautifully, he slowly lowered his fingers.

 

From her chest to her solar plexus.

 

“I want to go in here.”

 

Past her navel, sinking in a little lower…

 

“…Ah…!”

 

The movement was sudden. It might even be called a desperate struggle.

 

The moment Lisbell realized where Ulrich’s hand was headed, she twisted her body. However, Ulrich, who had anticipated her move, pushed her down forcefully.

 

Her ash-gray hair spread across the cold hospital floor. Lisbell stared dazedly at the sinister figure looming over her.

 

“…I’ll pay it back somehow.”

 

“How?”

 

“By any means necessary…”

 

“By any means?”

 

“So please… don’t do this.”

 

“What have I done?”

 



 

“Naive and yet so scared…”

 



 

“See, I told you you’re just like a cat.”

 

Ah, his playful attitude only made her feel more ridiculous.

 

It wasn’t as if he was recklessly charging at her like last time, but she felt no relief. His eyes, looking down at her so detachedly, only reflected the primal joy of a beast cornering its prey for sport.

 

“My wedding is not far off.”

 

“I know, it’s late summer now.”

 

“I’m getting married…”

 

“Do you want me to congratulate you again?”

 

It felt like talking to a wall. Whether he felt the same way or not, Ulrich squinted as if he couldn’t understand, then let out a soft “Ah” and smirked. He lifted his damp fingers to her cheek.

 

“Do you think I’m asking you to give up on your wedding?”

 



 

“I’m not. If you want to be the bride in late summer, then go ahead.”

 



 

“But can you really do that?”

 

Though his tone was gentle, his words pierced her heart savagely.

 

“You plan to offer your body to another man and then still go through with your engagement? Do you think you can handle that with your weak nature?”

 

His sneer was biting.

 

He always ridiculed her.

 

Only now was she vaguely realizing that this was how he always saw her. Ulrich might have always been mocking her. She had thought he might be good at acting, but that didn’t mean she was exempt from being his target.

 

Ulrich’s flawless social skills might have extended even to her.

 

“You…”

 

As soon as she uttered a word, she realized her mistake. Her pale face and trembling lips revealed her fear.

 

“Have I made a mistake towards you?”

 

“Mistake?”

 

“If not, then why…”

 



 

“Why do you keep doing this to me…?”

 

It was no coincidence. Amidst the continuous incidents, Ulrich’s malice was vividly alive. Even if it was an elaborate plot to bring her down, it was no exaggeration.

 

The theft incident that never happened didn’t need to be mentioned, and this time was no different. While her mother’s condition might have been a coincidence, the fact that he covered the surgery costs to use it against her was entirely his intention and choice.

 

At this point, it was clear to her.

 

Ulrich continuously put her in difficult situations.

 

So, it was all intentional.

 

He had a natural talent for creating situations. With his background and money, there was nothing he couldn’t do, instilling both reverence and fear in her. No matter how much she struggled, she realized it was futile against him…

 

She couldn’t understand why, so she finally voiced it.

 

Mocking me, tormenting me, constantly pushing me like this. What is the underlying reason? Lisbell had no choice but to become genuinely curious.

 

“Why are you doing this?”

 

He looked as if he had been asked an obvious question.

 

“It’s simple.”

 



 

“I can do this.”

 

His eyes, now fully revealing their depths, were chillingly clear. They showed the truth, ideals, and reality. Ulrich truly, without a shadow of a doubt, believed it.

 

“Lisbell, you want to marry Mr. Motier.”

 



 

“I’m doing this because I want to.”

 



 

“Does desire need any more reason?”

 

He whispered, simply saying he wanted to, as if his words were an inexplicable noise in the distance.

 

Lisbell’s eyes fluttered. Tears that hadn’t yet dried flowed down her cheeks.

 

Ulrich eventually wiped them away with his fingers and brought them to his lips. Although it was just a drop of tears, it felt as if her soul had been sucked out… Was this feeling connected to the despair slowly consuming her whole body?

 

Cicadas chirping.

 

The sound of cicadas, a symbol of summer, disrupted the morning hospital atmosphere.

 

The intense sound would fade with time, as was the nature of the returning seasons.

 

But Lisbell couldn’t imagine the end of summer as clearly as before. No matter how hard she tried, it remained blurry as if smudged by her hands.

 

She was certain of one thing.

 

If she hadn’t set foot in Marnia, his paradise, she wouldn’t have ended up at this foolish crossroads.

 



 

Her pupils, widened in shock, gradually calmed.

 

People often make foolish choices even when they know they’re wrong.

 

That’s how Lisbell was now.

 

Her mother lying unconscious in a hospital bed, the secret she hid from Theodore, the insurmountable financial problems, and the precious future she still wanted to protect…

 

Cicadas chirping.

 

The sound of cicadas was still intense.

 

Summer, the season of breeding.

 

Lisbell couldn’t shake off the thought that her misfortune, which fell upon her suddenly, was also breeding like that.

 



 

“…Ugh.”

 

Her curled-up body shrank even more inward. Like a small pill bug rolling away after being tapped by someone’s foot, Lisbell only showed movements of wanting to hide somewhere. Each time the man’s persistent breath fell on her back, it was the same.

 

“Hah…”

 

His breath was as hot and heavy as if he had swallowed the scorching summer sun.

 

Each drop felt like a heavy rock, difficult to bear. It didn’t just settle; it poured down. The unusual temperature and rhythm made it clear what he was doing now.

 

“Ugh, Ah…!”

 

Lisbell, who was rubbing her forehead against the sheet, wanted to bury her face entirely to muffle the inevitable moans.

 

But just the other day, she had been severely scolded for trying to stifle her moans. The man had developed a new hobby of listening to her moans. Any attempt to disrupt his newfound pastime was met with harsh retribution.

 

Ulrich, exhaling warm breath, pushed aside the slip covering her back.

 

The rough feel of the lace trim on the slip was strange. Lisbell normally didn’t wear such lacy slips. The fact that she was wearing this and on this bed was entirely his doing.

 

Under the ‘repayment contract’, a few bedroom rules had been established.

 

First, when called, Lisbell must stop whatever she was doing and come to Ulrich’s bedroom. Second, she must wear a slip that was easy to remove.

 

Because of this, with just one movement of his hand, Lisbell had to expose her clean, dry back.


Chapter 40.


Ulrich poked at her sharply raised shoulder blade with his fingertip and pressed the soft flesh firmly with his penis.

 

“Uh…!”

 

Lisbell’s rounded shoulder line trembled. It wasn’t just there that convulsed. The lower part, filled with his entire length, also trembled as if strained.

 

“Lisbell, huh….”

 

In that state, he pressed his pubic bone fully against her perineum, making their lower bodies one. As he gently scratched the entrance with the veins on his penis, Lisbell, who was lying down, vibrated as if hit by a spark.

 

Ulrich, wearing a languid smile, rubbed and ground the deep spot with his glans fully inserted.

 

“Ha, ugh! Ah….”

 

“The place you feel is deep.”

 

“Huh, huh…!”

 

“I noticed you react when I touch deep inside your throat too.”

 

“Ah, Ah…!”

 

“I thought it was because it was your first time… but it seems you were born with this preference.”

 

It was Ulrich’s talent to speak elegantly yet crudely. Using that talent without filter, he grabbed her buttocks that curved temptingly. The slight flesh of her buttocks fit perfectly in his hand as he traced the overall outline.

 

Holding it tightly, not allowing any escape, Ulrich relentlessly pounded the inside. The penis, already covered in her fluids, squelched as it moved out, spraying sticky droplets.

 

Licking his lips, he observed the debauched traces. Twisting her buttocks until the flesh was mashed, he spread them wide, making the eager entrance, swollen with small wrinkles, more visible.

 

When he fumbled with one finger, feeling the fervent traces, Lisbell shrank her reddened nape. Smiling silently at her sensitive reaction, he adjusted his posture and thrust deeply into her inner wall.

 

“ugh! Ah, Ah…!”

 

Her split buttocks crumbled without resistance, struggling to contain his forearm-sized cock.

 

“Do you know that your belly tenses whenever I rub inside like this?”

 

“Uh, ung….”

 

A snicker. This time, a rather loud laugh descended. Lisbell was now afraid of his laughter. Ulrich no longer hid his sneer towards her. She feared what kind of ridicule it would be, a learned response from past experiences.

 

“You said you wanted to do it from behind first.”

 

“Uh, uh, ah, ah….”

 

“Was it all for this? Hm?”

 

He straightened his spine and slapped, slapped, slappedi pounded Lisbell’s buttocks as he thrust fiercely. Every time the tip of his penis, snaking its way through the curves, hit the stimulation point, white spots burst in her head. She could only clutch the hapless sheet and gasp.

 

No. It wasn’t for that reason at all.

 

The reason for insisting on this position….

 

“You’re trying to have fun in your own way… right.”

 

“Huh….”

 

“Well, I agree. If you’re going to have sex, it’s better to enjoy it together. Probing and touching where it feels good….”

 

Ulrich, panting shortly, quickly shook his pelvis. Each time the man thrust his hips fervently, Lisbell felt as if she were sinking deep somewhere. Even though she was on the bed, it felt like being driven into the cold, hard floor below, inducing a sense of self-loathing.

 

“Huh! Uh…! Ah… uh…!”

 

A large hand crawled inside her nearly stripped slip. Already overwhelmed with tingling and heat, she was disoriented, but his hand still grasped her breast, hitting the peak. The pulling sensation, as if to tear the scant flesh away, spread a numbing sensation. His hands, twirling her nipples, immediately soothed the pain. It was a disorienting caress.

 

“Ah, uh! Ugh…!”

 

“Ah… tight again. Unless you’re trying to turn me into a premature ejaculator, why don’t you relax a bit.”

 

Ulrich, snickering, grabbed her breasts firmly without wasting any motion and thrust forcefully.

 

Between Lisbell’s reddened buttocks, Ulrich’s clean penis moved in and out relentlessly.

 

As a result, only Lisbell’s pubic hair, moistened with fluid, stuck to her skin. Ulrich, finding the hair similar in color to her own, fondled it curiously while continuing to thrust.

 

Every time he forcefully penetrated the pleasingly tight interior, a thrilling tension pulled at the back of his neck. Like an animal savoring a taste, he licked his lips multiple times, thumping her buttocks rhythmically with his pelvic bone.

 

Even a single thrust pushed so deep that the pressure of organs being squeezed was unrelenting. This made Lisbell, while being penetrated, subconsciously feel her lower abdomen several times. Though knowing it was impossible, she worried her belly might bulge bluntly.

 

“Huh, ah, ah, Ah…!”

 

The erratic speed, alternating between fast and slow like a playful game, began to quicken again.

 

This time, it felt a bit different. Lisbell sensed he was ready to release the built-up sexual tension and clenched her toes, bracing her lower belly.

 

He twisted her erect nipples, hoping she’d better swallow his swollen penis. The force was such that her coral-colored breasts might be pulled out whole. Sometimes he would neglect to exert force where needed and, conversely, handle delicately areas that needed careful attention roughly.

 

“Aah! ugh! ah! Ah, Ah…!”

 

Lisbell’s high-pitched moans filled the dark bedroom as Ulrich, grabbing her split buttocks, pulled back. His penis, hard with imminent ejaculation, swelled. The robust organ barely exited, scratching the wet entrance.

 

As Lisbell gasped, her prone body was grabbed, flipping her vision upside down.

 

Having kept her eyes closed throughout the ordeal, the invading light in her barely opened eyes was faint. Unable to gather her sprawling limbs, Ulrich grabbed her chin.

 

“Time to do it.”

 

And third, instead of ejaculating inside, she must always receive his semen orally.

 

Lisbell, with her moist eyelids trembling, slowly parted her lips.

 

Straddling her face, Ulrich looked at her red, crumpled eyes and stroked his trembling penis. His hand movement was obscenely suggestive.

 

The veins on its surface pulsated violently. The thick shaft and the split testicles below seemed impatient to release their fluid, responding obscenely.

 

He shifted his gaze to her slightly open lips and stiffened tongue. As if imagining a rough suck, he eyed her fiercely and pressed his blunt glans into her small mouth.

 

“Uh, ugh….”

 

White semen spurted out thickly. Not a single drop of the arousal byproduct escaped Lisbell’s mouth.

 

The sticky taste sweeping through her mouth was torturous. Knowing he wouldn’t like it, Lisbell nonetheless couldn’t help but frown.

 

He smirked, touching her face, which was marred with unsightly wrinkles.

 

“Warm.”

 



 

“Lisbell seems to have a knack for taking things in, either from above or below.”

 

Ulrich, making that comment about Lisbell’s mouth filled with his glans, didn’t withdraw immediately after ejaculating but lightly shook his hips. Although only the glans was inserted, its sheer size made it feel like her mouth was completely full. It was like having someone’s clenched fist in her mouth.

 

The overwhelming weight of the penis, threatening to tear her inner walls of mouth, made Lisbell struggle.



Chapter 41.


Ulrich persistently shook his waist to extract all the liquid before finally pulling the tip out of her mouth.

 

As the accumulated semen inside was pushed out, the white mucus trailed along his organ and her parted lips. Ulrich chuckled at the messy sight and gestured to his genitals.

 

“Will you lick it clean?”

 



 

“You promised to eat it all.”

 

Lisbell stared at him with teary eyes before slowly sticking out her tongue. As she extended her tongue like a cat to lick his erect glans, she felt like a cheap prostitute selling her body for a few coins.

 

Wanting to break away from these self-destructive thoughts, Lisbell hurriedly licked his glans.

 

Ulrich, letting out a deep moan, adjusted the position of his head to make it easier for her to lick.

 

Her soft, wet tongue grazed the thick skin of his glans, the erotic curves on the top, and the small urethral opening in the center.

 

Though slightly softened after one ejaculation, his penis quickly became stimulated and began to swell again under the delicate movements of her tongue. Fully aware of his reaction, Lisbell closed her eyes in despair. Even in this situation, fearing his wrath, she couldn’t stop her tongue. It was the submissive stance of a weakling.

 

“You’re quite good at this now.”

 



 

“When I first told you to do it, you were drooling all over the place.”

 

After confirming that his penis was clean with no traces of semen, he pulled back. Lisbell, withdrawing her tongue which had become numb from the teasing, looked troubled.

 

Ulrich quickly grasped the reason. Like his straight, erect penis, his neatly sprouted fingers pried open Lisbell’s half-closed lips.

 

“…Ugh!”

 

“Swallow it.”

 

As expected, he confirmed the accumulated semen inside her mouth and sneered. Suspecting she would spit it out when he wasn’t looking, Ulrich pushed his fingers deeper.

 

The intruding fingers soon reached the back of her throat. Lisbell’s legs, pinned beneath him, thrashed as if she were being strangled.

 

Ignoring her violent resistance, Ulrich pushed his fingers deeper into her narrow, wet mouth.

 

Gulp.

 

The taste that finally went down her throat seemed to spread a fishy smell throughout her body.

 

Lisbell, having accidentally swallowed with his fingers still deep in her throat, couldn’t help but retch. As soon as he withdrew his fingers, which had been buried so deep that no knuckles were visible, Lisbell turned her body sharply.

 

“Ugh, ugh…!”

 

As she gagged and curled up, Ulrich gently stroked her tangled hair as if feeling sorry for her.

 

Comforting someone suffering from his actions was truly something only Ulrich could do.

 

Though she wanted to immediately brush away his hand, disgusted, she had no strength left. After a few dry heaves, Lisbell finally regained her composure, but before she could hold onto it, her body was dragged.

 

“Swallowing is nice and all.”

 

“…Ung…”

 

“But it’s a bit disappointing that I can’t kiss you afterward.”

 

“Ung… ugh.”

 

“Sucking on Lisbell’s tongue is surprisingly pleasant.”

 

His gaze, staring at her still-wet lips, was displeasing. Despite his penchant for bizarre acts, it seemed he couldn’t bring himself to kiss her mouth filled with his own semen.

 

Instead, he bit her nipples, visible through the thin slip.

 

“Ung…”

 

Lisbell’s hands grabbed his shoulders as if to push him away. Her normally numb nipples felt a sharp thrill from just one flick of his tongue.

 

A man who pulled her to bed every single day, he never forgot to torment and nibble at her breasts. Despite her complaints, he never let go once he bit down.

 

He showed such attachment that sometimes he would bury his face in her flat chest and dawdle.

 

Due to these frequent teases, her breasts had become so sensitive that even a slight pinch or bite could make her back twist.

 

“Mm, mm…”

 

Lisbell moaned under him as he persistently licked her nipples through the slip. It was her desperate attempt to resist the strange sensation.

 

Has it been about two weeks?

 

Since they began sleeping together.

 

The pain that had dragged her to a living hell on the first night was, fortunately or unfortunately, no longer present. After a few nights, Ulrich learned her sensitive spots, and his quick, efficient lovemaking left Lisbell trapped in waves of unfamiliar pleasure instead of the splitting pain.

 

And each time she realized she was feeling it, she was filled with crushing self-loathing.

 

Feeling sexual pleasure from another man’s touch, not Theodore’s, in such a demeaning way, was unthinkable.

 

She was no different from a beast driven only by instinct.

 

Yet her body, betraying her reason, continued to commit this unimaginable act. The burden on her conscience grew heavier each day.

 

“Ha, ugh… stop…”

 

“Stop?”

 

Ulrich, catching her slip of the tongue as she inadvertently voiced her restraint while struggling, asked back as if to catch her off guard.

 

He lifted his head slowly, letting go of her nipple through the slip. His crooked gaze sent a shiver of unease, and then he smirked.

 

“You don’t like it through the clothes?”

 

He immediately pulled the slip aside. Her barely protected breasts were now fully exposed. Burying his nose in her non-existent cleavage, he circled his tongue around the protruding tip.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Lisbell twisted her waist and let out a scream.

 

The difference between being sucked through the clothes and directly on her skin was subtle yet significant. The transfer of saliva from his tongue and how it trailed was conveyed clearly.

 

Indeed, as if substituting for the kiss he couldn’t give, Ulrich stubbornly clung to her nipples.

 

Even the slightest friction from his tongue was enough to make her waist twist, showing how sensitive her breasts had become. He deliberately made a loud sucking sound as he slid his hand down to her groin.

 

“Ung, stop… ah…”

 

Resistance was futile. Before she could even fully voice her protest, two fingers entered her at once, spreading her open.

 

Already melted from several rounds of him tonight, her inner walls parted easily as he scissored his fingers and licked her nipples.

 

Lisbell threw her head back. At some point, her mouth had filled with saliva, unable to swallow as her breath hitched. Meeting Ulrich’s gaze, she knew she couldn’t stop.

 

“No, I don’t want this…”

 

“You don’t want it?”

 

“Ung, ah! Ung…”

 

“Yet you’ve already taken three fingers?”

 

Without her realizing, the number of fingers increased to three, stretching and probing her inner walls. His fingers skillfully targeted her sensitive spots, making her shake her head. The more violently she reacted, the more Ulrich teased her nipples and moved his fingers faster inside her.

 

“Ah, ah… ahh… mm…”

 

Her groin grew wetter as her body trembled with each pulse. She felt her insides heating up, a terrifying and unpleasant sensation.

 

In the end, her face turned red as she clung to Ulrich’s arm.

 

Finally, the fourth finger.

 

“Ah, from behind, ah, from behind, Ulrich…i”

 

The position was always so she couldn’t see his face, with Lisbell on her stomach.

 

As could be inferred, the rules of their bed play were a strict compromise. For every term from Ulrich’s side, there was a term considering Lisbell’s stance.

 

She saw the contract on the day she returned to this villa and signed it with trembling hands in front of him. How did he react?

 

Ah…

 

He smiled, just like now.

 

Mocking her desperate behavior, Ulrich firmly held Lisbell’s trembling thighs and thrust inside as he pleased. The three fingers, now moving rapidly, turned into a thick rod, tearing her insides apart.

 

“Ah, ah, ah… ah!”

 

Feeling the mess between her legs, goosebumps rose on her skin. Again, the familiar mixture of strange pleasure and self-hatred overwhelmed her.

Chapter 42.


“Wasn’t it just for sex that you wanted to do it from behind?”

 

“Ah, ah, ah, yes…i Ahhh…i”

 

“This isn’t sex. This is, um….”

 

While prodding and rubbing her wet hole with three fingers, he casually remarked.

 

“This is me helping Lisbell have some fun.”

 

“Ung, ah…i Ah, Ah…!”

 

He relentlessly played with Lisbell’s insides as she desperately tried to escape.

 

When she curled up on her side, he continued his actions by lifting one of her overlapping legs. Eventually, he removed two fingers, leaving only his longest middle finger to stir the murky liquid flowing below.

 

“Ah, ah… ugh…!”

 

Caught in a near ecstasy, Lisbell reached a trembling climax.

 

As soon as she came, Ulrich withdrew his finger, which had been twisted so erratically it defied rhythm. An opaque liquid trailed down his fingertip.

 

“Haa, ha…”

 

Her vision blurred, her mind shattered.

 

The lingering pleasure left all over her body pushed her deeper into a twisted guilt.

 

Every time she did this with Ulrich and felt it intensely, Theodore’s face would come to mind.

 

It felt like committing adultery.

 

She couldn’t stop crying when suddenly her waist was grabbed, and she was dragged, face down, onto the sheets.

 

The strength spreading her buttocks revealed an unseen lust.

 

An insatiable, grotesque sexual appetite.

 

A terrible sensation of a slippery, massive volume slowly pushing into her cleft.

 

Lisbell buried her tear-streaked face in her arm and quietly wiped away her tears.

 

Opening her weary eyelids, Lisbell realized she had fallen asleep. Curled up in the middle of the bed without a pillow, she blinked sleepily.

 

Just then, the sound of water from beyond ceased.

 

Soon after, Ulrich, with a nightgown over his sculpted naked body, appeared, running his hand through wet hair.

 

“Did you wake up?”

 



 

“You were sleeping so quietly, I thought you might be dead.”

 

Ulrich, making a statement that seemed like a joke, nonchalantly approached the drink table in the bedroom.

 

He always had a whiskey after sex. Though, it seemed not just because of sex. He appeared to be a drinker. Eventually, she found out that there were drink tables with decanters scattered throughout the villa.

 

Today too, he filled his glass generously and took a sip before turning back to the bed.

 

Seeing him, Lisbell pushed away the loosely covered blanket and tried to sit up. The idea that she had slept soundly here felt absurd.

 

Having just woken up, she intended to return to her own bedroom but couldn’t manage it. Every action, from bracing herself on the sheets to lifting her torso and properly sitting down, was more exhausting than she had imagined.

 

The pain from the sex might have subsided, but the lingering muscle soreness was still there. Honestly, she felt too weak to even move a finger. Thinking about returning to her bedroom on another floor made her sigh.

 

More than returning, she wanted to wash away his remnants on her body. When she touched her abdomen to pull off the blanket, she felt something sticky. As soon as she wiped it with her palm, she knew what it was.

 

It was Ulrich’s semen.

 

She remembered it vividly. She had fallen asleep during the act, so he had ejaculated all over her body as if in frustration.

 

Her entire body felt dirty with traces of fatigue and bodily fluids. But she was so exhausted that she couldn’t do anything about it. Even though she was awake, she felt like she was still wandering in a dream.

 

“Want a drink?”

 

Ulrich, watching her from a tilted stance, shook his empty crystal glass.

 

Lisbell touched her lips.

 

It was strange. She hadn’t been conscious of it a moment ago, but the mention of a drink made her want to rinse her mouth. It felt as if the semen he had discharged into her was still filling her mouth.

 

She wanted to run to the bathroom and rinse, but in her current state, even that seemed impossible.

 

Besides, would water be enough to rid her of this taste?

 

She thought it might be better to use the high-proof alcohol, so Lisbell nodded slightly.

 

He poured the crystal glass generously. The sound of pouring filled the quiet bedroom. The space that had been filled with her moans and his breath always felt awkward.

 

Lisbell took the glass he handed her.

 

As soon as she carefully swallowed a sip, she started cough!ng violently.

 

Lisbell grabbed her throat. It was just a sip. Yet it felt like her esophagus was burning. She had heard whiskey was strong but hadn’t imagined it would taste this harsh.

 

The glass slipped from her grasp and rolled off the bed, spilling its contents and wetting the floor. Ulrich looked at the spill and then at Lisbell, who was still cough!ng with a flushed face, and burst into laughter.

 

“…ugh…!”

 

The next moment, he pounced on the bed.

 

As his damp blonde hair rustled, Lisbell’s body had already crumpled. He had jumped on her and hugged her tightly.

 

Lisbell felt like dying in a different way.

 

Her whole body already ached as if trampled, and now, on top of the effect of the strong liquor, being pinned down by a much larger man left her disoriented.

 

But her dismay was brief; Lisbell wriggled to escape his embrace.

 

“Let go, let me go. I need to go back to my room….”

 

“Why not stay here tonight? You look too weak to even get up.”

 

Lisbell opened her mouth but then closed it firmly.

 

From her experiences, she knew he was very stubborn. Once he decided on something, he would make sure to see it through. He might say she could do as she wished, but the reality was different. She already saw him in a negative light.

 

Dragging her tired body into an argument, risking another session starting, would be bad for her. She was so exhausted that she could fall asleep immediately if she closed her eyes.

 

I must smell right now….

 

Unlike Ulrich, who had cleaned up, she hadn’t even gotten rid of the sweat accumulated overnight. Falling asleep during sex meant she wasn’t in a clean state.

 

Thinking about it briefly, she changed her mind.

 

Lisbell remembered the repayment contract he had handed her in the parlor. He had proposed replacing her debt with sexual intercourse, specifying the term clearly.

 

The period extended to late summer, almost the end of autumn.

 

Seeing that, Lisbell realized clearly that contrary to his words about not interfering with her marriage to Theodore, he was intent on ruining it. Otherwise, there would be no reason to keep her until late summer.

 

“The period written there could change.”

 



 

“If I get tired of you before then, the contract will end there.”

 

His nonchalant comment while holding a cigarette had struck her deeply. For her, a situation shaking the foundation of her life was just a whim for him, ending whenever he got bored.

 

Was he telling her to have hope or to sink into despair?

 

His words left her uncertain.

 

Ultimately, both despair and hope remained for Lisbell. The nightly endurance was despair, while hope was naturally….

 

[- What do you mean, Lisbell? Postpone the wedding?]

 

When she signed the contract, she didn’t cry. But tears welled up when she called Theodore.

 

Listening to his urgent voice on the other end, Lisbell couldn’t respond immediately. Leaning against the wall, hearing him ask what happened made her feel choked up.

 

All she wanted was to marry Theodore.

 

But why had things turned out this way? Lisbell felt confused and overwhelmed, fearing she might never escape this maze. By the time she realized, her face was already drenched in tears.


Chapter 43.


Drip, drip.

 

I lifted my head hurriedly after only watching the traces of falling droplets on the floor. Theodore’s insistent questioning, sensing something was wrong from my lack of response, demanded my attention.

 

[What’s going on? Are you in trouble? If you’re in Marnia right now, I’ll come to you. Lisbell. Let’s meet and talk.]

 

“No.”

 

[No?]

 

“Don’t come, Theo. You… there’s no need for you to come here.”

 

Swoosh~

 

Guilt stirred again, like a mischief.

 

What started as a small seed had grown to the size of a fist, pounding relentlessly against Lisbell’s heart.

 

[No need…?]

 

Such words born from that kind of heart only led to awkward misunderstandings.

 

Lisbell bit and released her lips as she listened to his reaction over the receiver.

 

Even in this moment, intense dilemmas flooded her mind.

 

Should I tell Theodore everything?

 

Should I tell him that this is happening to me, that the current situation is such that I cannot leave Marnia, that my mother’s life is tied to that man, and that I cannot irresponsibly abandon her to return to you…?

 

Her fingers gripping the receiver turned pale.

 

Soon, a dry laugh slipped quietly.

 

What If I tell him?

 

If I tell him, will all this misfortune that has come to me be resolved?

 

No.

 

Of course, if it were Theodore, he would surely step in wholeheartedly. If I told him I was held hostage for my mother’s surgery costs, he would help with all he had, even if it meant using the funds meant for the wedding. But even if he stepped in, the wedding would still have to be postponed.

 

Even if we managed to repay my mother’s surgery costs and secure our livelihood, what about after that?

 

The repayment contract Ulrich presented included all hospitalization fees for the specified period. The price for her being in his bed was that high. The thought that her mother’s future treatment costs would not be insignificant kept her from stopping such self-destructive judgments.

 

Misfortune doesn’t lessen when shared. It only increases the burden, creating two hardships instead of one. Comforting herself would be brief, but the heavy reality would continue to tighten its grip.

 

That’s why misfortune is called misfortune.

 

Lisbell thought it was enough for her alone to tumble within this misfortune. She loved Theodore too much to drag him further in.

 

In reality, she knew well that, for his sake, she should be asking for a breakup to prevent him from getting hurt any further.

 

But she couldn’t bring herself to do it.

 

Now, this was the only hope she could hold onto…

 

If even this were gone, she wouldn’t be able to endure her time in this villa. Even if it was merely a result of her selfishness, without that small straw, she had nothing else to grasp…

 

“Sorry, Theo. I’ll explain everything later. I’d like to postpone the wedding date to winter.”

 

Her selfishness manifested so clearly. Even if it seemed difficult, she couldn’t utter the words suggesting a breakup. She was fully aware that Theodore might end up disappointed in her and take such a step himself, but still…

 

In truth, she knew Theodore wouldn’t do that.

 

Since she was the one who loved him the most, having known him to always be kind and gentle.

 

That phone call was her last contact with Theodore.

 

And two weeks had passed since then.

 

Lisbell recalled the phone call she ended without hearing an answer and shivered. A strong arm pulled her back firmly by the waist. Ulrich’s gestures were always like this. Whenever he wanted something, he had to pull it right in front of him, never hiding his rudeness.

 

If he were someone who understood such things, he wouldn’t have put her in such trouble in the first place. This method had been ingrained in Ulrich since childhood.

 

“Lisbell, your hair is tangled again.”

 

Ulrich, who was hugging her warmly from behind, buried his face in Lisbell’s ashen hair, tickling her skin.

 

“It tangles so easily.”

 



 

“Is it because it’s thin and wavy…”

 

He pointed out her flaws, but his actions were contrary. He swayed his face leisurely as if enjoying something pleasant.

 

Lisbell closed her eyes, ignoring his warm breath on the back of her head. She wanted to fall asleep like this, but she was bothered by Ulrich constantly stroking her flat lower abdomen with his broad palm. She had an uneasy feeling that it would soon change its demeanor and threaten her.

 

“Do you know the large farm in Crimpford?”

 

So, she couldn’t easily fall asleep, and Ulrich suddenly asked. Lisbell didn’t answer. It seemed he wasn’t expecting a reply as he continued nonchalantly.

 

“When I was a child, my father took me there to broaden my horizons.”

 



 

“I didn’t expect much, but the farm’s scale was impressive. The green fields stretched endlessly to the horizon.”

 

Her head felt heavy and dizzy. Could a single sip of whiskey make her drunk? Lisbell curled up inwardly. Ulrich persistently stuck to the back of her head, following her like a caterpillar. Occasionally, he stretched out his arms and pulled her curly hair.

 

“While my father was meeting the farm owner, I wandered around, exploring the outdoors. Do you know what amazed me the most?”

 

I don’t know.

 

And I don’t want to.

 

One sip had made her mind feel loose, while this man’s pronunciation and speech were perfectly intact. Was this rambling a drunken behavior? I don’t know. I just don’t want to know.

 

“It was the cotton field. It was a hot season like now, and the cotton bolls were in full bloom.”

 



 

“The white bolls looked as if snow had fallen in summer.”

 

What he said kept reminding her of someone, making it harder to kill her consciousness.

 

Theodore, who was born as the son of a textile factory owner. He, too, often talked about the farms and cotton fields in his hometown, just like Ulrich was doing now.

 

Thinking of Theodore while being entwined naked with another man on the bed made her feel disgusted with herself.

 

“Lisbell’s hair feels like the cotton bolls I held then.”

 



 

“It’s a cute texture…”

 

The slight intoxication and the heavy drowsiness combined, and her mind was completely dazed. She wished the sound would slowly fade, but unfortunately, everything was clearly audible. It was exhausting.

 

The words she just heard were something Theodore had once said.

 

He had told her that her naturally curly hair often tangled and was annoying to manage, but he found it cute like a cloud. Her fiancé had once uttered such ticklish words.

 

Now, hearing Ulrich dirty those words Theodore had once said, while mentioning things that reminded her of Theodore, made her feel cursed.

 

Her loosening mind gradually lost strength.

 

Just before falling asleep, she envisioned Theodore’s radiant smile towards her like the sun. In her fading consciousness, she ran into his arms.

 

A mirage-like sensation that would disappear the moment she grasped it.

 



 

Swoosh-

 

Twisting both ends of a soaked towel, water droplets fell refreshingly. Lisbell, who watched it silently, folded the towel twice, leaving it with just enough moisture. Then, she carefully wiped her mother’s arm that was sticking out from under the blanket.

 

If only her mother’s eyelids would flutter even once, she would have no more wishes, but her mother’s face remained as serene as always, continuing her quiet sleep.

 

After the surgery, Mrs. Osborne had been transported to this villa the moment Lisbell signed the contract. Now, in this cozy bedroom, she received lavish care beyond their means.

 

Under normal circumstances, such expensive medicine being administered morning and night, and the personal physician of the Altahart family coming to Marnia to check on her daily, would be unimaginable.

 

But even in such a perfect environment, her mother showed no sign of waking up. Lisbell’s days passed by caring for her mother. Except for the times when Ulrich summoned her to his bedroom, she spent all her time here.



Lisbell stared blankly at her mother, who lay as if only her body remained, devoid of her soul.

 

“…Mother.”

 

Knowing there would be no response, she still opened her mouth. Her parched and cracked voice, a testament to her broken expectations, echoed in the beautiful yet desolate room before fading away.

 

Lisbell hesitated again as she moved her hand, which had paused for a moment.

 

Why didn’t you tell me?

 

If her mother were to regain consciousness, that was the first question she wanted to ask. It simmered with many emotions.

 

There was guilt for not recognizing the condition of her only family member, relief that her mother had survived in some way, and, on the other hand… a thinly veiled question of why her mother hadn’t informed her earlier, leaving her to be caught like a hostage in a man’s grasp.

 

Lisbell, lost in thought, shook her head.

 

The strange thoughts made her shrink back. Almost scolding herself, she diligently continued to clean her mother’s body.

 

Her mother’s frame, usually hidden beneath clothes, was emaciated. It was like a fragile straw that couldn’t withstand the harsh winter winds.

 

Lisbell bit the inside of her cheek and quickly pulled down her mother’s dress.

 

After making a round of the bed to clean her mother, she sat back in the chair. She hung the now dry towel over the basin and picked up a book she had taken from the study.

 

Opening to the page she had left off, she cleared her throat. She worried that her hoarse voice from the previous night’s distress might sound unpleasant to her mother.

 

Even though her mother was unconscious, Lisbell wanted her to know she was there, so she always read aloud quietly. Today was no different. Her slightly husky voice filled the silent room like a constant background noise.

 

She was about to turn a page full of lines of text.

 

Late summer wind blew through the open window. Her loose ash-gray hair swayed gently.

 

Lisbell lifted her eyes from the book.

 

The midday sun blazed fiercely in the sky. At such moments, Lisbell often felt dazed. She was engulfed in thoughts, wondering what she was doing in such a peaceful scene.

 

Really, what am I doing now?

 

Although she was sitting upright, it felt like she was faltering like someone who had lost their balance. As she realized that the previously stifling hot wind of Marnia no longer felt so intense, she felt more disoriented.

 

The realization that the summer she had once eagerly awaited was passing by so meaninglessly deepened this feeling.

 

Knock, knock.

 

An unexpected knock approached like an unwelcome guest.

 

Lisbell hurriedly turned to the door. Ulrich, whose appearance she hadn’t noticed, was leaning against the door with his arms crossed.

 

It felt strangely surreal for him to be in her mother’s bedroom. During the week she spent caring for her mother, he had never shown his face here.

 

She didn’t know the reason, but she was just grateful. She no longer wanted to be in the same space with him and her mother. The frustration from the hospital room, which had been so brightly lit that she felt even more insignificant, still lingered deeply within her.

 

“You were here.”

 

His tone was monotonous, as if it were obvious she was there.

 

Lisbell closed the book and stood up. Even though he hadn’t completely entered the room, it felt uncomfortable for the three of them to be together.

 

“You have a visitor, Lisbell.”

 

As she was about to leave and ask about the visitor, Ulrich spoke first.

 

Visitor?

 

Noticing her puzzled look, he added with a smile.

 

“Theodore Motier.”

 

Lisbell’s steps halted abruptly. Ulrich tilted his head, not taking his eyes off her face. Leaning against the wooden door, he continued to smile enigmatically.

 

“Your fiancé is here.”

 

As Lisbell stood frozen in disbelief, Ulrich knocked on the door again. The knocking sound seemed like a command to snap her out of her daze.

 

Finally, Lisbell, whose vision was blurred, muttered.

 

“Theo… is here?”

 

“Yes.”

 



 

“I’ve instructed him to wait in the drawing room.”

 

Theodore was… in the drawing room, in this villa. Her fiancé was in the same city, the same area, the same building. What should have been an exciting prospect felt eerily disturbing. Lisbell unconsciously rubbed her arm.

 

“Are you going to meet him?”

 



 

“If not, I’ll send him away.”

 

“Noi”

 

She hastily grabbed Ulrich as he interpreted her silence and turned to leave.

 

“I can’t… just send him away…”

 

She quickly understood why Theodore had come all the way here. If it had been her, she would have done the same. If he had suddenly left saying he had an urgent matter and then only sent a message to postpone the wedding, she would have done the same. So, there was no need to ponder why he was here. The answer was in her actions.

 

Ulrich watched Lisbell in silence. His dry gaze, like sand in the desert, did not waver from her confused face.

 

He soon smiled subtly and entered the bedroom.

 

“Alright, then let’s meet him.”

 

Lisbell backed away as he approached. But Ulrich, with his long strides, caught her arm first.

 

Without a moment to react, she was dragged and seated somewhere. It was the vanity table that stood like a decoration in a corner of the room.

 

“Ouch…”

 

As his hands suddenly dug into her scalp, Lisbell reflexively bit her lip. Her loose ash-gray hair, now untied, gathered under his skillful hands.

 

He combed through the stray hairs and tidied the messy parts before loosening the tie around his neck.

 

Just before summer, he had often left his shirt buttons open freely. But at some point, he had started wearing ties, mostly black ones, similar to the one Lisbell had once given him as a gift. Lisbell decided not to care about him anymore.

 

Ulrich gently untied his tie and used it to tie Lisbell’s hair.

 

“It looks much better.”

 

Was it because her unruly hair was now neatly tied, or because the tie he used was his own? His ambiguous words were puzzling.

 

Lisbell’s uneasy expression was reflected in the mirror.

 

“You know where the drawing room is, right?”

 

He grabbed Lisbell’s ponytail and kissed the nape of her white neck.

 

Their eyes met in the mirror.

 

His eyes were like a blue chain. The feeling of being bound tightly, just by looking, could only be described this way.

 

It could be an unconscious manifestation. The guilt she felt toward Theodore made her feel remorse just by facing those eyes.

 

As her entanglements with Ulrich increased, the secrets she couldn’t share with Theodore weighed her down like a heavy burden. Since arriving at this villa, she had never felt light-hearted or free from worry.

 

“Please, enjoy your time with your fiancé.”

 

Leaving behind these oddly elusive words, he exited the bedroom.

 

Lisbell, left alone, still couldn’t move. Her face in the mirror looked as pale as a sheet. She sat there, unable to do anything, until the church bells tolled, filling the entire villa with their sound. Finally, she managed to get up.

 

Because Theodore was waiting.

 

As the twelfth bell rang, Lisbell arrived in front of the drawing room.

 

Standing in front of the closed door, she couldn’t describe her feelings. The drawing room was where everything had begun. She had come to apologize on behalf of her mother for a crime she hadn’t committed….

 

Lisbell closed her eyes tightly and gently placed her hand on the door. Then she slowly pushed it open.

 

The drawing room in the afternoon was filled with small rays of light. In the wavering sunlit waves, someone stood up abruptly. The simple gesture conveyed feelings of joy, surprise, longing, and tenderness.

 

No, perhaps it was her own feelings.

 

“…Lisbelli”

 

It was no wonder, for her fiancé, who had always been like a mirage, was now truly in front of her.

* * *


It was Theodore.

 

It wasn’t a dream, but the reality of him.

 

Unable to believe it, Lisbell stood by the door for a long time, unable to react. Theodore couldn’t just stand there quietly watching. As soon as the door opened and Lisbell’s face appeared, he ran over and grabbed his fiancée’s hand.

 

“Lisbell.”

 

Warmth spread from where he touched her. Despite the season, the warmth that had somehow been elusive, felt like summer. This brought her dulled senses back to life.

 

“Theo. How did you get here…?”

 

“Of course, I came to see you.”

 



 

“I couldn’t accept that one phone call telling me you wanted to postpone the wedding. So, I came to ask you directly.”

 

Theodore suggested they sit down and led Lisbell into the drawing room.

 

At the end of the hallway, the unchanged sofa from the past greeted her. The memories of what happened here came back, making her stop instinctively. Fortunately, the reaction was so slight that Theodore didn’t notice.

 

In front of Theodore was a cup of coffee, seemingly prepared for a guest. There was no steam rising from it, suggesting it had gone cold, and it looked like he hadn’t taken a single sip. This reflected Theodore’s anxious state, causing her heart to ache.

 



 



 

She never imagined such a moment would come while being with Theodore. Holding hands, sitting close enough for their knees to touch, looking into each other’s eyes but unable to speak easily, feeling the awkwardness first and foremost.

 

The atmosphere was tense, unlike a couple who had promised to marry. Lisbell didn’t know how to break the silence and looked down slightly. She stared at the back of Theodore’s hand, tightly holding hers.

 

“Lisbell, look at me.”

 

“…Okay.”

 

What will he ask first?

 

Why are you here?

 

What exactly happened suddenly?

 

What’s the exact reason for postponing the wedding?

 

There were so many questions she couldn’t guess. And it saddened her that she couldn’t guess.

 

When she first saw Theodore, she felt like she had finally woken up from a nightmare. But now, stepping out of that shattered dream, a reality where she couldn’t take a single step forward awaited her like a beast with its jaws wide open.

 

All that remained was to be swallowed up.

 

So, she wanted to turn around and run away….

 

“Did you have something to eat?”

 

Among the many expected questions, Theodore asked something completely unexpected.

 

Lisbell doubted her ears for a moment. But the next moment proved there was nothing wrong. The familiar smile on Theodore’s face and his comforting hand caressing her cheek were evidence.

 

“You seem to have lost some weight. Your complexion doesn’t look good…. Are you eating well?”

 

“Theo.”

 

“Are you sick?”

 

As the affectionate questions continued, Lisbell felt herself breaking down bit by bit. The many fears that fueled her avoidance gradually subsided, leaving only a strong yearning.

 

Yes, Theodore was this kind of person.

 

She loved him because she knew his nature and this type of kindness. No, she still loved him. His kindness, which made her lean on him whenever something tough happened, hadn’t changed despite the uncertain situation.

 

“No, Theo. I’m fine. So don’t worry.”

 

“Really?”

 

“Yes, really…”

 



 

“I’m sorry. For making you come all the way here.”

 

“You don’t need to apologize. I came on my own.”

 

Lisbell leaned into the palm caressing her cheek and closed her eyes. Something lightly touched and then left her forehead. She knew it was his lips without even seeing.

 

They were officially engaged. Despite that, Theodore’s cautious and tender behavior contrasted sharply with someone who had treated her worse than a discarded toy.

 

“Lisbell… Is there something wrong with your mother?”

 

Before coming to the drawing room, she recalled wiping her arms and legs with a towel.

 

Even covered with soft bedding, her emaciated body and deathly pale complexion, almost devoid of any warmth, made her worry if she had already stopped breathing.

 

“No matter how much I think about it, I can’t guess anything else. Lisbell, you always think and worry about your mother, no matter where you are. If there’s nothing wrong with her, then you wouldn’t be acting like this.”

 

“Theo.”

 

“Tell me. Is something wrong with your mother?”

 



 

“Even if it’s not that, if something is troubling you, don’t hide it from me and tell me.”

 

What’s troubling me?

 

It’s this villa where we’re together right now.

 

Facing you like this in this prison-like place is unbearable.

 

So many visible things are pressing and weighing me down.

 

For example, the pavilion in the garden over your shoulder, the memories of crouching in this drawing room without feeling sunlight, even the tie that feels like it’s gripping my hair….

 

Because of all that, even the time spent with Theodore couldn’t be separated from the man. And that was the very hardship Theodore was painfully curious about.

 

Theodore suddenly clasped her hands.

 

“Lisbell,” he whispered softly, his voice full of sorrow. Through her tear-blurred vision, she saw Theodore gritting his teeth.

 

“Damn it. Something did happen, didn’t it? Why are you crying? Tell me what happened. I need to know. Okay?”

 



 

“This is just my guess, but… coming to Marnia, not answering about your mother…. Is it related to that man?”

 

Theodore continuously wiped her silent tears with his palm. He didn’t realize what kind of misunderstanding he was creating, but his face grew increasingly serious.

 

“Is it? It’s related to that man, the owner of this villa, isn’t it?”

 



 

“Is it a financial issue?”

 

Lisbell involuntarily curled her shoulders. Theodore, who was fully focused on her, couldn’t miss the change. His face hardened further. Certain he was right, Theodore resolutely grabbed her shoulders.

 

“I’ll help you, Lisbell.”

 



 

“I’ll help you.”

 

“What….”

 

“I’ll find a way to raise money. Even if we have to delay the wedding, I’ll gather as much as I can. If that’s not enough… I can contact my parents in Renbruck.”

 



 

“I heard my father recently signed a new farm and supply contract. I was worried about the sudden investment amount, but the broker who introduced the farm seems to be reputable. He trusted the investment, so once the contract is done, the factory sales will increase effectively in the first half of the year. If that happens, helping you won’t be difficult.”

 



 

“Lisbell, we promised to share our future. That naturally includes situations like this. You don’t have to handle everything alone.”

 

At that moment, she could read the responsibility in his eyes. Theodore wasn’t pretending. He was sincere. He genuinely dreamt of a future with Lisbell and was extending his hand to solve the difficulties she faced.

 

The hand she always thought was like a mirage was now a reality she could grasp right in front of her.

 

Lisbell stared at it blankly.

 

She believed she should never rely on him. She didn’t want to drag Theodore into this valley of misfortune, feeling like a cutting north wind at every turn. She firmly believed that was how she protected her love.

 

But he had come, he offered to help, and he was extending his hand.

 

The days she endured in this cruel and lonely space flashed quickly. The more she counted the tough and anxious days, the harder it was to ignore his hand.

 

Should I take it?

 

If I hold this hand, can I escape this valley of misfortune that won’t let go?

 

Hope, thought to be faded and blurred, surged anew, pulsing through her body.

 

Lisbell met Theodore’s eyes. She grimaced, unable to hold back the sob rising from deep inside.

 

“I, I….”

 

Her lips were just about to open.

 

Bangi

 

A gunshot echoed through the drawing room.


The lingering echo left by the sound was extremely sharp and intense. It felt like a drill boring into the brain. It was evidenced by the figures of the two people, frozen solid. Their pupils, containing only each other, trembled as if swept away by the wind.

 

Bangi

 

A gunshot rang out again.

 

The sound was so sudden and startling that it felt as if someone had fired a gun right next to their ears. But it wasn’t so. Only now, a little late, did the sense of distance set in. The space was strictly separated. The gunshot came from outside the window.

 

“What is it…?”

 

Theodore, seemingly just as bewildered, looked towards the window with a dazed expression. Seeing him react this way confirmed that the sound indeed came from outside.

 

So this space remained unharmed, but Lisbell felt overwhelmed as if she had been struck by it.

 

A moment from the past fiercely resurfaced.

 

The savage gunfire that suddenly assaulted the senses while walking down a hallway, just like now. When she peeked outside the window, startled, there was a man aiming at a target in a textbook-perfect stance.

 

“Is someone practicing shooting?”

 



 

“Lisbell?”

 

Theodore’s voice was intermittently cut off because the gunshots still invaded this space. He squinted one eye as if the noise was bothersome. Lisbell, looking at his face, thought of just one thing.

 

After the continuous gunfire sounds, the target board seen in a flash…

 

The pitiful target board, damaged almost perfectly with only the center deeply pitted as if hit every time.

 

Cold sweat trickled down her spine. She felt another chill. The brief summer she had reclaimed was quickly ebbing away like a receding tide. The season was breaking down again.

 

Even amidst this, the continuing gunfire sounded just like Ulrich’s sneering laughter, mocking her. It felt like the sound wasn’t just tearing at her ears but at her heart as well. Recalling his trivial stories she had half-listened to in the past.

 

“Do you know the large farm in Crimpford?”

 

“It was the cotton field. It was a hot season like now, and the cotton bolls were in full bloom.”

 

The topic that used to torment her by associating it with Theodore, so much that she wanted to pass out by forcefully pushing herself to drink, now prickled her sharply for no apparent reason.

 

“Lisbell, this sound….”

 

“Theo.”

 

“What?”

 

Theodore, stretching his neck to figure out where the sound was coming from, looked back at her. Lisbell saw a peculiar seed of despair in his face.

 

“Your father, the farm he newly contracted this time… is it the large farm in Crimpford?”

 

Theodore’s eyes widened.

 

“Yes. How did you know?”

 

Ah.

 

Ah.

 

Ah….

 

The myriad of thoughts occupying her mind scattered. The gunfire, which had been ringing in her ears like tinnitus, ceased. But Lisbell still felt as if she could hear something. Thump, thump, thump. A blunt but heavier throbbing than the gunfire hammered down her entire body like an ax.

 

She realized only a moment later.

 

It was her own heartbeat.

 

Even though the space was clearly separated, making it seem like only the savage sound was transmitted, it wasn’t so. Lisbell was surely torn apart by that gunfire. Anxiety and unease surged in like a black wave through the cracks of her shattered mind.

 

My misfortune has finally transferred to my fiancé.

 

When did it start?

 

The misfortune that swallowed me was now preparing to engulf my fiancé as well.

 

A shiver ran through her entire body.

 

“…Lisbell? Lisbelli”

 

Unable to bear it, she hunched forward, clutching her head. Her fingertips brushed against the frustratingly soft material of a necktie. Lisbell yanked at it neurotically, like someone screaming silently.

 

Her ponytail, leaving a mark, messily cascaded down. She looked at the necktie in her hand in despair.

 

Staring at the black necktie stretching horizontally across her eyes, Lisbell unconsciously grabbed her neck.

 

Her cautious movements gradually turned pathological.

 

Even though nothing was hanging there, she scratched furiously at her white skin until red drops of blood appeared. She was picking at her skin so much that flesh clung to her nails, but the panic splitting her mind was so dominant that she didn’t have time to feel the pain of her skin tearing.

 

“Ah….”

 

Then realization hit her in an instant.

 

It wasn’t just about the money.

 

Even if that were resolved, everything couldn’t be undone as if it never happened.

 

He meant for me to come to him willingly.

 

By betraying the trust with my dear fiancé and going to him directly.

 

Lisbell had already committed the act of betraying this relationship. She had done it. There was even an excuse. She did it to save her mother. She thought she had no choice at the time.

 

And that incident had very clearly turned into her weakness. The leash of this secret was in Ulrich’s hands. That’s why she kept feeling something was tied around her neck.

 

“Ha….”

 

“Lisbell? Are you alright?”

 

“Haha….”

 

A hollow laugh slipped out.

 

“Why? Are you in pain? Is it your head? Does your head hurt?”

 

She no longer felt any warmth from her fiancé’s careful touch. No warmth at all; even if she were at the bottom of a cold ocean, it wouldn’t be as chilling as this. The uncontrollable cold surged as if she had become a living ice block.

 

The trap that had taken her as its prey was silently laid at her feet.

 

As intricate as a spider’s web, as precise as a chessboard….

 

Her foolish self had stepped into it willingly, unaware, step by step. She didn’t even realize it when it was finally wrapped around her neck.

 

Going forward was checkmate, going backward was checkmate.

 

In chess, this was called a mate.

 

Yes, I’m exactly in that state now….

 

In a disheveled state, Lisbell stared blankly into space. Even in this moment, Theodore’s tender hand, with no fault to find, caressed her cheek as he called her name soothingly, “Lisbell,” and brushed back her tousled hair.

 

Feeling his touch silently, Lisbell slowly turned her head.

 

“Theo.”

 

“I’m listening. Tell me.”

 

“…Will you break off the engagement?”

 

The tender hand that had been stroking her sideburns as if prepared to accept anything froze. Lisbell, if she could, wanted to lean her cheek against that palm once more. But she couldn’t anymore. She realized too painfully that she couldn’t anymore.

 

“Now….”

 

“I asked you to break off our engagement.”

 



 

“Let’s break up, Theo.”

 

Holding onto Theodore any longer wasn’t love but obstinacy. As someone who loved him, she couldn’t commit such an ugly selfish act. It was clear that the path ahead couldn’t be a bed of roses, at least not for him, now that she had understood the underlying issues.

 

So this was the right thing to do.

 

It should have been like this from the beginning.

 

Driven by the desire to keep at least one thing within reach, she had done something she shouldn’t have. If she couldn’t correct it now, at least Theodore should be freed from this shadow.

 

She didn’t want to imagine the moment when the swamp holding her down would swallow even his ankles. So the answer was clear.

 

“What are you saying?”

 



 

“Why, why does it have to end like this? Just a moment ago….”

 

Holding her shoulders gently but firmly, Theodore, his face hardening, opened his eyes wide.

 

“You’re doing this on purpose, aren’t you?”

 



 

“You’re saying this because you don’t want to cause me any harm, aren’t you? You don’t mean it, right?”

 

His attitude was unusually earnest, and perhaps he was right; it contained a strong denial. A denial driven by his desperate belief that they couldn’t end like this, that she felt the same way.

 

And it wasn’t just words. His wavering eyes, the way he clasped his hands over hers on her lap, everything expressed his blind desire to confirm the solidity of their relationship.

 

“Theo….”

 

“Say it isn’t true.”

 



 

“Say it was a slip of the tongue.”

 



 

“Lisbell, it’s alright. I told you just a moment ago. You don’t have to feel guilty. It’s all on me. It’s my choice, my decision. So you shouldn’t feel any burden….”

 

This was the second time.

 

Facing a situation where she had no choice but to make a foolish decision, knowing it was wrong.

 

“I don’t love you anymore.”

 



 

“That’s why, Theo.”


Theodore was frozen in place. The news must have been that shocking.

 

In contrast, Lisbell remained calm. For the first time, she realized how easy it was to lie. By simply stripping away her emotions and reciting plausible words that came to mind, it wasn’t that difficult. Above all, she believed this was the best path for Theodore.

 

Now that she had realized this was the best course of action.

 

“You don’t love me…?”

 

His eyes, which had been turbulent, soon regained focus.

 

“Don’t lie.”

 

“It’s not a lie.”

 

“No, it is a lie.”

 



 

“I know you. Have I only known you for a year? As much as you’ve seen me, I’ve seen you too, Lisbell.”

 

Lisbell turned her head to avoid his gaze. Then Theodore got off the sofa and knelt down in front of her, trying to look into her face. She wanted to avoid it, but knowing that avoiding it more would only increase his suspicion, Lisbell remained still as if she were a stone.

 

Theodore scrutinized her small face deeply and closely.

 

“…Why?”

 



 

“Why are you saying such things…?”

 

“They say there are no reasons when love begins.”

 



 

“I think it’s the same when it ends.”

 

Trying to appear as if she had made a difficult decision, Lisbell brushed her face once.

 

“I was confused too, facing this right before the wedding, so I needed some quiet time to think. But seeing you come all the way here… I now have an unshakable certainty. I don’t feel any excitement when I see you anymore.”

 

“Lies.”

 

“It’s not a lie.”

 

“Lies…”

 

His resolute consciousness began to waver.

 

Believing that Lisbell had no reason to hide such things from him, the cruel excuse she presented seemed to validate all her actions.

 

The sudden departure, the rude notification to delay the wedding via phone, and the awkward behavior when they finally met here…

 

“I know this shouldn’t have been avoided in this way. But the time we spent together was precious to me too. That’s why I was scared and afraid of the moment when I would have to tell you this…”

 

Lisbell drove the nail into his collapse.

 



 

Theodore finally looked speechless. The grip on Lisbell’s hand, which he held as if it were a lifeline, had weakened considerably. Lisbell quietly looked down at his hand, which had always felt reassuring. It seemed like she was trying to capture the warmth she would never feel again.

 

“…Then what about your mother?”

 



 

“There must be something wrong with her. I’m sorry, Lisbell, but I can’t help but think that your sudden change is because of her.”

 

“My mother is perfectly fine. Theo, she’s as healthy as ever, your worries were for nothing.”

 

“Then why did you come to Marnia?”

 



 

“You said you needed time to think? But why did it have to be here? Isn’t it because your mother is here? And wasn’t it because something happened to her? If nothing’s wrong with her, then why, why did you pack up and come here all of a sudden? Why here…”

 

His voice had grown slightly harsh. It was a sign that his denial was fading and a faint disappointment that the story might be true was beginning to settle in. Negative emotions always tend to spread quickly. The small bud of pessimism in Theodore would surely follow that trend.

 

“No way…”

 



 

“Then did you come to see that man?”

 

His misunderstanding was clear. Lisbell didn’t respond. She knew it was time to nurture his misunderstanding, not correct it.

 

Saying it wasn’t true would only nullify all the effort she had put into uttering each painful word.

 

She couldn’t say it twice. If she did, she would end up pathetically begging him not to leave her, confessing it was all a lie.

 

So she endured it. Misunderstanding her relationship with Ulrich in that way was excruciatingly painful, but if it was the way to save Theodore, she had to endure it.

 

“No, right?”

 



 

“Say no, Lisbell.”

 



 

“Please, just say no…”

 

The shock and fear that his fiancée might have another man just before their wedding finally broke Theodore down.

 

Lisbell couldn’t bear to look at him resting his face on her knee. Even so, she could tell he was crying. She felt the hem of her skirt getting wet where his face touched it.

 

The traces of tears gathering like puddles in this place, where it didn’t rain, felt like tears he was shedding for her.

 

The simple and kind-hearted Theodore Motier.

 

“I wish you always happiness.”

 

This is sincere…

 

Swallowing back the words she couldn’t bring herself to say, Lisbell looked out the window. Her eyes, reflecting the slightly subdued sunlight, grew as dull as those of a living corpse.

 



 

She didn’t see Theodore off as he left.

 

She just sat silently in the drawing room for as long as it would take for him to leave the villa and go far away.

 

The shadows of the afternoon, now more sharply angled, cast a shape that seemed to cut at her feet. She stared blankly into space as if unable to escape from those shadows.

 

What is this feeling?

 

What is this strangely calm feeling?

 

Even though she wanted to hold onto him and believed she had no hope otherwise, had she been mentally preparing herself for the moment they would part?

 

Oh, is it resignation?

 

Yes, this feeling of a desolate heart with no will left must be resignation. It was a new emotion to her, and though fascinating, it wasn’t welcoming.

 

Lisbell, who had been as silent as a pillar for a long time, finally stood up quietly. Leaving the drawing room, she headed to her mother’s bedroom to return to her routine.

 

Her mother looked exactly the same as before she had left.

 

What would Theodore have done if he had seen her mother like this?

 

He would have hugged her tightly right away.

 

And he would have said something like this:

 

“You’ve been suffering alone, haven’t you?”

 

“Why didn’t you tell me?”

 

“Lisbell, don’t try to bear it all alone.”

 

“I’m here with you.”

 

Just imagining it made it seem like his voice was really there. It was because she had heard those words before. It was the comfort he had given her every time she was struggling, the comfort she trusted and followed.

 

The more she reminisced about him, the more she felt she had made the right decision.

 

While sitting silently in the drawing room, Lisbell had envisioned the future with Theodore as if recalling an unfulfilled dream.

 

The imagination started from the point where she told him the truth.

 

Theodore would probably have run around tirelessly to solve the financial problems, just as he had said. She might have helped him, and the problem could have been resolved more smoothly than expected.

 

The real problem would come afterward.

 

Ulrich, who found her amusing to play with, would use the farm contract as leverage to threaten Theodore’s family. That would bring chaos far beyond the current financial issues. It was about the survival of the factory that his father had built.

 

After resolving that, Ulrich would directly pull the invisible leash he had placed around her neck. He would force her to confess that she had betrayed Theodore and was humiliated under Ulrich.

 

Ironically, the scariest part of her imagination was here.

 

Lisbell’s fear lay there.

 

External pressures and threats could be overcome together. But if distrust was sown from within, breaking their trust and faith in each other, the end would be unpredictable.

 

If that truth was exposed and Theodore abandoned her because of it, she wouldn’t be able to bear it. That fear and horror drove her to let him go first. It was cowardly avoidance, but still, but still…

 

Lisbell imagined the end with him breaking multiple times. Repeating it until Theodore left the villa, she endured it in the same place.

 

If she hadn’t done that, she would have chased after him, telling him not to cry and caressing his cheek.


Lisbell sat down in the chair and opened a book.

 

She calmly resumed reading from where she left off. Her voice flowed smoothly through the first and second lines but faltered on the third. The quiet sound was swallowed by the stillness of the bedroom.

 

After a brief silence, Lisbell started reading again from that part. Yet again, she stumbled. Trying to pretend nothing was wrong, she resumed speaking but soon faltered again.

 



 

Taking her eyes off the book, she looked at her mother’s hand, neatly placed on the blanket. She closed the book, set it down, and stood up to grasp it. Even though she knew it was too frail for her to hold, she couldn’t endure without doing so.

 

“Mother.”

 

No answer came back.

 

She felt disappointed despite not expecting a response.

 

“Did I make the right decision?”

 

It didn’t matter if it wasn’t her mother. She wanted to hear an answer from anyone.

 

“Please, tell me I did.”

 

That I didn’t make the wrong decision.

 

“Please….”

 

Tell me that this regret I’m feeling now is misplaced.

 

Holding her mother’s hand, she sank to the floor and lowered her head. The tears she had held back in front of Theodore now streamed down uncontrollably.

 

Regret always came too late, hitting her with an overwhelming force. Lisbell couldn’t resist it and was buried in it.

 

After crying until her knees on the floor were damp, dizziness washed over her. She leaned her dizzy head against the bed and then slowly stood up.

 

She didn’t want to show such a miserable sight by her mother’s side, not knowing when she might wake up. If her mother, encouraged by her hope, were to wake and see her daughter’s face like this, it would break her heart.

 

Rationalizing that she needed to take a break from caregiving for the day, Lisbell tidied up.

 

In that short time, her swollen eyelids stung every time she blinked. This made her think of Theodore. He must have cried just as much. No, probably even more. His eyes must have stung terribly…. Lisbell bit her lip at the thought that made her heart ache.

 

Today, she wanted to hide in a corner where no one could see her. She wanted to lie in bed, pull the blanket over her head, and sleep as if tomorrow would never come. With such gloomy thoughts, she left the bedroom.

 

She was heading down the hallway to her room when a slightly open bedroom door caught her attention. What drew her attention was not the now familiar interior design or the overwhelming furnishings.

 



 

There was a drink table, as always. A sleek liquor bottle was on it. The type of liquor often changed, apparently according to Ulrich’s taste, but what she saw now was the same one Ulrich had drunk a few days ago.

 

The reason Lisbell noticed it, despite her preoccupied mind, was simple. She remembered the strange exhilaration from that day, when just one glass made her feel as if her brain was relaxing and her body melting away. The taste was awful, but the effect was remarkable.

 

What she needed now was not something else but that effect to escape this oppressive regret.

 

When the thought crossed her mind, her feet had already crossed the bedroom threshold.

 



 

“All duds, as expected.”

 

Ulrich took off his leather gloves, disliking the strong smell of gunpowder, and made a dissatisfied face. Victor, who had been standing a bit further away, approached with an expected look and nodded.

 

While Victor tidied up the firearms, Ulrich turned his head and gazed into the distance, seemingly looking at a specific place at the villa entrance, although it was unclear exactly where.

 

Victor signaled the household staff, who had come out to wait, to tidy up and quickly followed Ulrich.

 

“I’ve sent out the invitations as per the list you provided last time. Once the trial operation is over, we plan to hold the opening ceremony. We’ll prepare the reception party in three parts, similar to the opening of Hotel No. 1.”

 

“Yes, do that.”

 

“I’ve also drafted a speech, but it would be good for you to review it. After all, you’ll be delivering it.”

 

Ulrich’s shoulders slightly rose and fell as he walked ahead. Though Victor could only see his back, he could vividly imagine the sigh on Ulrich’s face.

 

“So, the day has finally come to go to the capital.”

 

“Please endure it for just a few days.”

 

“Just make sure neither Mother nor Gwen gets anywhere near me.”

 

How can they not come, given it’s a family-run business….

 

The thought was obvious, but Victor kept it to himself, knowing Ulrich would loathe it. Getting Ulrich to the capital hotel for the opening ceremony was essential from his standpoint.

 

Having finished all the business matters, it was now time to address personal concerns. Victor put down the notebook he had been holding.

 

“Just to be cautious… have you been taking your medicine, sir?”

 

“Medicine?”

 

“Or administering it.”

 

Ulrich, walking ahead, paused momentarily before realizing Victor’s intent and let out a short laugh.

 

“Neither.”

 

The assistant was referring to the measures to prevent a child from being conceived through his affairs with Lisbell. Ulrich thought Victor was exceptionally meticulous. It was indeed a fundamental part of the education for anyone stepping into this family business.

 

“I don’t finish inside anyway.”

 

It was quite uncomfortable having to listen to such personal matters, but thanks to past experience, Victor had developed the resilience not to flinch.

 

“One can never be too careful.”

 

“Indeed.”

 

“It’s an issue that can’t be taken too lightly.”

 

Absolutely.

 

In high society, where bloodline succession was crucial, the issue of heirs was always a hot topic. It could be a result of tender love or a product of terrible infidelity. Such stories would fuel the scandals that would brighten up Laurent’s social season more than spring flowers.

 

This issue’s magnitude was even greater in larger, more prestigious families. The Altahart family, with their historically poor sense of propriety, had faced this problem numerous times.

 

Blood could be a powerful bond, a weapon, and a form of power in the face of a prestigious name.

 

According to the ancestors’ rule that only those bearing the family blood could inherit the name and the business rights, a wrongly conceived child could potentially consume the entire family.

 

Therefore, Ulrich did not welcome the idea of children.

 

He didn’t want to bear the risk of producing a child just for a night’s pleasure. He didn’t want to create a life from a brief moment of sweetness if it meant bearing that much risk and responsibility.

 

Victor had developed a tolerance for Ulrich’s personal life because he had handled such matters many times. When Ulrich had a regular female companion, Victor would ensure she took contraceptives, and if she seemed particularly untrustworthy, he would recommend Ulrich to take them. They both agreed that a child shouldn’t be conceived carelessly, and Ulrich never resisted taking the medication.

 

“By the way, is that kid still at the main house?”

 

Victor nodded, understanding who Ulrich meant.

 

“Yes, he is.”

 

“How’s he doing?”

 

“Well….”

 

Even a polite response of “well” didn’t come easily. Ulrich, expecting this, let out a resigned chuckle.

 

“Gwen Altahart, of course.”

 



 

“Taking in an illegitimate child and then getting involved with another one… utterly irresponsible.”

 

Victor had some bad news about Gwen. However, it was a sensitive issue that the family was strictly controlling, so even he had to be cautious. Ulrich would find out when he went to the capital anyway.

 

There was no need to bring forward something that would soon cause a headache. Victor decided to keep quiet.

 

“Well, luck might have prevented a child so far, but there’s no guarantee for the future.”

 



 

“From now on, mix the medicine into Lisbell’s meals.”

 

I don’t want a child.

 

That was the implication in his brief order.


“More importantly, the guest?” 

 

Ulrich casually asked as he opened the door to the office they had arrived at. Victor followed behind and closed the door. He glanced towards the office window.

 

“He has left.”

 

“And the send-off?”

 

“As per your instructions, I had a driver ready to take him to the station, but he declined and left the villa alone. The driver said he looked like he was about to cry.”

 

Ulrich, who was about to light a cigarette as he sat down, paused in thought and then quietly laughed.

 

“What is Lisbell doing?”

 

“I heard she is in the drawing room.”

 

“Still?”

 

“Yes.”

 

His smile deepened.

 

“One side is propping up a pitiful pride, while the other is just sitting there without even seeing him off…”

 

Just by their attitudes, the situation was clear. Ulrich, humming contentedly, shuffled through the papers. Victor, watching him, quietly clicked his tongue. He recalled some of the absurd instructions he had silently followed as Ulrich’s secretary.

 

Bribing the Marnia police to send letters about a non-existent incident, investigating an unrelated factory owner in another city, or suddenly driving off to Misley in the east and then returning…

 

He now knew well that a woman was at the end of all those paths.

 

Lisbell Osborne.

 

The daughter of Mrs. Osborne, who once managed this villa, and now, essentially Ulrich’s mistress. He didn’t know when it started, but she had firmly caught Ulrich Altahart’s interest.

 

No matter how many times he thought about it, it was pitiful. How did she catch this madman’s attention? What strange thing had she done?

 

Then his thoughts shifted.

 

No.

 

She might not have done anything peculiar. One must not overlook the fact that this boss was crazy. Madmen are unpredictable because they get hooked on strange points. If he had been capable of rational thought, he would have long been repulsed by the Altahart name and left it.

 

Ulrich seemed to consider himself one of the more normal members of his family, but Victor saw it differently. Based on the obstinacy and persistence he showed in incidents, he was the most extreme among his family.

 

Knowing when to give up was also a skill. But Ulrich couldn’t accept that.

 

He was the type to keep going until he succeeded. He would use everything he had to achieve his goal, even if it meant breaking someone’s spirit. And he felt no guilt about it.

 

That was the essence and dark side of Altahart that no one could deny. Ulrich too, despite his noble name, hid a vile nature underneath.

 

“Then I’ll adjust the schedule to match the hotel opening date. Since you’ll be in the capital, I’ll arrange for you to handle all matters requiring your attention at once.”

 

“Don’t report to the mansion yet.”

 

Despite his hatred for other Altaharts, Victor silently bowed.

 

After his secretary left, Ulrich worked for a while. After reviewing and clearing the piled-up documents, he found that night had fallen. He looked at the darkening sky, then stood up quietly.

 

“I heard she is in the drawing room.”

 

Is she still there?

 

He headed towards the drawing room. The sound of his footsteps echoed in the wide, silent hallway. The night breeze, passing through the occasionally open windows, felt pleasant.

 

“The driver said he looked like he was about to cry.”

 

Ulrich’s smile deepened. He brushed his hair back in the soft breeze. He felt a thrill from the idea that Lisbell and he had shared a thought at that moment.

 

He soon reached the drawing room and opened the door. It was quiet inside. After confirming no one was there, he was about to leave.

 

But something caught his eye.

 



 

Ulrich approached the sofa. A piece of black cloth stuck out. It was a necktie, thrown carelessly. He was the only one in this villa who owned something like that.

 

He quickly deduced its origin. It was likely the tie he had used to tie her hair when she went to meet her fiancé.

 

If it’s here…

 

“Ha.”

 

So, she wasn’t just being prideful.

 

Ulrich picked up the tie, which seemed about to fall off the sofa. A gray hair was tangled at the end, as if it had been forcefully pulled out.

 

He stared at the thin strand.

 

He remembered the taste of her tears he had once licked. He wondered if it would taste the same here, but he didn’t bring it to his lips. If he were to taste it, he’d prefer it fresh from her rather than this discarded state.

 

After staring at the hair for a while, he let it float away lightly and left the drawing room with the tie in hand.

 

He quickly guessed where she might be. Even in such an infuriating situation, she wouldn’t abandon her duty to stay by her mother’s side. Her actions were always predictable.

 

What amazed him was himself.

 

Despite hating boredom, he didn’t find this predictable process tedious.

 

He didn’t know if this change was good or bad, but it wasn’t unpleasant. Ulrich hummed softly as he crossed the corridor.

 

The sky had turned a clean, dark black.

 

Under the particularly dark night sky, Ulrich reached the bedroom he had visited earlier that morning.

 

Knock, knock.

 

Knowing no one would answer, he opened the door immediately. It was quiet inside. But he couldn’t conclude she wasn’t there. Lisbell always sat like a wax doll, barely noticeable.

 



 

So he believed he would see her sitting quietly.

 

…She’s not here?

 

The room was empty.

 

Only the cold, dying figure on the bed was there. It was so unexpected that Ulrich looked around, still holding the doorknob.

 

But no matter how much he looked, he couldn’t find her.

 

Strangely, an unseen tension suddenly gripped his mind.

 

Even realizing she wasn’t there, he stepped into the bedroom. It was close to a malfunction, his assumption shattering.

 

Ulrich approached the bed, moving his tongue slowly. Mrs. Osborne slept like the dead, with the same face as yesterday and the day before.

 

Ulrich, arms crossed, leaned and looked down at her static face.

 

Then his gaze shifted.

 

Wind blew in through a slightly open window. The dark air felt thick under the sky that would soon hold the Milky Way.

 

Ulrich straightened up slowly.

 

The wind, once refreshing, now felt stifling. This was because an unthinkable assumption had emerged.

 

Did she leave her mother behind?

 

With her overly kind nature?

 

Impossible.

 

Even as he thought that, Ulrich quickly left the bedroom.

 

Given the driver’s report of Theodore looking like he was about to cry, and Lisbell’s refusal to see him off, it was clear. Today, Lisbell must have broken off the engagement. All signs pointed to it. It must have been a seismic shift in her life.

 

What if, in such a state, she momentarily lost her mind and decided to abandon her mother to escape?

 

Even thinking it unlikely, Ulrich’s steps quickened as he headed to her bedroom.


Still walking gracefully, it was a posture that anyone who knew him well would notice the distinct difference in an instant. Ulrich arrived at Lisbell’s bedroom without taking a single breath.

 

This time, he skipped knocking and abruptly flung the door open.

 

The interior was dim, barely recognizable. The curtains, which might have been drawn since the previous night or earlier, had not been pulled back, making the room feel eerily cold and silent.

 

Ulrich’s eyebrows twitched slightly.

 

In the desolate atmosphere, there was a faint smell of alcohol.

 

Ulrich quietly walked toward the bed. The first thing he saw was her disheveled hand. Then, he saw her back as she lay on her knees on the floor, leaning against the bed, asleep. Next to her feet lay a bottle of whiskey.

 

It was the whiskey he recently enjoyed.

 

Now he understood why she had been absent from the spot she usually occupied daily to take care of him.

 

Ulrich nudged the empty bottle with the toe of his shoe and looked down. Her sleeping posture, sprawled out without moving, was quite a sight.

 

He lifted his head slightly.

 

Even though it was his first time in Lisbell’s bedroom today, it unmistakably felt like her space despite being under his ownership. Slightly cluttered items and signs of use were noticeable.

 

The live-in staff diligently cleaned and maintained the villa daily, including his bedroom. It was the same kind of work that Mrs. Osborne did before she collapsed.

 

But Ulrich had instructed them not to touch this room. He didn’t want anyone else’s gaze or hands intruding on Lisbell’s domain. More precisely, he wanted to be the only one to touch it. He wanted to enjoy her pure essence untouched by anyone else.

 

And this space was the very presence of the living Lisbell.

 

Ulrich didn’t find the seemingly messy interior particularly unpleasant and bent his knees to sit.

 

“…Ah, it’s wrinkled.”

 

Holding it in his hand all the way here had crumpled his tie.

 

As he looked at it, he firmly grabbed Lisbell’s hair as she slept, lying face down. He didn’t hold back, and as he pulled, she let out a small groan, “Ugh…”

 

Daring to loosen it without permission.

 

Ulrich stroked her fine hair that slipped through his fingers. He never thought a day would come when he’d be so concerned with someone’s hair. The thin strands seemed like they could tear at any moment, but surprisingly, they were tough. It reminded him of her persistence.

 

Nonetheless, Lisbell’s gray hair clung to his fingers without tearing, feeling like a very thin whip. The more he toyed with it, the stranger he felt. Touching it with one hand, he realized the sensation was enough to bring him to climax if he pulled out his cock from his pants with the other.

 

He hadn’t planned on it, but once he became conscious of it, blood rushed to his lower body, swelling it tightly. Just as he wondered if he should go through with it, Lisbell turned her head, murmuring, 

 

“Mmm…”

 

Her thin hair slid smoothly through his fingers.

 

Ulrich stared at his empty hand momentarily before slowly loosening his tie. He slipped it over Lisbell’s head and placed his arm under her bent knees.

 

When he lifted her onto the bed, she tilted her head back, her moist lips slightly parting. Ulrich brought his face close to hers. The strong scent of alcohol in her breath was evident. The whiskey bottle, nearly empty, provided proof of where it had all gone.

 

Kneeling on one knee on the bed, Ulrich tightened the tie he had placed around her neck. As the space gradually closed, it soon fit snugly around her neck.

 

“…Cough.”

 

The tie tightened like a cord around her neck, causing Lisbell to instinctively gasp for breath, curling her fingers. Ulrich watched her struggle indifferently before gradually releasing his grip.

 

As he pulled the tie knot in the opposite direction, a faint mark appeared on her neck. The vague discomfort he felt on his way here dissipated somewhat.

 

Switching his gaze between his still-swollen groin and Lisbell’s pale face, Ulrich straightened up.

 

He hesitated briefly, remembering that he didn’t particularly enjoy the feeling of holding a drunken woman and having sex as if he were the only one indulging in lewdness.

 

His hand, which had been brushing against the tie’s wide end, was about to retreat into the air.

 

“Mm…”

 

Then, Lisbell trembled and opened her eyes, which had been closed all this time.

 

Her pale purple eyes, slightly clouded with tears, searched the void meaninglessly before slowly focusing on the man occupying part of her vision. Ulrich reached out to close her eyes, which were clearly drunk.

 

“…Theo?”

 

But unexpectedly, his arm was grabbed.

 

Lisbell, with a voice that sounded like she had cried a lot, called out.

 

“Theo, is that you?”

 

Her pronunciation was more slurred than usual. Ulrich easily allowed himself to be pulled closer by the hand gripping his arm.

 

To be precise, it was the first time Lisbell had held onto him like this, so he was slightly bewildered and let himself be pulled.

 

“Don’t go.”

 



 

“Don’t go, Theo…”

 

Clinging to his arm with desperate hope, Lisbell mumbled, rubbing her face against it. Witnessing this, Ulrich quickly concluded.

 

She’s drunk.

 

Indeed, having drunk such a strong liquor on an empty stomach, it was impossible to avoid getting thoroughly drunk.

 

Nevertheless, seeing Lisbell, who usually stayed calm and barely smiled in front of him, clinging like this was quite novel. So, Ulrich remained still, allowing her to pull him further until he was practically lying on top of her.

 



 

Ulrich’s eyes gleamed softly in the darkness.

 

Even her lips, which occasionally pressed against his, carried the remnants of the intoxication lingering in the room. As he remained motionless, Lisbell, seeming to take his stillness as a sign, lifted her head and pressed her lips more firmly against his.

 

“Mm…”

 

The soft moan leaking between her slightly parted lips was different from what he usually heard from her, more sensual. He found it amusing and slightly smiled, causing Lisbell to think he had given her permission and to gently suck on his slightly parted lips.

 

Ulrich maintained his half-bent posture, supporting himself with one hand on the bed. His dark gray eyes, gleaming in the darkness, were unusually calm for a man engaged in a kiss.

 

Mistaking him for her fiancé, whom she had tearfully sent away earlier, Lisbell kissed him, believing it was Theodore.

 

“Did you always kiss like this?”

 

He criticized the lukewarm kiss, with her timidly sucking on the surface of his lips. Every time he thrust his tongue deep into her mouth, she trembled like a rabbit caught by the tail, and now he understood why. If this was how she kissed her fiancé, it made sense.

 

“Even a child would do better than this.”

 



 

“I wonder if you even had a proper first night.”

 

His low voice murmured ambiguously, making Lisbell, thinking he was interrupting her kiss, let out a soft “Mm…?” with a drawn-out moan.

 

Ulrich gently pressed her slender chin with his fingers.

 

Even in a room where it was difficult to find a single ray of light, the soft movement of her lips was visible and felt smooth. Whenever he approached her, it always felt like she reluctantly complied, but if this was how she kissed her fiancé, it made sense.

 

Ulrich smirked but felt a strange chill in the back of his mind.

 

He released her chin and lowered his head again to kiss her. This time, Lisbell, though hesitant, gradually wrapped her arms around his neck.

 

The seductive behavior, like the scent of strong flowers in spring, made Ulrich feel uncomfortable below.

 

Despite the overpowering scent of intoxication from her, there was something tantalizing about it. It was as if she knew how to stir a man’s desires with her charm.

Chapter 51.

“Ung… umm…”

 

Ulrich sighed as he watched her still clumsily pressing her lips against his, unable to do anything but rub insistently.

 

Through the wide-open door, Lisbell’s moist tongue cautiously pushed in as if testing the waters. Enjoying the sensation of her tongue scraping against his teeth, Ulrich quietly lowered his arms and lifted her neat skirt that fell to her knees.

 

As he touched her prominent kneecap and trailed his hand up her slender thigh, Lisbell immediately responded.

 

Her skin twitched as if sparks were flying, but she did not resist much. She merely occasionally curled her tongue inside her mouth and exhaled hot breaths that seemed almost scorching.

 

Still tipsy, Ulrich felt as if he was drinking along with her and savored it sweetly.

 

“Theo, I’m sorry…”

 
 

“I’m sorry, so don’t go… Huh, yeah…?”

 

Just as he started to feel her pleasantly licking the inside of his cheek, Lisbell suddenly clung to his clothes and pleaded. It was obvious that her trembling eyes behind tightly shut eyelids resembled a trapped herbivore.

 

“Where am I going?”

 

“Don’t go… I, uh, I lied…”

 

“What lie?”

 

“I said I, uh… don’t love you anymore.”

 



 

“But actually, the truth is, I still…”

 

“Do you love me?”

 

“Do you love me?”

 

Lisbell slowly opened her eyes towards the deep darkness.

 

Her trembling hand clutched his coat, recognizing him only by his silhouette. Ulrich gazed down at her under the same circumstances.

 

The only difference was that her vision was blurred by drunkenness, whereas he was sober.

 

Ulrich wondered if she might sober up now. If she did, he was curious about how she would react.

 

Probably, her face would turn pale, and she would push him away in disgust, treating him like a germ, crawling away from him even if it meant crawling on all fours.

 

Watching her react like that, he thought it wouldn’t be bad to strip her skirt and immediately thrust into her. If he thrust deeply, spanking her buttocks while hitting her most sensitive spots, she would squirm and spill clear fluid like urine.

 

Her face and other features would turn as red as her heated hole from the thrusting, bringing out her most erotic side. This too seemed not a bad idea.

 

“I love you…”

 



 

“This too, this too is sincere…”

 

Her weak voice, which had been trailing off like a loose thread, was now quite clear.

 

Ulrich looked down at her innocent face, pouring out a heartfelt confession to the wrong person.

 

The kiss resumed urgently. This time, it was Ulrich who initiated it.

 

Lisbell, seemingly startled by his uncharacteristic boldness, soon sweetly accepted his intruding tongue like a piece of sugar.

 

Wet sounds leaked from the slightly parted and then rejoined lips. The mingling saliva loudly testified to how lustfully the two small pieces of flesh were rubbing against each other.

 

“Lift your hips.”

 

Ulrich, nibbling on her tongue, murmured as he pushed his arm towards her buttocks. Lisbell, exhaling roughly, cautiously complied with the command. While doing so, she carefully grasped his dark arm.

 

“Why, but, huh…?”

 



 

“Your way of speaking, uh, since a while ago…?”

 

Ulrich, who had been removing her lower garments with quiet efficiency, raised his eyebrows slightly.

 

“Way of speaking?”

 

“You don’t usually use formal speech… but you keep…”

 

It seemed she was caught on an irrelevant point. Even amidst this, her inability to sober up was indeed remarkable.

 

She had said before that she was quite weak to alcohol. The whiskey stocked in the villa was strong enough to make even heavy drinkers like him feel lightheaded, so it must have easily pushed her to the brink of unconsciousness.

 

As a result, even now, rubbing her lower abdomen obscenely, she accepted it without any resistance.

 

“Should I stop?”

 

Ulrich asked as he stroked her soft pubic hair hidden in her underwear.

 

Lisbell frowned slightly but soon returned to her dazed state.

 

“Yeah…”

 

“Why?”

 

“Because it keeps, keeps reminding me.”

 

“Reminding you of what?”

 

“Of someone I don’t like…”

 



 

“That man keeps…”

 

He couldn’t help but laugh in disbelief.

 

She had no idea that she was rubbing bodies with the very person she claimed to dislike, right before intercourse. If she knew, she wouldn’t be tangled up like this in the dim bedroom.

 

Suppressing a reflexive laugh, Ulrich whispered, “That’s too much.”

 

“…Yeah?”

 

“Then, if you don’t like it…”

 

Ulrich’s hand slowly withdrew from her lower body, where he had made room for entry. His elegantly outlined hand grabbed his own trousers. The act of unbuttoning in the dark was vivid enough to stir tension.

 

He licked his dry lips and left a brief kiss on the corner of Lisbell’s mouth.

 

“Then I’ll just thrust it in.”

 

His trousers were fully undone. With one gesture, he pulled out his stiff, engorged erect!on. The reddish, swollen head of his cock threatened as it bobbed against his firm abs.

 

As he grasped the blunt tip and rubbed it, pre-cum had already started to trickle down. From the moment she started her misguided declaration of love, he had been aching down there.

 

“Umm… ung.”

 

Suppressing the softly struggling Lisbell with his body, he pressed their lips together again. Every time he softly licked her alternating lips, her belly button trembled.

 

Ulrich spread her legs a bit more and removed her skirt and underwear, revealing her wet vulva. He pressed his cock against her smooth entrance and rubbed it.

 

“Haa…”

 

“Ugh… yeah… ah…”

 

Instead of immediately penetrating, he rubbed the soft entrance. As his veined surface stimulated her, Lisbell twisted her waist and moaned.

 

Ulrich grabbed her wriggling buttocks, deepening the intimate contact between their gen!talia. As he raised her arousal, her flesh softened, and she began to show moistness.

 

Meanwhile, his lips were not idle either. He persistently found and sucked her tongue that kept trying to hide, stealing her breath in an obscene manner.

 

Ulrich felt as if he was getting drunk himself.

 

The more he plunged his tongue into her mouth and stole her sticky breath and saliva, the more his rational mind was overlaid with hazy heat.

 

“Haa, haa.”

 

Moaning and writhing, Lisbell did not resist. She might truly believe tonight is her first night with her fiancé.

 

Ulrich chuckled darkly.

 

Knowing that he was about to take both her real and fake first night, he already pictured her reaction when she found out later.

 

Would she cry, get angry, feel desolate, or despair? The various possibilities were already a delightful plaything.

 

“Hoo…”

 

Even so, he sighed deeply.

 

The tantalizing play was reaching its limit.


After several sessions of !ntercourse, the opening widened without much resistance, despite the gentle pressure pushing in. It had only been pressed a few times between the tender flesh, but already his entire shaft was sticky with fluids.

 

Now it was time to thoroughly beat it with his arm, swollen to the size of a forearm.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

Startled, Lisbell grabbed the sheets tightly with both hands and squeezed her buttocks as Ulrich suddenly flipped her over.

 

Ulrich pulled her lower body closer, making it stick tightly. Then, he naturally took a position from behind, spreading her buttocks apart. He saw the wet hole below the tender flesh, sticking to his palm, glistening with moisture.

 

Before entering, he stretched it from side to side. Over time, the previously tight contraction had eased a bit, and the previously soft color had darkened slightly.

 

It was a satisfying change.

 

As he wondered if this would one day become stained like a mark he personally left, Ulrich thrust his wet center inside all at once.

 

“…Ah…!”

 

Despite being soaked, it was quite a struggle to push it all the way to the base.

 

Ulrich pushed deep into the tight inner walls with pure strength. The inner walls, forcibly opened, trembled with slight spasms.

 

Then, he adjusted to the rounded buttocks, thrusting rhythmically, causing the inside to tremble wildly.

 

“Ah, ah, ah…!”

 

Lisbell instinctively swayed her hips, rubbing her forehead against the sheet. It was uncharacteristic of her.

 

Perhaps she was mistaken in thinking that the one penetrating her was her fiancé, but being intoxicated itself was likely bringing unexpected exhilaration. Good sex even when sober can be enhanced with the addition of alcohol or drugs.

 

There was no need to make her turn her face this way to confirm. Not only her lewd appearance but the change in the inner flesh as it received him indicated that she was willing.

 

Today, after only a bit of initial resistance, the rhythmical piston movement was not difficult at all.

 

Her insides tightened perfectly, squeezing the flesh pleasingly with every thrust. Ulrich held her pale buttocks in both hands, fingers gripping tightly, and rapidly bounced his hips.

 

“Wait, just a moment…!”

 

The act was paused briefly.

 

Lisbell, gripping the sheet like a lifeline, reached back to hold Ulrich. Or rather, it was more of a pushing motion than a grasping one.

 

Ulrich stared blankly at the long, slender fingers resting on him. For a brief moment, he felt a violent impulse to break each finger that was hindering this rapid pleasure.

 

“I don’t like this, Theo…”

 

“You don’t like it?”

 

No way.

 

Ulrich, with a sneer, slammed his pen!s deep, making a loud noise, as if questioning how she could say she didn’t like it when she was greedily sucking it in. Lisbell flailed like a fish out of water.

 

“Ah! This position, I hate it! Please…!”

 

Ulrich’s powerful thrusts paused.

 

Even in this situation, Lisbell, unable to control her limbs due to the overwhelming pleasure, collapsed forward with a wet voice.

 

“It reminds me of him. I hate this position…”

 



 

“I don’t want to think of him while I’m with you…”

 



 

“So, please… please…”

 

In short, she was asking him to stop using the position that reminded her of intercourse with him, not to stop the sex altogether.

 

Ulrich, initially unresponsive, let out a quiet laugh.

 

With eyes that were hot yet cold, like ice within flames, he looked down at her thin back and flipped her over to a straight position, grabbing her knees.

 

Following her trembling body, the loosely tied necktie fluttered. He grabbed it, pulling her neck slightly towards him.

 

“Is this what you want?”

 

Without knowing who she was with, she was making demands like this.

 

Even as he thought this, Ulrich complied with Lisbell’s request. It was a small pleasure saved for later. For now, she only associated certain positions with him, but eventually, she would think of him regardless of the position, marking her deeply.

 

“Is this good?”

 

“Yes, ugh, ah…!”

 

“Do you like it, facing me like this?”

 

Resuming the rhythmic thrusts in the new position, Lisbell’s face flushed deeper red, moving aimlessly.

 

So stupid.

 

Despite his mocking thoughts, Ulrich felt an uncontrollable heat rising.

 

He grabbed her behind the knees, lifting her lower body and thrusting upwards. The thin, wet pubic hair stuck annoyingly to both her crotch and his groin, adding to the irritating sensation.

 

“Do you like it? Huh?”

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

“Answer, Lisbell.”

 

“Yes, I like it… Ah…!”

 

“Then say you love me again.”

 

“Uh, ah, ah…!”

 

“Say it again. Come on…”

 

Slowing his thrusts deliberately, he urged her. Lisbell clung to him more tightly, embracing him with her whole body.

 

Lightly kissing her nose and flushed cheeks, he prompted her again, and Lisbell, perhaps mistaking his tender manner for that of her fiancé, whimpered.

 

“I love you, Theo. I love you…”

 

Ulrich couldn’t suppress a laughter bubbling up from his core. He kissed her tongue, wrapping it around his own, then whispered softly in her ear.

 

“But I’m not Theo.”

 

“Uh…? Uh?”

 

“Do you still love me?”

 

Lisbell panted heavily. He increased his pace as soon as he threw out the unsettling question. Penetrating deeply into the wet hole, Lisbell clung to him, her body convulsing.

 

Even as she was overwhelmed by pleasure, her eyes darted upward, unable to ignore his strange words.

 

Ulrich covered her eyes with his hand and continued thrusting into the soft, concave spot inside. His heavy, tight scrotum was already pulling taut. Today’s sex was strangely enjoyable, and the urge to climax was approaching faster than usual.

 

“Theo… Theo…?”

 

“Yes, I’m here.”

 

“Theo… ugh, ah…!”

 

“I’m here, Lisbell…”

 

Giggling, he teased her with exaggerated affection.

 

Toying with her deliberately, he focused all his energy on thrusting, as if to completely dominate her. Holding her slender waist, he pushed her up strongly.

 

Lisbell felt it acutely every time he grazed towards her navel. She particularly enjoyed it when he targeted that area from behind.

 

“Ah, Theo! Theo!”

 

“Is it good with Theo, huh? Does your fiancé’s dick feel that different?”

 

Under normal circumstances, she would have felt something was off, but unfortunately, Lisbell was too far gone to notice. With her mind muddled by potent intoxication and the burning heat inside her, she couldn’t harbor any doubts and clung to him.

 

Through the blurry, swaying vision, she saw only darkness.

 

Whatever form it took, in her sorrow-stricken eyes after losing her fiancé, it was perceived only as Theodore returning to her.


“Theo, Theo, ah, just a little more… uh, ah, ah!”

 

The rapid and forceful invasion at the entrance quickened. Lisbell became like a nail being hammered, her body trembling as she curled inward. Ulrich persistently pushed into her and whispered in her ear.

 

“Can I do it inside?”

 

“Uh, huff, huh…? Ah! Ah…!”

 

“Lisbell, inside you… ha….”

 

“Huff, ah….”

 

“We’re going to get married anyway, right?”

 

He asked in a tone so gentle and desperate that Lisbell, caught off guard, nodded while clinging to his neck.

 

Ulrich’s smile, caught at the corners of his lips, darkened like a shadow in a shaded corner.

 

“You gave me permission.”

 

Ulrich, who held her ankles apart and aligned below, thrust passionately. Lisbell, unable to even swallow her saliva, rubbed the back of her head against the sheet, crying out.

 

The squelching sound continued between their hips.

 

The inside, which had loosened up, clung to the shaft as if pleading not to let go, then barely returned to its place, repeating this pattern. Each time the intense coupling that felt like it would pull her insides out continued, wet traces spurted everywhere.

 

“Ah, ah, aaah…! Uh-huh!”

 

Lost in the sensuality squeezing her entire body, Lisbell reached the pinnacle that struck her brain sharply. The woman’s piercing moans, which had been quite sharp, gradually faded and then died away.

 

Meanwhile, Ulrich wrapped the tie around her neck in his hand and pulled.

 

Kissing her deeply, he accelerated to the final speed.

 

Pressing firmly against her thigh, already marked by light abrasions from the constant contact, he forcefully thrust his glans up to her cervix.

 

“Hmm…!”

 

As the act subsided, Lisbell, unable to swallow her saliva, wandered the air with unfocused pupils, reaching another climax. Ulrich, watching her messy appearance, ejaculated.

 

As she had wished, his body shook with satisfaction, and Lisbell’s convulsions, nearly at the level of shivering, subsided. Her arms and legs also lost all strength.

 

Now, completely limp, she breathed softly, as if finally falling into a sleep she could not escape.

 

Her gray hair, disheveled, covered the side of her face. Watching this, Ulrich leaned forward. He finally took a mouthful of her fluttering hair, sucking it gently like he had with her lips earlier, then slowly let it go.

 

“Hmm.”

 

It wasn’t particularly tasty. The texture was what he enjoyed. Earlier, it had clung to his fingers, and now it clung to his tongue, the unfamiliar sensation feeling fresh. It seemed he could chew it playfully whenever he was bored.

 

But Ulrich thought of something else.

 

Letting go of the hair, his lips naturally moved to bite Lisbell’s lips.

 

Already asleep, her lips parted easily with the slightest touch. The willingness and innocence, still recognizing him as her fiancé, were both gratifying and annoying.

 

Suppressing a chuckle, he filled her mouth with his tongue. Biting her swollen lips until they puffed up, he slowly withdrew. Grabbing her limp legs, he hoisted them over his shoulder, realigning their connection.

 

The smell of alcohol lingering in the air was almost gone. Ulrich’s nerves, now fully alert, could only detect Lisbell’s body scent. Perhaps it was because of the hair he had just chewed.

 

Accepting it gladly, he adjusted his posture. He then carefully undressed her one by one.

 

He didn’t bother to remove the tie around her naked body.

 

Whenever he felt unsatisfied, he would pull and loosen the tie in his hand.

 

Even in her sleep, Lisbell occasionally coughed lightly, feeling the physical pressure. Each time, he would smile sweetly and quicken his pace a little more.

 



 

She had developed a habit of waking up, counting the hours of the night, not knowing when she had fallen asleep. It was always like this in the morning.

 

Lisbell, lying on her side, quietly rolled her half-open eyes.

 

When did I come back to this room?

 

As she wandered through these thoughts, fragmented memories floated to the surface. And when those memories finally turned into the image of Theodore crying with his head on her lap, Lisbell held her breath.

 



 

That’s right.

 

Yesterday, Lisbell had notified her fiancé of their breakup. It was truly a unilateral and disgraceful manner. After that, she had guarded her mother’s sickbed, unable to bear it any longer, and intended to return to her room. During this process, through the crack of an accidentally opened door….

 

Ah, alcohol.

 

She remembered coming back to this bedroom and drinking directly from the bottle without a glass. No wonder her head had been splitting with pain.

 

What’s this… a tie?

 

She noticed several things in succession. A tie draped over her completely naked body, and a man’s arm resting across her waist.

 

She became aware of the soft breathing against her back.

 

When did this man arrive?

 

There was no memory of Ulrich in the last scene she remembered. She had been drinking alone in this bed. Though she didn’t know what had happened, her entire body felt achy as if she had been tossed around.

 

Lisbell let out a small groan and twisted her body, only to freeze. Goosebumps ran up her stiffened back.

 

It’s still… inside.

 

As soon as she moved her lower body slightly, it felt sticky between her buttocks. Once conscious of it, the foreign sensation became overwhelmingly uncomfortable. The reason for the unusually tight position was clear. Ulrich’s penis was still inside her.

 

Revulsion and fear simultaneously washed over her. The thought that she might have been like this all night made her feel sick, and the physical strain of being spread out for so long scared her.

 

Lisbell bit her lip hard enough to draw blood and cautiously lifted her upper body. She slowly moved forward.

 

“Huff….”

 

Despite her efforts to stay silent, a faint moan escaped. The heavy flesh slid out slowly, laden with the foam that had built up overnight. The empty space inside her throbbed and ached from the prolonged friction. Dampness oozed out. Startled, Lisbell quickly wiped between her legs with her palm.

 



 

Her hand was smeared with a sticky liquid, resembling a mix of milk and oil. Lisbell stared down at the evidence, bewildered.

 

“Mm.”

 

Just then, the man beside her stirred, unknowingly draping his arm over his forehead. Ulrich, yawning and still half-asleep, opened his pale eyelashes.

 

He reached out to Lisbell, who was sitting there staring at her hand in disbelief, and lightly touched the long tie hanging diagonally down her body. She jolted awake and turned her head.

 

“Why… are you here?”

 

“Don’t you remember?”

 



 

“Of course not. You drank an entire bottle.”

 

He added that it was stronger than she had thought, then slowly sat up.

 

His eyes, usually docile, looked even more droopy with lingering sleepiness. He yawned again and ruffled his messy platinum hair. Lisbell, staring blankly at his face, spoke.

 

“Clearly….”

 

“Hmm?”

 

“Clearly, we agreed not to….”

 

Mentioning the contract clause prohibiting internal ejaculation, Ulrich, realizing the source of the traces, let out a lazy laugh.

 

Propping himself up with a cushion, he started to look for a cigarette, then remembered this was her bedroom and stopped.

 

“You gave me permission, Lisbell. You said I could do it inside.”

 



 

“Ah, you probably don’t remember that either.”

 

He removed the blanket covering his lower body and got out of bed. Stretching leisurely, he ignored the crumpled shirt and put on his pants. As he buckled up, he noticed her still staring at her palm helplessly and chuckled.

 

“And it doesn’t matter anymore, does it?”

 



 

“I saw yesterday that you’re completely done with Mr. Motier.”


Those words struck a nerve with Lisbell, who had been struggling to regain her composure. She lowered her hand, which she had been keeping suspended awkwardly, and wiped it on the blanket. Though the marks disappeared quickly, she still felt uneasy, as if something muddy was clinging to her.

 

Moreover, the inexplicable tie around her neck was another source of discomfort. It was definitely “his” tie. Lisbell was about to impatiently remove it when he spoke.

 

“Were you the one who wanted to break off the engagement first?”

 



 

“Or did you suggest it?”

 

“It’s unrelated to this.”

 



 

“I hope this kind of thing doesn’t happen again.”

 

“Why?”

 



 

“Afraid you might get pregnant?”

 

Lisbell refrained from answering and stood up. With a lingering hangover and the recent breakup with Theodore still fresh, she had no energy to deal with the man in front of her. She just wanted to rush into the bathroom and wash off her tainted body.

 

As Ulrich approached the curtained window, he spoke to her retreating back.

 

“Wash up and come down to the dining room. Let’s eat together.”

 

“…I’m not in the mood.”

 

“Come down anyway.”

 

“I said I’m not in the mood.”

 

“Do I seem like I’m making a suggestion?”

 

Lisbell bit her lip hard.

 

Walking along the window, he methodically drew back the curtains. The room, which had been dark the previous night, was now flooded with light. Despite the bright scene, Lisbell seemed about to collapse, while the man stood comfortably, basking in the morning sunlight, and spoke cheerfully.

 

“I have something to tell you.”

 

“Then tell me here….”

 

“While we eat. Lisbell, you’ll feel worse if you stay on an empty stomach after drinking so much last night. You need to eat something.”

 

She knew well enough that his occasional kindness was just a facade. Lisbell no longer fell for it.

 



 

“If you really don’t want to… I’ll just have to visit that bedroom where your mother is lying down. You’re always there, after all.”

 

Lisbell’s face hardened with rejection. Smiling flawlessly, Ulrich picked up the tie from the bed. Only after clutching it did he leave the room as if his business was finished.

 

Lisbell immediately headed to the bathroom and turned on the faucet. The water cascaded over her body, washing every corner.

 

But she didn’t feel cleansed. Instead, she felt more suffocated. Standing under the hot water until her skin was thoroughly warmed, she finally stepped out after a long while.

 

After washing, she checked the clock on the table.

 

Her headache persisted, and her stomach felt uneasy. She wanted nothing more than to collapse onto the bed and sleep. But she couldn’t do that without knowing what he meant by having something to say.

 

If it concerned her mother, avoiding it was pointless. Besides, he said he’d come to her mother’s bedroom if she didn’t go….

 

Suppressing a groan, Lisbell rummaged through the closet.

 

Half of it was filled with thin slips Ulrich had his secretary stock without her consent. Pushing them aside disdainfully, she selected a clean outfit. It was just her usual neat blouse and a long flare skirt that covered her legs.

 

She considered tying her damp hair, but feeling too lazy, she left the bedroom.

 

As she entered the dining room, the rich aroma of warm soup filled the air. Ulrich approached and set a pre-served bowl of soup before her as she sat down.

 

He too seemed to have washed, with his hair slightly damp, and wore a light gown suitable for indoors. Lisbell glanced at the steaming soup, then watched him pick up his fork.

 

“What is it you need to say?”

 

“Just eat first.”

 

“Tell me, and I’ll eat.”

 

“Do I need to feed you directly?”

 



 

“Are you a baby?”

 

Annoyed by his words, Lisbell picked up the spoon. She didn’t want to give in, but his taunts were grating. If she kept resisting, he might really grab her and force the hot soup into her mouth.

 

The mere thought exhausted her, so she reluctantly took a spoonful of the soup. It was fortunately palatable. She’d noted before how surprisingly good the food was, considering it was for someone like him.

 

“I need to visit the capital in a few days.”

 

He finally got to the point as she started eating. Lisbell’s hand paused. She looked up quickly. Ulrich met her unexpected gaze as he lit a cigarette.

 

“I have an unmissable appointment.”

 



 

“Your mother’s treatment will continue as usual. Nothing will change except my absence. But I thought you should know.”

 

“When will you be back?”

 

“Why are you curious?”

 



 

“Planning to run away?”

 

Lisbell’s grip on the spoon tightened. Her gaze dropped.

 

“How could I run away?”

 



 

“Mother hasn’t regained consciousness.”

 

“If you really wanted to, you could.”

 



 

“Though, I suppose there’s no need to try so hard now. You’re completely done with Mr. Motier.”

 

The soup that had been manageable moments ago now felt nauseating. Every time Ulrich intentionally brought up Theodore, it made her feel sick. It was like her Achilles’ heel was being cruelly exposed.

 

“Is that all you needed to say?”

 

She put down the spoon with a clatter and stood up, only to be yanked back into the chair by her arm. The grip was so strong it hurt, and Lisbell frowned in pain.

 

“Do you really not remember anything from last night?”

 

“…Ugh.”

 

“You melted my heart completely.”

 

Seeing Lisbell’s pained face, he slowly released her arm and gently rubbed the spot. As he exhaled cigarette smoke, he murmured.

 

“Did you know you told me you loved me last night?”

 

Lisbell’s eyes widened in disbelief.

 

“You said it several times.”

 



 

“Several times….”

 

His lazy voice spread through the smoke, as if savoring the memory.

 

Lisbell realized his malicious intent to force her to recall a night she didn’t want to remember, which she couldn’t recall anyway.

 

“…Didn’t you learn that taking advantage of a drunk person is unworthy of a gentleman?”

 

Ulrich’s eyes slowly returned to her. His gaze, intense and fiery, couldn’t be ignored. Lisbell instinctively drew her knees together.

 

“You grabbed me first.”

 



 

“You clung to me, crying and begging me not to leave.”

 



 

“Ah, didn’t I mention? I’m weak against your crying face.”

 

Both possibilities existed.

 

He could be lying to mess with her, or she could have really clung to him in her drunken state. If only her memory were clear, she would know instantly, but the events of last night were a blank. The more she tried to recall, the worse her headache got. It was a severe hangover.

 

“Even if I did… You should have ignored it as drunken behavior.”

 

“You kissed me first, you know. Don’t you remember?”

 

“You should have just left me alone and walked out.”

 

“You kissed me several times. You even used your tongue first.”

 



 

“Hugging my neck… begging me not to leave while wrapping your legs around my waist.”

 

She couldn’t listen any longer.

 

“I didn’t think it was you!” Lisbell gasped, her eyes filled with resentment.


Even if what he said was true, nothing would change.

 

It was probably because she was drunk and mistook him for Theodore that she acted so disgracefully.

 

Last night, the man who pretended to be her fiancé in the cover of pitch-black darkness was none other than Ulrich Altahart. Now, just the thought of him made her feel repulsed, someone she could never have good feelings for. No matter what, that wouldn’t change.

 

“If it were you.”

 



 

“If I knew it was you, I never would have….”

 

She wouldn’t have done it.

 

The words choked with sobs were swallowed down and never came out.

 

It was truly a cursed night.

 

No matter how hard she tried to ignore it, her constant recollections of last night kept making her think of Theodore.

 

After telling him the lie that she no longer loved him and announcing the breakup, she couldn’t console him as he cried on her lap, cowardly standing by as he wept. She just sat there, watching as he completely left, feeling like she was hanging herself in this prison-like villa.

 

It was a sort of torture, constantly being reminded that the future she had tried so hard to protect was shattered to pieces.

 

Lisbell wiped away the tears running down her cheeks. From the other side, she heard the sound of someone clicking their tongue.

 

“Change your mind a little.”

 



 

“Now that you no longer have a fiancé to feel guilty about, you don’t need to be so distressed. Last night, Lisbell, you felt good enough holding onto me. Honestly, it felt good, didn’t it? You cried and climaxed so many times with me….”

 



 

“If your fiancé is gone, shouldn’t you be able to enjoy yourself a bit more?”

 

Lisbell felt dizzy.

 

His words were really hard to understand. Did he think that the reason she found this relationship difficult was simply because of guilt towards her fiancé?

 

Close, but not entirely correct.

 

Ulrich viewed relationships between people too simplistically and superficially. He didn’t consider the inner depths, only the external factors, defining cause and effect based on that alone.

 

Lisbell realized this after a moment.

 

“You…”

 

Her voice was dry and sounded like metal.

 

She looked out the window. The sky, which had been clear for several days, seemed a bit dimmer. The green leaves on the branches were slightly discolored at the edges.

 

Late summer was ending.

 

It was a sign that cool autumn was coming.

 

“You’ve never loved anyone, have you?”

 



 

“That’s why you can say things like that….”

 

There was a time when she hoped that everything might end after summer passed. Standing in front of the autumn that had finally arrived, she realized how futile that hope was.

 

Her mother was still the same, and the future she dreamed of with Theodore had completely crumbled.

 

So, what was she doing here now?

 

“Love?”

 

Ulrich stood up.

 

He grabbed Lisbell’s arm, who was staring off into the distance. Her slender body was forcibly pulled up and pushed onto the dining table. Ulrich pushed away the soup bowl that was barely touched. The sound of the chair falling and the bowl shattering on the floor mixed together messily. Her hearing seemed to fail her as everything crumbled.

 

“Why bother with something so childish and tiring?”

 

Ulrich flipped her flare skirt up. Feeling her underwear being pulled down to her ankles in an instant, Lisbell bit her lip. Her buttocks, bruised from his grasp last night, were spread apart.

 

“Like this.”

 

He undid the cord roughly tied around his waist and pulled out his erect!on, rubbing it against Lisbell’s dry vulva.

 

The foreplay was short. As if to vent his displeasure, he thrust into her dry vag!na.

 

“…Ah…!”

 

“There’s a hole you can spread whenever you want… ha, anyway.”

 

A deep breath escaped his lips. Lisbell tightened her lower abdomen. Despite feeling a distinctly different pressure from last night, Ulrich persistently moved his hips.

 

“Ah, ah, uh…. “

 

From the woman underneath him came dry moans, different from the sweet ones of the night before.

 

Even so, once a body was accustomed to pleasure, it couldn’t easily forget that overwhelming sensation. As he scraped inside her with his engorged shaft, her inner walls reluctantly released moisture reflexively.

 

Ulrich continued his increasingly slick thrusts, raising his eyes.

 

Her hair, not tied up, covered her face again. He brushed it away, tucking it behind her ear. Her delicate profile was revealed. Ulrich stared intensely at her vacant, purple eyes and thrusted deeply, smiling lazily.

 

“Ah, as I thought.”

 

“Ugh, ah…”

 

“You’re the prettiest when you cry and moan absentmindedly.”

 

Lisbell gripped the tablecloth tightly.

 

His words, meant to shatter her pride, made her feel resigned rather than angry. Reality still coldly surrounded her. No matter what feelings she had towards this man, she couldn’t escape this situation.

 

Even if one side’s love was broken, as long as the other side’s love remained….

 

Unless she found a perfect way to take her mother out of his grasp, there was no other choice.

 

With every passionate thrust from behind, her vision shook. It felt like she was being plunged to the bottom of the sea. Perhaps it was the pressure on her chest making it hard to breathe.

 

Lisbell, staring weakly to the side, slowly closed her eyes.

 

What am I….

 

So, what am I doing now….

 



 

The boulevard decorating the Laurent Square in the capital was already painted with the reds and yellows of autumn.

 

The ballroom of the Alstard Hotel, adorned with fragrant osmanthus and autumn roses, exuded meticulous opulence befitting an event hosted by the Altahart family. On closer inspection, it was dazzlingly luxurious, but the overall picture blended together naturally. Their display of luxury was so elaborate.

 

Many eyes were on the man standing in the center of the ballroom like a painting.

 

When he gave a smooth speech from the podium, there was at least a pretext to openly watch, but now, glances quickly turned away, fearful of being caught. The excitement in their eyes was clear, a pure curiosity towards the exceedingly handsome man.

 

“Well, who do we have here!”

 

Someone approached the man with a champagne glass. In a party like this, the military uniform naturally drew attention.

 

“Our little treasure of Altahart!”

 

Ulrich managed a slight smile, thinking how unbecoming the nickname was for someone of his age.

 

“Colonel Craxson, you made it.”

 

“Haha. These days, seeing your face is as hard as plucking a star from the sky. Only at events like these do I get to see this expensive face.”

 

The world was changing rapidly. At the end, even the once seemingly eternal authority of the nobility was fading like a setting sun.

 

Titles of nobility were no longer prestigious accomplishments. More and more areas were emphasizing visible financial power over such intangible authority.

 

Amidst the increasingly sharp conflict between the monarchy and parliament surrounding the state, the Altahart family maintained close ties with military units capable of mobilizing force, acting as a centrist power.

 

Strength, as unchanging in value as money.

 

Of course, it wasn’t just for political advantage. The more eyes on them, the more restricted their actions. For personal matters requiring manpower, it was much less conspicuous to use the Colonel’s name than that of Altahart. It was a friendship maintained for such purposes.

 

“I’ve been busy with various matters. Just last month, I sent a gift to you through my secretary. I hope you received it safely.”

 

“Oh, of course. I got it, and it was a big hit with my unit.”

 

“It was just a small gift.”

 

“Small gift? Come on, you should know when to be modest.”

 

Colonel Craxson’s eyes, slightly bloodshot from burst capillaries, were a common side effect among drug users. Standing before a soon-to-be addict, Ulrich smiled leisurely.

 

Having tried various substances himself, Ulrich had lost interest as he wasn’t fond of the hazy state induced by drugs. Still, many covertly brought him illicit substances as tribute.

 

He saw great returns from re-gifting these as bribes. What he gave to Colonel Craxson was an aphrodisiac that doubled its effect when taken with alcohol. The Colonel’s vacant eyes indicated he had spent the night indulging in drugs, alcohol, and women.



“By the way, it seems your proud brother is absent today.”

 

Ulrich was still smiling, but his smile had slightly faded.

 

“Oh, you were looking for Gwen, I see. Unfortunately, he has a separate engagement today.”

 

“Is that so? It’s been hard to see Gwen these days. In the past, we would at least bump into each other at the White Club, but even that’s rare now. With both brothers so busy, your family must be thriving. Isn’t that right?”

 

Colonel Craxson laughed heartily and patted Ulrich’s shoulder. Ulrich responded with a pleasant smile. Shortly afterward, hearing someone calling from the other side, Colonel Craxson bid farewell and walked away.

 

“Did you have a good conversation?”

 

Victor, who had been anxious since the Colonel’s arrival, quickly approached and asked.

 

“Listening to a drug addict’s ramblings is pointless.”

 

“Someone might hear you.”

 

“All he does is shoot blindly, he must be out of his mind. Otherwise, he wouldn’t say such nonsense about being proud of Gwen.”

 

No wonder he was so edgy; just as feared, Colonel Craxson had brought up Gwen.

 

“…You held yourself well.”

 

“The guests?”

 

“All those who received invitations have confirmed their attendance.”

 

“Is there anyone left I need to greet personally?”

 

“There is one person… Ah, here she comes.”

 

Ulrich turned towards where Victor was pointing.

 

A woman with elegant brown hair, half pinned with jeweled accessories, wearing an emerald chiffon dress, approached with the sound of clicking heels. Realizing the two knew each other, Victor quietly stepped back.

 

“Ulrich.”

 

Her voice was as graceful as a wild rose.

 

Ulrich lifted the gloved hand of the woman and kissed it. Among the ladies watching, exclamations of “Oh my!” were heard. The beauty of the approaching woman was extraordinary, and the two of them together looked like a piece of art.

 

As he lowered the hand he had been holding, Ulrich began to speak.

 

“I’m pleased you accepted the invitation, Lady Schwaben. Or should I call you Director Schwaben now?”

 

“You can still call me Daphne, as before.”

 

“I can’t do that. You’ve become the owner of the most famous art gallery in Laurent.”

 

“Are you drawing a line?”

 



 

“Don’t do that. I’ve called you Ulrich for a long time.”

 

Her eyes, asking prettily, were as moist as a deer’s. Ulrich looked down at her face, standing straight. Then Daphne took a step closer, clicking her heels.

 

“Is it because there are eyes watching us? Shall we go to a quiet place where no one is around?”

 

Ulrich’s eyebrows twitched slightly. Daphne’s clear and transparent eyes reflected that distinctly. A subtle tension, imperceptible to others, surrounded the two. Soon, Ulrich smiled meaningfully, as if to crush that atmosphere.

 

“A quiet place.”

 



 

“Why does it sound to me like you’re suggesting we do something naughty rather than have a conversation away from prying eyes?”

 

It was an unusually direct statement for the occasion. More surprising was Daphne’s reaction, blushing deeply as if shy. She was an unusual woman, now and then. He couldn’t deny that her unconventionality had once intrigued him.

 

He dismissed the fleeting past with a chuckle.

 

“Well, maybe in the past, but now it doesn’t seem appropriate.”

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“I mean our relationship.”

 

Ulrich leaned toward her slowly.

 

“You’re soon to be my brother’s wife.”

 



 

“Making a sister-in-law a secret mistress is a bit…”

 

Disgusting, isn’t it?

 

His voice was irresistibly seductive, meant only for her ears. As if to emphasize his point, Ulrich’s lips curved beautifully. It was the truth for him, but it was an offensive remark for her, touching on both her promiscuous past and her current respectable life.

 

Unexpectedly, Daphne let out a small laugh.

 

Ulrich maintained a smile, though his eyes showed a slight frown. His feelings mirrored this expression; he was put off by the unclear meaning of her laugh.

 

“It seems… the rumors about you being away from the capital for a while were true.”

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“If not, you would know better than I do.”

 

“I think you’ve had too much to drink.”

 

He smoothly wrapped a retort in polite language, and Daphne laughed, seemingly on purpose. Her inscrutable laughter subtly annoyed him.

 

“Today, I just came to greet you out of joy.”

 



 

“We’ll meet again soon, so let’s talk in detail then, Ulrich.”

 

“Yes, if you have any business, please make an appointment through my secretary.”

 

Even this clear statement that there would be no personal meetings didn’t dampen Daphne’s gentle smile as she left. Ulrich watched her departing figure, then signaled Victor, who was waiting nearby.

 

“I didn’t put that woman on the invitation list. Why is she here?”

 

“Well, actually… Madam Altahart reviewed the list later and added her.”

 

“My mother?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Hmm, Ulrich let out a significant hum.

 

“I can’t figure out the signal. Is it to make sure things are sorted out before my brother’s marriage?”

 

Daphne Schwaben.

 

Currently engaged to Gwen Altahart due to family alliances, she had once shared a bed with Ulrich. It wasn’t a relationship with heartfelt emotions but more of a mutually agreeable physical connection.

 

“If that’s the case, they’re sorely mistaken. It’s been sorted out long ago.”

 

That was the truth. Their time together was in the past. Enough time had passed for Daphne to be regarded as nothing more than a faded memory to Ulrich.

 

She had never held much significance to him anyway, but now, there was absolutely nothing left of their past connection.

 

Daphne had been one of the few who stayed by Ulrich’s side for quite some time among his past lovers. As someone who met him privately, she never overstepped her bounds publicly. She had a passable appearance and could nonchalantly handle his occasional harsh words.

 

Not because she was mature and broad-minded, but because her mind was inherently innocent, he concluded. It became evident while observing her.

 

Such traits didn’t often become a problem but occasionally amused Ulrich. Of course, he soon grew tired and unilaterally cut ties.

 

Afterward, she reappeared a year later as his brother’s fiancée.

 

“Can I leave now? They seem to be having a good time without me.”

 

Having attended the first part, including the owner’s speech, and staying through the second and third parts, considered the after-party, he had fulfilled his duties.

 

Victor nodded, and Ulrich set down the decorative glass he had been holding and sighed. Flashing a mesmerizing smile at anyone who met his eyes, he left the hall naturally.

 

Outside the banquet hall, he loosened the tight tie around his neck. The brooch pinned near the knot was bothersome.

 

He always had to dress meticulously for official events, down to the smallest detail, which was annoying. He never liked ties, but the one Lisbell gave him was nice because it lacked such cumbersome accessories.

 

It was smooth from the knot to the broad end, with nothing catching on his fingers, which he found refreshing. He developed a new habit of repeatedly smoothing it down when deep in thought, often wearing it at the Marnia villa.

 

Also, he found it amusing to see Lisbell shiver quietly whenever she saw it.


“Is that all?”

 

Despite knowing she could never escape, she still approached everything with intensity and desperation, which Ulrich found appealing.

 

To be honest, Ulrich had assumed that on the day Lisbell signed the contract with him, she would break off her engagement.

 

But she didn’t.

 

Until the day her fiancé visited the Marnia estate, Lisbell continued her hopeless relationship. That was her hope, as Ulrich saw in her beautiful face stained with drunken tears.

 

Even though it seemed she had given up, there was a subtle yet persistent desperation that kept her alive. How could that not pique his interest?

 

That’s why she crossed his mind even more in the capital.

 

People born into wealth, like him, who had never experienced true hardship, didn’t understand such intensity and desperation. For them, boasting and showing off was the sole purpose and pleasure in life.

 

Oddly enough, it was hard to feel any elegance from them. They seemed more vulgar and shameless. He was no exception; the entire Altahart family was like that. Their refined exteriors were just a facade, hiding dens of beasts filled with sordid desires.

 

Elegance.

 

Ironically, Ulrich felt it more in Lisbell, who tried her best in life. How could her earnest desire to live to the fullest not be considered noble?

 

Maybe he felt this way because he lacked it himself. She lived her life more meaningfully than he did, who found life so tedious that he wished to die soon.

 

In another sense, he wanted to delve deeper into her.

 

Why did she strive so hard to endure?

 

Everything ends in death anyway.

 

She would become like dust in the wind, ceasing to exist in this world….

 

Life is fleeting, yet Lisbell seemed to hold onto something that made her refuse to give up. This instinctive curiosity welled up within him, making him reflect on the roots of his own life.

 

He wondered what she would do if he severed all those lights she clung to and if he would feel any different from his current pessimistic self if he, too, found such light.

 

In any case, Lisbell was undoubtedly the greatest stimulant in his life right now.

 

He had planned to return to Marnia as soon as his schedule allowed, but the thought of the delicate scent that clung to him made him want to leave immediately. He wished the ground beneath his feet would change from the paved roads of the capital to Marnia’s lush lawns, not the marble reflecting the chandeliers of a luxury hotel.

 

Walking quickly but still composed, he headed for the quiet rear entrance of the hotel.

 



 

He was straightening his loosened tie when he noticed a sedan parked at the wide staircase below. The familiar face of the man standing courteously before the back seat caught his eye. Upon making eye contact, the man bowed respectfully.

 

“Madam Altahart sent me.”

 

It was his mother’s personal secretary.

 

“Oh dear.”

 

Ulrich muttered. It was a sigh of someone facing the inevitable.

 

He had hoped to leave quietly, but that seemed impossible.

 

Indeed, it was a bit surprising.

 

He hadn’t expected that his mother, let alone his brother Gwen, would attend an event that had already been communicated through Victor. It seemed they had retreated for a quiet meeting later.

 

Ignoring it would be an option, but if a summons from the family followed, it would complicate things. With a sigh, Ulrich obediently got into the back seat the secretary had opened for him.

 

The car glided smoothly along the central road.

 

The scenery of the capital hadn’t changed much. The glittering points of light that could hurt the eyes were still the same. Propping his chin, Ulrich surveyed the landscape before succumbing to fatigue and closing his eyes.

 

Soon, the sedan turned into a townhouse complex.

 

Passing by rows of grand houses, the car entered a massive estate even among the exclusive area.

 

Like an enlarged garden in Marnia, the expansive garden encircled a central fountain. The sedan came to a halt before a mansion boasting classic architectural style and vast grounds.

 

“We’ve arrived.”

 

With the driver’s announcement, the door opened.

 

Stepping out, Ulrich straightened his back, noting the staff lined up on either side, bowing deeply.

 

Despite so many visible heads, it was eerily silent, always a curious phenomenon. As Ulrich leisurely surveyed those waiting in hushed anticipation, he noticed the elderly butler approaching.

 

With a seemingly longer mustache, the butler greeted him courteously.

 

“Young Master, it’s been a while. Have you been well?”

 

“Considering I feel nauseous the moment I step in here, I suppose so.”

 

“That’s fortunate to hear. Madam is waiting for you. Please come in.”

 

Ignoring Ulrich’s sarcastic remark, the butler led the way. Unexpectedly interrupted on his way home, Ulrich checked his pocket watch. Leaving the reception early had given him some extra time.

 

Yet, in this house, you never knew when or where variables would arise. The topic his mother summoned him for would determine the extent of those variables.

 

“Oh my.”

 

As Ulrich entered the living room, a fond sigh greeted him.

 

He looked up to see his mother sitting regally on a single-seat sofa. A red-haired handsome man stood behind her. He was new.

 

“So, my hard-to-see son has finally arrived.”

 

“Glad to confirm I’m alive.”

 

Responding indifferently, Ulrich took a seat on the prepared sofa.

 

As he crossed his legs, a servant approached and listed the available beverages. Ulrich asked for a glass of iced soda. He was in a hurry, so he declined hot tea or coffee.

 

“Really, it’s heartbreaking…. How could you leave without a word? If Victor hadn’t been passing messages, I wouldn’t have known what to do.”

 

Acting as if deeply wounded by her son’s indifferent attitude, Lady Altahart clutched her chest. Ulrich chuckled at the sight.

 

“Your acting has improved.”

 

He leisurely added after quenching his thirst with the quickly served soda.

 

“What play inspired you this time?”

 

Both Ulrich and his brother Gwen knew well—his mother was the most eccentric person in this household.

 

She had a knack for changing faces, not in the surgical sense but in personality, as if another soul temporarily possessed her.

 

She had always loved theater, finding immense joy in observing others’ lives. “Tragedy up close, comedy from afar,” was a phrase she lived by.

 

Her husband’s death had let her whims bloom fully.



The beginning of it all was when the most popular male actor of the theater troupe came to the Altahart estate. At the time, I thought it was just because his charming appearance had caught her eye and she wanted to have some fun for a night.

 

But that wasn’t all.

 

The lady would take them as her lovers and then act as if she were the heroine of the play they starred in. She would fit herself into the role of their partner, living life as if she were that character. It was the essence of vicarious experience.

 

Those related to her realized this when the first male actor was quietly dismissed from his position as her lover, and a second actor was chosen to replace him.

 

When she was with them, her personality subtly changed. Since the heroines in the plays these actors starred in were different, she changed her face accordingly.

 

It was a bizarre act, but with enough money, nothing was impossible. And the lady had more than enough money to keep her secret dream alive.

 

Actors who caught her eye and served her received enormous sponsorship on a monthly basis. Furthermore, just the name Altahart was a powerful enough backing to ensure they wouldn’t be easily dismissed from leading roles. Their treatment within the troupe improved to almost that of the troupe leader.

 

Also, the lady had been a celebrated beauty in society. For a stunning woman like her, just a bit of flattery would make the money flow. It was a position many would volunteer for without hesitation.

 

To Ulrich, it seemed that his mother was currently absorbed in her own performance. The exaggerated act of dabbing at nonexistent tears with her long sleeves was an indication of that.

 

The “current” lover, standing by her side, comforted her, his touch subtly suggestive, befitting his role as a physical consort.

 

“So, what do you want from me?”

 

“Have you eaten?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“That’s a pity. I thought we could have a nice meal together after a long time.”

 

“Do that with my brother.”

 

“That’s difficult, which is why I’m asking you.”

 

Ulrich paused his idle sipping of sparkling water.

 

“What do you mean, difficult?”

 

“Gwen has collapsed.”

 

This was unexpected news.

 

Ulrich set down the glass he had been twirling.

 

“Suddenly?”

 

“Yes, it was a sudden blow.”

 

“Is there a problem?”

 

The lady sighed.

 

Her expression darkened slightly, revealing glimpses of her unmasked face.

 

“Syphilis, they say.”

 

“Syphilis?”

 

Ulrich let out a small laugh.

 

“That’s a sexually transmitted disease, isn’t it?”

 

Given Gwen’s promiscuous nature, it wasn’t entirely surprising.

 

“How is he?”

 

“Not good.”

 

“How bad?”

 

“Very.”

 

“Is he close to death?”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“Judging by your reluctance to answer, I guess he is.”

 

The lady confirmed with silence.

 

Ulrich, resting his chin on his hand, turned to look out the window.

 

Gwen’s death, huh.

 

It was he who always spoke of suicide, but now it was his brother whose life was in danger. Life was truly unpredictable. Has Gwen written a proper will? If not, perhaps he should subtly intervene now. As he pondered this, his mother spoke again.

 

“So, Ulrich.”

 

“Yes.”

 

“You need to get married.”

 

Ulrich couldn’t believe his ears. The sudden shift in topic left him momentarily stunned.

 

“You know that Gwen is engaged to the young lady of the Schwaben family.”

 



 

“I’ve only informed them of Gwen’s condition, but the Schwaben Marquis seems uneasy. There are reports that he’s been attending social gatherings he rarely went to since the engagement. We need to present an alternative before he gets any strange ideas.”

 

“Is that alternative me?”

 

“Your marriage was bound to proceed once Gwen got married.”

 



 

“With Gwen in this state, you, as the second son, must take over his succession duties. Handling your marriage simultaneously isn’t a bad idea.”

 

“Do you desire the Schwaben family’s gemstone mines that much?”

 

“I can’t deny it. The assessment my appraiser finally completed indicates that the undeveloped mines will bring in a fortune. It would be foolish to miss out on such wealth.”

 



 

“And the Altahart family cannot afford to be foolish. You understand that, don’t you?”

 

Her assertion, reminding him of the scrutiny on their family, was sharp. Feeling a sudden tension in his neck, Ulrich rubbed it and glanced at the ambiguous corner between the ceiling and the wall.

 

“We’ll meet again soon to discuss the details, Ulrich.”

 

Now, he understood what Daphne meant at the hotel reception party.

 

“So, that’s why…”

 

Thinking of her made his head throb more. His past interest in her had faded, leaving only a weary residue.

 

Still, her carefree simplicity, which he had once found endearing, would now become an irritating thorn. Just anticipating the effort of dealing with her was exhausting, indicating that he had no affection left for her.

 

Yes, it was really bothersome.

 

There was someone else Ulrich wanted to observe 24/7, tied up right in front of him. So why this talk of Schwaben?

 

His lips curled with a crooked smile.

 

“What a shame. I’m already married.”

 

“…What?”

 

“And I have children.”

 

“This is nonsense.”

 

“I have three.”

 

“…Ulrich. What are you talking about?”

 

His mother’s stunned expression quickly regained composure.

 

“You’ve been in Marnia for less than a year. How could you have three children in that time?”

 

She saw through his nonsensical statements as a desperate attempt to avoid the arranged marriage.

 

“That’s a bias, Mother. They could be triplets.”

 

“If nothing else, I know my beloved son is speaking nonsense.”

 



 

“Now, stop this protest and come back to the capital.”

 

“To prepare for a marriage, right?”

 

“That’s not all. As I said, you need to take over the succession duties Gwen was supposed to handle, and time is running out.”

 



 

“You went to Marnia because Gwen refused to hand over the department store management rights. That problem is essentially resolved now, so I don’t see why you need to stay there.”

 

Her gaze was sharp like a well-honed blade. Despite appearing as a whimsical lady lost in her role-playing, she was undoubtedly the head of the Altahart family.

 

They didn’t hesitate to suppress emotions for the sake of the family and wealth. While the sadness over Gwen’s critical condition was not insignificant, maintaining the family’s position was more important. They prioritized ensuring that the family machinery continued to run smoothly over the death of a member.

 

Her stern and dry demeanor in using Gwen’s condition to bring Ulrich back to the capital was a testament to this duty.

 

It might seem cold, but that was how the Altahart family had amassed and maintained their wealth for generations.

 

They took what they wanted with relentless determination and discarded what they didn’t need without hesitation.

 

Ulrich, listening to his mother’s complaints, excused himself, using the bathroom as an excuse. Victor was waiting outside. As he walked past, Victor quickly followed.

 

“Should I have the car ready?”

 

“Before that, I should see my dying brother’s face.”

 

Ulrich’s calm tone made Victor look ashamed.

 

“I apologize for not informing you earlier.”

 

“When did you find out?”

 

“Just last week. The lady was very secretive about this.”

 

“Understandably so.”

 

Ulrich didn’t question further and walked quietly.

 

Navigating the long and complicated corridors without getting lost, he eventually stopped in front of a bedroom.



Knock Knock

 

When he knocked, a businesslike voice from inside asked for his identity. Instead of answering, he flung the door open. His mother’s trusted aide looked startled by the rude intrusion but quickly stepped back when he recognized it was Ulrich.

 

With the obstacle gone, Ulrich walked inside.

 



 

Reaching the bed, he crossed his arms and looked down at it askew.

 

On the bed, bathed in the soft afternoon sunlight, lay Gwen, who was said to be at death’s door. Just as the report had said, his once sturdy frame was severely deteriorated. He seemed to have lost a lot of weight, and his complexion was so pale it was unbearable to look at. It was as if he was showing the slow process of how a human being approaches death.

 

“Syphilis, huh?”

 

Of all the diseases, it had to be that one. It was a headache-inducing revelation. Unless even the god he worshipped was fed up with his merry romps and there was no other explanation for such bad luck, it was almost comically fitting for him.

 

In a way, it was a very appropriate end for him.

 

What goes around comes around, after all.

 

All he’d ever done in life was gamble away all his money at the White Club, where he had people preemptively bribe others to rig games, or take various drugs while indulging with prostitutes in his bedroom. Therefore, it was only fitting that his downfall would be so disgraceful.

 

“I wonder if, next time I see you, you’ll be lying in a coffin instead of a bed.”

 



 

“Before that, I must make sure to get your signed resignation from managing the department store.”

 

In their family, the mention of money could wake anyone from their sleep. It wouldn’t be a bad idea to secure everything firmly in case he miraculously returned from the grave. It was a pragmatic conversation to have in front of a dying brother, but there was no other choice. After all, Ulrich himself was also an Altahart.

 

He leaned forward. A long shadow cast over Gwen’s body lying under the blanket.

 

“It might have been your last wish, but you certainly managed to hold me back.”

 



 

“I hadn’t planned to come back to the capital just yet….”

 

Ulrich muttered ominously to his unconscious brother and then sensed someone’s presence, turning his head.

 

The door connecting to a small room inside the bedroom was open. A child was standing behind the door, peeking in.

 

Ulrich immediately recognized the child as his brother’s illegitimate son.

 

As their eyes met, the child’s shoulders shot up in surprise. He was so startled that they didn’t settle back down for a long while.

 

Ulrich straightened up from leaning over Gwen. The shadow that had stretched menacingly over his brother also retreated.

 

The child pursed his lips as if he might burst into tears. Sensing the child’s anxiety, Ulrich uncrossed his arms and walked towards the door.

 

He stopped just a step away from the child and bent his knees to meet the child’s eye level.

 

“Honestly.”

 

Ulrich slowly extended his hand.

 

He gently patted the platinum-blond hair that was so similar to his own and Gwen’s. The child flinched at the sudden touch but gradually relaxed, feeling no threat in the hand’s movement.

 

“You really make things difficult for everyone….”

 

The child’s innocent eyes darted around, unable to find focus. Watching the child’s genuine confusion, Ulrich murmured quietly,

 

“Irresponsible Gwen Altahart.”

 

After patting the child’s head a few more times, Ulrich left the bedroom.

 

Victor, waiting outside, informed him that the car was ready. Ulrich headed straight for the exit. He briefly told a servant following him that he had urgent business and then got into the car, taking out his pocket watch.

 

Even if they drove nonstop from now on, they would only reach Marnia after dark.

 

His fingers tapped the side of the pocket watch as if measuring something. It was a close call. Somehow, the inside of his heart thumped. It had been a while since he felt this kind of thrill.

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes, sir.”

 

“Find out if there are any long-term hospital rooms available at the Royal Capital Hospital.”

 

“Hospital rooms, sir?”

 

“Yes,” Ulrich replied, turning his gaze out the window.

 

As he looked at his brother lying there, rotting like a corpse, what surprisingly came to his mind was a complete stranger. It was the villa in Marnia where he had spent a few months; someone else was bedridden there in a similar condition to his brother.

 

And he kept thinking of the small nape of someone who stayed by that bed no matter the rain or snow. The nape with hair that used to be well-groomed but now often left unkempt as if they had given up on caring for themselves.

 

“Have you… ever loved anyone?”

 

The violet eyes that looked at him.

 

Ulrich quietly smiled, gazing indifferently out the window.

 

Love.

 

He occasionally saw people in love.

 

Sometimes he heard about it through rumors, and sometimes he witnessed it with his own eyes.

 

Despite their different forms and stories, they all had one fatal commonality.

 

They were all out of their minds.

 

People in love often did crazy things.

 

It was as if that absurdly childish and crude emotion grabbed the person’s brain and shook it wildly.

 

Ulrich hated such things.

 

It was nothing but disgraceful and pathetic.

 

Whenever he saw those who voluntarily jumped into the fire under the guise of such illogical emotions, all he felt was cold contempt that made his entire body freeze.

 

Naturally, acceptance and understanding were out of the question.

 

Above all, that emotion was too fragile.

 

For an Altahart, who had to deal with people all their life, it was an unnecessary attitude and condition. Being in love meant having a weakness. Letting someone else hold your heart was an incredibly dangerous thing.

 

You didn’t have to look far.

 

Just look at Lisbell Osborne.

 

Because she loved her mother and her fiancé, she was constantly pushed around. Her pitiful and wretched state was the result of her love, which she talked about so much.

 

Ulrich had no desire to end up like that.

 

That’s why he openly laughed at Lisbell’s assertion that he had never been in love. There was nothing to offer but a contemptuous smirk to someone who bragged about something he never even wanted.

 

The car’s engine purred softly.

 

Imagining the situation waiting for him in Marnia, Ulrich leaned back comfortably in his seat.



Swish.

 

Lisbell’s gaze, which was fixed on her book, lifted.

 

Perhaps it was just a momentary whim of the weather, but a heavy rain, which hadn’t been predicted earlier, was now pouring down outside the window.

 

She tried to read her book again but soon gave up.

 

The sound of rain invading the bedroom was louder than expected, swallowing up her tiny voice. She could speak a little louder, but at the moment, she didn’t feel the energy for it.

 

She just accepted it.

 

Though she knew getting used to giving up wasn’t beneficial, she was too tired to fight every little thing.

 

It had been like this since Theodore had visited. The small hope she had held onto like grains of sand slipped through her fingers, and she had no will left to grab onto anything again.

 

Since that day, Lisbell had picked up the telephone several times only to put it back down. She kept hesitating, torn between telling Theodore the truth now or fearing it was too late.

 

If she had meant to hold on, she should have followed him that day. Since giving up at that moment, the relationship had irreparably fractured.

 

Even though she desperately wanted to fix it, her current situation made it impossible. It would only lead to the same cruel repetition.

 

So Lisbell let Theodore go little by little.

 

Even if he left, she still had someone left.

 

“Mother.”

 

Lisbell, putting her book down, grasped her mother’s dry hand on the blanket. It still lacked any warmth. As she massaged her mother’s hand, hoping for better blood circulation, her eyes darkened. She thought of the man who had saved her mother’s life but had, in return, thrown her into the mud.


He wasn’t at the villa at the moment. Two days ago, he had to leave for an appointment in the capital. He said it would take about three days, so he would return to Marnia either today or tomorrow.

 

That fact occasionally returned as a bitter reality.

 

The reason was her own appearance, still staying in a corner of this villa even though he was not here.

 

There was nothing physically holding her, but Lisbell was trapped in this villa. An inescapable reality tied her tightly to this place, which felt like a prison.

 

Still, until recently, she seemed to have held onto some faint hope, but now she wasn’t sure.

 

Would the day come when her mother would regain consciousness and open her eyes?

 

Was she clinging to a hope that was too much like ashes?

 

She couldn’t even hold it tight because she was scared, but even if she did, it would eventually shatter. Was she holding onto such a fragile hope?

 



 

It was then.

 

Lisbell’s eyelashes fluttered.

 

“…Mother?”

 

She felt a faint movement in her mother’s fingers, which she had been holding and rubbing for a long time.

 

Was it an illusion?

 

Was it really an illusion?

 

Forgetting even the worn-out hope she had been chewing over, Lisbell stood up suddenly.

 

“Mother… Mother!”

 

Her voice, already delicate and now cracked like parched land from not speaking to anyone for nearly two days since Ulrich left, desperately called out. Responding to her call, her mother’s fingers twitched once more.

 

Lisbell hurriedly looked at her mother’s face. As if nerves that had been asleep for a long time were waking up one by one, strength entered here and there. Soon, her mother’s eyelids gradually lifted. Lisbell, seeing the purple eyes she hadn’t seen since they returned to Marnia, felt a surge of emotion.

 

“Mother, are you coming to your senses?”

 

Having been unconscious for quite a while, her mother couldn’t come to her senses right away. After a long period of numbness, her eyes, which barely regained focus, looked at her daughter who was holding her hand desperately.

 

She opened her dry lips. No sound came out. Perhaps because her vocal cords were strained from not being used for so long, only a dry, raspy sound escaped.

 

“Wait, just a moment. I’ll get you some water.”

 

Lisbell propped her up and quickly grabbed a water glass. After filling it up, she brought it to her mother’s lips and tilted it. Her mother couldn’t swallow well even then. As she coughed, Lisbell wiped the wet corners of her mouth with a handkerchief.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

The name her mother managed to call out, after barely stopping her cough, reached her ears.

 

Ah, why does it feel so dreamlike to hear this voice calling me? Lisbell’s eyes filled with tears, unsure whether from longing or relief. As she quietly wiped them away, Mrs. Osborne’s eyes, seemingly becoming clearer in consciousness, looked around.

 

“Where…?”

 

“This is Marnia Villa. The place where you used to work, Mother.”

 

“What on earth… happened?”

 

“Don’t you remember? Mother, you collapsed.”

 

“What?”

 

“Why didn’t you tell me?”

 



 

“Why didn’t you say a word about being unwell…?”

 

Why didn’t you say anything…?

 

Her voice, choked with sobs, was cut off.

 

Mrs. Osborne, sensing how the secret she had desperately wanted to hide had been revealed, let out a small sigh.

 

“It seems I’ve caused you worry.”

 

“They said you collapsed while working. Your condition was so bad that you went straight into surgery.”

 

“Surgery…? I had surgery? Then, how did we manage the cost?”

 

Lisbell smiled bitterly at her mother, who couldn’t help but bring up money even in this situation.

 

“…Mr. Altahart helped us.”

 

“The master did?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“So… that’s why I’m here?”

 

Her mother seemed clueless about everything. It was natural. Although many things had happened to Lisbell, it was all during the time her mother was unconscious. In a way, the foundation of this situation was laid before she collapsed, but Lisbell had kept it a secret, so there was no blame to place on her mother.

 

“The master is….”

 

“He’s not here right now.”

 

“Not here?”

 

“He went to the capital.”

 

“…What is going on…? Anyway, it seems the master took care of me. Did he contact you to come here? And you’ve been by my side since then? What’s the date today? How long have I been unconscious?”

 

Lisbell, calmly tidying up her mother’s wrinkled blanket, spoke.

 

“Summer has just passed.”

 



 

“Autumn will be here soon.”

 

Her mother’s fussy actions suddenly stopped. The mention of the change in seasons carried a clear implication.

 

The one who knew better than anyone that her daughter would be a bride in late summer was Mrs. Osborne. She also knew that her daughter was supposed to leave for another country after the wedding.

 

It was something that should have happened before the end of summer. So the fact that her daughter was still here could only mean one thing.

 

“Lisbell, you…”

 

“I’m breaking off my engagement with Theo.”

 

“…Is it because of me?”

 

“It’s not like that.”

 

Lisbell reached out to calm her mother, who was already sinking into grief. Pulling up the blanket that had slipped down her body, she whispered softly.

 

“It was my decision.”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

“So you don’t need to worry, Mother.”

 



 

“Please lie down, Mother. You just woke up, and if you strain yourself like this….”

 

“Lisbell!”

 

As Lisbell was about to turn away to contact the doctor staying in the annex, her wrist was grabbed.

 

The strength was quite strong for someone who had just woken up. It showed how desperate her mother was.

 

“Tell me honestly. Have I become a burden to you…?”

 

Looking down at her mother’s emaciated hand, Lisbell gently placed it back and covered it with her palm.

 

“It’s okay, Mother.”

 



 

“Really, it’s all okay.”

 

Her voice was hollow. It felt that way because she tried to keep as much emotion out of it as possible.

 

But this was the best. Her mother had been unconscious for a long time and had just opened her eyes. Even though she had recovered enough to communicate after the long rest, she still needed to be careful. And the truths she had to reveal would undoubtedly be too much for her mother.

 

“Sleep a little more, Mother.”

 

Hold on.

 

It’s not the right time yet.

 

So hold on, endure, and persevere, and then, when everything seems back to normal….

 

Lisbell’s hand, pulling up the blanket, hesitated. A sense of despair briefly crossed her mind, wondering if such a day would ever come for her. Mrs. Osborne, who had been silently watching her daughter, caught her hesitation.

 

“The air is a bit chilly. If you feel cold, use this blanket….”

 

“Why….”

 



 

“Why are you so… thin?”

 

Mrs. Osborne’s small question froze Lisbell.

 

“Lisbell, was your wrist always this thin…?”

 

That one sentence was the problem.

 

All the fabricated sentences, busy trying to fill everything with lies, evaporated from her mind. At that moment, hearing those words, she felt as if she was hitting an insurmountable wall. Along with occasional feelings of injustice and futility.

 

Why did she have to swallow everything?

 

If she hid it from Theodore and even from her mother, whom could she confide in about this endlessly turbulent turmoil inside her?

 

Drip Drip

 

Tears suddenly poured out. Lisbell quickly covered her mouth with her hand. She knew she had to stop, but it wasn’t working. Rubbing her tear-filled eyes, she spoke incoherently.

 

“No, this is, this is just….”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

Her mother’s voice, unlike her own tearful one, was firm. She looked up with deeply trembling eyes. Mrs. Osborne, having sensed the discord, silently held Lisbell’s wrist tightly.

 

The strength was stronger than Lisbell had vaguely imagined. It felt like a signal that she wouldn’t collapse even after hearing her confession. Even knowing it was just a fragile mind wanting to depend, Lisbell, as if mesmerized, opened her mouth. It was right to say she couldn’t hold out any longer.

 

“The truth is, actually….

 

Tears rolled down her cheeks and fell onto the bedding covering her mother.

 

She didn’t even know what she was saying. Relying on the hot tears, she poured out the things she hadn’t been able to tell anyone, incoherently.

 

With her head bowed low, she couldn’t see her mother’s expression. She couldn’t bear to look. Even knowing that her mother’s face would be as contorted as her own, she knew it was irrevocable. It wasn’t possible, and she realized she didn’t have enough energy left inside.

 

It was at that point.

 

Without even realizing it, she had collapsed to such a point.

 

After a heavy confession, only the cold air remained in the bedroom. She could easily picture her mother, completely pale from head to toe, after learning the truth. As regret, spreading like a bruise from inside, took over.

 

“Why….”

 

A faint but undeniable warmth touched her cheek. Lisbell flinched and looked up. Her vision, blurred with tears, was cloudy.

 

So she couldn’t see her mother’s expression, but she could sense it.

 

“Why didn’t you say anything?”

 



 

“Why didn’t you tell me….”

 

She finally understood.

 

Her mother’s stubborn refusal to mention her own condition was no different from her own determination to hide every setback she faced.

 

No, it was a mirror image of her own actions.


Lean and frail, Lisbell leaned on those diligent hands trying to wipe away her tears and completed her confession. Her mother, unable to hide her shock, occasionally stiffened her expression and soon after, tears welled up in her own eyes.

 

“Oh my god, the master…”

 

Unable to continue, the lady clutched her chest with a clenched fist, unable to bear it. Lisbell, unable to wipe away her own tears, tried to calm her mother, fearing that even such actions might strain her.

 

“I should have been honest from the start. If I had, things wouldn’t have gotten this bad…”

 

“Lisbell, you don’t need to eat yourself up over it.”

 



 

“I think I understand how we both feel now…”

 

Lisbell’s heart ached. She bit her lip, then nodded carefully.

 

Mrs. Osborne, who was gently stroking her daughter’s pale cheek, looked out the window. Watching the now lighter rain, she suddenly spoke.

 

“Let’s leave together.”

 

“…What?”

 

“I can’t leave you in this place any longer.”

 



 

“Before the master returns… we should quickly gather our things and leave.”

 

Lisbell was taken aback.

 

“But, but mother. I have a contract with him. And mother, you just woke up. Your condition…”

 

“Don’t worry about me. It’s not as bad as you think.”

 

To prove her point, her mother swung her legs out of bed. Lisbell quickly moved to support her. With her help, her mother stood up slowly and took a few steps around the bed.

 

“You said the problem was my surgery and hospital bills. If we break the contract, we’ll just have to repay that money. We’ll leave this place together… and pay it off gradually. That’s what we’ll do. No matter how long it takes, as long as we can repay it, there’s no reason for you to be treated this way.”

 

Lisbell was momentarily stunned. It was something she couldn’t handle alone, something that had always brought her to her knees. Her mother was discussing it so easily.

 

It’s not something that can be handled so easily.

 

Doubt grew from the adversities Lisbell had to face here.

 

But only for a moment.

 

Before her mother regained consciousness, there were many things that gave her psychological pressure. The overwhelming costs and the confession she couldn’t bring herself to make to Theodore.

 

But now her mother had opened her eyes, and now that she had given up her future with Theodore, there was no reason to be held back by that fact.

 

In other words, I am free…

 

“Is it really… okay?”

 



 

“Can I, can I leave this place?”

 

A fine ray of light seeped into Lisbell’s cloudy eyes. Mrs. Osborne gently stroked her daughter’s hair and said.

 

“Of course.”

 



 

“You, Lisbell, you don’t have to be tied to anyone like this. Especially not because of me.”

 

The hope that seemed impossible alone was now overflowing just because her mother had opened her eyes.

 

Having made a decision, her heart grew impatient. Although she had regained consciousness, her mother was still an invalid with limited mobility. To head to the train station with her, they had to hurry.

 

Though unspoken, mother and daughter shared the same thought: this had to be done before Ulrich returned to Marnia.

 

Even if Ulrich escalated the issue to a lawsuit, as long as their intent to repay was communicated, they would manage. First, they had to escape from this place filled with bad memories and psychological pressure to see any sign of a new beginning. Her mother surely thought the same.

 

Lisbell went to her room and opened her suitcase. She packed a few pieces of clothing and some travel money, then grabbed an umbrella from the wardrobe.

 

Fortunately, the rain was light.

 

“Mother, hold onto my arm tightly. If it feels too rushed, let me know immediately.”

 

Lisbell wrapped a cape around her mother’s shoulders to protect her from the cold weather and stepped out.

 

The gate was open, probably for Ulrich’s return today or tomorrow. Lisbell, tightly supporting her mother to prevent her from falling, passed through the gate.

 

It was unbelievable. She never imagined she would leave the villa with her mother so safely.

 

Then, Mrs. Osborne coughed.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

“Don’t worry about me. Let’s go.”

 

Reading Lisbell’s worried gaze, Mrs. Osborne smiled. Even that pale smile was worrisome. They needed to reach the train station quickly to let her rest.

 

Leaving the iron gate, they soon entered a narrow path. Due to the heavy rain, the ground was muddy. Supporting her coughing mother, Lisbell walked along the path heavily scented with rain.

 

After the narrow path, a vast meadow stretched out, with a winding road running through it.

 

On days without rain, she occasionally saw carriages passing by. She hoped they could catch one.

 

As she heard the leaves shuddering from the raindrops, the narrow path came to an end. Lisbell tilted her umbrella back to survey the surroundings.

 

As her view cleared, the weight of her mother leaning on one arm suddenly increased. Lisbell dropped the umbrella and hurriedly caught her mother.

 

“Mother? Mother!”

 

Mrs. Osborne’s complexion was as pale as a sheet, much worse than before. She trembled all over and then coughed with her last strength.

 

Blood spread around her lips. It was hemoptysis. Horrified, Lisbell hurriedly propped her against a tree trunk.

 

“Mother, what’s wrong…! Mother!”

 

The rain pounded painfully in her ears.

 

Lisbell didn’t think of retrieving the fallen umbrella but frantically checked her mother.

 

But the situation didn’t improve.

 

In fact, it only got worse. Her mother, who had been coughing, was now pale and still, her eyes gently closed.

 

Lisbell knew that face well.

 

The face she had seen almost daily in the cozy bedroom of the villa.

 

The face of her mother who hadn’t regained consciousness after surgery.

 

That face now loomed over her mother like a demon. With trembling hands, Lisbell cupped her mother’s cheeks.

 

Mother, mother.

 

Her faint breaths shattered against the falling raindrops.

 

Mother, mother, mother…

 

Lisbell kept calling. Standing before the vast meadow, she felt trapped in a small box, overwhelmed by a sense of claustrophobia. As the waves of anxiety rose, she let her tears flow, lowering her trembling hands.

 

Slowly, she leaned in.

 

She pressed her ear to her mother’s chest, wrapped in the cape.

 

Thump, thump, thump.

 

It was beating.

 

But.

 

Thump… thump… thump…

 

It was slow. It was slowing down. Her mother’s heartbeat was gradually slowing.

 

Was the anxiety chilling her fingertips creating an illusion?

 

She wished it were so, but it seemed highly unlikely. Her mother had stopped coughing altogether.

 

“No, no…”

 

Please, please.

 

Even as she chanted, the beating in her ears grew fainter. Like a dying flame, it seemed inevitable that it would finally go out.

 

Lisbell turned her head blankly in the midst of the relentless downpour.

 

Toward the villa.

 

There was a doctor there. If she carried her mother and ran now, sprinted with all her might, she might save her.

 

But… she couldn’t bring herself to act.

 

Go back?

 

Again?

 

To that villa?

 

No.

 

How could she go back after finally escaping?

 

I don’t want to.

 

What determination had it taken to leave?

 

Never…

 

I don’t want to go back.

 

To that place that sucked the meaning out of everyday life, never…

 

“Ugh…”

 

She felt nauseous. The situation that kept forcing her into such lowly choices made her shudder with all her heart.

 

Even now, with her mother’s heartbeat slowing to a stop in front of her, Lisbell clutched her head. A soundless scream burst from her open lips. It felt like the scene in the drawing room was repeating itself. As if she were trapped in a very bad, helpless prank.

 

The rain poured heavily.

 

Earlier, it seemed bearable, but now it felt like a torrential downpour, crushing her body unbearably. The rain-soaked her hair and seemed to penetrate her brain. Her body grew heavy and wet. The temperature of the rain was as cold as ice. Her body, drenched in it, cooled down.

 

And so did her heart.

 

“…Mother.”

 

No response.

 

“Mother.”

 

No matching gaze.

 

“Mother…”

 

In front of this despicable display, her vile nature.

 

If I give you up, I don’t have to return to that hell, do I…


Tok.

 

A raindrop, precariously hanging on the edge of a leaf, fell onto Lisbell’s head.

 

“…!”

 

At that moment, she experienced a feeling of her heart plummeting to the ground.

 

Startled, she fell backward, landing on her backside. Without even thinking of adjusting her clothes soaked in the muddy puddle, she covered her mouth with her hand.

 

Feeling as if she were seeing a detached soul, an eerie and shivering sensation washed over her, and Lisbell was seized by the impulse to peel off her own skin. A wave of guilt washed over her, gnawing at her like bitter bile.

 

How could this happen?

 

No matter how the situation turned out, how could she even think of abandoning her mother…

 

She felt like a horrible monster.

 

Facing the freedom she wanted to reclaim, she was about to abandon her only blood relative. In other words, she was choosing a cowardly escape over the evident way to save her mother, overwhelmed by extreme selfishness. Even amidst this, she despised herself for only wanting not to return to that villa.

 

Unable to move forward or backward, Lisbell collapsed weakly. In the rain that seemed to wash away her senses and melt her very existence, she was sinking deeper, almost to the point of being buried under the ground.

 

A round violet light gathered above the trees.

 

Through the pouring rain, a car quietly appeared.

 

The source of the violet light near the tree her mother was leaning against was the car’s headlights. The engine sound pierced through the noise of the rainwater and settled.

 

The car stopped in front of the path, and the back door opened.

 

A black umbrella popped up. Unlike herself, who was struggling even to avoid a single drop of rain, the man who got out of the car, Ulrich, had returned to the villa before she could escape and was calmly standing there, avoiding the rain.

 

What she couldn’t even dream of avoiding was something he could handle with a mere gesture.

 

A new awareness struck her as a fresh despair.

The cold sound of rain was slicing through her ears. The continuous noise felt like his sneering, poking at her nerves.

 

Her body shivered uncontrollably. He was always an enigma, but he had never instilled such intense fear in her as he did today. The moment she recognized him, Lisbell’s lips parted.

 

“I’m… sorry.”

 



 

“I’m sorry, I…”

 

Ulrich, who hadn’t spoken a word since getting out of the car, raised an eyebrow. Soon, he took a leisurely step forward.

 

Even the splashing sound was elegant. No matter how much rain poured down, it couldn’t leave a mark on him. The man, who seemed invincible, bent down in front of the sunken Lisbell.

 

The black umbrella tilted slightly.

 

“What is it?”

 

For a moment, she thought the rain had stopped. And it had, indeed, stopped.

 

Thanks to Ulrich tilting the umbrella towards her.

 

“Speak.”

 



 

“What are you sorry for?”

 

It seemed lenient, but it wasn’t. His soft voice was laden with reproach.

 

What was she doing here?

 

Was she trying to run away?

 

Did she dare to do such a thing?

 

In his brief questions, sharp implications floated.

 

Lisbell lowered her head. Her face was drenched, and she couldn’t tell if it was from tears or rain. Ulrich watched her silently before glancing away.

 

“Is this the time to keep your mouth shut?”

 



 

“Your mother doesn’t seem to have much time.”

 

Her body flinched as if pricked by needles.

 

Her terrified eyes turned towards her mother, leaning against the tree.

 

She looked like a corpse, unmistakably so to any passerby. The feeling of her heart being twisted and plummeting to the ground from earlier came back vividly.

 

It was the worst. Lisbell bit her lip.

 

“Please, save her.”

 



 

“I’m sorry. It’s all my fault…”

 



 

“So please, save my mother, please…”

 

She couldn’t even lift her face as she pleaded desperately. Now she could distinguish between tears and rain. The tears, seeping from her scraped insides, were hot enough to burn.

 

She couldn’t deny that it was a very faint thread of relief.

 

What kind of relief, though, she didn’t know. She couldn’t understand.

 

Perhaps it was simply the relief of being able to save her mother. Or perhaps, deeper down, it was a vile pardon for the humanity she momentarily lost.

 

A large palm cupped the back of her head.

 

Lisbell was drawn into his arms without any resistance. Even though she could escape the rain and be embraced, she felt nothing but an ominous foreboding.

 

“Lisbell, having too many thoughts when you’re naive leads to this.”

 



 

“You always make the situation worse.”

 

Lisbell’s eyelids quivered. It was a weak movement, like the last struggle of a butterfly caught in a spider’s web. No matter how she struggled, she couldn’t escape.

 

At some point, the invisible trap started layering itself around her, without her even knowing.

 

“In such cases, not thinking at all is also a way.”

 

Grip.

 

She felt the force gripping her hair. The gesture, now revealing its claws, carried a refined warning.

 

“Don’t do anything foolish.”

 



 

“Just stay still…”

 

No matter how much she struggled, she didn’t feel her feet properly land anywhere.

 

Just swaying this way and that. Her senses were completely disarrayed, similar to a feeling of floating.

 

Only then did she realize.

 

What she had been doing all along.

 

Oh, I am… falling.

 



 

A needle was inserted into her thin arm.

 

While watching the liquid being injected, Ulrich glanced at the contract in his hand.

 

“Young master, it is done.”

 

The doctor attending to Mrs. Osborne adjusted his glasses and reported. Only then did Ulrich turn his head straight.

 

“Is she safe?”

 

“Yes. Her body temperature dropped considerably, but it wasn’t for a long time, so she’ll recover with sufficient rest.”

 

“No side effects or anything?”

 

“No. It wasn’t a treatment likely to cause side effects in the first place… You had asked to adjust the medication so she could wake up for an hour or two on the day you returned from the capital. It’s like she woke up from a long sleep briefly and then fell asleep again.”

 

“Good job. There are doctors in Laurent who have difficulty even with that, but you seem to manage well.”

 

When Ulrich finished speaking, Victor, who had been standing by, took out a notebook and wrote something. The doctor, recognizing it as a check issued only by the Altahart family bank, swallowed hard. It was an item valuable enough just to possess, with gold edges.

 

“You flatter me. Shall we proceed with the same treatment as before starting tomorrow?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“To keep her in a state of continuous sleep.”

 

At the confirming tone, Ulrich just nodded slightly. Meanwhile, Victor handed the doctor a check with the pre-determined amount. The doctor accepted it with great gratitude.

 

“A capable doctor like you should have been by my brother’s side.”

 

“Haha, it wasn’t such a difficult request. If you ever need my services again, please feel free to call me anytime.”

 

It seemed the doctor thought it was just flattery. Though sincere, Ulrich didn’t want to emphasize it too much, so he just gave a suitable smile. After his duty, the doctor left the bedroom.

 

Ulrich walked quietly to the bed. Lying on it was a woman with a complexion that seemed fragile enough to shatter.

 

Just as the doctor said, it was a minor medication adjustment, barely a small trick. Seeing her struggling even with that made it seem like staying alive was a miracle in itself.

 

Indeed, Ulrich was a little surprised. When he got out of the car, he was momentarily speechless because Mrs. Osborne, leaning against the tree, looked like she had just died.

 

She still had a role to play.

 

He couldn’t let something useful die meaninglessly. The intention was always to instill a deep sense of guilt in Lisbell, not to sever all her ties.

 

He had ordered Mrs. Osborne to wake up from her quiet sleep just in time for his return from the capital for this reason.

 


The presence of her mother was somewhat of a hindrance, but Ulrich wanted a more certain shackle than that.

 

Emotions can sometimes be intense, but they can also become as thin as paper. If Lisbell’s sense of responsibility towards her bedridden mother became that thin, and if she decided to run away leaving her behind…

 

There might come a time when he could accept that fact calmly, but it wasn’t now.

 

For now, he wanted to watch over her a little longer.

 

The result was as expected but still brought a sense of relief. What happened to Lisbell today ended up chaining her with a shackle she could never remove herself. Her gloomy appearance and the somber look she had while sitting down in the pouring rain were proof of that.

 

“Transfer the lady to the hospital as soon as a room is secured in the capital.”

 

Ulrich said, tearing the paper he was holding. The word ‘Repayment Contract’ written at the top split into two. Soon, the paper was shredded beyond recognition and discarded to one side.

 

“Immediately? Do you need to move so urgently?”

 

“My impatient mother will soon issue a summons.”

 

“A summons?”

 

“Have you seen Gwen’s condition?”

 

“No. There’s a strict no-entry order except for family.”

 

“He looks like he could die tomorrow.”

 



 

“That’s why she must be anxious.”

 

Victor sighed as if he understood now.

 

A summons was a unique authority held by the head of the Altahart family, requiring any family member to return immediately to the main residence in the capital, regardless of their location. Failure to comply could result in the legal recovery of their business management rights by the head.

 

For an Altahart who established their position through management rights within the family, this was a significant loss. The only way to avoid it was to comply with the summons.

 

What Ulrich intended to do now was to prepare to avoid being caught in such a situation.

 

Wait a minute…

 

If that was true, how far ahead had he planned?

 

Victor, who was closest to Ulrich’s orders, knew that he had instructed the doctor to adjust the medication. He also knew that this was a means to completely bind the woman who had ended up stuck in this villa.

 

And this method was coincidentally leading to an easy resolution of future situations.

 

The bait Ulrich chose to tie Lisbell’s feet to this place was Mrs. Osborne. Judging by his recent actions, it was clear that Ulrich intended to take her to the capital.

 

Lisbell wasn’t staying with him because she liked him. She was only staying because of a deal involving her mother.

 

Such a woman wouldn’t willingly follow Ulrich to the capital. If he took her mother, she would resist in some way, causing significant problems in trivial matters.

 

But…

 

But would she do that now?

 

Surely this wasn’t part of the plan either.

 

Ulrich had no idea about Gwen’s condition until he visited the capital, so he couldn’t have anticipated that an anxious lady would issue a summons soon.

 

So, it’s just a coincidence…

 

Even if it was true, it was astonishing. It could only be described as a stroke of remarkable luck. In the world, luck was often referred to as a moment blessed by the gods. Otherwise, it was an inexplicable event.

 

A man who not only was born talented but also received the love of the gods.

 

“Yes, I will proceed as soon as possible.”

 

Victor, who responded in a firm voice, secretly offered sincere consolation to Lisbell.

 

Leaving Victor behind, Ulrich walked down the long hallway.

 

The only sound was his footsteps echoing through the quiet space. Having just returned from the noisy capital, he finally felt a sense of relief.

 

The noise was bearable for a day or two, but Lorraine’s chaos was exceptional.

 

Well, what can I do? It’s a world where various information and gossip are fascinating and profitable.

 

In such a peaceful scenery surrounded by nature, you can’t feel the same pure excitement, malice, and proportional pleasure that oscillates.

 

Thinking about returning to that gloomy paradise made his head throb. The fatigue he had temporarily forgotten while staying here would soon resurface, flooding him with its waves.

 

But his thoughts soon took a slight turn.

 

Even in such a dreary place, would things change if he took Lisbell with him?

 

Would it feel different?

 

This was something he was curious about.

 

Despite thinking it was nonsense, he couldn’t help but wonder if his life in the vibrant yet desolate capital would change with just one different person by his side.

 

The curiosity that sprouted like a small bud quickly grew as big as a fist. Before he knew it, Ulrich was determined to take her to the capital no matter what.

 

By then, he had already reached Lisbell’s bedroom.

 

He knocked briefly and opened the door.

 

Lisbell was sitting on the bed. Her hair, dried and stuck together messily, and her clothes, still damp and clinging to her, suggested she had been forcibly brought here.

 

Her feelings weren’t far off.

 

Why else would she sit down in the rain without even thinking of getting up? It was a clear sign that she didn’t want to return to this villa.

 

“Lisbell.”

 





There was no response to his call. Ulrich approached the bed and looked at her face.

 

Even though she was indoors, sheltered from the storm, Lisbell’s eyes still looked like a wandering stone in the storm.

 

“If you stay like this, you’ll catch a cold.”

 

There was no response again, but he didn’t expect one in the first place. So, as he spoke, Ulrich was already turning around.

 

He grabbed a towel from the attached bathroom.

 

By the time he returned to the bed, Lisbell hadn’t moved an inch. Ulrich placed the towel on her head and roughly wiped away the remaining moisture.

 

He suddenly smiled.

 

He remembered Lisbell’s eyes, staring at him helplessly from the dark forest path. Eyes like a lost child. A vulnerable side he rarely saw in the always steadfast Lisbell. Eyes that clearly showed her shaken instincts.

 

Ulrich quietly tucked away his silent laughter and grabbed Lisbell’s hair along with the towel. As he lifted her head, her face followed limply.

 

He left a light kiss on her bloodless, pale lips. He thought she might frown, but Lisbell remained still. It was as if her soul had a crack that couldn’t be filled.

 

But even this wasn’t pleasing. He didn’t know what she was thinking. Whether empty or not, he wanted to dig into her piece by piece. Feeling a crude impulse, Ulrich threw the towel onto the bed.

 

Then he grabbed Lisbell’s wrist and pulled her up.

 

“It’s better to warm up a bit more.”

 

He led her limp, half-melted body into the bathroom.

 

Standing her under the hose, he turned the faucet, and water poured out refreshingly. Unlike the rain outside, it soon turned warm and steamy.

 

He couldn’t understand. Even though it was clear that going outside would leave her chewed up by the rain, why did she insist on going out?

 

He couldn’t fundamentally understand why she would reject a place where everything was provided, like this warm water flowing out on its own.

 

He thought he knew the answer without hearing it.

 

It was probably because of the love or whatever she had mentioned herself. No matter how many times he thought about it, it was an absurd sentiment.

 

Ulrich embraced Lisbell’s waist from behind. Then he started unbuttoning her blouse one by one.

 

It was only then that her slender body, as if waking up, slightly recoiled and curled her shoulders.




She had no idea that all her struggles only resulted in pressing closer against Ulrich’s chest. If she had the presence of mind to realize this, she wouldn’t have been dragged to the bathroom in the first place.

 

Ulrich chuckled and resolutely unbuttoned her blouse.

 

The front slowly opened. However, Lisbell’s resistance did not intensify. Instead, her body, gradually exposed, trembled slightly. The sudden chill hit her as the only layer of clothing was removed.

 

With only her underwear left, she was pushed into the warm water. Although the water stream wasn’t strong, Lisbell wobbled. Ulrich held her and adjusted the faucet. His shirt also became soaked in places.

 

He brushed her tangled hair to one side. Water droplets ran down her pale, smooth skin.

 

Without hesitation, Ulrich licked it.

 

He knew it had no taste, but he did it anyway. Sometimes, with her, his brain acted as if it was partly damaged, imagining it tasted like ripe fruit juice. He instinctively placed his tongue on it.

 

Lisbell flinched as if pricked by a thorn at the touch on her shoulder. Ulrich straightened his head after a few more licks and made sure her body could regain warmth. He rubbed the water all over her, and when some parts were hard to reach, he used his cupped hand to pour water directly.

 

Lisbell’s trembling gradually subsided.

 

Ulrich, who had been persistently rubbing her protruding shoulder blades, softly whispered to her back, which was facing the wall.

 

“Come with me to the capital.”

 

There was a reaction after a brief moment. Lisbell’s fingers, which were touching the wall, curled.

 

“Why the capital….”

 

Her voice, heard for the first time since entering her bedroom, was hoarse. It was so dry that even these many water droplets couldn’t wet it.

 

Ulrich turned off the faucet. The water stream gradually died down and eventually stopped. However, her enticing skin was still covered with beads of water.

 

He bent his head toward her seemingly pristine shoulder line and answered her tiny question while hugging her deeply from behind.

 

“I have something to do in the capital.”

 



 

“I can’t leave you alone in this villa while I’m gone.”

 

He spoke as if caring for her, but his intentions were different. He still found her interesting and planned to torment her even while taking her to the capital.

 

As his sly curiosity, which he hadn’t satisfied, seeped into his elegant tone, cold sweat dripped down Lisbell’s back like water droplets.

 

Ulrich slyly licked his way up from her shoulder to her neck, kissing and sucking. Every time his lips felt wet, he swallowed as if it were her bodily fluids, thinking it truly tasted that way.

 

“In the capital, Mrs. Osborne can receive much more precise and thorough treatment.”

 



 

“The medical facilities and equipment there are far superior to here.”

 

Ulrich grasped her chin, which had been staring blankly at the wall, and turned her to face him.

 

He engulfed her pale lips, which stood out red against her pallor. After lightly probing inside with his tongue, he slowly pulled back, making the saliva stretch, and murmured while looking into her eyes.

 

“If Lisbell just follows me, you won’t have to worry about the treatment costs.”

 

There was a long silence. But it didn’t feel like a bad sign.

 

If it were the old Lisbell, she would have stubbornly refused to go to the capital, flaunting her pride.

 

Perhaps the reason she couldn’t do so now was that the unfortunate situation she encountered today, while taking her sick mother out, kept replaying in her mind.

 

Though her constant resistance was attractive, her compliance now wasn’t bad either. It was pleasing not to have to repeat unnecessary words multiple times.

 

Using her mother as a pretext to break her bamboo-like spirit once was a good move. Even if that spirit rose again, it was beneficial for him now, as it made it easier to take her to the capital.

 

To seal the deal, Ulrich turned her body to face him and said,

 

“Lisbell, all you have left is your mother now.”

 

He smoothly removed her thin underwear clinging to her naked body. Her breasts, neatly gathered, drew his gaze.

 

Gazing lasciviously for a while, he then pressed and rubbed her nipple with his fingers, emitting a slightly excited tone.

 

“So, you must prioritize your mother.”

 

The voice urging her to grow guilt was deceitful, even to him.

 

Ulrich chuckled and lowered his head. He sucked her nipple into his mouth, including the areola.

 

Lisbell’s body stiffened as he sucked hard enough to make his cheeks hollow. The rigidity of her body, which had begun when he licked her shoulder, intensified his arousal.

 

Her resistance always fueled his desire. It evoked pure pleasure, as if he were crushing the neck of something alive. Though already erect, he felt he could get even harder, eager to explore every part of her thoroughly.

 

Was lust always this destructive?

 

Perhaps. He never put in as much effort or received such a deep impression from anyone else as he did with Lisbell. Savoring the red, ripe nipple with his mouth, Ulrich’s hand moved downward.

 

“…Ah.”

 

A barely audible moan escaped Lisbell’s lips.

 

Ulrich’s fingers slid into the moist triangle between her legs. Despite the rapid progression, her hole was already moist, thanks to the flowing water.

 

Ulrich spread his palm wide, rubbing her tangled pubic hair before thrusting his long middle finger deep into her hole.

 

“Only three days.”

 

“Ah….”

 

“And it’s already this tight? Hm?”

 

He teasingly added his index finger and scratched the inner walls. Her hole, forced to swallow two thick fingers, widened and wrinkled.

 

Ulrich enjoyed the texture of her pubic hair, spreading his palm and striking down. The droplets of water that soaked her pubic hair splashed in response to the rapid movements.

 

“Haha, it splashes just like Lisbell’s fluids.”

 

“Ah, ung…!”

 

“I wish you’d get this wet quickly. There’s nothing more satisfying than having you soak my lower part with your fluids….”

 

As his fingers flipped her tender insides, Lisbell leaned against the bathroom wall, trembling. Her lower body convulsed, sucking his fingers.

 

Noticing she was getting aroused faster than he expected, Ulrich glanced down.

 

“Ung, haah.”

 

Lisbell occasionally stood on her tiptoes, unable to hide her reactions. It happened every time his palm rubbed her pubic hair. Each time he touched the densely packed area, she displayed her sensitivity without restraint.

 

Confirming his assumption, Ulrich pressed his palm firmly against her pubic area. He applied pressure, rotating it in circles, and her lower abdomen tensed. Her toes curled, scratching the floor.

 

Ulrich raised an eyebrow, realizing something and letting out a small exclamation.

 

“Come to think of it, this is where most women feel pleasure.”

 

He withdrew his fingers, now slightly moist from her fluids.

 

Taking his hand to her pubic hair, he disturbed the sparse forest and spread her flushed labia wide. His fingers quickly found the prominent nub.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

“Is this the spot you love to have rubbed?”

 

“Ah, uh… hng, yes…!”

 

Her clitoris, the source of her pleasure, was mercilessly rubbed. As he pinched, scratched, and twisted it, Lisbell squirmed, her whole body shuddering, her cries echoing through the bathroom.

Ulrich’s sly smile deepened as he felt his palm, covering her groin, becoming steadily wetter, in stark contrast to her physical resistance. His eyes gleamed with a sinister interest, reflecting an almost maniacal shine against the bathroom’s light.

 

“Haa, haah, ugh…!”

 

Desperate to pull away, Lisbell gripped his forearm, but it was futile. Every time his fingertips lingered on her clitoris, as if to leave a mark, her knees weakened and her insides tingled sharply. The sensation of every nerve pulsing throughout her body was so sensitive it was almost terrifying.

 

Ulrich watched Lisbell, weakly clutching his arm, before suddenly lowering himself.

 

“…Hmp!”

 

His fine platinum hair brushed against her groin.

 

Lisbell was so startled by him bringing his mouth below her that she couldn’t even breathe.

 

Meanwhile, Ulrich licked the wetness from her pubic hair before spreading her flesh wide in one swift motion.

 

In the center, a modestly engorged nub was gently protruding.

 

Lisbell’s thighs trembled as he flicked it with the tip of his sharp tongue. He then enveloped it with his lips, sucking it as if to consume it. Fluids gushed from her now slippery entrance.

 

Ulrich savored the rich taste from the traces around his nose and mouth. The scent, too lewd, made part of his mind deliriously insane, numbing all his senses.

 

“Ah! Hmph, ah… no, no…”

 

Lisbell shook her head frantically, her body convulsing as if in a fit. Yet each time Ulrich bit her clitoris as if to chew it, she swallowed her breath and shuddered. The nature of the sensation became clear from the torrent of fluids that followed.

 

Ulrich, now with his eyes closed, suckled her clitoris thoroughly as if kissing it. What was once too small to find without parting the flesh quickly swelled up after a few licks.

 

As if praising him, Lisbell curled her waist in resistance as he delicately worked his tongue.

 

“Hah, stay still…”

 

He was engrossed in her reactions, almost captivated, but her constant struggling began to irritate him.

 

It was as if she despised feeling pleasure from him. Once in a daze like an idiot, now she vibrantly resisted. This irked him.

 

“Ah!”

 

Ulrich grabbed her wrist and pulled her down. He caught her collapsing body and laid her on the cold bathroom floor.

 

He briefly glanced at her small, hardly shaking breasts before spreading her groin wide while she was still dazed.

 

Diving in, he pressed his lips back to her clitoris, sucking it deeply, causing her calves to tense up.

 

Her half-bent legs hit Ulrich’s shoulders and back as he intrusively delved in. But he paid no mind, busy pressing his tongue against her clitoris and the crevice beneath it.

 

“Hah, haah, ung…!”

 

The overwhelming pleasure, mixed with discomfort, hit her. Each breath she took brought a slight convulsion, a tingling chill spreading through her abdomen. Each time, Lisbell’s breath caught.

 

It was a repulsive joy.

 

Pleasure that usually left her feeling raw now felt heavily subdued.

 

She felt despicable, writhing so lewdly despite having planned to abandon her mother and failing to save her from near death.

 

“Haha, you’re soaked.”

 

“Haah, haah…”

 

“Lisbell, you actually like it, don’t you?”

 

Her awkwardly floating ankles were grabbed, spreading her vulva so wide it couldn’t be hidden. His warm, throbbing shaft rubbed against her entrance.

 

The solid vein’s soft friction made her pulse with anticipation. Lisbell felt disgusted by her body’s reaction, hating herself for feeling it.

 

“Now, let’s… ngh…”

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

The tip, lightly stained, spread her opening wide as it penetrated. The largest part soon followed, pushing in deeply, causing her hips to curl inward.

 

“You welcome it, don’t you… haah… right?”

 

Ulrich, interpreting her body’s treacherous response in his own way, gripped her legs like reins.

 

“So let’s enjoy this. There’s no grand meaning to sex to always… making a face like you’re being dragged to hell.”

 

“Hmph, ugh…!”

 

“Ah, inside you feels really good… haa….”

 

He tilted his head back, platinum hair rustling wetly as it fell behind his forehead.

 

His closed eyes mirrored pure lust.

 

Unlike his demeanor, her insides welcomed him, growing wetter by the moment. It was a sensation that made it impossible not to thrust.

 

He pounded without hesitation. His shirt clung to his back like a rider’s, revealing his lewd hip movements. Wet slaps echoed as they collided below.

 

“Hah, haah, ugh…!”

 

Lisbell’s eyes widened at the constant scraping sensation inside, hastily covering her mouth. Even so, fragments of trembling moans escaped her lips.

 

Soon, a sharp thought pierced her mind.

 

Ah, maybe this is my punishment.

 

Being pinned and pounded by a man she didn’t want, who held her barely alive mother hostage, leaving her to cry and moan like an animal—this felt like a divine punishment for abandoning her humanity.

 

The entire time she sat in the bedroom, guilt consumed her. Watching her mother, who had lived only for her, dying while she stood helpless on the forest path twisted and wrung out her spirit.

 

She desperately wanted to say something to alleviate this guilt, but the reality that even that was out of reach drove her mad.

 

In the midst of this, sex with him became a tiny escape. Despite being revolting, horrific, and dreadful, it was the only way her blocked breath found release.

 

Receiving this punishment seemed to somewhat ease the deep-seated guilt inside her.

 

So now, I am being punished….

 

“I told you, don’t think.”

 

“…Ung, haah…!”

 

“Now is the time to focus on your mother’s recovery.”

 

“Huh, mm… mmph…!”

 

“Lisbell, you’re a good daughter. So… ugh, you need to come with me to the capital.”

 

The thoughts that had risen like black water quickly receded.

 

An empty mind felt weightless.

 

Swaying. Like a straw doll on the cold ground, her body shook without any will. Her hand, which had been covering her mouth, slowly fell to the floor.

 

Somewhere, the sound of gunshots echoed. The wetness soaking her knees felt like someone’s tears.

 

Even amid this, her tightness greeted his thrusts with warmth, feeling it obscenely and honestly moaning.

 

The moans of someone lost trailed off into the air. Even though it was her own voice, it barely reached her ears. With reality fading away, the only vivid thing was the sinister gleam in the eyes looking down at her.

 

“Do you understand?”

 

His voice demanding an answer struck her ears like bullets. With her heart already riddled with holes, Lisbell mumbled in response.

 

She couldn’t tell what she said, but when she saw him smirk the next moment, she guessed it was what he wanted.


The capital, Laurent, was peaceful.

 

That was until a single scoop leaked from the Altahart family.

 

Before dawn one morning, a brief one-line report received from a related party started the commotion.

 

All the newspapers in Laurent replaced their planned articles with this new report, filling their front pages by the early hours of the morning.

 

A family photo of the Altahart family was used on the front page. Some newspapers only featured a small cutout of Gwen, the eldest son and heir.

 

Clink.

 



 

The small sound that rang in her ears woke Lisbell.

 

Lying on her side with her eyes open, she saw people moving quietly yet busily.

 

There was no need to look further. These were the servants working at the Altahart main estate.

 

Though it wasn’t the dining room, the smell of delicious food wafted through the air. The servants were gathered around a table near the bedroom.

 

Lisbell slowly got up. One of them must have sensed her presence, as they turned towards the bed and bowed. When one greeted her, the others followed suit like shadows. Then they quickly resumed their work.

 

“…Excuse me.”

 

Lisbell opened her mouth cautiously, waiting for the right moment.

 

Her voice abruptly cut off.

 

As soon as she spoke, they stepped back, gave a polite bow, and left the bedroom in an orderly line. Lisbell stared blankly at the space they had vacated.

 

She got up from the bed and approached the table where the servants had been gathered. As expected, it was lavishly set with food meant to be eaten in the bedroom.

 

She felt a bit disoriented.

 

While she was grateful she didn’t need to go down to the dining room to eat, she was also irritated by Ulrich’s attitude of treating her like a doll trapped in a dollhouse, giving orders to the servants.

 

Before sitting at the table, Lisbell headed to the bathroom. She cupped water in her hands and washed her face first. She did this to awaken her dulled senses since coming here.

 

But today, as usual, she didn’t feel refreshed even after several washes with cold water.

 

That was how dazed she felt.

 

The fact that she was staying at the Altahart mansion in the capital was always hard to grasp.

 

“…haah.”

 

The reality hit her constantly.

 

Even the towels here were much softer than the ones she once thought were luxurious in Marnia.

 

And not just that. Even the bathroom was excessively opulent, with golden decorations that sometimes made it blindingly bright under the sun. Even the faucets and the bathtub were gilded.

 

The bedroom wasn’t much different.

 

Famous paintings hung on the walls, marble vases adorned the tables, and crystal decanters decorated the drink tables.

 

Just being surrounded by such expensive items made her feel overwhelmed. Lisbell could never feel at ease in this room, constantly worried about damaging something valuable.

 

Of course, if asked if that was the only reason for her discomfort, the answer would be no.

 

As she headed to the table, something caught Lisbell’s eye. It was today’s newspaper, folded carelessly. She picked it up.

 

{Gwen Altahart Dies, Laurent Shrouded in Mourning}

 

It had been a week since she arrived in the capital. Even when she first got here, the state of this family was splashed across the front pages of the newspapers, and now it was the same.

 

Gwen Altahart’s fate had shocked many people unexpectedly.

 

As she tilted the newspaper, ashes that had gathered in one corner scattered softly. The family photo of the Altahart family, showing Gwen Altahart sitting solemnly, was marred by black ashes.

 

Ulrich received the newspaper every day and stubbed out his cigarette on his brother’s face.

 

She only realized that “the matter in the capital” Ulrich mentioned was his brother’s death after arriving here.

 

As she glanced at the densely written article, she read that they would be transferring the body to the church for the funeral today.

 

Lisbell folded the newspaper and set it down, then headed to the table. Sitting by the window, she could see outside clearly. Instead of picking up her fork, she first took a sip of milk while glancing outside.

 

It wasn’t raining, but the weather felt gloomy. It was because of the people gathered on the lush green lawn, all dressed in black. These were the members of Ulrich’s family.

 

The Altaharts.

 

Setting down the glass, Lisbell slowly picked up her fork. As she cut into the well-seasoned omelet, her eyes landed on something.

 

Her chewing slowed.

 

A child…

 

Among the towering adults, there was a child. Dressed all in black, the child looked like they were wearing raven feathers from head to toe.

 

Were they part of the family?

 

But as far as Lisbell knew, Gwen Altahart was unmarried. And Ulrich Altahart, of course, had no children. She hadn’t heard of or met any other siblings.

 

So who was that child?

 

The thought quickly passed as it wasn’t her concern.

 

Lisbell had come to the capital solely for her mother’s treatment.

 

When she was drowning in guilt, exposed by her own vile nature, Ulrich had made her an offer she couldn’t refuse.

 

No, was it really an offer?

 

It had felt more like a timely punishment, a threat.

 

Would she abandon her mother again?

 

The sharp threat that pierced her conscience, reminding her of her wicked intention to abandon her mother during the storm.

 

Lisbell had been powerless then, and Ulrich was as meticulous as ever. When she finally gathered her wits to protest, her mother had already been transferred to the capital hospital. The repayment contract set for autumn became meaningless. Her mother’s salvation, after almost dying in the storm, depended on the life-support treatment provided in the capital. To save her mother, she had no choice but to rely on him without regard for time or cost. Therefore, Lisbell had to quietly follow Ulrich.

 



 

It was while she was gripping her fork, tasting bitterness in her mouth.

 

Unbeknownst to her, Ulrich had looked up towards this side of the bedroom.

 

Even he couldn’t go against the custom of wearing mourning clothes. Dressed in a black shirt, different from his usual white, he wore a black tie that felt somewhat stiff.

 

Despite the distance, it was clear he was staring straight at her, stroking his tie as if he was sure their eyes had met.

 

Lisbell frowned and turned her head. Her appetite, already scarce, vanished entirely, and she put down her fork with a clatter.

 

Deliberately avoiding his gaze, she continued her meal, occasionally glancing outside. At some point, Ulrich had turned and was now holding the shoulder of a woman in a black hat with a short veil.

 

It was probably his mother.

 

Cora Altahart, the current head of the family.

 

Since arriving here, Lisbell had not encountered any of his family members. She had arrived in the dead of night and existed like a fish in a bowl in his bedroom.

 

She bit the inside of her cheek.

 

Naturally, she hadn’t met her mother either. Her mother was currently hospitalized in the Royal Capital Hospital, receiving treatment far superior to what she had in Marnia.

 

Yes, she had heard.

 

It was just indirectly obtained information.

 

Since bringing her here, Ulrich had kept her confined, not allowing her to go anywhere.


Of course, no physical measures were taken. 

 

Just a psychological burden was imposed.

 

“I hope you stay quiet for a while. Unless you want that pretty face of yours plastered all over cheap gossip magazines.”

 

“What does that mean…”

 

“With Gwen’s death, the media is overly focused. They’ve gathered from areas we can control to those we can’t. Yellow journalism tends to flare up passionately at times like these. I hear from the butler that the front gate is crowded with reporters carrying cameras. If you step outside or even peek out of the window, you might catch unnecessary attention as someone not in the family photo.”

 



 

“I don’t mind if rumors spread that you’re my hidden lover, but I think Lisbell would dislike that, so I’m telling you.”

 

“…Until when?”

 

“For now, it’s best to keep a low profile until we get through Gwen’s funeral safely.”

 

“What about my mother? How can I visit my mother?”

 

“There’s a family attendant guarding her hospital room to ensure immediate contact if anything happens. So, if anything serious occurs, we’ll be informed right away.”

 

“…What about me?”

 



 

“What should I do here?”

 

He gently brushed her hair back as she sat on the bed. His large palm soon covered her pale cheek.

 

“You just need to stay.”

 



 

“Do nothing, and stay still.”

 



 

“Didn’t I make it clear?”

 

It was a lie.

 

‘Do nothing’ wasn’t true.

 

Because his hand, which had been caressing her cheek, naturally slid down and spread Lisbell’s legs. It was just a role to relieve his lust.

 

Ultimately, until the mourning for his household that swept through the capital was settled, she too had to be restricted in her actions. Lisbell also refused to get further entangled with his household.

 

Just a week ago, she thought it was natural, but it was suffocating.

 

Not being able to meet her mother, the reason she was dragged to this unfamiliar capital, troubled her daily.

 

And today was the day of Gwen’s funeral, as he mentioned.

 

The family gathered in the courtyard would soon head to the church where the funeral would take place.

 

After that, perhaps she could escape this suffocating life a bit.

 

The feeling of being controlled, from her living space to her range of activity, under his grasp, was deeply unsettling. The special locks on the windows that couldn’t be opened without the servants’ help, the grand double doors, and the other wealthy items around her seemed like the bars of a dreadful cage.

 

She habitually scratched her neck.

 

There was nothing there, but it felt like it was tightening.

 

She scratched her skin with her nails.

 

She knew it wouldn’t change anything, but couldn’t stop by instinct.

 

The unconscious act finally stopped when she saw blood.

 

She wiped the stinging spot with her sleeve.

 

Seeing the small blood stain, Lisbell decided to talk to him as soon as he returned today.

 

Ulrich returned as the sun set and the moon rose.

 

Exhausted, he went straight to the bathroom upon entering the bedroom.

 

Lisbell sat on the bed, waiting silently until he finished his shower. It was the same position she always took when he returned from outings. She was sick of it, but had nowhere else to go. Anyway, since this was his domain, Lisbell felt uncomfortable whether here or there.

 

“Did you eat?”

 

He asked, coming out of the bathroom in a loosely tied robe.

 

Lisbell turned her head silently. Ulrich looked in the direction she indicated, where the table tray was placed. The food on the plate was mostly untouched.

 

“Still quite a bit left. You didn’t eat much yesterday either. No appetite?”

 

“How can I eat comfortably when my mother’s life is uncertain?”

 

Her tone was calm, but the content was biting. Recognizing this, Ulrich smirked and sat next to her. He grabbed her slender chin with his fingers.

 

“If your mother knew her daughter was refusing to eat because of her, she’d be upset.”

 

“…Is the funeral over?”

 

“Yes, finally. I feel like I’ve heard Gwen’s name a lifetime’s worth.”

 

“Then can I go outside now?”

 

“What happened to your neck?”

 

Ulrich suddenly asked, tilting her chin. His eyes, sharper than usual, scanned the area she had scratched earlier.

 

“Did you hurt yourself?”

 

“I scratched it a bit.”

 

“Why?”

 

“It was itchy.”

 

“Still itchy?”

 

“It’s fine now.”

 

Not expecting him to be so persistent, Lisbell was slightly taken aback. She tried to push his arm away, but he continued to stare intently at the spot. Shortly after, he called for a servant. Within less than a minute, an old butler with a long mustache knocked and entered.

 

“Pavil, bring some first-aid ointment.”

 

“Should I call a doctor?”

 

“No, it’s not that serious.”

 

“Yes, young master.”

 

Ignoring Lisbell’s protests that she was fine, Ulrich firmly applied the ointment to her neck. The sensation of the salve spreading felt strange and unexplainable.

 

“Hm, no licking your neck today after applying the medicine.”

 



 

“Is it safe for humans?”

 

If he was certain it was harmless, he seemed ready to lick even this medicated neck ravenously. Even with the servant still there, he didn’t hold back his words. Lisbell pushed his arm away and widened her eyes.

 

“Please answer my question first.”

 

“What was your question?”

 

“Now that the funeral is over, can I move around freely?”

 

“Hm.”

 

“I want to visit the hospital where my mother is.”

 

“There’s been no special news from the attendant.”

 

“I want to check with my own eyes.”

 

Ulrich gestured for the butler to leave.

 

Left alone in the bedroom, he lit a cigarette. Exhaling the smoke slowly, he brushed back his hair.

 

“Do you know what my brother’s death means?”

 

“…Not really.”

 

“My brother was the heir. With him gone overnight, what’s the next step?”

 



 

“I, as the second son, must take over the succession.”

 

“And what does that have to do with me?”

 

“I’d love to take you to the hospital, but I’ll be terribly busy starting tomorrow.”

 

“I didn’t ask you to come with me. I can go alone.”

 

He played idly with her messy hair.

 

“Do you know where to go?”

 

“If you tell me the hospital.”

 

“Do you think you can go alone?”

 

“There’s no reason I can’t.”

 

Sucking on his cigarette until his cheeks hollowed, he exhaled and laughed strangely.

 

“It’d be better if I went with you.”

 

“No… I’ll decline.”

 

“Always a fortress except when spreading your legs.”

 

His fingers crawled up her knee.

 

“What about clothes?”

 



 

“You can’t visit the hospital in a slip like this. Right?”

 

When coming to the capital, Lisbell’s clothes were discarded. More precisely, Ulrich disposed of them. Since arriving, she had only worn the slips and robes his secretary provided. It was true she couldn’t go out dressed like this.

 

“I can borrow the maids’ clothes.”

 

“That would be too pitiful.”

 

“…Are you trying to stop me from going?”

 

“Me? No way.”

 



 

“I’m just a bit sad.”

 

Ulrich tucked her gray hair behind her ear. He kissed her exposed cheek deeply.

 

“You won’t even consider my offer to go together.”

 

“I just want to see my mother immediately, and you said you’d be busy for a while.”

 

“Don’t pretend to care about me. You just don’t want to be with me.”

 

His intention, obvious though it was, was hard to understand. Well, when was he ever comprehensible? Still, he caressed her eye with an unreadable smile.

 

His fingers then touched her lips.

 

“Will you kiss me?”

 



 

“If you do, I promise to prepare clothes for tomorrow and a car to the hospital.”


Ulrich thrust his face forward as if to confront himself, and closed his eyes tightly. Crackle, crackle. In the quietness surrounding the bed, only the sound of the tobacco leaves he was holding burned. Lisbell stood still, facing his sharply visible face even in the dark.

 

With his eyes closed, Ulrich’s eyebrows twitched.

 

“Aren’t you going to do it?”

 

“What does this mean to you?”

 

“I enjoy seeing how much you despise it.”

 

Despite his closed eyes, Ulrich’s voice had a hint of laughter as if he could clearly see Lisbell’s face filled with disgust. Lisbell felt an urge to slap his cheek but didn’t want to complicate the situation by acting on it.

 

“Do it like you would for a fiancé.”

 



 

“Ah, now it’s ex-fiancé.”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“I would love it if you included some tongue.”

 



 

“Hurry up.”

 

Lisbell clenched her fists tightly. She felt something wrapping around her neck again, which had just been treated. Her breathing became shallow, and her chest tightened. She wanted to scratch her neck wildly, knowing it wouldn’t help. It was an abnormal behavior caused by psychological erosion.

 

Just think about Mother.

 

It had already been a week since she last saw her mother. The vividness of the final memory was torturous. Her frail figure leaning against a tree as if dead, or before that, barely walking through the rain. No, before that… her mother, sincerely grieving and angry amidst many truths Lisbell confessed in desperation.

 

She shouldn’t have said anything.

 

She should have kept quiet and swallowed it down.

 

If she had… would things be different now?

 

It was a useless regret. Given the situation, Lisbell had to take responsibility for her mother until the end. So, she wanted to see her condition as soon as possible.

 

Holding onto this thought, Lisbell brought her lips to Ulrich’s. It was hardly a kiss, more like a mere contact.

 

She knew she had to act quickly to satisfy the vile man, but her uncomfortable state made it hard to think clearly. Her insides felt twisted in different directions. Initiating physical contact with him brought a dizzying feeling.

 

“…Mm…!”

 

Her body was pushed back. Ulrich, who had been still, suddenly embraced her waist. He chuckled between their joined lips.

 

“Still clumsy.”

 

“Ugh…”

 

“But cute, so I’ll let it slide.”

 



 

“It would be better if you came with me.”

 

“I can go alone.”

 

“Then suit yourself.”

 

As he climbed on top of her, he pulled up her slip. She didn’t even bother with underwear anymore since all she did here was have sex with him. Her bare groin was exposed.

 

Her body, accustomed to the intercourse, began to move slowly. Lisbell bit her lip, staring at the ceiling. The usual nausea-like sensation arose. The thought of seeing her mother tomorrow made it bearable.

 



 

Sunlight cutting through the bedding awakened the morning.

 

Lisbell opened her eyes slowly in a daze. Even after a while, there were no signs of anyone else. As he mentioned, he seemed to have left early for his busy schedule starting tomorrow.

 

Rising slightly, she noticed a dress hanging in the makeshift closet. It seemed to be the dress he had promised as a reward for the kiss. Throwing off the blanket, Lisbell quickly grabbed a gown and headed to the closet.

 



 

A white undershirt with a black ribbon and a plain black flared skirt, matching the ribbon.

 

Lisbell touched the blouse’s sleeve. The flowing material was undoubtedly silk, unlike her stiff shirts, which were soft and elegant.

 

Ulrich’s preparation was perfect. Inside the clothes, there were silk stockings and lace gloves, as if for a noblewoman. Feeling it was unnecessary, she omitted the gloves.

 

Seeing it confirmed it didn’t suit her, but with her clothes disposed of, she had no choice.

 

She couldn’t visit her mother in her slip dress from the bedroom, as Ulrich suggested.

 

While sighing, she noticed a note on the mantelpiece. It said to call a servant when she was ready. Unconsciously clutching the note, she looked around. Though he wasn’t there, it felt as if he was watching her every move, giving her chills.

 

She hesitated but pulled the bell rope to leave for the hospital quickly. After a moment, the door opened with a knock. It was the old butler, Pavil, who had brought the medicine yesterday.

 

“I plan to visit the hospital where my mother is admitted.”

 

“I have been instructed by the second young master. The car is ready, please follow me.”

 

Lisbell followed the butler, who treated her like a family member, feeling uneasy. Now she could finally take a proper look at the inside of the Altarhart estate. The first day she arrived, it was too foggy to see anything clearly, and she wasn’t in the mood to look.

 

The bedroom was luxurious, but seeing the hallway and other spaces, it seemed normal for such an estate. It made her understand how the Marniha villa could be merely a ‘villa.’

 

“The mansion is still in disarray despite the funeral of Master Gwen being over. To avoid drawing attention, we have arranged for you to leave through the back gate.”

 

The butler said as he opened the door to a luxurious car. His politeness felt excessive and made her feel sick, as if she had a special relationship with Ulrich.

 

Nodding slightly, she got into the car.

 

“Philip, the driver, will guide you once you arrive at the hospital.”

 

The door closed. The car moved, the gravel under the fountain crunching as the wheels rolled. The car quickly left the townhouse.

 

Entering the main road, the buildings around them grew larger.

 

The path along the calmly flowing river was unfamiliar.

 

The trees lining the streets were colorful, fitting for autumn, and the grand fountain beneath the majestic statue sprayed water high.

 

They passed a park with a central blue clock tower and scattered benches, and restaurants and coffee houses, preparing for business, opened their terraces early, creating a lively atmosphere.

 

After taking in the unfamiliar sights, the car stopped in front of a building.

 

“We’ve arrived.”

 

Philip, the driver, introduced himself and got out, leading the way. Following him, Lisbell quietly clenched her hands.

 

Had her mother woken up since arriving in the capital? If so, what did she remember? Did she remember trying to escape with her? Had her condition improved? Was it the same? The capital’s medical skills should be far better than those of a small town, but if there was still no improvement, what should she do…

 

Lost in thought, she noticed the surroundings had become eerily quiet. She looked up. This place felt different from the usual ward with patients and nurses.

 

In the distance, there was a double door. A woman sitting in front, handling paperwork, stood up sensing their approach.

 

Philip explained their visit. The woman, after a brief wait, went inside the double doors and soon returned. She looked around as if searching for someone.

 

“Did you come with Ulrich Altarhart?”

 

“No.”

 

“Then, unfortunately, visiting is not allowed.”

 

Lisbell was taken aback by the unexpected refusal. She opened her mouth to speak but only managed to stammer, not understanding.

 

“I’m here to see my mother.”

 

“Yes, I confirmed your purpose of visiting Helen Osborne.”

 

“But how can you deny a family member a visit…”

 

“I’m sorry, but visits are only allowed when accompanied by Ulrich Altarhart.”


I don’t know what kind of absurd situation this is. Feeling her mind heavy and tangled, Lisbell took a step towards the woman.

 

“I don’t understand. I am the family of the patient, not Mr. Altahart. So why can I only visit if he’s present?”

 

“That’s the policy.”

 

“What kind of policy?”

 

As she shot back the question, the woman glanced awkwardly at the double doors behind her.

 

“It won’t matter what you say to me. If you want to visit Helen Osborne, please accompany Mr. Ulrich Altahart.”

 

Even if she didn’t know exactly what was going on, one thing was clear: the woman had no intention of stepping aside. As despair began to engulf her mind, Lisbell suddenly remembered the conversation she had with Ulrich last night.

 

“It would be better if you go with me.”

 

“Still, it would be better if you go with me.”

 

Now she understood why the man had been so compliant. He had foreseen this. For some reason, he knew that she wouldn’t be able to see even a strand of her mother’s hair if she came to the hospital alone.

 

Lisbell pressed her lips together and looked past the woman at the double doors.

 

“Is my mother really in there?”

 

“Yes, she is registered as a patient.”

 

“Is she okay? Is there anything wrong with her?”

 

“I’m sorry, but I cannot disclose any information about the patient.”

 

Her stomach churned.

 

This wasn’t much better than when she was in Marnia. No matter how good the treatment, what good was it if she couldn’t verify it with her own eyes?

 

Though she was filled with self-reproach, that was all. No matter how she felt, the double doors remained firmly closed. There was only one way to open them: by coming with Ulrich.

 

With a bitter taste in her mouth, Lisbell had no choice but to leave the hospital.

 

Back at the mansion, having returned in the car driven by Philip, Lisbell was consumed by a sense of helplessness she had never felt before. Even during her time in Marnia, she often felt useless, but never as despondent as this.

 

It was because she kept feeling like she had made a terrible mistake.

 

The thought that her mother’s life was now completely in Ulrich Altahart’s hands filled her with a dizzying anxiety.

 

Despite being the sole guardian, she was denied visitation rights that were easily granted to him. The name thrust in front of her every time she tried to see her mother was Ulrich’s.

 

Is there any way out of this situation?

 

“…Ugh.”

 

Suddenly, she felt something stuck in her chest. Clutching her chest, Lisbell staggered and collapsed onto the edge of the bed. On the bed that was far too large for her frame, she curled up and scratched at her neck.

 

No matter how many times she clawed at her skin, the feeling didn’t go away. Gasping for breath like someone on the verge of death, she suddenly smelled a faint scent of blood.

 

She raised her trembling hand. There was cold blood caked under her nails. All sorts of troubling thoughts crowded in. Her mind became chaotic, like a messy sketchbook.

 

“When that happens, sometimes the best thing to do is not to think at all.”

 

Yet, she would lose all her strength in an instant, recalling those words that had been planted inside her like brainwashing.

 

Don’t think….

 

Is it really that I think too much?

 

Is that why my head hurts so much?

 

Lethargy gradually consumed her consciousness.

 

Lisbell wiped her hand on the pristine sheets. After repeating this several times, she closed her eyes. Severe exhaustion brought sleep to the brink. It felt like she was sinking into water.

 



 

A touch on her neck disturbed her sleep. Unlike in the morning, she didn’t furrow her brow. It was already night, with only a few lights dimly illuminating the dark surroundings.

 

At first, she only recognized the presence in front of her as a silhouette, but it soon became clearer.

 

“This makes the treatment feel pointless.”

 

Ulrich, fiddling with her neck, chided. Something sticky was applied as his hand moved. Then she realized he was applying ointment, just like the previous night.

 

Looking at him with eyes darkened by the night, she spoke in a slightly hoarse voice.

 

“I went to the hospital but couldn’t see my mother.”

 

“That’s why I told you. It’s better if you go with me.”

 

As expected, he wasn’t surprised at all.

 

“…Why didn’t you tell me?”

 

“Because I’ve experienced it myself.”

 

Ulrich, who had crouched beside the bed to match her height, turned slightly. Running low on ointment, he squeezed out some more. He applied it to her neck and leisurely met her gaze. His eyes, which blended into the dark atmosphere, were both beautiful and eerie.

 

“Lisbell, because you think too much, it’s faster for you to understand things by experiencing them.”

 



 

“If I had told you the truth, would you have believed me?”

 

He chuckled softly.

 

“No, you would have just gotten upset and made things difficult for me, like before.”

 

Lisbell clenched the blanket under her hand.

 

“…She’s my mother.”

 

“I know.”

 

“She’s my mother, so why can’t I see her?”

 

“That’s a bit off. It’s not that you can’t see her.”

 



 

“You can see her if I’m with you.”

 

“But I’m her guardian.”

 

“Ha, do you really think so?”

 

His laugh was forced. It was nothing more or less than a sneer.

 

That’s why Lisbell couldn’t accept even the touch of his hand treating her neck. She had read somewhere that one method of torture involves inflicting wounds, then treating them, and then wounding the same spot again. Perhaps he intended to torment her in that way.

 

“Now, I’m your mother’s guardian, Lisbell.”

 



 

“If I’ve saved her twice, I should at least be able to play that role, shouldn’t I?”

 

“…I want to see my mother.”

 

“Later.”

 

“Later when?”

 

“When my situation calms down.”

 



 

“Well, depending on how you behave, I might change my mind. I’m quite fickle, you know.”

 

“Behave…?”

 

“If you act nicely, I might make time for you.”

 

Not knowing exactly what he meant by acting nicely, but knowing that it would likely be something she could never willingly do given how he had tormented her in various ways, Lisbell looked at him with a sense of desolation. As he wiped his fingers smeared with ointment residue, he suddenly laughed.

 

“The clothes suit you better than I thought.”

 

There was a sticky satisfaction in his leisurely gaze. It was the exact opposite of her feelings, so she couldn’t help but speak her mind.

 

“I don’t think so.”

 

“If I want to take them off right now, they must suit you.”

 



 

“If I have time, should we go shopping for clothes together?”

 

“If we have time, it would be better to visit my mother first.”

 

Ulrich, who was still fully dressed in his business attire from tie to cufflinks, stood up.

 

“Let me just tell you that this attitude is not at all attractive.”

 

Taking off his jacket, Ulrich spoke.

 

“Shall we eat first? I heard from Pavel that you skipped meals all day. I haven’t eaten yet either. Let’s go down together; I’ll show you around the mansion.”

 

Lisbell slowly sat up. Although she wanted to stay in the room, realizing that her chance to see her mother depended on Ulrich made it difficult. Coupled with what he had just said, she had no choice but to get out of bed.

 

Although she wanted to walk as far away from him as possible, he held her waist as they moved, making it impossible. Practically leaning against him, she barely noted the locations of the study, the reception room, the indoor pool, and the terrace-attached tea room before arriving at their destination: the dining room.

 

Contrary to her expectation that it would be empty, as Ulrich had led her confidently, there were already people inside, illuminated by the chandelier’s light.

 

Two men and women. Lisbell hesitated as she saw them.

 

“Oh my, Mother.”

 

A beautiful woman with honey-blonde hair turned her head elegantly. Her eyes, exactly like Ulrich’s, looked this way—blue-gray, beautiful yet eerie.


Next to her sat a handsome man with captivating red hair. Though their relationship was unclear, the atmosphere was peculiar.

 

“I didn’t expect to see you here,” he said, while Lisbell boldly walked into the dining room she didn’t dare enter easily.

 

“It’s been so long since I saw you in the dining room. You always eat in your bedroom.”

 

Not only was he undeterred, but he also headed straight for the spot opposite the two seated individuals. A quietly appearing butler pulled out a chair for him, and he sat, sending a questioning glance towards Lisbell, who was still standing by the door.

 

Lisbell approached him hesitantly, as if walking on a thorny path, clutching her skirt.

 

“Didn’t you say that was a privilege exclusive to a lady?”

 

“It’s enough to enjoy such privileges in the bright morning. Staying in the bedroom until evening would make the servants see you as too lazy.”

 

The lady calmly responded to her son’s pointed remark, her gaze now fixed on the approaching Lisbell.

 

Lisbell felt suffocated under the scrutinizing stares of four floating blue-gray eyes. As soon as she sat on the chair the butler had pulled out, she met the lady’s piercing gaze. Despite its gentle color, it was sharp enough to make her spine tingle.

 

“Pavil, what are you doing?” Ulrich said, looking at the butler holding the decanter.

 

“You should send away uninvited guests who don’t belong here.”

 

There was no doubt who he was referring to—the handsome man with red hair sitting next to the lady.

 

“Uninvited guest? Are you referring to the unfamiliar young lady sitting next to you?” the lady pointedly remarked, her gaze still fixed on Lisbell.

 

“I’m talking about that leech who has no shame and flatters my mother,” Ulrich retorted, disparaging his mother’s lover. The atmosphere quickly turned tense. Despite four people being present, no one spoke, and the air grew heavy. Only the hosts of the house remained composed.

 

The lady sighed softly.

 

“If you want to discuss qualifications, I won’t stop you, but I wonder if you have the right to be so confident, Ulrich. I have never seen the young lady sitting next to you before. How should I interpret a stranger sitting in this mansion’s dining room?”

 

“Well, I think our perspectives are a bit different.”

 

“Different? How?”

 

“I’m single, but you’re married.”

 



 

“I’m not such an ungrateful son that I can look favorably on my mother’s lover who has shamelessly taken my father’s place.”

 

As the mother and son exchanged tense words, the food began to be served one by one. Lisbell held her breath in the heavy atmosphere, wondering if she could even eat in such a situation.

 

Ulrich, having casually sipped from his glass, narrowed his eyes at the handsome man across from him.

 

“You seem to be around for quite a while this time. What do you like so much about him?”

 



 

“Is it his good looks? His body? Or… is it because he’s more capable in bed than he looks?”

 

He wasn’t the type to get drunk easily after just one sip. Hence, his words were carefully considered, and in this sense, he was truly unrestrained. His tone was refined, but his words were enough to humiliate someone. The lady sighed again.

 

“Julian.”

 

The red-haired man responded promptly to the call.

 

“Yes, ma’am.”

 

“You should go upstairs now.”

 

With that one sentence, Julian stood up without hesitation. He bent over and kissed the back of the lady’s hand with a light smack. His actions seemed oddly frivolous, not weighted with genuine experience but rather like he was mimicking the nobility he had observed.

 

Julian, having finished his farewell to the lady, walked towards the door.

 

Before leaving, he exchanged a brief, unreadable glance with Lisbell, leaving a strangely uncomfortable impression as he exited.

 

“Now that Julian is gone, shouldn’t you also send her away?” the lady said.

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“I mean the young lady sitting next to you. Are you going to keep her here?”

 

“Even if I send her away, she needs to eat first.”

 

Ulrich responded indifferently, pulling a few plates toward Lisbell to encourage her to eat. He himself only sipped from his glass, causing Lisbell to feel nauseated.

 

It was inevitable that the lady, observing this from up close, would make a remark.

 

“I don’t know how you can be so selfish.”

 

“Indeed, I wonder who I take after,” Ulrich replied nonchalantly.

 



 

“It certainly doesn’t seem to be Father…”

 

The lady sighed, seemingly exasperated, and signaled the butler with her eyes. The approaching butler refilled her glass. The lady glanced at Lisbell, who was awkwardly forking her food.

 

“What’s your name?”

 

“Lisbell Osborne.”

 

“How do you know my son?”

 

“We met in Marnia.”

 

“…Ulrich. Is the young lady unable to speak for herself? Do you have to answer for her?”

 

Ulrich responded calmly to his mother’s pointed reprimand.

 

“She’s pregnant. I have to help her out.”

 

“…What?”

 

The lady’s shock quickly turned to confusion as Lisbell erupted in a fit of coughing. The bread piece she had been swallowing seemed almost to come back up as she stared wide-eyed at Ulrich.

 

He casually continued to slice her meat while smiling at her.

 

“I told you before, didn’t I? She’s pregnant.”

 



 

“With triplets.”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“Aren’t you happy? You always said you wanted grandchildren soon. Now you have three at once. It’s a family blessing. It might even be a gift from Gwen.”

 

Ulrich, having effectively silenced his mother, went a step further and gently touched Lisbell’s stomach. Even though her belly was flat, his act was so convincing that even Lisbell momentarily wondered if she was indeed pregnant. After a brief reflection on their encounters, she knew it was impossible, as their intimate moments had mostly involved withdrawal.

 

Seeing Lisbell’s shocked expression, the lady quickly realized her son was spouting nonsense again.

 

As if to say more, she pursed her lips but deemed it pointless and rose from her seat. The butler helped adjust her shawl.

 

“Yes, I forgot that sometimes your stubbornness surpasses Gwen’s. My beloved son, you may know best, but make sure no rumors spread outside.”

 

“I will be as thorough as you, Mother.”

 

“I mean it. Did you not think to cover her neck when bringing her here?”

 

Lisbell hurriedly pulled her disheveled gray hair over her neck. Although it now covered her nape, it was too late.

 

“Remember, eyes are watching you.”

 

“Yes, have sweet dreams.”

 

“You don’t need to push me out.”

 

The lady, having sternly scolded her stubborn son, left the dining room, her heels clicking on the floor.

 

After the storm, an uncomfortable silence filled the room. Lisbell, still dazed, looked at Ulrich. He continued eating nonchalantly. Noticing her stare, he lazily turned his head, his gaze as sharp as his mother’s, sweeping over Lisbell’s nape.

 

“Hmm… Are you worried my sexual preferences might seem violent?”

 

Muttering to himself, Ulrich gestured to the food on Lisbell’s plate.

 

“Don’t just sit there, eat. Unless you actually want to get pregnant.”

 

The repeated mention of pregnancy startled Lisbell. She flinched at the chilling sensation.

 

“The food is drugged.”

 



 

“I don’t welcome children either.”

 

That was the first bit of reassuring news she’d heard.

 

Finally, Lisbell moved her hands, cutting the meat into small pieces and eating it. The environment and people were far from comfortable, and she could hardly taste the food, but she forced herself to eat, thinking it was a means to avoid pregnancy.

 

Inside, the only sound that occasionally broke the silence was the clinking of dishes.

 

Beside the man leisurely sipping his drink, Lisbell recalled the conversation that had filled this space a little while ago. The sharp, pointed sentences aimed at each other were not something one would expect from a normal relationship.

 

Strictly speaking… it wasn’t something she cared about. No matter what happened to them, it had nothing to do with her. Lisbell just remembered her mother, whom she couldn’t see today despite visiting the hospital.

 

Just as she was not yet acclimated to the vast Laurent mansion, her mother would be utterly bewildered if she regained consciousness.

 

Would the hospital staff explain things properly to her? Or would they neglect her, thinking it was someone else’s problem? If that happened, how confused would her mother be….

 

Once the thought crossed her mind, her worries grew uncontrollably. She kept picturing her mother, sitting pale as a sheet in the pouring rain. Thump Thump Thump… her relentless heartbeat slowing down.

 

Was there no way to help?

 

No matter what she said, the man remained relaxed, as if he was deaf. Even though he acted like a generous person, his demeanor, which seemed to take responsibility for her mother to bind her, was hard to believe.

 

Especially since her mother, just before fainting again, had heard everything about the situation from her. Knowing that they were still relying on Ulrich’s help, despite remembering him, would confuse her mother greatly. Lisbell needed a way to reassure her.

 

“…I just want to ask, just in case.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Could you deliver a letter to my mother?”

 

“A letter?”

 

“If my mother has regained consciousness, she must be very shocked by the sudden change in her surroundings.”

 

Ah, he let out a short exclamation.

 

As if thinking about something, he tilted his glass, then soon smiled smoothly.

 

“Sure, I’ll deliver it.”

 



 

“It’s not a difficult thing.”

 

Lisbell almost thanked him for a moment. And she was appalled at herself for it.

 

The human heart was so fickle. The one who orchestrated all this misery was Ulrich. There was no doubt about that.

 

Yet she felt gratitude for his trivial kindness of delivering a letter. Her spine tingled unpleasantly.

 

“So, say thank you.”

 

She felt like she was encountering the version of herself he had once manipulated. Though she believed she was struggling to break free from his grip, the unsettling feeling that she was being tamed by him crept in.

 

It was absurd. Lisbell weakly shook her head, suppressing the words that almost slipped out.

 

The urge to speak, buried inside, made her neck itch as if a living creature was wriggling there. If no one was watching, she might have used all ten fingers to tear at her flesh.

 

Realizing she had just finished eating, she gritted her teeth and endured. The dinner setting was as grueling as that.

 



 



 

Wearing only a slip that revealed her body’s curves, Lisbell stared intently at the mantelpiece in her bedroom.

 

This was her current morning routine.

 

Upon waking, she didn’t even think about properly dressing but went to the mantelpiece in a daze. She checked if the letter she had left the previous night was still there. The letter she had painstakingly written in the study vanished every morning. Ulrich, who left early, likely took it.

 

From the day after she cautiously brought up the topic in the dining room, this routine became common.

 

The disappearing letters each day meant that Ulrich was delivering them to her mother. Yet, she didn’t know why she felt a sharp alertness each time she found the empty mantelpiece.

 

It wasn’t a feeling of relief. It was a hard-to-describe sense of foreboding that gnawed at her brain.

 

Considering what she had suffered at the hands of this man, it was only natural that she couldn’t fully accept this seemingly smooth process.

 

But what good was feeling ominous?

 

All she could do was this.

 

Write letters, leave them on the mantelpiece that had become an unspoken agreed spot, and confirm with her own eyes that they were gone.

 

Even if she harbored suspicions, there was nothing she could do. If she unwittingly annoyed Ulrich, the day she could see her mother might be further delayed. Rash actions were forbidden.

 

Regret always hit hard.

 

If only that rainy day, when she considered abandoning her mother and felt like a monster, hadn’t happened.

 

If that incident, which left her with an unshakeable guilt even after coming to the capital, hadn’t occurred….

 

So many thoughts….

 

Was she really like that?

 

So now, was she ruminating over things she couldn’t change?

 

“…Ah.”

 

Suddenly realizing her hand was hovering around her neck out of habit, Lisbell headed to the bathroom before her deepening thoughts could add more fatigue.

 

She approached the wardrobe, holding her dripping wet hair. The wardrobe, once filled with nothing but sensual slips, now held several new blouses and skirts, bought by Ulrich since that day.

 

As if taking a new hobby in dressing her up like a doll, he filled the wardrobe with clothes to his taste. Ulrich’s dressing room was separate from the bedroom, so everything in there was Lisbell’s.

 

Picking the neatest outfit, Lisbell left the bedroom. Writing the daily letter in the study was now part of her morning routine. She moved silently towards the study she had just grown accustomed to.

 



 

Rounding the corner, Lisbell encountered an unexpected scene.

 

A child with a tear-streaked face clung to a pillar, and a red-haired man crouched in front of the child.

 

Neither of them were complete strangers.

 

The child had been seen among the gathered family at Gwen Altahart’s funeral, and the red-haired man, Julian, was the one who stood beside Mrs. Altahart when she accidentally walked into the dining room.

 

Although not well-acquainted, Lisbell couldn’t just walk by. The scene looked as if Julian was bullying the child.

 

The child’s face, pressed against the pillar with evident fear, and Julian’s hand tapping the child’s shoulder, appeared quite menacing.

 

As she hesitated, her eyes met the tearful eyes of the child. The sight reminded her of the orphans at Misley Orphanage, where she spent time with Theodore. The child seemed about their age.

 

“Excuse me.”

 

By the time she realized it, she had already approached them.

 

“What are you doing right now?”

 

Julian turned his head. Seeing Lisbell, his eyes widened in surprise, and he straightened up.

 

“Hello.”

 

He greeted her nonchalantly.

 

Lisbell watched him silently, then glanced at the child. The child, also surprised by her sudden intervention, stared at her with clear, teary eyes. The child’s hair was a bright platinum blonde, just like the hair of the man she had clung to last night.

 

“This child, despite knowing me, tried to pass by without greeting. So, I was teaching manners personally.”

 

“Is that so?”

 

Julian responded with a shrug. Lisbell sighed softly.

 

“I don’t think your intentions were bad. But it could easily be misunderstood.”

 

“Misunderstood?”

 

“It looked like you were bullying this child.”

 



 

“Look at the child’s face.”

 

Pointing at the tear-streaked face, Julian turned his head, embarrassed. Lisbell stepped closer to the pillar, partially shielding the child.

 

“Education is necessary, but I don’t think pushing the child like this is needed.”

 

“Pushing? I think that’s a misunderstanding.”

 

Julian, feeling awkward, rubbed his neck and stepped back.

 

“If someone else sees this, it could complicate things. I’ll leave now. But I want to emphasize that what you saw is a misunderstanding.”

 

“Yes, I hope so too.”

 

Julian turned away with an inscrutable smile. When he kissed the back of the lady’s hand in the dining room, he seemed courteous and sincere, but now, facing him separately, he had the aura of a common thug from the back alleys.

Lisbell stayed in place until he turned the corner and disappeared. Finally, she turned around only after he vanished.

 

The terrified child was still clinging to the pillar. She couldn’t even wipe away the tear pooling in his eyes, as if paralyzed by fear. Feeling sorry for him, Lisbell bent down and sat.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

When she spoke in a small voice, the child jumped as if he had been struck by a spark. Hiccups. Soon after, her shivering turned into hiccups. Despite approaching as gently as possible, even that seemed too much for the child.

 

Lisbell wasn’t unfamiliar with such a sight. When she stayed at the orphanage for volunteer work, a newly admitted child had been in a similar state. The child had come to the orphanage after being intentionally neglected by her mother in the busy streets one morning.

 

At first, the child struggled to adapt to the orphanage but gradually opened up to the kind adults and other orphans in the same situation. Now, she had become so cheerful that she took the lead in organizing games.

 

“Lisbell! Look here.”

 

“Hey, hey, Lisbell. What is a fallen apple?”

 

That child was Mary, the bob-haired orphan who approached her and handed her an apple too beautiful to be called a fallen apple.

 

That child’s actions reminded her of Mary’s early days. With a nostalgic smile, Lisbell reached out her hand to the child. The child, who couldn’t even wipe away his tears, shuddered and fled in the opposite direction.

 

“Hey…!”

 

Lisbell tried to chase after him belatedly, but the child had already run far away. Whatever treatment he had endured, his defense mechanisms were incredibly strong. It made him feel even more out of place in this mansion, which was filled with confidence and arrogance.

 

Lonely and desolate….

 

Lisbell sometimes felt this way because it was like seeing her own shadow—unable to fit in or blend harmoniously, always out of place.

 

Standing alone in the hallway, Lisbell swallowed her breath and headed to the library, her original destination.

 

She wrote and sealed today’s letter. Although that was all she had to do, she didn’t return to her bedroom.

 

She hated her bedroom because it only made her feel her helplessness. The memory of the previous night also left an unpleasant aftertaste. It was a sensation she would never get used to. That’s why she preferred to read in the library rather than her room, even though she could take the book with her.

 

While turning the pages of her book in a corner seat, hoping to avoid anyone, she felt a presence in the once quiet space. She glanced around but saw no one. Instead, a long shadow on the floor indicated the presence of a child, not an adult.

 

Curious, Lisbell put down her book and approached the source. Again, a startled figure darted away. She saw the back of the fleeing figure clearly this time.

 

Had the child returned after running away?

 

She wanted to ask, but the child had long since disappeared.

 

Although a bit concerned, Lisbell didn’t go looking for the child. After all, she wasn’t in a position to prioritize others in this grand mansion, where even taking care of herself was a challenge.

 

She tried to ignore it, but it wasn’t easy.

 



 

As Lisbell headed to the library like any other day, she turned around.

 

A child who had been following her in secret quickly hid behind a pillar.

 

Standing still and waiting, she saw the child’s small head peeking out, driven by curiosity. When their eyes met, the child flinched again but didn’t completely hide this time.

 

Lisbell smiled awkwardly at the child.

 

From that day on, the child followed Lisbell wherever she went.

 

It started with the child revealing their presence as a shadow in the library and gradually progressed to approaching Lisbell visibly. However, the child never came closer than a certain distance, as if drawing an invisible line.

 

Today, Lisbell knelt down, looking into the child’s curious, light brown eyes. As Lisbell lowered herself to the child’s level, the child clung more tightly to the pillar. With a gentle smile, Lisbell gestured for the child to come closer.

 

The child shook her head weakly. When Lisbell mouthed, “Why?” the child hesitated. Lisbell, smiling a bit more, gestured again for the child to come closer. The child slowly stepped out from behind the pillar.

 

Waiting patiently to avoid scaring him, Lisbell watched as the child took small steps forward. Soon, the child was within arm’s reach, though he still avoided eye contact nervously.

 

Lisbell carefully reached out. The child flinched but didn’t run away this time. Lisbell waited until the child’s trembling subsided, then gently patted his hair.

 

“What’s your name?”

 

Lisbell asked softly, but the child bit his lip and shook his head again. Unsure of the meaning, Lisbell tilted her head in confusion. Was the child unable to speak? She wondered.

 

At that moment, footsteps approached from the side.

 

The child, who had just calmed down, was startled like a scared rabbit, shook off Lisbell’s hand, and ran in the opposite direction. Watching the child’s retreating back, Lisbell looked down at her own palm.

 

The child was gone, but the warmth she had felt remained in her hand.

 



 

“Ah…!”

 

Sweat trickled down her upturned chin. Her chest, pressed against the man’s, rubbed against his skin. Ulrich, who had been thrusting into her with relentless force, withdrew at the last moment and rubbed his flesh against her spread thighs.

 

With a heavy breath, Ulrich found Lisbell’s lips and kissed her deeply, intertwining their tongues as he continued to move against her soft thighs. The thick fluid spilled from the tip of his throbbing cock.

 

“Uh…”

 

Lisbell’s platinum hair rustled down. Her slip had long since been discarded, leaving her loosely wrapped in a robe that barely covered her heaving breasts.

 

The sensual waves in the darkness continued as her body writhed. It was impossible to stop, driven by the man’s tongue licking her entrance directly.

 

Ulrich enjoyed the tightness of her trembling walls, reaching deep inside her with his tongue after bringing her to climax.

 

Her soft inner walls squeezed the warm flesh of his tongue, sucking it in hungrily. Every time he swirled his tongue inside her, wet sounds filled the room. He didn’t mind the increasing moisture, swallowing it down his throat.

 

“Ugh… uh.”

 

Lisbell covered her mouth with the back of her hand. Her ragged breaths came out in rapid succession. She didn’t want to react, but her body, already surrendered to pleasure, writhed beneath him in joy.

 

Ulrich, who was fervently licking her below, finally raised his head when his face was drenched. His red tongue slid out of her, gleaming in the dim light, dripping with her fluids, enhancing his provocative image.

 

He licked his lips and inserted two fingers into her mouth.

 

“Ugh…”

 

“You forgot to release your excitement here.”

 



 

“Should I spit?”

 

Lisbell’s face twisted slightly. Reading her discomfort, Ulrich smirked and swirled his fingers inside her mouth, pushing them so deep that she gagged before he pulled them out, now coated in her saliva.

 

Turning on her side, Lisbell blinked at the clock. It was close to two in the morning.

 

A time that no longer felt unexpected.

 

Busy with succession work, Ulrich often returned to the mansion at such late hours and frequently woke Lisbell, already asleep, with his impromptu sexual advances.


When the heavy heat in her belly and the chilling tension in her body woke her up, Ulrich’s weight was pressing down on her again.

 

Ulrich would strip her as he pleased, thrust as he wished, and continue until he was satisfied. As a result, Lisbell felt completely drained. Trapped in this mansion, her only activity was sex with him, and even that left her exhausted for the entire day.

 

There was also a deep sense of self-loathing. Reflecting on her past, she couldn’t shake the feeling of being a tool for a man’s sexual desires.

 

A chilling voice echoed in her mind, urging her not to think further. Lisbell buried her face deeply into the pillow, not wanting to feel more pain.

 

Ulrich, downing a glass of whiskey, removed the blanket as he went to wash up. The sound of running water from the bathroom tempted her to continue her disturbed sleep, but surprisingly, her mind was clear. Only her body felt heavy and sore.

 



 

Lisbell rubbed her cheek against the pillow and brought her clenched hand in front of her eyes.

 

She recalled the platinum hair that had lightly brushed against her hand. Hair that resembled Ulrich’s but left a vastly different impression.

 

As she idly recalled this, Ulrich returned from his shower. Still with work to do, he sat at a desk lit by a lamp, reviewing documents. Listening to the rustling papers, Lisbell cautiously spoke up.

 

“There was a child in the mansion.”

 

Ulrich, who had been turning a page with an unlit cigarette in his mouth, looked at her.

 

“Did you meet them?”

 

Did she meet them? It was hard to say. After she had helped the child in distress, the child had followed her around, but she didn’t feel the need to mention it in detail. Facing Ulrich’s sharp gaze, she felt she shouldn’t.

 

“Where?”

 

“I saw them while passing through the corridor… by chance.”

 

“Did you greet them?”

 

“No. If it’s a sensitive matter, you can pretend you didn’t hear it.”

 

“It’s not that sensitive.”

 

“…Who are they?”

 

“Gwen’s illegitimate child.”

 

She had suspected it. Just by their hair color, she could guess they were related to the family.

 

Also, Julian’s behavior made more sense now. From their previous conversation, she had gathered he was Mrs. Altahart’s lover… or something similar. Was it okay for someone like him to treat a family member so poorly? Perhaps he took advantage of the child’s ambiguous status as an illegitimate child.

 

“Is the child only in this mansion?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Why?”

 

“I just explained why.”

 



 

“Because they are illegitimate.”

 

“Then what about their education…?”

 

“Well, that’s a matter for the future.”

 

“A matter for the future?”

 

“It means it’s too early to decide their fate. Just because they’re Gwen’s child doesn’t mean they can be formally recognized due to their mother’s poor lineage.”

 

“…Then why bring them here?”

 

“Just in case. Even if they’re only half-related, there might be a need to accept them as a family member depending on the situation. Especially since my mother is very thorough in these matters.”

 



 

“Leaving them out of sight and later having them come back with a claim to the family based on blood relations would be troublesome. It’s better to keep an eye on them from the start.”

 

In other words, because they were an illegitimate child, they were left without proper education. If legitimate heirs couldn’t take their place for some reason, the child would be a backup.

 

Considering the family’s honor and authority, it made sense. However, it was sad and bitter that the child, so small that their head barely reached her waist, lived in this vast mansion without proper care.

 

The child had definitely craved affection. They must have never received such attention, which is why they followed her around so eagerly. The more she thought about it, the more it bothered her.

 

“…I was just wondering, but.”

 

Stop.

 

She had to stop this unnecessary meddling here.

 

What right did she have to take care of someone else in her situation? She had no room for such leisure.

 

But her mouth wouldn’t stop.

 

“Would it be difficult for me to take care of the child?”

 

“Huh?”

 

Lisbell hesitated as she sat up. The warmth she felt from the child kept resurfacing, a feeling she thought she couldn’t experience in Altahart’s mansion.

 

“Even if it’s just basic education….”

 



 

“No matter the reason, leaving a child like that is… too pitiful.”

 

Her heart pounded. Her hands and feet felt cold. Her body, exposed due to the fallen blanket, didn’t cause this chill. It was the anxiety within her.

 

She thought it might be presumptuous. If Ulrich felt the same, it would be disastrous for her.

 

She looked up, tense.

 

Ulrich, staring at her with an unreadable expression, chuckled softly.

 

“You said your dream was to be a teacher… You must really like children, Lisbell.”

 



 

“Or is it a sign that you haven’t given up on your former fiancé?”

 

“Huh?” he tilted his head lazily.

 

Lisbell’s shoulders tensed.

 

The forgetfulness that the dire situation urged always came back because of him. Ulrich would sometimes bring up her past with Theodore. Even though she knew it was just a means to mock her, it was hard to stay indifferent.

 

Because it brought back everything from that day.

 

The misunderstanding that she had an affair with Ulrich, which had hurt Theodore’s feelings deeply.

 

The back of her neck itched again. It felt like dozens of insects were crawling up from her feet, gathering in one spot, twisting her nerves and giving her goosebumps. Feeling her neck growing cold, Lisbell clutched it.

 

Then, he spoke.

 

“It seems difficult. The child is under my mother’s jurisdiction.”

 

“…Can’t you persuade her?”

 

“Your assumption is wrong. I have no intention of persuading my mother in the first place.”

 



 

“No need for such useless efforts.”

 

Despite half expecting this, her heart sank. It felt like a footprint, as if someone had stepped on her heart. Disappointment welled up.

 

Ulrich turned away, as if that was the end of the conversation. While she was left in despair, he continued to review his documents as if nothing had happened.

 

Listening to the sound of pages turning, Lisbell turned her head. On the mantelpiece of Carrara marble was a neatly placed letter. It was the one she had written for the day before she fell asleep.

 

“…Then what about me?”

 

Her voice was dry and rough like a drifting sandstorm.

 

“What am I supposed to do?”

 

She lived each day feeling suffocated by helplessness. She couldn’t even meet her original target, her mother, and all she could do was write a daily letter, uncertain if it would ever be properly delivered.

 

Maybe she saw a reflection of herself in the neglected child. They were both in positions where they had to remain here, even though they were deemed useless for now.

 

That helplessness and loneliness.

 

The pitiful feelings she had to endure repeatedly.

 

“Are you telling me to do nothing? I’m a living person. I have a will and I breathe. So I can’t just do nothing. If that’s what you really want, you should have brought a corpse that can’t move.”

 



 

“Or do you want to make me like that?”

 



 

“Do you really… want me to wither and die?”

 

Ulrich turned to her again. His gaze, deeper than usual, erased his usual relaxed demeanor. Perhaps that’s why it felt so cold. That chilling gaze wandered over Lisbell’s tense face.

 

He clicked his tongue and stood up. His long legs quickly brought him to the bed, where he grabbed Lisbell’s chin and lifted it. She didn’t want to follow his arrogant gesture, but she couldn’t resist his strength.

 

“I find this side of Lisbell very annoying.”

 



 

“But also amusing….”

 



 

“I don’t know whether to find it cute or bothersome.”

 

Her neck itched terribly. Lisbell grabbed his wrist.


However, he couldn’t separate himself from me.

 

My mind went blank at the sight of the man’s gleaming eyes right in front of me. They were terrifying, as if one wrong step could lead to a cliff edge. Eyes that seemed to burrow into my mind and consume my brain whole. Lisbell held her breath in front of those piercing eyes.

 

“I don’t want to make you a corpse just yet, so let’s speak kindly to Mother.”

 

He slowly bent his upper body.

 

His sculpted lips gently brushed against Lisbell’s. Though it was a part of a warm human body, all Lisbell could feel was a cold, bleak chill. Despair and pessimism, which she had often felt, came alive vividly.

 

Not long after, their lips parted with a faint sound.

 

When the distance between them increased, his eyes returned to their previous weight. Ulrich, eyes filled with a rough playfulness, let out a short chuckle and kissed Lisbell’s pale cheek.

 

As he moved away, he muttered softly.

 

“Strangely, it feels like I lost this time.”

 



“Here it is.”

The concise butler bowed and then turned away. Watching the departing figure, Lisbell turned her head.

It was the door to a room she had never visited before.

 

It had been a week since she had reluctantly brought up the topic of the child. Today, she was finally going to meet the child officially. Ulrich had somehow succeeded in persuading his Mother.

 

Lisbell placed her hand on the door.

 

As she stayed still, everything around her became as quiet as a dead mouse. Aside from the departing butler, there were no other signs of life.

 

She sincerely wanted to care for the child.

 

To ignore the child that everyone had abandoned felt like abandoning herself. It was almost like an act of suicide.

 

If she had ignored the uncomfortable feeling that habitually squeezed her chest, her deepening blue depression would have only grown worse.

 

But that wasn’t the only reason.

 

The letter that had mysteriously disappeared from the mantelpiece this morning.

 

Lisbell realized that her range of activities had significantly shrunk since moving to the capital. She met no one, and her daily routine was monotonous. Everything was limited to the point where it could be easily defined.

 

This couldn’t go on.

 

Due to Ulrich’s busy schedule, her meetings with Mother were continuously postponed.

 

But she couldn’t let herself get used to it.

 

However, expanding her range of activities was frightening. She wondered if even this was part of Ulrich’s meticulous plan, given his ability to make her feel the value of her name.

 

He was currently Mother’s guardian, and she didn’t want to arouse any unnecessary suspicion. Offending him would not bring any beneficial results.

 

For now, she needed to go along with the situation.

 

She needed to be careful and expand her range without being noticed. The most plausible way to do that was to teach the child. It provided a reasonable excuse to move around the mansion and potentially gather information related to Mother.

 

Creak.

 

She gently pushed the door open.

 

The bedroom, with its neatly arranged furniture and fixtures, felt bleak despite its tidiness. It felt like a sterile, businesslike environment rather than a space maintained with affection. It was similar in structure to Ulrich’s bedroom, but slightly different in that aspect.

 

As she stepped inside with difficulty.

 

Crash!

 

The child, sitting at the table and having a late meal, dropped the fork. The child, thinking it was a servant, looked up and was visibly surprised to see her.

 

But that wasn’t what caught Lisbell’s attention. The child’s situation of having to eat in such a hidden place was very similar to hers.

 

The stiff child soon came to life. Without thinking about picking up the fork, the child got off the chair and hid behind the bedpost. The cautiousness was consistent.

 

Lisbell didn’t rush the child. She lowered her posture to match the child’s eye level, just as she had done in the hallway. She smiled slightly without taking her eyes off the child. The child, who was awkwardly trying to hide behind the thin post, blinked.

 

Lisbell waved her open hand side to side. At her greeting gesture, the child hesitated but eventually mimicked it. Seeing the small hand, Lisbell smiled even brighter.

 

Seeing the wary expression on the child’s face slightly relax, Lisbell gestured for the child to come closer. The child hesitated, moving tentatively, as if afraid of being watched.

 

Finally, the child was close enough for Lisbell to touch. Slowly, she reached out and patted the side of the child’s head. The child flinched but didn’t pull away.

 

“Hello.”

 



 

“What’s your name?”

 

The child shook their head again.

 

“Don’t want to tell me?”

 

“…No.”

 

“What?”

 

“Don’t… have one.”

 

Don’t have a name?

 

The confusion in her mind quickly turned to cold clarity. This too was a form of neglect. No matter how indifferent they were, how could no one give the child a name? A name was fundamental to a person’s identity. It was chosen with care for the hope that it would play a role in the person’s life.

 

In other words, the people in this mansion didn’t care enough to be inconvenienced by the lack of a name for the child.

 

It wasn’t just a materially different world. This place, at the top of the Altahart pyramid, was a space where even the basic humanity expected in people had dried up.

 

“I’m going to take care of you for a while. We’ll be seeing each other every day.”

 

At the unexpected news, the child’s eyes widened.

 

“But without a name, it will be very inconvenient for us. So… I’ll give you a name. Is that okay?”

 

The child hesitated before nodding cautiously.

 

Lisbell thought for a moment. She remembered the orphanage in Misley where she had once stayed. There had been a child who arrived without a name, much like this child. The headmaster had gone to the church and received several names from the pastor.

 

“How about Noah?”

 

One of the names that had been considered but ultimately not given came to mind. As she gently suggested it, the child’s eyes widened with excitement. The child then jumped into Lisbell’s arms, whispering softly, “I like it.”

 

Lisbell patted the child’s head.

 

The warmth she felt was almost pulsating. It was the first time since coming to this mansion that she forgot the itch in her neck.

 



 

Noah was kind and innocent. It seemed it was the first time he received someone’s attention, and although he often didn’t know how to respond, he showed genuine joy. The pure aspects of a child were incredibly endearing.

 

The lessons always took place in Noah’s bedroom.

 

Although Noah was five, he lacked basic education and knowledge. Currently, he was treated worse than dust in the household due to his illegitimate status, but there might come a time when he would need formal education.

 

If that happened, as a noble of high birth, he would likely be sent to a prestigious public school. While gathering books for teaching, Lisbell learned that Ulrich had also attended such a school, increasing the likelihood of this scenario.

 

The more she thought about it, the more she was appalled by the family’s coldness.

 

If that time came, uneducated Noah would struggle to keep up with the other children, causing him great confusion. Yet, judging by their attitude, the household seemed to expect Noah to endure such difficulties on his own.

 

“It’s too cruel.”

 

In that case, he might have been happier living with the mother he never knew. Lisbell realized that blood ties alone were not enough for happiness.

 

Carrying the materials for the lessons, she headed to Noah’s room.

 

“You’ve decided to take care of that child?”

 

The sudden voice startled her. It came from the top of the stairs she was about to descend.

 

Lisbell gathered the items in her arms and looked up at Julian, who was smiling at her. Since their last meeting, his smile had felt increasingly disconcerting.


“Madame’s consent came as quite a surprise.”

 

Step by step, like an actor continuing a play, Julian descended gracefully and stood in front of Lisbell.

 

“Madame rarely reverses a decision once made. So naturally, I thought convincing the second young master would be impossible.”

 

“…Do you have business with me?”

 

Julian shrugged at Lisbell’s tone, which could be perceived as curt by some.

 

“Business? Nothing grandiose. I just thought we might as well introduce ourselves since we ran into each other. After all, both you and I are the lovers of this household’s members.”

 

Lisbell’s fingers tightened around the book she was holding, turning white.

 

“I am not like that. Don’t compare me to you.”

 

“Really?”

 

Julian tilted his head in apparent surprise.

 

“From what I saw in the dining room before, that didn’t seem to be the case.”

 

He pointed to his neck with a strange smile.

 

“Completely covered in bite marks.”

 

The memory of that day flashed back. It wasn’t the first time she had been pointed out. Madame Altahart had also expressed disapproval with a glance at her neck as she left the dining room. Lisbell instinctively covered her neck, which had healed considerably since that day.

 

“We’ll be seeing each other often. It would be awkward just to nod every time, don’t you think? Knowing each other’s names wouldn’t hurt. So, what’s your name? I’m Julian. Julian Scott.”

 

“…Julian, I’m sorry, but I’m really not like that. I’m just here because of a weakness I couldn’t avoid.”

 

She hadn’t intended to converse with him at length, but the assumption that she was unmistakably Ulrich’s lover made her slightly indignant.

 

No matter how much she thought about it, their situations were clearly different. Just remembering the dining room was enough. She had looked like she was being dragged to the slaughterhouse, while Julian comfortably stayed by Madame’s side, dutifully serving her. Though likely for monetary compensation, Julian seemed to have willingly become her lover.

 

Not being in that position, Lisbell’s rebuttal was clumsy.

 

“Weakness? What weakness?”

 

As soon as she saw Julian’s reaction, Lisbell realized her mistake.

 

She bit her lip. Julian’s smile faded as he saw her obvious discomfort.

 

Soon after, he spoke as if in admiration.

 

“The second young master… caught your weakness? My goodness, the great Ulrich did such a senseless thing? A man even married women lined up to be with?”

 

She felt her stomach twist. Julian’s insinuation that Ulrich’s feelings were special for treating her differently from others made her nauseous.

 

“Is your business done? Then I’ll be going.”

 

“Oh, wait. Hold on.”

 

As she hurried to leave, Julian grabbed her arm. When Lisbell looked at him with displeasure, Julian raised both hands in a gesture of surrender.

 

“At least tell me your name before you go. I told you mine.”

 

Sighing, she realized he wouldn’t let go until she told him her name.

 

“Lisbell Osborne.”

 

“Lisbell, Lisbell Osborne.”

 

Julian repeated her name as if memorizing it, then smiled meaningfully.

 

“If you ever need my help, feel free to ask.”

 

“…You’re quite friendly for someone who’s practically a stranger.”

 

“Living under the same roof, we might have to rely on each other sometimes.”

 

Why should that be necessary?

 

Though she couldn’t agree with his logic, she didn’t argue. The more time she spent there, the stronger her desire to leave became.

 

Lisbell nodded curtly and turned away. Glancing back as she walked down the corridor, she saw Julian still watching her. Ignoring his wave, she turned her face forward.

 

As she headed to Noah’s room, she reflected on her conversation with Julian.

 

“Madame rarely reverses a decision once made. So naturally, I thought convincing the second young master would be impossible.”

 

In fact, Lisbell had also been surprised when she heard Madame had given her permission. It wasn’t beneficial for them in any way.

 

Whether due to harsh reality or cold intentions, it was clear they intended to neglect Noah. Keeping him under the family’s control, either for care or surveillance, and discarding him when he became useless was likely their plan. In that sense, they probably felt fulfilling their duty by just providing for Noah’s basic needs.

 

“Such a useless task.”

 

Even Ulrich had said so himself.

 

So it was puzzling. Why would Madame allow something that wasn’t beneficial to them? And how had Ulrich persuaded her?

 



 

Lisbell paused, looking out at the sunlit window.

 

Is there a reason to dwell on it?

 

Thinking too much would only give her a headache. Adapting to the given situation and finding a way to survive was the best she could do.

 

She was destined to leave this place someday. More interest or curiosity was a luxury. A herbivore wondering about a predator’s thoughts would only end up being devoured.

 

Letting go of her thoughts, Lisbell headed to Noah’s room.

 

Behind her footsteps, the sunlight shimmered indifferently.

 

At the same time, the sunlight pouring into the mansion equally illuminated a hotel in the city center.

 

Rubbing his eyes strained from a long meeting, Ulrich entered the tea room in the hotel lobby, adjusting his cufflinks.

 

“Mother?”

 

“She’s already arrived.”

 

Just as Victor reported, his mother was already in the tea room. However, she wasn’t alone. Ulrich’s steps halted.

 

As if reading his movements, Daphne, sitting next to his mother, turned her head while lifting her teacup. Her golden eyes lit up with delight upon seeing him.

 

“Ulrich, come here.”

 

Damn.

 

Realizing he had been deceived, Ulrich let out a small laugh. He wanted to leave immediately, but there were already eyes on him. Being the owner of this hotel and a man of renowned reputation, it wasn’t unusual for him to draw attention.

 

Unable to turn back, Ulrich eventually sat at their table.

 

“The meeting ran long, so I’m a bit late. If you were alone, I might have apologized, but since you have company, it seems unnecessary.”

 

“An apology would suffice, but why don’t you greet Miss Schwaben first?”

 

At his mother’s prompting, Ulrich finally looked at Daphne. Sitting primly like a noble lady, Daphne met his gaze. Ulrich nodded slightly with a formal smile.

 

“It’s been a while, Ulrich.”

 

“Indeed. I never imagined you would be spending time with my mother.”

 

“Surprised by my unannounced visit? Yesterday, Madame invited me to have tea with her, and I was delighted to come.”

 

“It seems so.”

 

Ulrich’s detached reply came with a polite smile as he ordered a coffee.

 

Something touched the back of his hand resting on the sofa armrest. Looking down, he saw Daphne’s delicate, white fingers. She was holding his hand.

 

“I’m sorry about Gwen.”

 

The intimate touch and sincere expression seemed calculated but quickly felt impulsive. Her touch felt subtly sticky.

 

By noble standards, it wasn’t polite. Touching someone without permission was unacceptable. But Daphne Schwaben was never one to think that deeply.

 

Ulrich smirked, finding her consistent.

 

“Are you sincere?”

Chapter 76.

“Yes?”

 

“I asked if you truly thought that.”

 

Daphne’s curious touch halted. Ulrich didn’t take his eyes off her face right in front of him. Daphne, who had initially been silent under his direct gaze, eventually drew back her hand with a faint smile.

 

“Of course. Even though we didn’t spend much time together, he was still my fiancé.”

 

The scent of deceit was strong.

 

Indeed, even she would have felt some relief at Gwen’s death.

 

Those born into noble families enjoyed much wealth and power, but also had responsibilities and duties. Marriage was no exception. In many cases, partners were decided at a very young age or even while still in the womb, especially if family ties were strong. And barring any significant variables, they would eventually marry that chosen partner.

 

The process of Daphne Schwaben becoming Gwen’s fiancée was no different. This meant there was a high probability that Daphne had no say in the matter. It wasn’t unusual. The world they inhabited treated such arrangements as customary and obligatory.

 

The problem was that her fiancé happened to be Gwen Altahart.

 

The eldest son of the Altahart family was notorious for his promiscuity and volatile temperament, coupled with excessive greed.

 

Daphne had already endured significant hardships because of Gwen even before marriage. Ulrich had revealed a scandal involving his brother one morning. As a result of their engagement, not only could one gain more capital and honor, but they could also be dragged into the mud together.

 

Even though the Altahart family quickly took action, the story had already spread within the social circles. Given that it was well-known that their family controlled much of the capital’s media, the scandal seemed even more plausible. Consequently, Daphne’s reputation suffered as well.

 

Ulrich also bore some responsibility for the incident, but he felt no remorse towards Daphne. If there was anyone to blame, it was the now-deceased Gwen. The whole affair wouldn’t have happened if Gwen had not disregarded their wager. Gwen’s irresponsible actions had brought about this trouble.

 

Having gone through such an ordeal, learning about her fiancé’s promiscuous lifestyle, it was not surprising that marriage seemed extremely distasteful to her.

 

“That’s right.”

 

Daphne smiled brightly at his affirming words, as if it was a needless denial. She was a woman whose true feelings were hard to discern. Ulrich shook his head inwardly and picked up the coffee cup on the table.

 

“You two look like a perfect picture together.”

 

The lady watching them from the opposite side suddenly joined in.

 

Ulrich let out a dry laugh as he took a sip of coffee. He couldn’t shake the feeling that she had called him here just to make that statement.

 

Ulrich didn’t often have individual meetings with his mother. They each had their roles, and outside of those duties, there was little time for leisure or rest. Moreover, it was difficult to adjust to his mother’s peculiar nature in a subtle way, so he didn’t particularly enjoy these encounters.

 

However, today’s meeting was prompted by the issue of Gwen’s illegitimate child. As he caressed the coffee cup in his hand, Ulrich looked out the window.

 

“Do nothing? I’m a living person. I have willpower and I breathe. I can’t just sit idly by. If you truly want that, you should have brought a corpse that can’t move.”

 

It was about time for that resilient spirit to stretch its limbs.

 

Persuading his mother to take care of the child was a form of placation. There were many things she shouldn’t know yet. Pressing her continuously would only result in her breaking apart.

 

It was strange. The curiosity that should have stopped at a certain point did not cease, and the more he watched, the more interesting it became. Lately, even the letters placed neatly on the mantle every morning piqued his interest.

 

At this point, he wanted to watch everything.

 

That was why he felt as if he had lost somehow.

 

Could desires and curiosity linger so long and persistently? Though it was different from before, it didn’t feel particularly unpleasant. If so, there was no reason to cut it off. Ulrich still wanted to hold her in his palm and play with her as he pleased.

 

He had no expectations when he mentioned the child’s education to his mother. It seemed more appropriate to yield a step to Lisbell at the moment. He was contemplating whether to use this as a new leverage to threaten his mother, but surprisingly, she agreed.

 

Instead, she wanted to spend a day with him.

 

Today was that day, and when he arrived, Daphne Schwaben was there. Moreover, there were remarks about how well they suited each other. Her intentions were so blatant that it was almost embarrassing.

 

“I must say, I’ve often thought Miss Schwaben suits you better than Gwen. You two seem to be in harmony, don’t you? Just look at how well you sit together now.”

 

“Is that so?”

 

“I couldn’t say it before because I didn’t want to hurt Gwen’s pride. Oh dear, is it rude to say such things to Miss Schwaben?”

 

“Not at all. I’m taking it as a very generous compliment.”

 

“That’s a relief.”

 

The two women played along elegantly, as if rehearsed. It felt like watching a silly play, with each trying to paint the other’s face with gold.

 

As he wondered how long this charade would last, Ulrich quietly sipped his coffee.

 

Judging by the situation, it was clear his mother would soon propose a new engagement to the Schwsben family. And Daphne, sitting next to him, was likely already aware of this.

 

When his thoughts reached that point, Ulrich put down his coffee cup with a clink.

 

“You should find paintings at the Schwaben family’s art gallery, Ulrich”

 

It was amusing for a moment, but that was all. His interest quickly waned. Once he lost interest, he never regained it. Daphne, sitting next to him dreaming of marriage, was that lost interest. Staying any longer was just a waste of time.

 

“I’d love to stay longer, but my schedule is quite tight today.”

 

Even if it was an excuse, it wouldn’t matter, but unfortunately, he was genuinely busy these days. He had to take over the succession process that Gwen had concluded, and it wasn’t easy. He had to deal with the distribution issue at the Altstad department store immediately.

 

“Don’t look at me like that, Mother. You know better than anyone how hectic my schedule is these days.”

 

Rising from his seat, Ulrich walked around the table towards his mother, who looked at him resentfully. He took her hand gently and kissed the back of it.

 

“If I had known there would be a guest, I would have tried to reschedule.”

 

“Yes, indeed.”

 

“I also apologize to Miss Schwaben.”

 

“No need to apologize.”

 

Conscious of the surrounding eyes, Ulrich also kissed the back of Daphne’s hand. Though it was a soulless gesture, his naturally graceful demeanor made it seem sincere.

 

Just as he was about to let go of Daphne’s hand.

 

“We’re planning a big exhibition at the Schwaben Gallery soon.”

 



 

“Ulrich, may I send you an invitation?”

 

One of Ulrich’s eyebrows twitched upward.

 

At this point, this bold direct approach seemed like a strategy.

 

His family had always avoided private invitations. Unless it was a major event like the opening of the Altstad Hotel 2nd branch, they rarely appeared in such settings.

 

This was another form of control. As much as they were in the spotlight, their associations were scrutinized.

 

Associations could be beneficial but could also be harmful. Especially in these times of rapidly changing circumstances and the constant fall of someone’s reputation, being wrongly associated could lead to scandal.

 

Therefore, the Altahart family had always avoided accepting such invitations.


Chapter 77.

For a while now, Daphne, who had been engaged to Gwen, could not have been unaware of this. Nevertheless, her steadfast invitation reflected her confidence in the establishment of their engagement. And surely, this was driven by her mother’s encouragement.

 

His mind cooled down. The situation that left him with no immediate way to refuse made him uneasy.

 

After a moment, Ulrich displayed an artistic smile.

 

“Gladly, I will wait.”

 

Daphne’s face blossomed like a sunflower under the sun as she waited for his answer.

 

Ulrich nodded slightly, indicating his intention to leave. As he turned, a beam of brilliant sunlight graced his face. Leaning into it, he pretended to squint at the brightness and wiped the smile off his face.

 

***

 

Soft conversations blossomed like petals in his ears. The recently isolated Lisbell naturally directed her attention toward them.

 

Far off, at the end of the corridor, two servants were having a private conversation. As she watched them, they seemed to sense her gaze and turned their heads, easily spotting her.

 

The two immediately distanced themselves and bowed politely. Their frosty demeanor made it difficult for Lisbell to engage in conversation, leaving her to watch them walk away again today.

 

…There’s no leeway there.

 

Before Noah came along, she recalled the days spent in Ulrich’s bedroom, akin to a hunting trophy hung on the wall. She had felt the same back then; they must have received specific instructions. Otherwise, why would they flee the moment they saw her without a moment’s hesitation?

 

To gather information from the outside, it would have been advantageous to win over one of them, but it was no easy task. In fact, it seemed almost impossible.

 

How could she get any news about her mother?

 

“If you ever need my help, feel free to ask.”

 

A voice suddenly echoed in her ear.

 

Julian might bring more valuable information than the servants she planned to recruit. Unlike her, he seemed to have free access to and from the mansion, with countless places he could go.

 

However, without knowing the reason for his kindness, she couldn’t readily accept his help. Lisbell had come to understand that there was no such thing as a favor without a reason. All kindness had a motive, and if it wasn’t visible, there was likely a dark greed behind it. Julian, too, might want something from her. This assumption dispelled any desire to accept his help.

 

Before she knew it, she was standing in front of Noah’s bedroom.

 

Knock, knock.

 

Knock.

 

Knock, knock, knock.

 

Lisbell knocked in a rhythmic pattern before opening the door.

 

As soon as she stepped into the room, Noah came running to her from afar, clinging to her skirt.

 

The unique knocking pattern was Lisbell’s signal that she had arrived. Noah was afraid of strangers entering his room. After opening the door a few times and startling him, she had devised this method.

 

“Noah, good morning. Did you sleep well?”

 

“Yes….”

 

Noah answered while rubbing his flushed cheeks against her skirt. Lisbell gently stroked his platinum blonde hair and headed towards the desk.

 

“Did you do the homework I gave you yesterday?”

 

“Yes, yes, I did!”

 

Noah’s little head bobbed up and down. Lisbell patted the back of his head as a sign of praise and opened the textbook.

 

The child was keeping up with the lessons better than she had feared. She had been worried since he hadn’t received proper education before, but he seemed to absorb everything quickly like a blank slate.

 

Today was a basic math lesson. She repeated the steps of calculations several times for him to understand the theory and then gave him a few problems to solve on his own. While Noah was struggling with the problems, Lisbell took out a new sheet of paper.

 

Dear Mother,

 

The opening was always the same.

 

Whenever Noah was engrossed in his work, Lisbell would sit beside him and write letters as if solving her own life problems. She used to do this mainly in the study, but now that she visited Noah’s room more often, she did it there.

 

She had filled about half the letter when Noah, who had been burying his head and shaking his pencil, suddenly took an interest in what she was doing.

 

“What are you doing…?”

 

Noah had a rather short attention span. His curiosity was piqued by Lisbell’s hand moving faster than his own. She gently brushed his disheveled golden hair and replied kindly.

 

“I’m writing a letter to my mother.”

 

“Mother?”

 

“Yes, my mother is sick and in the hospital right now.”

 

Thinking of her mother, her relatively good mood quickly plummeted. This was the most troubling issue she had been dealing with recently.

 

In the past, Ulrich had said he would go to the hospital with her whenever he had time, and at the time, she didn’t think it would be too far off.

 

But that had not yet happened. Moreover, the idea seemed laughably distant now. She worried every morning when she saw the daily newspaper in her room.

 

Ulrich’s name was almost a public commodity in the recently published papers.

 

Every page mentioned him. As someone who shared his room, she saw a detailed breakdown of his daily schedule that even she wasn’t aware of.

 

Despite Gwen’s funeral being over, the attention towards Altahart had not waned. Instead, people were watching more closely, as the future pillar had perished. Business associates, acquaintances, and everyone who knew and remembered him in the Rechem Empire were keenly watching.

 

In other words, Ulrich was incredibly busy.

 

She couldn’t truthfully say she had no idea about his schedule. Ulrich left before she woke up and returned after she was asleep.

 

When he woke her for sex, it was never before midnight. It was an exhausting schedule that made it remarkable he still had the energy for sex.

 

Knowing his routine, asking him to make time to visit the hospital felt laughable. It was frustrating, but she had to be patient for now. The only consolation was that her letters were consistently disappearing.

 

“Are you crying…?”

 

A warm sensation settled on the back of her hand.

 

Startled, she looked up to see Noah gazing at her with trembling eyes. Realizing she had made the child anxious, Lisbell smiled as if nothing was wrong.

 

“No, I’m not crying.”

 

“But…”

 

“I just thought of my mother. I miss her.”

 

Noah blinked his wide eyes. Then, as if thinking of something, he pouted. His transparent eyes were quickly filled with tears.

 

“I also…”

 

“Huh?”

 

“Mommy…”

 

Lisbell was shocked and quickly hugged Noah. The words she had said to distract him had struck a chord.

 

It made sense that in this large mansion, with no one to look after him, it meant both his father and mother were absent. For such a young child, there was truly no one left.

 

“Sorry. I shouldn’t have said that.”

 

The child buried his face in her chest, shaking his head and sniffling. His thin clothes grew damp. The more she tried to comfort him, the more he seemed unable to control his emotions. Lisbell silently stroked the back of his head.

 

“I miss mommy…”

 

Noah mumbled, starting to sniffle.

 

“Hm?”

 

“Pendant, with her picture. Grandma…”

 

“Pendant?”

 

Lisbell pulled the clinging child back slightly to see his face. His face was already tear-stained. She wiped his blushing cheeks with her sleeve and calmly asked.

 

“Noah, tell me slowly. What do you mean?”

 

“Mommy gave me a pendant, with her picture…..”

 



 

“Grandma took it away…”


Chapter 78.



“Grandma… Mrs. Altahart?”

 

Noah barely answered with a teary voice. Lisbell pulled the small body closer to stop the child from crying. When it didn’t work, she gently lowered her head.

 

“Noah, should I bring you some nuts you like?”

 



 

“Drenched in honey.”

 

Noah’s little hands gripped Lisbell’s hem tightly. Even with a tear-streaked face, his eyes sparkled. Smiling at his innocent expression, she said, “I’ll bring them if you stop crying.”

 

Honey-drenched nuts were Noah’s favorite snack. As expected, it worked well. The child lifted his arm and rubbed his face.

 

“Wait here for a bit.”

 

She could have called someone, but she didn’t. She wasn’t part of this household and didn’t feel right using the servants’ care.

 

Lisbell walked down the corridor, waiting for a servant while mulling over the pendant Noah mentioned. Also, the image of Noah crying and wanting his mom lingered….

 

Mrs. Altahart confiscated it.

 

Could the child be separated from his birth mother because of their bloodline?

 

“Because Gwen’s child isn’t listed officially, his maternal blood linage is not great,” Ulrich had said in the past. If that was true, they should at least let him have the pendant. If they were going to be so irresponsible with his upbringing, the least they could do was….

 

“Lisbell?”

 

Julian Scott was who she met in the corridor while looking for a servant. He had just come into the mansion, his coat smelling of cold wind. He smiled at her with familiarity.

 

“Fancy meeting you here.”

 

It was a ridiculous greeting. They had always met in this mansion, so why the surprise?

 

“Hello.”

 

She couldn’t ignore him, so she responded briefly. As she turned to walk away, she heard a lukewarm chuckle behind her. Lisbell suddenly stopped.

 

“…Excuse me.”

 

Julian looked surprised. He seemed astonished that Lisbell, who he thought would just leave, had stopped.

 

“Yes?”

 

“Do you know anything about the pendant Mr.Gwen’s child had?”

 

“Pendant?”

 

“Yes. Mrs. Altahart confiscated it.”

 

Julian was the man closest to Mrs. Altahart, possibly even closer than Ulrich. That was Julian Scott right before her.

 

She couldn’t shake the feeling she was doing something unnecessary, but she couldn’t let it go.

 

“Not sure.”

 

Julian, who had taken a few steps closer, rubbed his chin. His mannerisms, like when he descended the stairs last time, were full of theatricality. She had heard he was an actor, but even knowing that, it felt awkward and stifling, like dealing with someone wearing a mask.

 

“Is it a special pendant?”

 

“It contains a portrait of his birth mother.”

 

“A portrait of his birth mother. Then, Mrs. Altahart probably took it because she couldn’t stand the sight of it… it might be in that box.”

 

“Box?”

 

“Have you ever been in Mrs. Altahart’s bedroom?”

 

“Of course not….”

 

His confident question made her more bewildered. On the other hand, his self-assurance was overwhelming. His remark implied he often entered Mrs. Altahart’s bedroom without caring.

 

“Well, the most extravagant place in this mansion is Mrs. Altahart’s bedroom.”

 

Why was he telling her this now? Lisbell cast a puzzled glance at him. Julian grinned as if to say, “Just listen.”

 

“There’s a box in that bedroom that doesn’t fit in. It’s a plain wooden box, not decorated with jewels or gold, making it conspicuous in its plainness.”

 

“…And?”

 

“If she confiscated the pendant, it’s probably in that box.”

 



 

“Mrs. Altahart has a habit of stashing things she hates to see in there.”

 

Though lengthy and verbose, his point was quite useful. She hadn’t expected much, so it was even more surprising. They weren’t close, yet he revealed this much, suggesting he wasn’t as ill-natured as he appeared.

 

Lisbell lowered her eyes. Noah’s traces remained on her clothes, his tear-streaked face and sorrowful cries lingering in her mind.

 

“Could you… check it for me?”

 

“Check it?”

 

“To see if the pendant is really in there….”

 

“My goodness, Lisbell. Do you even realize what you’re asking?”

 

Julian was horrified in an unexpected way. He talked about entering Mrs. Altahart’s bedroom without blinking, yet seemed deeply disturbed by the idea of opening the box.

 

“Is it that hard? Just to open a box?”

 

“Do you know Mrs. Altahart selects actors from the theater as her lovers?”

 

She didn’t know, but it felt wrong to interrupt, so she waited quietly.

 

“The man before me was my colleague, Beram. I learned about the box because he drunkenly babbled about it.”

 



 

“Beram was a favorite of Mrs. Altahart. He kept an eye on that box and eventually asked her about it. She told him it was for things she didn’t want to see. But Beram didn’t believe her. He was sure it was filled with treasures.”

 



 

“He was determined to check it out, though I didn’t think he’d actually do it. His position was too beneficial to risk angering her, especially as her favorite.”

 



 

“But he eventually touched the box.”

 



 

“I haven’t seen Beram since.”

 

“You haven’t… seen him?”

 

“He disappeared without a trace. No one in the mansion or the theater has seen him. He vanished like a puff of smoke.”

 

Lisbell was horrified.

 

“You mean… he’s dead?”

 

“Probably. Otherwise, there’s no reason for him to disappear so thoroughly.”

 

“Even so, would she kill someone just for opening her box?”

 

Julian laughed, almost mockingly. His gaze was filled with derision, as if looking at a fool.

 

“Don’t you get it?”

 

He raised an arm.

 

“These people.”

 

He circled his finger near his temple.

 

“They’re all completely insane.”

 

She had no rebuttal. Despite wanting to deny it, Lisbell had already experienced Ulrich firsthand. Her confrontation with her son suggested Mrs. Altahart wasn’t much different. Indeed, they had unusual aspects.

 

But could they really value human life so little? Did money truly make everything else insignificant? The sheer enormity of it made Lisbell’s heart tremble.

 

“Oh dear, I must go.”

 

Julian checked his pocket watch.

 

“Mrs. Altahart knows my theater schedule well. She probably knows I’m back by now.”

 

“…Thank you for answering my questions.”

 

Julian, who had been about to leave, gave a cryptic smile.

 

“A word of advice: if you get entangled with Mrs. Altahart, make sure you’re on her side.”

 

He leaned close to whisper softly in her ear.

 

“Mrs. Altahart is a very scary woman.”

 

Though no one was around, his hushed voice sent a shiver down her spine.


Chapter 79.


Lisbell caressed the rim of her ear where his breath had lingered, then took a step back. With a sly smile, Julian pocketed his pocket watch and turned to leave.

 

Standing alone in the hallway, Lisbell soon encountered a servant. When she requested honey-soaked nuts, the servant offered to bring them to the room, and she nodded, heading back to Noah’s room.

 

“Noah?”

 

As she opened the door and stepped inside, Noah quickly sat down. A quick glance revealed the desk in disarray. The neatly arranged letters and fountain pen were now scattered, indicating that Noah had been examining them in her absence.

 

“I, I didn’t look.”

 

“It’s okay, Noah.”

 

Perhaps due to the years spent in the mansion, the child seemed easily intimidated by the smallest matters. Lisbell gently patted his head to reassure him, and Noah hesitated before clinging to her.

 

As they resumed their interrupted lesson, there was a knock on the door, followed by the arrival of a servant with the requested snack: honey-soaked nuts.

 

“Is it good?”

 

“Yes….”

 

Noah eagerly accepted the treats she offered, sometimes grabbing some with his tiny hands and shyly offering them to Lisbell, who accepted them with a grateful smile.

 

As Noah continued to eat, his mouth grew sticky from the honey-covered nuts. Attempting to wipe his mouth with her sleeve, Lisbell realized it wouldn’t suffice and stood up quietly.

 

Heading to the bathroom to dampen a towel, she noticed a box poking out from under the bed, which seemed too big for Noah to handle alone.

 

“Noah, what’s this?”

 

Still engrossed in eating, Noah glanced over and quickly jumped down from his chair.

 

With small, hurried steps, Noah ran over, grabbed the box, and hugged it while shaking his head.

 

“It’s mine, it’s mine.”

 



 

“You can’t look….”

 

It seemed to be something like a treasure box for the child. Lisbell had seen children in orphanages often create such things. Regardless of age, each child had their own personality and deserved respect in such matters. Lisbell smiled and nodded.

 

“Okay, I won’t look.”

 

“Really…?”

 

“Of course. I won’t do anything Noah doesn’t like.”

 

Only then did Noah relax and lower the box from his arms.

 

While Lisbell went to the bathroom as planned, Noah tidied up the box and returned to the desk. Lisbell carefully wiped his sticky mouth with the dampened towel, glancing at the bed.

 

What could be in there to make him so protective?

 

The curiosity was brief. She had promised not to look, and she intended to keep her promise.

 

Lisbell shifted her gaze from the bed.

 

***

 

It was morning again.

 

Wrapped in soft bedding, Lisbell woke up to the rich aroma of coffee and lifted her head.

 

There was Ulrich, whom she had assumed had already left. Sipping coffee and reading the newspaper, he noticed her movement and greeted her with a gentle smile when their eyes met.

 

“Good morning.”

 

Blinking in disbelief at the surreal scene, Ulrich put down the newspaper and tenderly brushed her long, slender hair with his elegant fingers.

 

“Did you eat honey cake yesterday?”

 



 

“I smell something sweet in your hair.”

 

“I ate nuts.”

 

“Nuts, huh. Do you like those?”

 



 

“You have a child’s taste.”

 

As they continued their dreamy conversation, Lisbell gradually woke up. She sluggishly sat up, while Ulrich leisurely sipped his coffee, leaning against the bed’s headboard. Puzzled by his relaxed demeanor, she had to ask.

 

“Why are you in the bedroom today?”

 

“I have something to tell you.”

 

The nerves that had been relaxed suddenly tensed up. Could it be news about her mother? Seeing her eyes sharpen with focus, Ulrich chuckled and twisted a strand of her hair, his fingers moving like bees drawn to the sweetness.

 

“Let’s go on a date today.”

 

“Date…?”

 

“Let’s watch a play together this afternoon.”

 

She couldn’t understand the absurd suggestion.

 

While Lisbell was left speechless, Ulrich got up from the bed and approached the wardrobe. Humming, he looked through the blouses, skirts, and dresses he had bought in spare moments, finally selecting a white dress and hanging it on the mirror.

 

“Victor will choose and bring the accessories later.”

 

“Wait, hold on.”

 

“Yes.”

 

He turned around, looking leisurely as if wondering what the problem was. Lisbell, too stunned to even tidy her disheveled hair, just stared at him, then grabbed her forehead to pull herself together.

 

“A play?”

 

“It’s currently the most popular play in Laurent. It’s being staged at the theater my mother acquired.”

 

“Why are we going there….”

 

No, that wasn’t the point.

 

“If you have time to watch a play, I’d like to visit my mother.”

 

Yes, that was the crux of it.

 

She had asked to visit her mother so long ago. If he had time for a play, the hospital should obviously come first.

 

Reading Lisbell’s frustrated thoughts, Ulrich responded with folded arms.

 

“After the play.”

 



 

“If there’s time left after the play, we’ll go to the hospital together.”

 

“…Really?”

 

“Why would I lie?”

 

Lisbell gulped. His calm counter-question revealed no insincerity in his expression. It seemed almost indifferent as he toyed with the dress he had chosen.

 

Before long, there was a knock. Recognizing it as a summons for him, Ulrich glanced at his pocket watch and spoke.

 

“I was waiting to tell you this. I have to go now.”

 

“When… will you be back?”

 

He looked surprised at her unexpected question, then smiled like a spring breeze. Leaning over, he brought his face close.

 

“I like hearing that.”

 



 

“Will you wait for me?”

 

“…A promise is a promise.”

 

“Yes, a promise is a promise.”

 

His light laughter carried a transparent joy. Lisbell couldn’t return the smile. The weight of their meanings was different. He dreamed of watching a play, while she longed for a hospital visit, both clinging to the hollow promise of a date.

 

“I’ll come to pick you up. See you then.”

 

His lips settled on her forehead, rubbing gently before moving down to her lips. The urgent knock from outside sounded again. Ulrich, with a slight sigh of irritation, slipped his tongue smoothly into her mouth.

 

“Some people have no sense.”

 

Muttering to the secretary outside, Ulrich planted a final kiss on Lisbell’s lips and straightened his posture.

 

After securing his tie and adjusting his cufflinks, he left the bedroom.

 

Lisbell checked the time. Her heart thumped steadily. It was a different sensation from the desolate anxiety that usually dried her out.

 

She couldn’t believe she was anticipating his return for the first time this morning.

 

The play started well past noon.

 

Sitting beside Ulrich in the car, Lisbell awkwardly fiddled with the necklace around her neck. Not just the necklace, but the hair accessories, the long lace gloves on her arms, the silk stockings, and the high heels all felt uncomfortable.

 

“We’re almost there.”

 

As the driver reported, the car soon arrived at the theater.

 

As the engine quieted, the driver quickly stepped out to open the back door.

 

Ulrich got out first and extended his hand into the car. She wanted to ignore it, but it wouldn’t be wise to upset him. Today, of all days, she needed to be cautious, with the chance of visiting her mother so close.

 

Reluctantly, she took his hand, which he held firmly, more forceful than necessary for mere balance.


Chapter 80.


When both of them got out of the car, a person who appeared to be a theater staff member approached, greeted them, and led the way.

 

The interior was quiet as they climbed the stairs. According to the staff member, the performance had already started. As he said, the inside was intense with the stage lights, and the actors’ clear voices resonated poignantly.

 

The two were guided to the VIP seats on the second floor.

 

The VIP seats, which overlooked the stage, had a long sofa and velvet curtains installed on both sides of the railing.

 

Since the performance was in full swing, Lisbell sat down on the sofa carefully. Ulrich approached the railing, which was set up to prevent accidents, and drew the curtains aside to get a better view of the stage. Only then did he sit leisurely on the sofa, crossing his legs.

 

“Shall I get you some tea?”

 

Ulrich leaned his upper body towards her as he spoke. Lisbell looked back at him at the sudden suggestion. Their eyes met in the dim scenery, and he smiled serenely.

 

“You seem tense.”

 

“It’s okay.”

 

“Relax. It’s not your first time watching a play, right?”

 

Even if she wanted to, it was inevitable to be overwhelmed by the new scene. Moreover, with Ulrich sitting beside her in an uncomfortable environment, she couldn’t feel at ease.

 

“…It’s my first time coming to a theater.”

 

“First time? Really?”

 

“I’ve only seen small church plays until now.”

 

“Small church plays. Haha, that’s cute.”

 

Saying so, Ulrich wrapped his arm around her waist. His well-shaped lips settled on her temple and gently rubbed against it.

 

“The scent is gone.”

 



 

“That’s a shame. You should’ve let it linger a bit longer.”

 



 

“It wasn’t bad having my nose buried in the back of your head while swaying your waist.”

 

He buried his nose once more and sniffed.

 

Lisbell frowned slightly and pushed him away. Even though the lights were off and only the stage was visible, it was a public place, and she couldn’t know when someone might look. Being caught in such an act with him would be quite embarrassing.

 

He should be the one to be more careful. These days, he was a famous person whose name appeared in the newspapers every day. Yet, acting so recklessly was incomprehensible to her. He was a man who, while seemingly fulfilling his duties responsibly, would become indulgent and lascivious without warning.

 

“If it’s your first time at a theater…”

 

Ulrich lifted Lisbell’s wrist, which was pushing against his chest. His even teeth bit the lace gloves covering her fingers and began to take them off. His face, partially illuminated by the light from afar, emitted a dangerous aura.

 

“You must not have had sex in a theater either.”

 

“…You said we were here to watch a play.”

 

“Technically, I said we were here for a date.”

 



 

“You know what a date means, right?”

 



 

“A time for a man and a woman to get to know each other intimately.”

 

Her nervous heart sank as he moved down to the floor. Ulrich’s broad shoulders partially obscured her view. The outer coat draped in the light streaming from outside the railing cast a fearsome backlight.

 

“…Huek…!”

 

He grabbed Lisbell’s trembling knee firmly. With his long index and middle fingers, he leisurely stroked the bony part, playfully lifting the fluttering hem of her skirt.

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“Shh.”

 



 

“Let’s make this a special experience.”

 

Ignoring her attempts to dissuade him, Ulrich lifted her soft clothing. The insides of her thighs, spread wide with the triangle between them, were exposed above her knobbly knees.

 

Even though her underwear wasn’t off, the realization that this wasn’t their usual bedroom but an outdoor VIP seat in a theater, where anyone could come in, filled her with shame. She could feel the heat gathering on her foot, wrapped in the strap of her shoe.

 

“Ulrich…!”

 

“I’d rather you call my name when you moan.”

 

He chuckled in the darkness, partially revealing his face. The man’s breath brushed against her leg, making her shoulders hunch involuntarily.

 

Ulrich brought his soft cheek to her inner thigh. His delicate lips made a sucking sound as they kissed her tender skin, moving upwards. He then reached her still-covered vulva.

 

“Ugh.”

 

Lisbell covered her lips with the back of her hand. Her eyes moved anxiously. Even though it was dark and only the stage lights shone, it felt as if she were being watched, making her limbs freeze.

 

Sensing Lisbell’s tension, Ulrich laughed softly and rubbed his nose against her central part. Even with the thin underwear in between, his high nose and occasional long breaths stimulated her senses sharply.

 

“Wait… Ah…”

 

Ulrich finally brought out his tongue. His reddish tongue licked the fabric-covered hole. Seen in the partial backlight, it looked like the lethal tongue of a snake.

 

Lisbell’s hips twitched as she grabbed Ulrich’s shoulders.

 

His tongue moved so diligently that the thin fabric got soaked helplessly. It felt as if it wasn’t his saliva but her own arousal making it wet.

 

“Ugh…”

 

She repeatedly tried to push his shoulders away. However, Ulrich only moved his head closer, concentrating on licking the outline of her vulva. He sometimes buried his nose and nibbled with his whole lips, making Lisbell’s fingers lose strength helplessly.

 

“Even licking through the clothes feels good.”

 

“Ugh…”

 

“Your hole is really soft.”

 

Ulrich, praising her as if she were praiseworthy, finally slipped his hand under her skirt.

 

The feeling of her underwear being removed planted an unprecedented sense of alertness. Lisbell, who had been reaching out to stop him, froze as she glanced at the stage below.

 

Julian Scott was on stage. The lover of Mrs. Altahart.

 

Oh, right, he said he was a member of the troupe.

 

She hadn’t cared about the troupe, but it turned out to be the one performing the play they were watching today.

 

If she had simply watched him perform, she wouldn’t have felt so shocked.

 

For a moment, she felt as if she had made eye contact with Julian.

 

That couldn’t be. Unlike her unobstructed view of the stage, the backlight would prevent the actors from seeing the audience.

 

Yet… Julian Scott, continuing his performance, didn’t turn his head, as if he could clearly see her.

 

To others, it might have looked like part of his stage presence, but to Lisbell, it wasn’t. She remembered the ambiguous smile he had given her whenever they met at the mansion.

 

“Ah…!”

 

While her mind was distracted, her underwear was removed and thrown aside. Lisbell tried to get up from the sofa, but Ulrich swiftly grabbed her ankle and lifted it. He placed her left leg over his shoulder and angled her right leg on the sofa’s armrest, bringing his tongue eagerly to her exposed vulva.

 

“Ung!”

 

Lisbell quickly covered her mouth with her hand. She could hear the sticky sucking sound below.

 

An embarrassing sensation climbed up her bare skin.

 

The tongue that had been busy through her clothes was now greedily licking her bare skin. The entrance was quickly moistened, sending shivers down her inner passage. Ulrich seemed determined to raise her sensitivity quickly, softly parting her labia and sucking on the protruding clitoris.

 

“Ugh, wait… Ulrich…!”

 

The stimulation was relentless, leaving her no escape as his lips fully enveloped her. Each sweep of his tongue over her clitoris sent a ticklish thrill through her.

 

Lisbell moaned like a cat and threw her head back. Julian Scott’s voice still echoed in her ears, twisting her insides strangely. It felt as if she were not the spectator but the one being watched, exposing scenes she shouldn’t to him, making her mind flicker on and off.


Chapter 81.

“Haah, huh… uh…!”

 

Ulrich mischievously bit the reddish clitoris while quietly moving his fingers. Soon, his middle finger plunged deep inside. He ruthlessly ravaged Lisbell’s lower body, poking at the tight inner walls that wrapped around him.

 

Under the influence of his caress, her rationality quickly crumbled. She knew she had to keep her composure, but it was impossible.

 

Barely managing to straighten her head, which had been helplessly rubbing against the backrest, her eyes met Julian’s on the stage once again. It was as if he was really looking this way. The fixed gaze made her inner thighs twitch and convulse. Another rush of liquid poured out.

 

“Haah, you’re dripping like crazy.”

 

“Huh… uh…”

 

“Do you like doing it here so much? Do you get more excited thinking someone might see us?”

 

He commented, pinching her n!pple through her clothes, showing a subtly perverted side. Pressing his body against hers, Ulrich’s entire body stuck to her trembling form.

 

A massive something brushed against and rubbed against her exposed skin. The silhouette of his erect cock, visible through his right thigh, was intimidating. Ulrich, too, was aroused as he licked between her legs.

 

His bulging flesh, full of blood, was protruding so much it seemed like it might burst through his pants. Even though he was clothed, the friction felt as if it was bare skin rubbing against her.

 

Standing up straight, he swallowed Lisbell’s confused lips while leisurely unbuttoning his pants. With a few gestures, his trousers were pulled down, and his erect dick sprang out, bare and exposed.

 

Grasping it in his palm, he gently stroked it up and down, causing it to twitch dramatically. His pen!s, looking like a living entity, was soon at the entrance of Lisbell’s hole. With a slow, twisting motion of his hips, he penetrated smoothly, meeting no resistance.

 

“Ah… huh…!”

 

“Haah…”

 

As it plunged in up to the root, heavy breaths burst from both of their mouths.

 

Ulrich, marveling at the soft inner texture that made his whole body relax, buried his face in her chest and slowly began to move his hips.

 

Squeak. Squeak.

 

The poorly constructed VIP seat sofa, incomparable to a bed, made a grating noise. Despite her wide-open lower body, Lisbell’s eyes widened in embarrassment at the sound.

 

Ulrich chuckled, lightly shifting their positions.

 

“Uh…!”

 

Now Lisbell was sitting on top of him, leaning against the backrest. Facing away from the stage for the first time, Lisbell couldn’t hide her confusion at the new position.

 

“Why… why…”

 

“This way, it will be quieter.”

 



 

“You’re not fine moaning and groaning while being penetrated by me, right? You don’t like it.”

 

He lightly shut her mouth, sweeping his sweaty forehead back, and slapped her buttocks that were perched on his thigh.

 

“Try rotating your hips.”

 



 

“This way, it will be quieter than if I moved.”

 

Indeed, the more men indulged in pleasure, the less they held back. If she made such noises here, not only the stage but the guests in the VIP seats on both sides would know exactly what they were doing.

 

Lisbell, her complexion pale, reached out.

 

Grabbing his shoulder with difficulty, Ulrich positioned himself so she could move her hips more easily.

 

As he moved, the object inside shifted direction, poking at her tender spots. She had to bite her lip hard to suppress the reflexive moans.

 

Biting down hard enough to draw blood, she timidly started to move her hips. Holding onto his shoulders was too burdensome, so she moved her hands to the backrest and wiggled her hips slightly.

 

Even if she didn’t want to, the sensation of the penis parting her flesh caused her hole to shiver on its own. Lisbell’s awkwardly rotated pelvis frowned, as if she was rolling in pain rather than engaging in an act of pleasure.

 

“Ah, as I thought, this outfit suits you well, Lisbell.”

 

“Huh, uh…”

 

“I thought it would feel amazing to see you riding on top of me in this dress.”

 

He lifted the hem of her white lace dress, pulling her hips towards him. The deepening connection made Lisbell’s pupils quiver weakly.

 

Ulrich, throwing a savage gaze that seemed to want to lick her entire iris, grabbed her buttocks tightly. With the pen!s lodged inside, every squeeze of her buttocks caused the vaginal walls to be scraped.

 

The creepy, electrifying sensation of her lower abdomen being torn apart heated her entire body. As she moaned and bent her waist inward, Ulrich supported her from behind, pulling her closer and whispering.

 

“Doesn’t it look like a wedding dress?”

 

“Huh…”

 

Ulrich made her lean on him completely, grabbing Lisbell’s buttocks with both hands. Then, he fiercely thrust his hips, which had been still until now.

 

“Huh, ah! …Uh!”

 

With the sudden rapid movements, Lisbell had to bury her lips in his shoulder to suppress her scream-like moans. Unable to endure any longer, she ended up biting his shoulder. Clinging on for dear life, her gums throbbed painfully. She looked like someone being tortured rather than engaging in sex.

 

Ulrich enjoyed the peculiar sensation of his flesh-covered shoulder being bitten, thrusting his lower body deeply.

 

Each time he thrust deeply, it felt as if his entire dick would be swallowed to the base. The smooth suction offered no resistance. Regardless of the owner’s psychological state, the interior was unbelievably seductive.

 

In the artificially darkened space, their entwined bodies never ceased to move. Two shadows falling on the floor, trembling like candles in the wind, painted the walls.

 

The narrow VIP room heated up with their fervor.

 

Lisbell couldn’t withstand the constant thrusting inside, sliding down helplessly. Ulrich, not missing the opportunity, switched their positions again.

 

Lisbell’s small back collided with the sofa backrest.

 

“Haa…!”

 

“Right?”

 

“Uh, uh…! Uh…!”

 

“This position suits us best.”

 

They returned to the initial position. Lisbell leaning against the sofa, with Ulrich on top, occupying the space between her legs, conducting the sex.

 

After removing his bothersome pants, exposing his cleanly shaved genitals, he thrust faster. Lisbell’s wet pubic hair clung to his lower body. Ulrich smirked, enjoying the traces of their union.

 

“This, really, huh, feels good, you know?”

 

“Huh, uh, ah…!”

 

“Your hair wrapping around my body… ah… haah.”

 

The pleasure from his relentless thrusting seemed to overflow, making his voice raspy. His heavy groans, like those of a beast, echoed.

 

Squeak, squeak, squeak.

 

The sofa started to groan again from the relentless pounding. But now, Lisbell had no strength to stop him. Holding onto his shoulders, she was overwhelmed by the overwhelming pleasure spreading from her insides.

 

“Huh, huh, uh…!”

 

All she could do was bite her tongue to stifle her moans. Staring blankly into space, struggling to keep her cries from escaping, her vision blurred.

 

As the position changed, Julian, who had been out of sight, came back into view.

 

Just then, Julian, who was looking towards the central seats, spread his arms wide and fixed his gaze on them again. The wave of shame rose from her chest and surged high.

 

“Ugh… uh… huh…!”

 

Closing her eyes tightly, the thunderous pleasure pounding her insides struck harder. Unable to escape, her eyes grew hot with tears.

 

Lisbell grabbed his shoulders, turning her head away as if to hide.

 

Her chin was immediately grasped. The face she barely managed to hide was forcibly returned to its original position.

 

“Since earlier, haah… what are you so concerned about?”

 

Displaying a waist movement that seemed to exude the scent of a horny male, Ulrich stuck out his tongue. He leisurely licked the moisture collecting at the corner of Lisbell’s eyes and laughed.

 

“Julian Scott?”

Chapter 82

At that moment, Lisbell’s fingers tightened so much that they turned pitifully pale. Her gaze, which had been deliberately distant, hurriedly returned to him. She didn’t even realize she was taking a very suspicious posture due to the sudden onslaught.

 

Facing her up close, Ulrich suddenly pulled her limp legs. He wrapped her slender thighs around his waist and pressed their lower bodies together as one.

 

Feeling the simultaneous pressure on her organs and the resulting sexual arousal, Lisbell frowned as if in pain.

 

“Making friends isn’t bad, but…”

 

“Ah…!”

 

He embraced her hips and lowered her to the floor. Both of them quickly fell beneath the sofa, out of sight of the stage.

 

“You should know how to choose your friends.”

 

In the darkness, skillfully avoiding the light, Lisbell looked up at him with difficulty.

 

His eyes, half-buried in shadows, were entirely black and somehow chilling. An unknown tension seemed to spread through every corner of her being.

 

Before she could ask what he meant, Ulrich placed her legs over his shoulders. Her lower body was pulled tight, and he pressed his organ against an even deeper point.

 

“Behave yourself.”

 

“Hnn…!”

 

“If you make friends with just anyone, you’ll get in real trouble.”

 

Soon, a loud, slapping sound resounded as he thrust strongly. Though he said that, it felt as if a severe punishment had already begun.

 

It was uneasy yet pleasurable, futile yet stimulating.

 

The unpredictable intercourse felt like being beaten.

 

***

 

Thankfully, the curtain call was long.

 

If it weren’t, they wouldn’t have been able to get dressed and put on their scattered accessories properly. They wouldn’t have been able to leave the VIP section on time after the play.

 

Exhausted, Lisbell sat on the sofa, swallowing her still-excited breath. Ulrich stood behind her, tying her messy ash-gray hair into a single ponytail. Making a neat ribbon with the tie, he sat down next to her.

 

Meanwhile, the curtain call ended. The red curtain came down like a wave, covering the stage. Lights gradually came back on. A bustling noise arose from the seats below, indicating people were preparing to leave.

 

“Let’s go too.”

 

Following Ulrich, Lisbell got up from the sofa.

 

As soon as she took a step, she stumbled. Her legs, still not fully recovered, gave her trouble. Fortunately, Ulrich, watching her, turned and caught her in his arms.

 

She needed to straighten her back but couldn’t. Biting her lip at the discomfort in her skirt, she felt the remnants of his climax, which he had done several times between her thin waist and thighs, running down one leg despite her efforts to clean up.

 

As she stood still, looking down awkwardly, Ulrich, seemingly understanding the reason, chuckled and lowered himself leisurely, taking a handkerchief from his jacket.

 

“Did I come too much?”

 

He nonchalantly lifted her skirt, letting her hold it, and wiped away his traces with the handkerchief.

 

Though it seemed he was cleaning her for hygiene, there was a subtle malice in his touch. There was no need to brush against her underwear, but his hand deliberately touched that area, lingering before pulling away.

 

Putting the handkerchief away, Ulrich smiled as if savoring the sight of Lisbell, who had stumbled like a fawn moments before.

 

“I’ve given you a special experience.”

 



 

“When will you ever have weak knees in a theater again?”

 

Too drained to respond, Lisbell quietly let down her skirt. He wrapped his arm around her waist, leading her out of the VIP section.

 

“Mr. Altahart?”

 

Unlike the noisy atmosphere below, the exit for the VIP section was quiet. As they approached the stairs they had climbed earlier, someone called out to Ulrich. It was an elderly gentleman in a fedora.

 

“Mr. Bates.”

 

Familiar with him, Ulrich readily shook the extended hand. His smile was formal and polite but nothing more. Thinking he might be a business partner, Lisbell stepped back and bowed her head.

 

“You must be here for the play too, Mr. Bates.”

 

“My wife loves theater, so I always try to make time for it once a week. But I’m surprised to see you here, Mr. Altahart.”

 

“Do I not seem like the type to enjoy such leisure?”

 

Mr. Bates quickly shook his head.

 

“Not at all. But isn’t today the opening of the Schwaben Art Museum exhibition? I thought you’d be there.”

 

“Why would I be there?”

 

“I met the Schwaben curator at the Foylewood family’s charity event the other day. He mentioned that you were planning to attend the exhibition, so I assumed you’d be there.”

 

Ulrich smiled knowingly.

 

Indeed, while this play was being performed, the Schwaben Art Museum exhibition was also in full swing.

 

If Daphne had spread the word that he would attend, it would only be to his advantage.

 

Thinking of Daphne, who was always overly optimistic, he pulled Lisbell closer.

 

Suddenly drawn to his side, Lisbell tensed her toes in surprise. But the lingering aftereffects of their intimacy, coupled with his overpowering grip, made her cling to his side.

 

Naturally, Mr. Bates’ gaze shifted to her.

 

“The curator must have been mistaken.”

 

Ulrich deliberately caressed Lisbell’s waist.

 

“I had a prior engagement today.”

 

His tone was factual yet intentionally suggestive. Mr. Bates, falling into the trap, brightened his eyes and looked at Lisbell from head to toe with curiosity.

 

Soon, he lowered his fedora and winked.

 

“I must have interrupted a private date.”

 

Leaving a courteous farewell, Mr. Bates quickly departed. Ulrich watched him whisper something to his waiting wife, smiling in satisfaction.

 

Word would spread quickly that Ulrich had attended the theater with Lisbell, a stranger to society.

 

This would create a small obstacle for his mother, who was hastily arranging his engagement. Remembering the faces of the two women who had plotted against him, he turned his steps.

 

However, leaving wasn’t easy. Known faces in the VIP section repeatedly called and stopped him. Each time, he subtly kept Lisbell by his side, attracting their gazes.

 

As people gathered, talk of the latest business matters emerged, making the dreary VIP corridor even more serious than a hotel meeting room.

 

Ulrich, surrounded by this group, glanced sideways. Lisbell, caught with him, looked incredibly tired.

 

Making a gesture of excuse to the one speaking to him, he leaned down and whispered in her ear.

 

“Go down ahead.”

 

Lisbell, wanting that, nodded slightly and started down the stairs. Outside, the wind gently brushed her cheeks, clearing her mind.

 

Rubbing her flushed cheeks with her hand, Lisbell saw the driver approaching. Bowing, he led her towards the car.

 

“Lisbell?”

 

Just as she tiredly followed, she heard her name from afar.

Chapter 83.


In this capital city, where she had no connections, the woman’s delicate voice sounded even more out of place. Lisbell instinctively turned her head. And there, she saw a woman holding up her dress in a rather rough manner to get into a car.

 

The woman had luscious red hair that seemed capable of dimming even the distant sunset. Her blinking eyes were a fresh, vibrant green.

 

There was only one person in Lisbell’s memory who adorned herself with such vivid colors.

 

“Bianca…?”

 

Lisbell was just as taken aback.

 

She never expected to run into someone she knew, even slightly, from Laurent.

 

“Oh my! Oh my, oh my.”

 

Bianca quickly withdrew her foot from the car. Then, in a flash, she dashed over to Lisbell. She wore high heels under her fluttering dress, yet she didn’t stumble once, just as Lisbell remembered.

 

“Lisbell! It’s really you, Lisbell?”

 

“Bianca, what are you doing here…?”

 

“I was dragged here by my mother, hoping to find a suitable husband! It was so boring I couldn’t even yawn. I would have rather been horse riding.”

 

Even now, she was as strong-willed as ever.

 

Despite that, Lisbell couldn’t quite believe it and stared blankly at Bianca, who was gripping her hand tightly.

 

Bianca was the only daughter of the Count of Cliquemont. Lisbell had taught her briefly during her university vacations, introduced by Theodore.

 

Since Lisbell last saw her, Bianca had grown into a mature lady.

 

“And you, Lisbell? Why are you here? I never dreamed we would meet in Laurent!”

 

“I… have my reasons…”

 

“Reasons?”

 

Bianca tilted her head. Lisbell’s lips felt heavy. Seeing her innocent face brought back old memories that were hard to confront. At the end of those memories was her irreversible breakup with Theodore.

 

“How’s Theo doing?”

 

Lisbell’s heart pounded fiercely since their encounter, fearing Bianca would mention him.

 

And now, in this unavoidable reality, Lisbell’s mind went blank. Her mouth was dry, and her tongue felt rough, a typical reaction of someone at a loss for words.

 

“You two were supposed to get married after graduation. I was so disappointed I couldn’t attend the wedding!”

 

Bianca was unusually open-minded for a noble. She valued essence over the dignity high-borns cherished, often worrying her parents with her rebellious nature. 

 

Her parents even wrote a regretful letter explaining that Bianca couldn’t attend their prearranged wedding, fearing she’d see something untoward and develop an unhealthy curiosity. In hindsight, it was a miracle Lisbell had been allowed to teach her at all.

 

“Theo and I… broke off our engagement.”

 

“Broke off the engagement?”

 

Bianca’s voice grew louder.

 

“Why? Did something happen?”

 

Lisbell clammed up again. Bianca rolled her eyes, pondering.

 

“Now that I think about it, I recently heard news about Theo from my father. So, naturally, I assumed you’d be…”

 

“News?”

 

It had been a long time since Lisbell had ended the engagement and left her tearful fiancé at the Marnia villa. She hadn’t heard anything about Theodore since then, intentionally or otherwise.

 

Knowing she had ruined their relationship with her stubbornness, Theodore’s memory remained a painful shard in her heart.

 

Thinking of him always brought pain. So she avoided any news about him.

 

Yet, curiosity flared up now, driven by Bianca’s proximity to Theodore. It was unlikely she’d relay incorrect information. Lisbell couldn’t help but listen intently to what Bianca might say.

 

Bianca was about to speak.

 

“Lisbell.”

 

Arms wrapped around her waist from behind. She took a few steps back in her small-heeled shoes, colliding with a firm body. Bianca’s gaze shifted from Lisbell to Ulrich, who had whispered, “Couldn’t find the car?”

 

It was a gentle reprimand for not being in the car yet. Ulrich’s eyes, having looked at Lisbell, soon turned to Bianca. Lisbell nervously clenched her fingers.

 

“Alta… Hart?”

 

Bianca, looking startled, glanced back and forth between Ulrich and Lisbell. She seemed unable to fathom their connection.

 

“Are you two…”

 

Ulrich, not recognizing her, squinted. Having received some social education during her coming-of-age ceremony, Bianca quickly straightened up, composed herself, and smiled.

 

“Hello, I’m Bianca Cliquemont.”

 

“Ah, the young lady of Cliquemont. So, that’s Lady Cliquemont back there.”

 

Back there?

 

Bianca turned to look.

 

Her mother, waiting in the car, had finally lost patience and was getting out. Her expression was fierce. Gasping, Bianca hurriedly said, “I forgot my mother was waiting in the car. It was an honor to chat, but I must go…!”

 

Bianca glanced back as she hurried to the car. Lisbell couldn’t decipher her intent. The car carrying Bianca soon smoothly left the theater.

 

“Let’s go.”

 

Lisbell thought Ulrich might ask how she knew Bianca, but he simply guided her to their car. He seemed oddly hurried.

 

When they reached the waiting car, he personally opened the back door for her.

 

Before getting in, Lisbell looked up at him to confirm if they were still going to the hospital. Ulrich, already watching her, met her eyes.

 

He gave a suspicious smile.

 

“I’m sorry. You’ll have to go back to the mansion alone.”

 

“What?”

 

“Something urgent came up that I must attend to right away.”

 

Lisbell grabbed his arm before he could close the door.

 

“What do you mean? What about the hospital… seeing my mother?”

 



 

“You promised. You said you’d visit the hospital after the play…!”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

He leaned closer, lowering his voice. Lisbell flinched, feeling as if he was physically covering her mouth.

 

Ulrich always had a way of overwhelming others without raising his voice. Though often smiling, his formality made his lack of expression unnerving.

 

And now, Ulrich was not smiling.

 

“Don’t raise your voice.”

 



 

“I don’t want others to think we’re arguing.”

 

He pulled her waist close. Their eye contact was sharp, like rubbing against broken glass, but to others, it might seem affectionate.

 

He leaned in as if to kiss her, but Lisbell turned her face away, making his lips brush her cheek.

 

She couldn’t react because she noticed onlookers nearby, still mingling outside the theater.

 

Finally, she understood why Ulrich was so cautious.


Chapter 84.


“…It’s a relief there are no reporters here.”

 

“If they were, they would have shoved their cameras in our faces to capture this scene.”

 



 

“Luckily, the theater’s security is pretty strict, isn’t it?”

 

Even with his sarcastic comment about being conscious of others’ eyes, the man grinned even wider. Lisbell glared at him and pushed his arm off her waist. Ulrich, of course, did not budge. Instead, he pulled her closer and kissed her defiantly.

 

She could feel the sharp gazes from all directions cutting into her skin. Her entire body froze with tension. A bleak premonition struck her, suggesting she might have to endure such awkward situations countless times in the capital and while staying close to this man.

 

“And…is there something you’re hiding from me?”

 

At this point, the small spark of doubt had grown into a tinder capable of pricking at something significant.

 

She still believed that provoking Ulrich wouldn’t bring her any benefits. However, the missed opportunity to meet her mother, which she had been looking forward to, made it unbearable to remain silent.

 

No matter how busy he was, couldn’t he at least stop by for a moment since he was here? It now seemed much more plausible that he was hiding something from her.

 

Maybe he was doing it deliberately….

 

“Well.”

 



 

“Do we need to share everything between us?”

 

Lisbell’s eye twitched. Ulrich had lifted her cheek with his hand. Distracted by his gesture, it took her a moment to comprehend his words. But before she could fully process them, Ulrich diffused the situation with a carefree laugh.

 

“I was joking.”

 



 

“Today’s events were really unexpected. While talking with other guests inside, I realized there was an urgent matter to check on. Victor will be here with the car soon, and we have to leave immediately.”

 

His detailed explanation made sense logically, but still… her heart felt uneasy and uncomfortable.

 

Yet, having doubts didn’t provide any solutions. She couldn’t stir up a commotion here by arguing with him, nor could she leave without Ulrich and head to the hospital alone.

 

A bitter sense of helplessness swallowed her whole.

 

Lisbell lowered her head. Ulrich patted her hair gently before kissing her temple.

 

The next moment, she was forced into the car by the weight on her shoulder.

 

As the door closed and the space was sealed off, Lisbell looked at Ulrich standing outside through the moving car window. Moments later, the car left the theater grounds, heading not toward the hospital, but toward the mansion.

 

“Do we need to share everything between us?”

 

Those cruel words echoed like those of a spiteful poet.

 

She couldn’t just sit still like this. She had to find out something. Ulrich had said there would be no issues with her mother unless otherwise contacted by the attendant at the hospital, but there could be some falsehoods in his words.

 

Or perhaps everything could be a lie.

 

What part should she believe? 

 

What part should she doubt?

 

Holding her forehead, Lisbell closed her eyes tightly.

 

Over her muddled thoughts, Bianca’s voice, which she had set aside for a while, floated up.

 

“Come to think of it, I remember hearing news about Theo from father recently. So naturally, Lisbell, you must also…”

 

News.

 

What news was it?

 

And do I even have the right to be curious about it?

 

Piling one doubt on top of another would only leave her treading in place.

 

She simply didn’t know.

 

What was she clinging to right now?

 

And what exactly did she want to give up?

 

In a life filled with questions, she had become accustomed to the bitter taste of self-reproach.

 

***

 

Afterward, Lisbell returned to her usual routine.

 

Teaching Noah, writing letters to her mother in her spare time, and being embraced like a straw doll by Ulrich’s arms that returned only at dawn, shaking her limbs. Just when the theater visit began to feel like a brief deviation from her daily life, unexpected news reached Lisbell.

 

“How do you know Miss Cliquemont?”

 

Ulrich, who had been playing with her chest absently, suddenly withdrew his hand and asked.

 

It was curious why this question, which hadn’t come up on the day they visited the theater but several days later, arrived now. Wanting to grasp his true intention, but feeling sluggish all over, it was hard for her to turn and read his expression.

 

Lisbell stared at the wall and spoke.

 

“I used to teach her briefly.”

 

“You did?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Hmm… That’s unexpected.”

 



 

“Did the Cliquemont family really have such an open mind?”

 

Ulrich, who had gotten off the bed, took out a cigarette.

 

Even though the lights weren’t on, the moonlight streaming in through the window brightly illuminated his face. The shadows cast in the right places made his profile resemble a sculpture meticulously crafted by many hands.

 

Watching him light the cigarette, Lisbell let out a tired sigh.

 

“They are similar to you. But… there was no teacher available for Bianca in the capital, which was the problem.”

 

She quickly understood what Ulrich was puzzled about.

 

No matter how advanced perceptions became and how weakened the power of social hierarchy was, the world was still fundamentally structured around classes.

 

Nobles lived in the world of nobles, and commoners in the world of commoners. It was still rare for someone to cross that firm boundary. Hence, it was indeed extraordinary for a commoner like Lisbell to have temporarily taught the daughter of a count in the capital.

 

“Come to think of it, wasn’t the daughter of that family notorious for being quite a tomboy?”

 

So they weren’t completely unfamiliar; he had at least heard some rumors.

 

As Ulrich mentioned, Bianca was still unruly now but was even more so in the past. Though she was born into nobility, she was more focused on exploring her curiosities rather than adhering to the virtues expected of a young lady.

 

Because of this, she often clashed with the tutors her parents had hired. Tutors who couldn’t handle Bianca’s fiery nature would quickly resign, leading to a frequent turnover at the Cliquemont household.

 

But that approach didn’t last long.

 

There were no more tutors left in the capital willing to take on Bianca, and the rumors about her made others wary of teaching her.

 

Nonetheless, they couldn’t just abandon her education.

 

In a rapidly changing world, knowledge remained the unshakable foundation and truth, serving as a weapon for the future.

 

Thus, Count Cliquemont, desperate to ensure his daughter’s education, discussed the matter with Mr. Motier, a factory owner from Renbruck who was visiting their mansion.

 

The two had maintained a friendship from previous business dealings and were well acquainted with each other’s families. Knowing Mr. Motier’s son, Theodore, was attending university in Misley, Count Cliquemont inquired if he knew any suitable teachers.

 

Knowing Theodore’s character, he was eager to entrust him with the task, but his daughter was unmarried and a noble. Having a male tutor for an underage noble girl was unthinkable in the capital.

 

Hearing this, Theodore introduced Lisbell, who was looking for something to occupy her upcoming vacation. Concerned about the rumors that might arise from a commoner teaching a noble, the lessons were conducted at a separate villa owned by the Cliquemont’s maternal side in a foreign country.

 

Though previous tutors had fled in horror, the two got along unexpectedly well.

 

Lisbell, being a commoner, was more lenient towards Bianca’s unruly nature, which had previously terrified other tutors. Initially wary of Lisbell, Bianca gradually opened up to her as she accepted her unconditionally.


Chapter 85.


As Lisbell got to know Bianca, she felt sorrowful, thinking that Bianca seemed trapped in the superficial label of nobility. Though Bianca had a genuine heart, the world of the capital and high society only highlighted her background and appearance.

 

Realizing that Bianca was stressed about this, Lisbell always listened to her sincerely and empathized with her.

 

Before parting, Lisbell encouraged Bianca, emphasizing that one’s background is innate and can’t be discarded, hoping Bianca would find a way to live well by making appropriate concessions and compromises in that world.

 

When they met again, Bianca seemed to have found the answer. Although they had a brief conversation at the theater, it was clear Bianca had become adept at compromising where necessary.

 

“But why did Bianca suddenly….”

 

Ulrich lowered the cigarette held between his lips as Lisbell softly asked.

 

Exhaling a puff of smoky breath, he crossed his legs and held something barely visible in one hand.

 

“Lady Cliquemont sent an invitation addressed to you.”

 

“…What?”

 

“She wants to invite you to a tea party in a few days.”

 

“How could that…”

 

“She saw me with you the other day. Maybe she sent it here, hoping I’d pass it on.”

 



 

“I found it amusing. Seeing her act so recklessly, the rumors of her being a wild girl aren’t unfounded…. You can sense the Cliquemont couple’s struggles.”

 

As he sat on the bed, Ulrich handed the invitation to Lisbell. Hesitantly, Lisbell took it. While she quietly read the invitation, Ulrich leisurely smoked his cigarette.

 

Occasionally, he would twist Lisbell’s waist-length hair around his fingers. After about five times of this playful act, Lisbell raised her head.

 

“But I can’t go there.”

 

“Why?”

 

“Because… I’m not a noble.”

 

A tea party.

 

Just hearing it made her feel as though her whole body was being pricked. It was clearly not a place for someone like her. Despite liking Bianca, Lisbell felt a bit resentful about receiving such an invitation.

 

However, in a way, it was just like Bianca. She wasn’t a high-nosed noble who drew lines based on class. Of course, she sent the invitation believing it wouldn’t be an issue for Lisbell to attend.

 

“Shall I go with you then?”

 

“…What?”

 

“You seem like you want to go.”

 



 

“If you’re with me, there’s no need to worry about lacking qualifications.”

 

Indeed, in the capital, the name Altahart was like a passport to enter anywhere. If she was with him, Lisbell could go anywhere, regardless of being a commoner or even a pauper.

 

Moreover, snippets of Bianca’s words drifted back to Lisbell’s mind.

 

“Come to think of it, I remember hearing news about Theo through my father recently.”

 

She knew she should forget, but the human heart isn’t that simple. If it were, life wouldn’t be so burdensome.

 

She wanted to hear the rest of the conversation interrupted by Ulrich’s appearance. For that, she needed to meet Bianca again, but the difficulty of arranging such a meeting turned it into a quietly held personal wish.

 

Yet, the opportunity had come on its own.

 

An unknown curiosity swelled in her heart, making it beat faster. However, she couldn’t easily agree because of Ulrich’s unclear proposal.

 

Going to an unknown person’s invitation, simply because she wanted to?

 

He wasn’t such a considerate man.

 

Unless he had another motive….

 

“Your gaze is intimidating.”

 



 

“You’re looking at me with suspicion.”

 

His tone, knowing full well yet asking, was equally dubious. Ulrich laughed as he lightly kissed the back of Lisbell’s hand.

 

“It’s my way of apologizing.”

 

“Apology?”

 

“I couldn’t visit your mother the last time.”

 



 

“This time, I might only be able to spare a little time from my schedule, so even if I can only stay briefly, I’ll go with you if that’s okay.”

 

Given that he didn’t need to accept the invitation, his willingness to go suggested genuine regret and offered goodwill. Indeed, Lisbell hadn’t raised the issue since that day, making this a decision he’d come to on his own.

 

Her thoughts clashed intensely.

 

If she had time to attend such an event, visiting her mother at the hospital would be the right thing. However, she was also curious about Theodore’s situation. Without Bianca, Lisbell would never have known anything about him.

 

Her mind began to ache again.

 

She didn’t understand.

 

Hadn’t she resolved the conflict between her mother and Theodore in Marnia? Why did it still persist? Why did she still feel like a lost child, suffering from the relationship between the two?

 

She thought she had definitively cut ties with Theodore, but was that not the case?

 

Lisbell looked down at the invitation in her hand. Her vision blurred, making the letters look distorted. Her mind felt heavy. She rubbed her eyes, feeling the itch she had temporarily forgotten rising again.

 

“…Can you come with me?”

 

She still had lingering regrets.

 

If she could just confirm that Theodore was living well, it would settle her uneasy mind. She was clinging to the more promising option for confirmation.

 

Last time, she chose her mother; this time, she chose Theodore.

 

Even a marionette with strings hanging loosely from its back wouldn’t look as pitiful.

 

***

 

“Are you serious?”

 

Ulrich, tilting his coffee cup, glanced towards the window. When he brought Lisbell to the capital, it was just turning into a chilly autumn. The wind had quickly become cold enough to rival winter.

 

Speaking of winter, he thought of the fireplace in his bedroom that warmed his nights during that season. Specifically, the mantelpiece above it, where small letters were placed nearly every day.

 

The handwriting saying ‘To Mother’ was as round and neat as her personality. When in a particularly good mood, he found the letters so adorable he wanted to kiss them.

 

“Ulrich, tell me. You’re not serious, right?”

 

“You need to speak clearly, Mother. If you’re vague, how am I to know what you’re referring to?”

 

“There’s no way you’re serious.”

 

“Is this a demonstration of improved acting skills? If so, you should seat a partner more suited to you than me.”

 

Finally, Lady Altahart surrendered.

 

“I am referring to the winter tea party hosted by Lady Cliquemont. You said you’d attend.”

 

“Oh, that.”

 

Ulrich nodded as if just realizing it, then tilted his head in another direction, puzzled.

 

“It was conveyed through Victor, but how did you know, Mother? Are you spying on me?”

 

“You know perfectly well, so what’s the point of asking?”

 

“It was a verification process. Anyway, you admit you’re spying.”

 

“Don’t blame Victor. He was just following my orders.”

 



 

“And without such surveillance, I wouldn’t have had the chance to curb your recklessness, so I don’t regret it.”

 

Although she said this, it was clear Lady Altahart wasn’t pleased. Surveillance or not, her son’s sudden revelation of attending a single noblewoman’s tea party wouldn’t undo the fact.

 

“Ulrich, what’s gotten into you lately?”

 

“Still speaking vaguely. Please be clearer.”

 

“You’re hopeless.”

 



 

“Is it because I set up a meeting with Daphne at the hotel without warning? Or are you still upset about my scolding for skipping the Schwaben Museum exhibition?”

 

“I’d like to ask you, Mother.”

 

Ulrich, having taken a sip of his coffee, finally directed his gaze towards her. Their eyes, of the same color and intensity, met in the air. His eyes carried a slightly sharper glint.

Chapter 86


“The one who taught me not to indiscriminately accept invitations for the sake of our family’s dignity was none other than my mother.”

 



 

“The reason I acted according to that teaching was because the head of the Schwaben family, who should know our family’s principles, dared to send me an invitation. I didn’t attend without discernment, and instead, I did what I wanted to do.”

 



 

“But Mother wasn’t pleased with that. The day after I went to the theater, she called me here and held me for an hour asking why I didn’t respond to the invitation meant for me.”

 

Ulrich tilted his head slightly, his soft platinum hair swaying.

 

“So this time, I accepted the invitation indiscriminately.”

 



 

“I’m merely acting according to Mother’s principles, so I really want to ask what exactly is so displeasing about it.”

 

Listening to her son’s lengthy defense, the lady felt the urge to hold her forehead. It was truly a case of being caught in one’s own trap.

 

To collect herself, the lady sipped the tea in front of her. Meanwhile, Ulrich looked out the window and hummed a small tune.

 

The lady often felt that this son was an unpredictable creature. Despite being siblings, he was so different from Gwen, who was born from the same womb. Although Gwen wasn’t particularly easy to raise, he wasn’t as difficult as Ulrich.

 

The eldest, who had passed away, was straightforward, making it easy to steer him in the desired direction. But Ulrich often had thoughts that were hard to understand.

 

The past few days had been similarly trying. Today, the lady finally grasped her son’s true intentions.

 

He wasn’t simply holding a grudge.

 

Perhaps he had meticulously planned and drawn a blueprint from a very shallow starting point to reach this moment.

 

The more she thought about what she was about to say, the more convinced she became.

 

“…Is the engagement with Daphne really that undesirable?”

 

“I never intended to come to the capital so early.”

 

“What could we do? Gwen ended up like that.”

 

“Indeed. He was of no help when he was alive.”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

She pretended to sternly warn him not to belittle his deceased brother, but Ulrich just shrugged and calmly sipped his coffee.

 

Knowing better than anyone the outrageous acts her second son committed whenever he was displeased, the lady couldn’t say more. Now was not the time to engage in a petty argument over minor remarks.

 

“Fine, I understand. I’ll inform the Cliquemont family that you won’t be attending.”

 

“What inform?”

 

“That you won’t be able to attend the tea party… Ulrich, do you really intend to go? Is it not enough that you accepted the invitation of a family you have no ties to, but now as a man, you’re going to attend a tea party in the middle of a busy time?”

 

“Anyone would think a tea party is highly inappropriate.”

 

Ulrich showed no sign of backing down.

 

The lady knew well what he was trying to elicit with this stance.

 

Finally, she sighed.

 

“Alright… Do as you wish. Just make sure to inform them quickly. Thinking about the rumors that will spread about you attending a tea party with a single lady after the theater incident shortens my lifespan.”

 

“Break off my engagement.”

 

Finally, a clear proposal came from him.

 

“…Ulrich.”

 

“I don’t intend to live as Mother’s puppet.”

 

At his firm resolve, the Altahart lady closed her eyes gently and then opened them.

 

“It sounds like a threat.”

 

“It couldn’t be.”

 



 

“I’m giving you options. Will you just watch as your son’s honor is tarnished, or will you understand and respect your one remaining son?”

 

Ulrich’s leisurely gaze met his mother’s. He smiled beautifully.

 

“If it’s the mother I know, the latter is the more suitable choice.”

 

Anyone else would have stubbornly insisted on their own way. But the Altahart lady was also a parent. No parent could win against their child. Pushing Ulrich further was futile.

 

Moreover, it was a pointless fight.

 

The more she pushed Ulrich, the more he would erode his dignity, and in turn, tarnish her name as well. They were connected by the bloodline of ‘Altahart.’

 

The Altahart lady set down the empty teacup she had used to calm herself and sighed lightly.

 

“I can’t just stand by and watch my beloved son’s honor be ruined.”

 

Ulrich smiled serenely. It was the smile of a victor.

 

“I’ll inform the Cliquemont family as soon as possible.”

 

“I’d appreciate that. Also, the young lady of the Cliquemont family has many rumors, so I’d prefer if you didn’t get involved further.”

 

“You mean the rumor that she’s an incorrigible troublemaker?”

 

“That’s a very simplified version of the true story, which is even scarier.”

 

“Aha.”

 



 

“Well, I wasn’t particularly interested in her anyway.”

 

Thinking the matter was settled, Ulrich rose from his seat.

 

Just as he was about to leave, he stopped suddenly.

 

“Ah, wait a moment.”

 

“Hmm?”

 

“Although I won’t attend the tea party, I have to meet the young lady of Cliquemont separately.”

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“I have a promise to keep.”

 

The lady’s expression turned curious.

 

Recalling Lisbell from the previous night, Ulrich realized they seemed quite close. The invitation, sent so proudly after he thought they wouldn’t meet again, was not a one-sided acquaintance.

 

Therefore, Ulrich decided to respond willingly. He felt the need to appease Lisbell a little.

 

“Do you have something to hide from me?”

 

He wasn’t sure when, but the time wasn’t yet.

 

He needed to drag this out a bit longer.

 

The recent days spent with her, the occasional tension, the situations he maneuvered to his advantage using her—all of it was enjoyable.

 

Enjoyable.

 

A very unfamiliar term for his monotonous life. It had been a long time since he felt such vibrant stimulation. Amidst the busy chaos, the thing that kept him sane was his time with Lisbell.

 

Hoping to maintain this, he knew how to offer the right incentives. Even if the secret would eventually come out, there was a right time for everything.

 

He didn’t want her leaving the mansion any more than necessary. The more she saw of the world, the more she would think. He needed to thoroughly suppress her thoughts.

 

“…Could it be.”

 

The lady’s face hardened slightly as she opened her mouth after a brief silence.

 

“Is it because of that woman?”

 

“Since you’re so worried about others seeing me with the young lady of Cliquemont, I’ll consider inviting her quietly to the mansion. It’s just a one-time meeting, so you’ll allow that, right?”

 

“She looked at you with fearful eyes.”

 



 

“It was barely enough to even call her a mistress.”

 

The lady’s serious gaze was one of reminiscing the past. It wasn’t hard to pinpoint the time. It must have been when they accidentally met in the dining room.

 

“Even though you’re my son, sometimes I can’t understand you.”

 



 

“Ulrich, many things change depending on how people think. Relationships are like that too. Did I ever tell you to kick that woman out of the mansion immediately? Did I ever hint that to you? No, I only advised you to be cautious so rumors wouldn’t spread.”

 



 

“I won’t mind if you have multiple mistresses. Just ensure the right person is in the proper place. Choose a respectable woman to be your wife, hold a ceremonious wedding, and once everything is settled, you can have as many mistresses as you like.”

 



 

“A man’s curiosity is just a seasonal whim. You might cherish her now, but there will come a time when that curiosity fades. When that happens, you’ll regret the actions taken under the influence of fleeting desires. It will all seem like the foolishness of a trivial mind. This is advice purely for your sake, so I hope you don’t take it badly.”

 

Her mother’s doctrine was long and pointless.

 

He understood it in his head but found it utterly unconvincing.

 

He couldn’t understand why things had to be that way.


As my mother said, it might be a momentary desire.

 

No matter how intense it becomes, it will eventually fade away, like the temperature of that season.

 

But is it wrong to be fully immersed in that desire?

 

If the interest will fade anyway, is it wrong to savor it to the fullest beforehand?

 

If even that is impossible, then why do the burdens and values of AltaHart exist that constantly weigh on my shoulders?

 

It raises many questions, but there are no sharp answers. Ulrich thought that his mother’s theory wasn’t absolute either. Such instability couldn’t be used as a benchmark.

 

He smiled softly, as if to hide his stiffened inner self.

 

“It doesn’t matter if you don’t understand.”

 

Ulrich walked towards the door with firm steps. Only when he reached the door did he turn to look at his mother.

 

“Just as you have your own romance, I must have my own.”

 

***

 

As soon as the door opened, the sound of someone standing up abruptly was heard. In this mansion, which was chilly all day long as if only corpses lived here, it was rare to encounter such bustling signs of life. But because of that, it exuded a strong human scent.

 

“Lisbell!”

 

Bianca, who stood up, pounding the table, was highly excited. It was a face that hinted at what thoughts she had while staying here after receiving an invitation. Anxiety and nervousness, corresponding expectations and thrills. Well, such complex things.

 

“Bianca.”

 

Even if we were to reunite, I never thought it would be here. Contrary to Lisbell’s thoughts, Bianca was now at the AltaHart mansion. As a guest invited by Ulrich.

 

“What, what is all this? I still can’t believe it. That I’m in the AltaHart mansion…. I can’t believe it even after saying it out loud. Could you pinch my cheek for a second?”

 

Bianca couldn’t wait and pinched her own cheek. Ouch, a weak groan escaped through her twisted lips. Bianca’s expression became even more blank.

 

Lisbell sat her down to calm her. The table was already splendidly set for guest hospitality. Lisbell smiled inwardly as she saw that a few cookies were missing.

 

“Bianca, calm down.”

 

“Calm down? If you knew what kind of smile my mother gave me today, you wouldn’t say that. And her tone! She gently interrogated me about how I came to know someone from this household, making my whole body shiver…. And she patted my shoulder three times while seeing me off. Three times. Not two, but three times. Lisbell, this is truly astonishing!”

 

As Bianca’s fuss grew longer, Lisbell’s mouth dried up.

 

She hesitated, then took a sip of the coffee she had poured into her empty cup.

 

“Your mother probably thought this was an opportunity to build a connection with AltaHart, but in reality, you’re meeting with me instead.”

 

“What? What does that matter! I’m so happy to see you again, even like this. I was so disappointed that you couldn’t come to my tea party. But then I found the letter inviting me to this mansion right after that.”

 

Bianca stuck out her tongue as if she was still stunned by the thought. Lisbell brought a small plate with cookies to her. Bianca eagerly ate another cookie, finding it to her taste.

 

“Rather, say something. I’m so curious I’m about to stand my hair on end. Since when have you been so close with the nobleman?”

 

The nobleman. She must be referring to Ulrich AltaHart. Lisbell felt the distant sense and responded awkwardly.

 

“We’re not close.”

 

“Not close? You live in the same mansion, he received your invitation as if it were his own and returned it to you, and in this intimate situation, how can you say that? I naturally thought you were in a romantic relationship with the nobleman!”

 

If I had been holding a teacup, I would have dropped it.

 

A romantic relationship.

 

Does it seem to others that the man and I are in such a tender relationship?

 

My stomach tightened.

 

There was a gap between speculation and reality. In reality, Lisbell was merely a scarecrow, bound tightly in the prison the man had made, deprived of her freedom with her mother held hostage.

 

“Wrong.”

 

“What?”

 

“Don’t say such things.”

 

Bianca, rarely looking puzzled, was taken aback.

 

Realizing that she had been too sharp, Lisbell quickly tried to make amends.

 

“I owe Mr. AltaHart a debt, so I’m staying with him for a while. That’s all, we are nothing more.”

 

“Then what about the time we ran into each other at the theater? The play we watched, it’s very popular among couples in Laurent these days. You two clearly came together that day.”

 

“He was exhausted from overwork recently, so he took me along to relax and watch the play. Like you said, it’s unbecoming for a man to go alone to such a famous place.”

 

“Then why did he invite me to the mansion today?”

 

“Since I couldn’t attend your tea party as a commoner, he invited you here instead. It’s purely out of his kindness.”

 

“Hmm… really?”

 

Bianca’s enthusiasm waned. Although her doubts hadn’t completely disappeared, she thought it would be impolite to pry further when Lisbell had been so clear-cut. Soon, she skillfully changed the topic.

 

“Have you been well? When did you come to the capital? You should have contacted me if you came!”

 

Realizing that the avoided topic had finally subsided, Lisbell relaxed and engaged in the conversation.

 

Just like when they met at the theater, Bianca was the same.

 

Still honest, and that aspect was charming.

 

She burst into laughter at a certain story, then looked around as if someone was watching her. After a while, she seemed to realize this wasn’t her mansion but a place she was invited to, so she laughed openly without worrying.

 

It felt odd to sense a commonness from a noble, but that was the Bianca Lisbell had known.

 

“Then, once you’ve settled your debt, are you going back to the countryside? Was it Misley?”

 

Bianca asked as her laughter subsided.

 

For a brief moment, her thoughts halted.

 

When did it start? Whenever she faced something complex, her mind would send red signals, turning her thoughts white. In an instant, she became a fool who couldn’t think. This must be the ‘don’t think’ Ulrich often referred to.

 

Lisbell rubbed her eyes to wake her frozen brain.

 

Afterwards.

 

What happens afterwards….

 

Come to think of it, I had never thought about the future.

 

Why hadn’t I considered that moment?

 

Why did I think I would be tied to him for life?

 

When his interest in me fades, I will be free.

 

The freedom I have longed for so much….

 

“Lisbell?”

 

“Huh?”

 

“Why did you suddenly go quiet? You’re speaking less.”

 

“Oh, it’s nothing.”

 

I have to take care of my sick mother.

 

And I have to do what I want to do.

 

The blueprint I had belatedly conceived felt thin, as if something important was missing.

 

Is it because I haven’t decided where to live?

 

Because I haven’t made any future financial plans?

 

Or maybe.

 

…Ah.

 

The absence of Theodore, who was naturally part of that blueprint, left a void. The emptiness made everything feel clumsy and inadequate.

 

“Bianca.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Remember the thing you were about to tell me last time?”

 

“What thing?”

 

“The news about Theo.”

 



 

“What were you trying to tell me then?”

 

This impromptu meeting had its purposes. Ulrich felt guilty for not accompanying her to visit, Bianca wanted to reunite with an old friend, and Lisbell… wanted to hear the news about Theodore she hadn’t heard.

 

“Ah, right,” Bianca said, her attention piqued. She dusted off the cookie crumbs from her hands and leaned closer.

 

“Recently, Mr. Mortier came to Laurent regarding a delivery issue and visited our mansion as a courtesy. I mean, Theodore’s father.”

 



 

“Apparently, Theodore returned to his hometown, Renbruck.”

 

“To Renbruck?”

 

“Yes. I wasn’t there long, so I’m not certain, but it seems he’s preparing to take over as the factory owner, following in his father’s footsteps.”




 

“Yeah. Thinking about it, that was strange. You two said your dream was to run a small elementary school in the countryside after getting married. But then Theodore suddenly decided to take over the factory owner’s position, which he claimed he had no interest in, and you, Lisbell, appeared in Laurent out of the blue.”

 



 

“You two really did break up, didn’t you?”

 

Bianca’s tone was bitter. But it was nothing compared to Lisbell’s heart. The words that firmly confirmed their separation felt like they were digging into the core of her being. The unresolved pain weighed heavily on her heart, causing the once smooth surface of her emotions to collapse.

 

“Relationships are terrifying when you think about it. They’re the deepest connections, but they’re also the most transient.”

 



 

“I just… I wish you and Theo happiness in your own ways.”

 

“…Yeah, thank you.”

 

Factory owner.

 

He who loved children the most had discussed with her and was the first to give up that path and future. For him to take it up again… meant that Theodore had also given up on their future together. Just as he no longer appeared in her blueprint, she no longer appeared in his.

 

Is it like this for everyone?

 

Do people slowly become strangers like this?

 

Lisbell half-listened to Bianca’s words as she gazed at the sky, where blue clouds were drifting by.

 

The wind blowing through the closed window was unusual.

 

Winter was coming.

 

No, summer had already ended long ago.

 

***

 

Bianca left after staying for about an hour longer.

 

Lisbell wanted to see her off outside the mansion, but the old butler stopped her. Knowing what it meant, Lisbell had no choice but to say goodbye to Bianca with a hug inside the building before returning to her bedroom. Just inviting Bianca over had been more kindness than she deserved.

 

Walking down the unusually long corridor, Lisbell kept mulling over the news Bianca had brought about Theodore.

 

He had returned to their hometown of Renbruck, was preparing to take over the factory owner’s position….

 

That’s good.

 

Despite her sadness, such thoughts came to her. It seemed like he had properly taken care of their ruined wedding and future, and was now planning and establishing something new. Perhaps that path suited Theo better. Given his inherently diligent and cautious nature, he would do well as a factory owner.

 

…Theo is doing that.

 

And the more she felt relieved, the more despair about her own situation overwhelmed her.

 

Even the ex-fiancé who received such a notification was living well, so what was she doing here?

 

When she went to meet Bianca, she had conflicted thoughts about whether this was right, whether holding onto regrets about Theodore was even acceptable, but upon meeting her, her thoughts changed completely.

 

Instead, she resolved.

 

She couldn’t keep being dragged around by Ulrich like this.

 

Having wrapped up the lingering issue with Theodore, it was time to face her mother’s matters. She could no longer just watch Ulrich’s reactions and be cautious. Her patience was wearing thin.

 

Pondering the most appropriate approach, she opened the door to her bedroom. Without her, Ulrich’s bedroom was always quiet and cold like a wooden doll. As Lisbell turned inward, she caught sight of herself in the mirror. Suddenly, she stopped.

 

Seeing this, she understood why Bianca thought of her as Ulrich’s lover. Even today, she was wearing a high-quality dress Ulrich had personally chosen for her. She had planned to wear anything, but he had somehow read her thoughts in advance and left the dress hung neatly in the closet.

 

Suppressing the revulsion, she had worn it to meet Bianca. Now that she had achieved her goal, she wanted to take it off immediately. As she raised her arms to unbutton the neckline at the back,

 

Thud-

 

A strange sound spread in the otherwise empty space. Lisbell stopped adjusting her dress and quickly turned around. The sound came from her makeshift wardrobe, arranged to Ulrich’s taste.

 

“…Is anyone there?”

 

It was a ridiculous question.

 

If there was no one, there would be no answer.

 

Just as she expected, there was no response. She tried to ignore it, but in the unnerving atmosphere of the bedroom, it was hard to dismiss. Lisbell cautiously approached the wardrobe. Confirming her suspicion, she heard a faint rustle from inside.

 

Without hesitation, Lisbell opened the wardrobe.

 

Her eyes widened immediately.

 

“…Noah?”

 

Noah, whom she thought was in his bedroom, was inside her wardrobe. His eyes were tearful, likely scared of the dark. Startled, Lisbell bent down. The child extended his short arms as if asking to be held. Lisbell quickly picked him up.

 

“Noah, why are you here…? No, how did you get here…?”

 

“Came to see Liz…”

 

Noah mumbled, pressing his chubby cheek against her chest. Lisbell quickly guessed the reason for his actions.

 

“You missed me?”

 

“Yes…”

 

“So you came all the way here?”

 

Noah’s small head nodded up and down. Lisbell, stroking the back of his head, noticed the wide bed behind them. The memory of last night with Ulrich flashed through her mind. Suddenly, the space felt suffocating. She didn’t want to keep Noah in Ulrich’s room, a place that tainted her spirit.

 

Lisbell hurried towards the door.

 

“Noah, even if you miss me, you can’t just come here.”

 

“Why? Why…?”

 

“Because this isn’t my bedroom. You know it belongs to someone else.”

 

“Yeah.”

 

She gently stroked Noah’s side hair. Opening the door, she finally felt relieved. Lisbell thought it might cause trouble if someone saw them, so she tried to put Noah down, but he clung tightly, not wanting to let go.

 

“Actually…”

 

“Yes?”

 

While practically running towards Noah’s room, he spoke shyly.

 

“Did you… write today too?”

 

“Write what?”

 

“A letter… to mother.”

 

“Not yet today. Why do you ask?”

 

“Just because…”

 

Noah fidgeted with his hands. Maybe he was thinking about the pendant. Lisbell didn’t give it much thought and quickened her pace. Shortly, they reached Noah’s bedroom. Despite Noah’s reluctance to part today, she managed to calm him down and put him to sleep. After tucking him in, Lisbell gently stroked his cheek and stood up.

 

Something brushed against her foot.

 

It was the box Noah had hurriedly hidden the other day. The lid had slightly opened from being kicked. After a moment’s hesitation, Lisbell quietly closed the lid and pushed the box back under the bed.

 

If he wanted to keep it hidden, he should have stored it properly.

 

She chuckled inwardly and carefully tucked the blanket around Noah before leaving the room.

 

“Did you come to watch my performance last time?”

 

She was halfway up the stairs.

 

Julian Scott was standing at a corner where he could look outside through the window. The sharp, cold wind blew in through the window he had opened, dissipating the smell of his cigarette.

 

She should have passed by without looking, but his words stopped her. They brought back unpleasant memories. The day she had gone to the theater due to Ulrich’s coercion, meeting Julian Scott on stage while she was entangled with Ulrich.

 

Julian let out a smirk at Lisbell’s lack of response.

 

“You said you weren’t a mistress.”

 

Julian finally said what she had feared. She wanted to believe it wasn’t true, but reality was always harsh. His words could only mean one thing. He had clearly seen her and Ulrich’s actions from the dark, beyond the balcony.

 

Was today a lucky day or an unlucky one?

 

It was a day when she could fully hear about Theodore and close that chapter, but also a day when she was twice mistaken for Ulrich’s mistress or lover.

 

Lisbell took a deep breath to calm herself.

 

“I told you last time.”

 

“What? That you’re being blackmailed because of a weakness?”

 



 

“You didn’t look like it.”

 

“Are you trying to insult me?”

 

“Of course not.”

 

Julian crossed his arms and leaned against the windowsill.

 

“I can help you.”

 

His dubious offer approached her like a dark hand.

“Didn’t we have this conversation once before?”

 

“Yes, and I also told Lisbell, who was wary of me like now, that there was no need for that.”

 



 

“Why do you keep trying to distance yourself? Lisbell, I just want to get closer to you.”

 

“Is there any reason to do that when we won’t see each other soon anyway?”

 

Hmm, he hummed deeply.

 

“It seems like the lady wants to kick you out of here.”

 

“…What?”

 

“I told you not to make an enemy out of the lady.”

 



 

“It seems she got really pricked by this incident. She ordered her secretary to investigate you.”

 



 

“I heard your mother is hospitalized at the Laurent Royal Hospital. Is that the weakness that the second young master found?”

 

Kick out. Don’t make an enemy. Pricked. My head ached from trying to unravel these nonsensical words.

 

Lisbell was soon startled.

 

No need to ask if it was true, if the lady had ordered an investigation on her. Knowing about her mother, which even Julian hadn’t mentioned, made it undoubtedly true.

 

“Did the lady tell you?”

 

“Not exactly. The secretary came to report while the lady and I were enjoying ourselves in the bedroom.”

 



 

“So, it was by coincidence.”

 

“Ha….”

 

“Was this really blackmail material?”

 

Seeing no reason to hide anything further, Lisbell slowly nodded, judging that this man could exert less influence on her than Ulrich. Julian let out a disbelieving laugh.

 

“The mighty Ulrich catching a woman’s weakness and playing with it.”

 

“…So, why did the lady investigate me?”

 

“Ah, she thinks you’re making the second young master act strange.”

 



 

“So, I intend to help you to earn some favor with the lady.”

 

“What do you mean by that?”

 

“If the reason you’re here is because of your mother’s weakness, then solving that problem means you no longer need to be here with the second young master. Isn’t that right?”

 

“That’s….”

 

It was true.

 

The only reason Lisbell was entangled with Ulrich was that her sick mother was held as a hostage.

 

“If I help solve that problem, your weakness will disappear, and you won’t need to stay in this mansion anymore. That seems like the best outcome the lady wants right now.”

 

“…Just for that reason?”

 

“Haha. You still don’t understand the people in this household, do you?”

 



 

“Unlike you, who claims to be held here against your will, I stay in this mansion by my own choice. I even came in here as a lover, hoping for the leftovers.”

 



 

“The lady’s favor is that very leftovers for me.”

 

He kindly explained as if worried she wouldn’t understand. Thanks to that, she understood very clearly. So, he wasn’t helping her to get on her good side but to get on Lady Altahart’s good side.

 

Trying to accept that Ulrich’s mother saw her as a thorn in her side, along with his offer, made her head spin. Lisbell wiped her face as she stood there.

 

Then, all thoughts vanished in an instant.

 

A bubble, two, three, emerged.

 

The news of Theodore from Bianca.

 

Julian’s purpose now clear.

 

And Ulrich’s attitude of hiding something.

 

“…The hospital….”

 

When the three bubbles overlapped, her lips parted as if swept by a wave.

 

“Ulrich admitted my mother to this hospital without my permission.”

 

“Wow, didn’t expect him to use such rough methods.”

 

“But since coming to the capital, I haven’t seen my mother even once.”

 

“Not once?”

 

“Ulrich said visits were only possible if he was present.”

 



 

“But he’s been too busy lately to take me to the hospital.”

 

Julian smirked.

 

Next, his question formed the suspicion that had been brewing in her heart.

 

“Could he really not spare any time to visit the hospital?”

 



 

“Our second young master, despite his looks, has a rather shady side.”

 

“…You’re right. It seems like Ulrich could make time but isn’t doing it, or it’s an excuse.”

 

“An excuse. That means….”

 

“Yes…. I think my mother might not even be in that hospital.”

 

“Then where is she?”

 

“I don’t know. I’m not sure, but… Ulrich is definitely hiding something from me. The most plausible scenario is that he didn’t admit her to the hospital and is hiding that fact.”

 

If not….

 

There was another possibility, but Lisbell shook her head to dismiss the thought. It couldn’t be.

 

“So, you want me to find out if your mother is really admitted there?”

 

“…Is that possible?”

 

She recalled the hospital she visited the previous day. Her mother’s room was located beyond the general access area, heavily guarded. She didn’t even have the courage to try getting in herself.

 

Julian put the short cigarette back in his mouth. Seeming deep in thought, he soon locked eyes with her.

 

“It is possible.”

 

“Really?”

 

“It’s probably true that you can’t visit without the second young master.”

 



 

“The special ward at the Royal Hospital, where your mother is supposed to be admitted, is a building established under the royal family’s influence, backed by influential noble lords who invest large sums every quarter in exchange for top-notch medical treatment unlike any other. Being such a discreet organization, it’s strictly off-limits to outsiders. Only those approved by connections, like needing to be accompanied by the second young master, can enter.”

 

She hadn’t known such details.

 

She had always wondered why the procedures were so stringent, why visits were restricted by the presence of another. Without Julian, she might have remained ignorant forever, making her neck tingle with fear.

 

But as she got closer to the truth, the situation felt even more daunting.

 

“Can you really look into such a place?”

 

Hearing about its standing and authority felt like it was in the clouds. It was something unimaginable to Lisbell before her entanglement with Ulrich.

 

Seeing what she found daunting, Julian exhaled smoke. The swirling cigarette smoke felt unsettling as it hung in the air.

 

“I once heard that the family of a lady I served had connections there. I can try to use that network to look into it.”

 

Perhaps it was his status in this mansion or the unsettling gaze he gave her that made Lisbell recall Ulrich calling him a “gigolo.” Even trying to interpret it positively seemed impossible.

 

The lady he once served.

 

He had been a gigolo for noblewomen from the start.

 

“Don’t look at me like that. I did it to survive. Did you think I joined the theater troupe purely by luck? Unfortunately, the world doesn’t work so easily.”

 



 

“I don’t take pride in crawling between old women’s legs. Especially considering my preferences. I prefer young and beautiful women if I can.”

 

His gaze subtly swept over her, unmistakably sticky. His eyes couldn’t be blamed on smoke now. Julian’s gaze was undeniably lewd.

 

His eyes crawled over her like saliva, making her feel like a bug was crawling on her skin. In short, it was unpleasant. Lisbell instinctively stepped back.


Mocking the sudden rise of her wariness, he curled his lips into a smirk. The sight of his upturned smile felt prickly, as if it would taint her consciousness. Ignoring his eerie grin, Lisbell brought the diverted conversation back on track.

 

“…If you can do something for me, I’ll show you some sincerity.”

 

“How so?”

 

“I could steal something of Ulrich’s and give it to you…”

 

Julian’s eyes widened before scrunching up in a distasteful grimace, a sign he was holding back laughter.

 

“Planning to filch some jewelry?”

 

“His bedroom’s full of it. He probably wouldn’t notice if one went missing.”

 

When she responded indifferently, he clutched his stomach and burst into loud laughter. She couldn’t understand what was so funny. The tension that wouldn’t fade made Lisbell moisten her dry lips. Julian, who had barely managed to lift his head, turned his sharp gaze to her.

 

“You still don’t realize how scary the people in this house are, do you, Lisbell? Even if you had the guts to steal something, don’t give it to me. I don’t want to get caught up in anything, so I’ll pass.”

 



 

“How about something else? There’s something simpler.”

 

“What…?”

 

Julian unconsciously leaned closer. The distance was already short enough that their lips almost touched. Lisbell’s face froze with shock. The man who nearly committed a botched kiss only smiled smugly.

 

“A kiss?”

 



 

“A show of sincerity like that would be enough.”

 

Julian winked at her, as if to ask what she was going to do. Lisbell stared at him blankly before letting out a dry chuckle. After Ulrich, now this man was treating her like a prostitute. It was humiliating and made her feel sick, but she had to endure it. If she thought about it, it was all Ulrich’s fault she was being treated this way. Only with Julian Scott’s help could she find a way to escape from Ulrich’s side.

 

At this moment, there was no other option. Wasn’t she already searching for a better method?

 

Julian’s plan was solid enough, and it would be foolish to reject it just because she felt uneasy about a brief kiss. It wasn’t like she could break through the hospital’s tightly guarded ward all by herself.

 

There was nothing else to consider.

 

Think only of your mother.

 

The only person left by her side, her mother….

 

Resolving herself with painful determination, Lisbell nodded. Julian, seeming satisfied with the agreement, deepened his smile and straightened his previously relaxed posture.

 

“A wise choice.”

 



 

“If I learn anything, we can talk again. For now, I’ll be going.”

 

Leaving behind a rather theatrical nod, he descended the stairs first and disappeared. Once his retreating figure finally vanished, Lisbell turned and walked in the opposite direction, rubbing her mouth with the back of her hand.

 

She marveled at how simple it all seemed.

 

Offering her body to Ulrich to pay for hospital bills had become so routine that giving up a kiss wasn’t even something to think twice about. She hadn’t even kissed Julian yet, but she already felt unbearably uneasy.

 

Lisbell scrubbed the spot with the back of her hand. As she kept repeating the motion, her delicate lips became swollen from being rubbed raw. Eventually, she couldn’t withstand the rough force, and they slightly split.

 

Lisbell, standing with her hand awkwardly raised, turned her head slightly. Her faint reflection appeared in the hallway window. Amid the blurred, muted colors, only the drop of blood on her lips stood out clearly in her vision.

 

It made her feel oddly creeped out, so she hurriedly averted her gaze. The only sound in the hallway leading to her bedroom was the echo of her own crossing footsteps. The corridor of the mansion felt particularly desolate today.

 

***

 

Looking back, that day was strangely off.

 

If asked what was off, it would be hard to pinpoint exactly, but everything, from beginning to end, was odd.

 

It started with the dream she had just before waking up.

 

Even the dream she had that night was unsettling and ominous.

 

When Lisbell opened her eyes in what she thought was reality, she found herself standing in an endless field. The sensation at her feet was similar to weeds brushing against her, but it wasn’t the familiar green.

 

It was all pitch black.

 

It was like a web of inky black dye had been splattered everywhere, or like someone’s long hair had been scattered all around. The sight was so chilling that she couldn’t stand still and kept walking.

 

Rustle Rustle

 

The feel of the ground against her bare feet was indescribably strange. The entirely black surface was soft and yielding, making her feel as if she were walking on someone’s scalp. Was it really hair wrapping around her feet? Was she stepping on someone’s skin?

 

The further she went, the more bewildered she became. Lisbell began to feel scared. Even if she were to be trapped in a labyrinth for the rest of her life, it wouldn’t be as terrifying as this.

 

“Haah, haah…”

 

When she came to her senses, she was running, unable to catch her breath. A cold wind blew from somewhere. Maybe it was what caused the black foliage to sway in unison.

 

Whooo, whooo—

 

The sound of the surrounding foliage was like the wailing of a mournful soul.

 

She couldn’t comprehend it. Everything was beyond understanding. Without even glancing back, Lisbell continued to run forward, her eyes fixed straight ahead. The more she ran, the more the feeling of the foliage wrapping around her legs intensified. By the time it started climbing up to her calves, the constriction became unbearable.

 

“Haah haa… ugh!”

 

It felt like her knee was being bitten. Without even a chance to resist, Lisbell fell forward. The ground, which had seemed soft enough to trip over just moments ago, was now unbearably hard as it slammed into her body. This couldn’t possibly be someone’s skin.

 

As she tried to assess her aching body, she barely managed to sit up.

 

Caw!

 

Caw!

 

The eerie sound of the foliage was replaced by the sinister cawing of crows.

 

The noise scraped at her brain. Lisbell clutched her ears and winced. While she was struggling with the pain in her eardrums, something caught her eye. Just a few steps ahead of where she had fallen was a crow, as big as her own body.

 

Caw!

 

The crow spread its wings wide and flapped them vigorously, tilting its head back. Its sharp beak was stained with blood. The sight, as if she were witnessing a gruesome murder, sent a shiver down her spine.

 

Don’t go near it.

 

Turn back and get away from that horrifying thing.

 

She knew she should do that, but despite her thoughts, Lisbell found herself stumbling toward the giant crow. She had spotted something resembling a dried-up hand near the crow’s body.

 

It was a form she was all too familiar with.

 

Steeling herself against the gut-wrenching tension, she took a step forward. Finally, she was close enough to see what lay before the crow. The sight made Lisbell’s head spin.

 

It was her mother.

 

Her mother, lying there as she had been the last time Lisbell had seen her in the pouring rain in Marnia.

 

But it wasn’t exactly the same.

 

The murderous crow dipped its pitch-black head down and began pecking at her mother’s insides, its beak drenched in blood.

 

Lisbell tried to scream.

 

But no sound came out. Instead, the pressure from holding back the scream clawed at her throat, choking her like hands wrapped around her neck. Gasping and wheezing, she crumbled to the ground.

 

As she frantically grasped at her throat, something began to take form around her neck. The sensation, which she had earlier thought was similar to the feel of grass, began to change.

 

It felt soft and resilient, like fabric.

 

Almost like neckties….

 

It was as if dozens of neckties had been tied around her neck, dragging her around like a noose. Lisbell, reduced to a state barely distinguishable from a corpse, crawled aimlessly through the darkness.

 

Caw!

 

As the crow’s cries, coming from who knows where, cut through her ears for the third time, Lisbell finally woke from the dream.

 

Shhhhh

 

Her entire body was drenched in cold sweat. Still unable to fully shake off the nightmare, Lisbell turned her head.

 

Heavy rain was pouring outside the window.

 

It was the winter rain, heralding the change of seasons.

Chapter 91

Could a nightmare really be this detailed?

 

Even after waking up, Lisbell couldn’t fully regain her composure due to the unsettling aftermath. In a bedroom where only the sound of rain dared to intrude, she lay frozen, curled up tightly on bedding that felt even more repulsive because of its luxury.

 

It wasn’t until the sweat that made her slip damp began to dry, and the cold set in, that she started to come to her senses. She threw off the blanket, got out of bed, and approached the window. Even though the window wasn’t open, the sound of the rain was intense. It was the kind of weather that made it seem as if invisible waves were crashing in.

 

Lisbell placed her hand on the window frame and stared blankly for a moment before heading to the bathroom. She washed away the sticky sweat on her naked body with warm water and put on fresh clothes. Just yesterday, a thin blouse was enough, but today, the unusual chill made her rub her arms. Reluctantly, she took out and wore a thick wool vest.

 

Perhaps because the nightmare that started her day was so unsettling, her mood remained sour all morning. Once again, she didn’t touch the food that was served. The image of her mother’s entrails being torn apart by a crow, whether dead or alive, still lingered, and she had no appetite.

 

The sky was overcast, and her mind was clouded.

 

It was one of those days when, even indoors, you feel utterly helpless, as if you were trapped in the torrential rain. Each time the sky couldn’t bear the onslaught of the rain and thunder cracked loudly, she felt even more disturbed. It was as if the scream of the crow from her dream was being resurrected.

 

Lisbell rubbed her still-aching chest and then began to tidy up. It was about time to go see Noah. Before leaving the bedroom, Lisbell habitually walked over to the mantelpiece.

 

Underneath the newly decorated wreath on the wall, the mantelpiece was clean as always.

 

The place where she would leave letters for her mother…

 

Though it had always been empty, today the sight of it felt particularly strange. Lisbell swept her hand over the empty shelf before turning away.

 

She exited the bedroom, rounded the corner of the hallway, and was about to descend the stairs when a steady shadow stretched to her feet. She had grown accustomed to checking her feet first and lifted her head out of habit. There stood Julian Scott. Arms crossed, he was still, as if waiting for someone. And Lisbell suspected that someone was her, as he straightened his posture when their eyes met.

 

“Lisbell.”

 

Come to think of it, wasn’t it on these stairs that they last spoke a week ago?

 

The place where he had made the brazen proposal to help her win the favor of the lady, who had been displeased with her.

 

Lisbell closed her eyes deeply and then opened them. She wished that gesture could dispel the remnants of the nightmare, but they clung to her as if glued to her eyelids, vividly.

 

“I was waiting for you.”

 

He said they should talk if there was anything he had discovered. As he had said, she had encountered him two or three times while staying at the mansion over the past week, but unlike before, they had passed each other like strangers. So today, his deliberate waiting could only mean one thing.

 

“Did you find out anything?”

 

“I did.”

 

For the first time, Lisbell took a step toward him.

 

“What is it?”

 

At her impatient question, Julian crossed his arms and leaned against the railing. With eyes that seemed to be contemplating something, he spoke.

 

“Your mother’s name, Helen Osborne, is correct, right?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“I checked, and it turns out that name is indeed on the list of patients using the special ward. Apparently, she’s staying in the best private room there. I personally confirmed this at the Royal Hospital this morning.”

 

Was it all just a baseless worry?

 

Lisbell felt a weight lift from her chest, but she couldn’t fully dismiss her suspicions because of the look on Julian’s face. He seemed unable to shake off a lingering doubt.

 

“However… I heard something strange from the nurse in charge of the ward.”

 

“Strange? What do you mean?”

 

“She said there’s always a foul smell coming from Helen Osborne’s room.”

 



 

“Like the smell of a dried-up corpse rotting away…”

 

Her heart clenched tightly.

 

It felt as if it had dropped with a heavy thud.

 

An uncontrollable tremor started to spread across her chest. Lisbell had to make a great effort not to clutch at it. As a result, she couldn’t stop her expression from crumbling.

 

A corpse?

 

The smell of a rotting corpse?

 

The smell of a dried-up corpse?

 

Lisbell faltered. Had she not instinctively strengthened her grip on the floor, she might have collapsed right there. But Julian Scott reached out a hand, as if she seemed particularly vulnerable. Normally, she would have pushed him away immediately, but she was in no state to do so now.

 

Why does the sound of the crow’s cry come to mind at this moment?

 

Why does the bloodstain on the crow’s beak come to mind now?

 

Why does the image of the dried-up body’s entrails come to mind now…?

 

She felt like she was slipping back into the nightmare, lost in a black thicket. Lisbell blinked several times.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

She only snapped out of it when the unfamiliar voice felt unusually close. Lisbell quickly pushed him away and stood up straight. Her frozen lips parted, and words poured out urgently.

 

“Are you sure about this?”

 

Julian, who had been looking down at his hand, which had been pushed away without hesitation, recovered his usual sly smile.

 

“Well, I can’t say for sure.”

 



 

“But the nurse has no reason to make up such a story.”

 

“But, but it doesn’t make any sense.”

 



 

“You said it yourself, a huge fund was invested in establishing and running that ward. To give the best special room, in such a well-maintained place, to someone who’s already dead… that’s not just wasteful, it’s absurdly extravagant, isn’t it?”

 

“Hmm, that’s true.”

 

“And then again, it’s not unusual for a hospital to smell of corpses. The city is overflowing with people, and just as many die every day. So the nurse might have been mistaken because she was busy…”

 

“Lisbell.”

 



 

“You’ve already made up your mind not to believe me.”

 

Lisbell flinched. Her reaction was that of someone sharply struck in a sensitive spot.

 

Julian, watching her closely with what could be seen as a pitiful expression, gave a slightly sympathetic smile.

 

“Do as you please. I was only passing along the news; it’s up to you whether to believe it or not.”

 



 

“But since we disagree, it’s probably best to postpone the reward. I don’t want to receive a kiss from you under these circumstances.”

 

His talk of a kiss, so out of place in this situation, read entirely differently to Lisbell. She looked up at him with eyes that seemed on the verge of tears.

 

“…So you’re convinced.”

 



 

“You believe that my mother might already be a corpse.”

 

“Ulrich Altahart, after all.”

 



 

“He’s the kind of person who could easily do something that crazy.”

 

Julian’s added comment, delivered with a shrug, was despairing. Lisbell felt like a sandcastle about to crumble under the slightest breeze, and she swallowed hard. Despite her instinct to deny it, the more her heart pounded wildly, the colder her mind became.

 

No matter how much she wanted to avoid it, Julian’s opinion seemed all too plausible. After all, as he claimed, it explained the questions that had repeatedly rendered Lisbell powerless. Why he had avoided taking her to the hospital under the pretense of being too busy…

 

“I have to check.”

 



 

“I have to check… for myself.”

 

“How?”

 

“I’ll ask.”

 

“The second young master?”

 

Julian scoffed.

 

“That’s like asking a lion if it will eat you. That man holds your weaknesses in his hands. Even if it’s true, do you think he’d answer honestly?”

 



 

“When will you finally face reality?”

 

His genuinely concerned voice seeped into every corner of her heart. Lisbell bit her lip. The wound on her mouth, which she thought had healed, throbbed as if it had reopened.

 

No, it wasn’t just her lip. Her entire body ached as if it were being chewed up and swallowed. She couldn’t stop every cell in her body from screaming as if she were facing a situation beyond her control.

 

“Thank you for finding out.”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

“You declined the kiss, so let’s consider it as never having happened. If there’s another way to repay your kindness, I’ll be sure to do so.”

 

She muttered as if talking to herself, without making eye contact with him. She worried that Julian might stop her from leaving, but fortunately, he didn’t. It seemed he had realized that she needed some time to gather her thoughts.

Ulrich never believed in such a being.

 

If there was something he did believe in, it was the sliver of morality that lay buried deep within even the most despicable of humans.

 

After all, no matter how corrupt someone may be, there is always a certain moral threshold they won’t cross.

 

Lisbell considered her mother’s issue, which she and Ulrich had been endlessly tugging over, to be the same. For him, it was a matter of life and death, and for Lisbell, it was the matter of the last remaining family she had in the world. Though they might have felt the weight differently, both recognized that it was an issue that warranted gravity.

 

Or so she thought. But was she wrong?

 

That man… did he truly lack even a shred of decency…?

 

…It’s all meaningless.

 

Lisbell sighed deeply, as if her insides were being scraped. Thinking about it alone wasn’t going to provide any answers.

 

Moreover, nothing had been proven to be true yet. Perhaps, as she had mumbled to herself, it was all just a misunderstanding.

 

What if she caused a fuss against Ulrich based solely on what Julian had said, and it turned out not to be true?

 

It was said that there was indeed a patient with that name on the hospital list, but the smell of corpses was just a rumor. There was no concrete evidence to confirm it. Lisbell tried to steady her trembling heart by thinking this way.

 

Bang.

 

Distracted by her own confusion, she forgot to knock. She realized her mistake only after she had already opened the door to Noah’s bedroom.

 

“Heuk…!”

 

Noah, who had been crouching in front of the bed, jumped up, flailing his arms in surprise. On the bed was the familiar box—the one the child had repeatedly told her not to look inside.

 

His frantic gestures suggested he had been inspecting its contents.

 

“Sorry. Did I scare you? I forgot to knock today….”

 

As Noah hurriedly tried to close the lid, he knocked the box over, and its contents spilled out onto the floor. Small, square objects scattered messily.

 

Lisbell was about to apologize, but then she stopped.

 



 

Despite being caught, the boy anxiously scrambled to gather the scattered items. But there was no way he could clean it all up quickly. His small frame was no match for the mess.

 

As a result, Lisbell clearly saw what had been inside the box. Standing there in a daze, she felt a cold sensation seeping into her veins.

 

She stood frozen for a moment before slowly taking a few steps forward. The objects that Noah hadn’t yet noticed lay forlornly on the floor. She bent down slowly to pick one up.

 

[To Mother]

 

The handwriting was familiar. The size was familiar. The color was familiar. Even the weight in her hand was familiar—it was the same letter she placed on the mantelpiece every morning as a promise.

 

The letter that should have been delivered to her mother in the hospital… why was it here?

 

“Helen Osborne’s hospital room always smells foul.”

 

“Like the rotting stench of a dried-up corpse….”

 

Her fragile belief was already cracking, and this new suspicion only made it worse. The emotions that had already started to fray at the edges became unbearably fragile, crumbling with the slightest impact. The trust she had in Ulrich, which was never based on solid evidence, shattered completely.

 

“Noah, why do you have this?”

 

By the time Lisbell realized what she was doing, she was already gripping Noah’s shoulder tightly.

 

The boy, startled by the unexpected strength she had never shown before, looked terrified.

 

“Answer me, Noah! Why is this here?”

 

Noah began to cry, his body trembling.

 

“U-u-un-uncle….”

 



 

“Uncle threw it away. Every morning, h-hic… I saw him throw it away….”

 

“…Uncle?”

 

“Yes. Huhng…”

 

Lisbell’s grip on Noah’s shoulder loosened. Her legs gave out, and she collapsed in front of the boy.

 

Her eyes, drained of all emotion, turned to the letters scattered around them. There were so many—far too many to count. She could guess how many there were just by looking at them. Perhaps they matched the number of days she had stayed in this mansion.

 

Yes, perhaps from the very beginning, the letters….

 

“Ulrich Altahart.”

 

“A man like that would do something so insane without batting an eye.”

 

Her entire body shivered.

 

These letters were evidence.

 

Evidence of Ulrich’s true nature—something she had been avoiding, pretending not to see, all along.

 

Where is my mother…?

 

Where on earth is my mother right now?

 

Could it be, possibly?

 

Finally, the most horrifying thought she had tried to bury deep within her mind surfaced. Fragments of a nightmare she had desperately tried to suppress began to emerge.

 

A crow, cawing loudly, pecked at her mother’s entrails. The resilient skin of her organs was torn apart, and the bird savored the taste of her blood.

 

Come to think of it, did that crow…

 

Have gray-blue eyes?

 

A scene from her broken dream came back to her as she awoke. Ulrich’s malicious intent, which she had finally confronted, jolted her mind awake, cracking open the memories she had locked away.

 

Lisbell remained frozen, unable to react.

 

“Huhuhng.”

 

Noah, whose shoulder she had just released, burst into tears in front of her. The boy seemed deeply hurt that Lisbell, whom he had trusted and followed, had turned on him. His cries sounded like her own—suppressed and unheard in her dream. Perhaps she had also cried with such grief and sorrow.

 

Noah cried, but Lisbell could not.

 

Unable to cry even in reality, she felt herself being driven to the brink.

 

“Noah, I’m sorry.”

 

Lisbell, who had risen to her knees, pulled Noah into a hug.

 

“I’m sorry for yelling.”

 

She apologized as she stroked the back of his head.

 

“It’s not your fault.”

 

Yes, it’s really not your fault.

 

“So don’t cry….”

 

Noah was always overly cautious. The way he had nervously looked through the letters in this room, how he had questioned her about them while in her arms—how much anxiety and fear must have grown in him, unnoticed by Lisbell.

 

But the person who should have felt those things was someone else.

 

Lisbell continued to gently pat Noah’s back. The boy, feeling that she had finally returned to the person he knew, clung to her. His sobs lingered heavily in her embrace.

 

Lisbell’s face, unseen by the boy, was emotionless, as if she had been drained of all feeling.

 

She realized something for the first time.

 

When someone becomes too angry, instead of boiling over with rage, they actually become extremely calm. Whether it’s because their emotions reach a certain limit and become numb, or because their entire nervous system is paralyzed, she didn’t know, but it was true.

 

This kind of anger.

 

This kind of betrayal.

 

Had she ever felt anything like it before?

 

It seemed like her entire being had frozen over, so much so that if she breathed, she wondered if a hollow sound would echo from within her. Lisbell curled her hand into a fist. The letter she hadn’t yet put down crumpled in her grasp.

 

It didn’t matter.

 

After all, it was a letter that would never be delivered.

 

***

 

“You’re awake?”

 

Ulrich, who had quietly entered the room, saw Lisbell sitting on the bed and asked in surprise.

 

He usually returned well past midnight, so the bedroom was often dark and quiet, with Lisbell sound asleep in the peaceful scene. His surprise was understandable.

 

The bedroom was softly lit by a single lamp. Lisbell sat quietly, watching the man move in the dim light. He smelled like the cold of winter, even after taking off his coat, which was covered in the outdoor air.

 

He began unbuttoning his shirt, seemingly intending to go wash up, but then glanced over at the bed and chuckled.

 

“Did you just wake up?”

 



 

“You look a bit out of it.”

 

He gently tapped her cheek, as if he had seen something adorable. His touch was reminiscent of someone petting a small dog, and it made her shudder. Perhaps the man really did think of her as such. After all, she had obediently believed every word he said, as naively as a fool.

 

“I’m going to the hospital tomorrow.”

 

It was a phrase she had repeated countless times in her mind while waiting for him to return. Her voice, still cold and detached, proved it had come from deep within her frozen heart.

 

The eerie tone of her voice settled on the bedroom floor like a shadow.

 

As if his feet were caught in it, Ulrich stopped in his tracks, unable to move towards the bathroom.


“Not ‘I want to go,’ but ‘I will go.'” 

 

It wasn’t a request but a command.

 

Ulrich’s eyebrows arched subtly, as if he noticed the slight shift in nuance.

 

Soon, he returned to his usual smiling expression.

 

“Tomorrow, then.”

 



 

“Tomorrow, I’ll…”

 

“Are you unavailable again?”

 

Lisbell rose from the bed, supporting herself with her palm.

 

“Then, the day after tomorrow?”

 

She walked silently.

 

“And the day after that?”

 

Lisbell reached for the box she had placed inside the small wardrobe. Hugging it, she turned around to confirm Ulrich’s expression. Though it was too dark to see clearly, she could tell that his usual calmness was gone.

 

In the darkness, the man’s eyes glinted fiercely. It was as if he was puzzled by Lisbell’s unusual persistence, picking at the nuances and dragging out the conversation.

 

That too, was a deception. How much must she have been underestimated for him not to have imagined something like this could happen?

 

Grinding her teeth, Lisbell forced a bright smile.

 

“Do you even plan on taking me to the hospital?”

 

She smiled, and Ulrich smiled too. Neither smile had any soul in it. Both were twisted, with only the sinister intention of seeing through each other’s true thoughts.

 

Ulrich glanced down at the unknown box in her arms and let out a sigh, seemingly feigned. He then approached her with a few steps and gently stroked her shoulder.

 

“I’ve been so busy lately with many things that I haven’t paid attention to that. I apologize if it upset you.”

 

If she didn’t know the truth, how would this affectionate gesture have seemed?

 

Regardless of how he behaved, she would have obediently submitted to make sure the meeting took place, even if there was no certainty of it. She would have taken the submissive role, never knowing it was a blind hope.

 

“Then take me tomorrow, right away.”

 

“Lisbell, as I said before…”

 

“I don’t mind if it’s at dawn.”

 

“We need to consider the hospital’s position as well. No matter how upset you are, throwing a tantrum like this is…”

 

“The hospital’s position?”

 

Lisbell sneered.

 

“Not yours?”

 

The smile on Ulrich’s face faded. He looked at her with a complex expression, as if he wasn’t sure whether to smile or not. Lisbell steadied her trembling voice under the pretty and sinister eyes that looked down at her arrogantly.

 

“Aren’t you just trying to stop me from going to the hospital, for your own reasons?”

 

“I don’t know what you’re talking about.”

 

“You don’t know?”

 

Lisbell flipped over the box in her arms.

 

The lid fell off, and the contents spilled out all over the floor, covering the ground beneath the two of them with neatly folded letters. Ulrich’s eyes dropped downwards. His gaze stiffened as he took in the sight of the letters. His confusion was turning into bewilderment.

 

Lisbell threw the now-empty box towards the bed.

 

“Is my mother even at that hospital?”

 



 

“Answer me.”

 



 

“Is my mother even alive?!”

 

Her voice, shrill with stress, shattered the air. The harsh tone filled the spacious bedroom, as if it was a desperate cry.

 

Why did she come to live in this city where she had no connections? It was for her mother’s treatment. Even though it was just for a brief moment, the greed that had once tempted her to abandon her mother had sunk deep into her, leaving her with a profound sense of guilt. Unable to suppress that intense emotion, she ended up following him.

 

She thought that enduring the lonely and desolate life was her way of atoning for her mother. It was a grueling existence, a self-reproach for daring to forget the grace of being born and raised, and trying to live on her own.

 

But what if all that time she endured, thinking only of her mother, was actually useless?

 

Lisbell didn’t know how to cope with this emptiness. Like a wound that hurt even though she knew it would, it was something she had to pick at, until it inevitably burst out in this cruel manner.

 

“Why is this here?”

 

Ulrich, on the other hand, remained calm.

 

He kicked one of the letters on the floor with his toe, his face now devoid of any smile. His indifferent and arrogant demeanor became a damning piece of evidence. Lisbell vaguely realized with what kind of mind he took the letter from the mantelpiece every morning.

 

“…Is torturing people with false hope a hobby of yours?”

 

Ulrich quietly lifted his head.

 

By now, Lisbell’s eyes were filled with tears, and she glared at him fiercely.

 

“Why did you take the letters if you weren’t going to deliver them?”

 

“If I hadn’t.”

 

He took a step forward. The letters scattered on the floor were crushed under his shoe. Lisbell felt as if her entire body ached, as if she were one of those letters. Ulrich grasped her chin, his expression hardening.

 

“It was obvious you’d act this stubbornly.”

 



 

“Who was it?”

 

“Let go.”

 

“Who gave you these?”

 

“I said, let go…!”

 

Lisbell shook off his hand. As she pushed him away with a loud sound, Ulrich ran his hand through his hair, now looking tired. Soon, he recovered his smile, but it was crooked and radiated a dangerous aura.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

He grabbed her wrist and shoved her back. The two pairs of feet kicked and scattered the pile of letters. Lisbell’s small body collapsed onto the bed. Ulrich pinned her arms above her head and glared down at her with bloodshot eyes.

 

“I’ve asked three times now, who gave them to you?”

 

His tone was sharp and threatening. It was a sign that his nerves were truly frayed. If this were a normal situation, Lisbell might have watched her words and actions more carefully, but not now. Determined to break the tension, she shouted back with all her strength.

 

“Questions are my right. I have no obligation to answer someone who deceived me!”

 

“And who decides that?”

 

“Answer me. Is my mother alive?”

 

“Are we playing some sort of question-and-answer game?”

 

“Ulrich!”

 

Ulrich slowly released his grip on her arms. He then sighed deeply, his face full of exhaustion. His pupils moved slowly and ominously, like a predator’s. The moment Lisbell noticed this unknown sense of danger, she flinched.

 

“…Ugh!”

 

Ulrich’s hand suddenly wrapped around her throat. As his upper body leaned forward, a shadow fell over her, threateningly enveloping her small frame.

 

“Gah, ugh…!”

 

Without hesitation, he squeezed her windpipe, making it hard for her to breathe. Lisbell instinctively flailed her arms and legs, but even as he watched her struggle, he didn’t loosen his grip. Lisbell hit, scratched, and pinched his arm, but he didn’t budge.

 

As her oxygen supply dwindled, her vision blurred, doubling and tripling before merging into a grotesque blur. It felt as if someone was shaking her head violently. Lisbell found herself experiencing an overwhelming, unknown terror.

 

Her mind flickered like a dying light. It felt as though she was experiencing the final moments of her life, with her consciousness becoming muddled, her senses crushed.

 

Her half-closed lashes trembled. Just as her last bit of breath was about to stop, Ulrich finally released his grip, veins bulging in his hand.

 

“Haah…!”

 

“I told you not to make me repeat myself.”

 

“Huff, huff…”

 

“Your learning curve seems to drop at the most inconvenient times.”

 

Without blinking, Ulrich had choked her, and now he shook his head in disapproval.

 

Meanwhile, Lisbell, who was curled up beneath him, gasped for breath, clutching her neck.

 

He was serious.

 

He seriously tried to choke me just now.

 

I could have died, and knowing that…

 

Her mind, filled with panic like a lightning strike, froze in shock and couldn’t function properly. Her thoughts were fragmented, unable to connect. It was a reaction akin to someone overwhelmed by a fear they couldn’t comprehend.

 

Then suddenly, she started to cry.

 

Her breath, which had been labored, quickly became wet with tears. Lisbell buried her face in the sheets and exhaled shallow breaths.

 

She had never felt so miserable. Why had it become so difficult just to learn about her mother’s safety and well-being?

 

She had thought countless times that it was meaningless to try to figure out where everything had gone wrong. But still, she found herself habitually retracing her steps to the beginning.

 

But now, she couldn’t even determine that starting point anymore.

 

She didn’t know.

 

No matter how many times she tried to reason why she had to suffer like this, she couldn’t understand.


“Please… tell me the truth.”

 

Even in this situation, the fact that there was still a duty she couldn’t abandon made her despair deeply. Lisbell, finally succumbing to the overwhelming situation, spoke in a voice that was utterly subdued.

 

“I know everything now. It’s true that Mother is admitted to that hospital, but I’ve heard suspicious circumstances that question whether she’s still alive.”

 



 

“I’ve heard that there’s a rotten corpse smell, that such a strange smell is coming from Mother’s hospital room. I….”

 

“From whom?”

 



 

“Who told you that?”

 

Lisbell’s lips, which had been trembling pitifully, suddenly stilled. Ulrich noticed that she was trying to protect her informant even in this situation and gave a faint, mocking smile.

 

“You’re going to stay silent?”

 



 

“Do you think I won’t find out?”

 

The brutal weight that had been crushing her body disappeared. Lisbell, who had been crying silently, wiped away her tears and looked up, startled. Ulrich, who had slightly raised his upper body, shifted his gaze sideways. The way his eyes moved, as if in deep thought, was eerie. After a moment, he slowly ran a hand through his hair.

 

“There’s only one person in this mansion who would tell you such things.”

 

His gesture was calm and leisurely, but an indescribable aura emanated from it.

 

“That whore.”

 

It was something akin to malevolent madness.

 

He got out of bed completely. Without hesitation, Ulrich turned and left the bedroom.

 

Left alone in the dark room, Lisbell stood in a daze before hurriedly scrambling off the bed. She left the bedroom barefoot, without even properly putting on her shoes.

 

As she tried to guess where Ulrich, who had suddenly revealed a murderous intent, had gone, she sensed movement from the other side. She ran toward the light at the end of the corridor.

 

She arrived at a place she had never been before. The large double doors, as big as those of Ulrich’s bedroom, were flung open in a hurry. From inside, a sharp scream, almost pitiful, erupted. As Lisbell’s toes curled inward, the doorframe banged loudly, swinging open on both sides.

 

“What the…!”

 

Ulrich came out from inside. He wasn’t alone. A naked man, not even a thread of clothing on him, was hanging from his arm. The identity of the man became clear only after he was thrown pitifully against the wall with a thud.

 

“Why… suddenly… ugh!”

 

Ulrich’s black shoe stomped on the nape of Julian’s neck, who had been dragged out of the bedroom. Julian, who had been leaning against the wall, flailed for a moment before sliding down to lie sprawled on the carpet. As he twisted his body, his erect penis swayed back and forth. His flesh was drenched with pre-ejaculate, as if he had just finished having fun.

 

He should have quickly gotten up and hidden his shameful appearance, but Julian couldn’t do that. Ulrich, with an expression frighteningly devoid of emotion, ruthlessly kicked him. The rain of kicks landed indiscriminately on his face and naked body.

 

It was already deep into the night, past midnight. At a time when even the smallest noise could sound like thunder, movement could be sensed from afar.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

At that moment, Julian curled up, clutching his chest. Ulrich’s shoe had struck him in the solar plexus. Ulrich didn’t stop there and swung his foot, smashing it into Julian’s chin. Whether it was a nosebleed or blood from his mouth, it wasn’t clear where it came from, but a red stain splattered across the wall. Lisbell, who had been standing there, unable to breathe, covered her mouth at the brutal scene.

 

The next moment, someone appeared, holding onto the doorframe Ulrich had come through. Cora Altahart, Ulrich’s mother, emerged, her hair disheveled and barely covered by a nightgown. She stood at the door, speechless as she watched her son brutally beat his lover.

 

She only came to her senses when Ulrich, standing over the bloodied Julian, turned his head. The pale moonlight touched one side of his face. The coldness of his profile was so chilling that it seemed insufficient to describe it as unfeeling. It was as if he lacked the basic moral decency that a human should possess.

 

Ulrich took a long stride to the other side of the corridor. He stood before a decorative table. A tall vase with eucalyptus was placed on it. He picked up the vase and turned it over. The green eucalyptus stems and the water inside spilled out.

 

“Ulrich!”

 

His mother was the first to realize what he intended to do, and she let out a shriek of warning, but there wasn’t even a hint of change in Ulrich’s pupils. He walked determinedly toward Julian and struck him over the head with the vase.

 

Crash!

 

The shattering sound echoed as if it would break the very air, and a dreadful silence descended upon the corridor. Julian, who had been trembling with the last remnants of consciousness, soon slumped like a corpse. Blood flowed from his head like a river. What had been a river turned into a lake, and what had been a lake turned into a sea, filling the entire area with the stench of blood.

 

Ah….

 

Lisbell stepped back. The hand covering her mouth trembled uncontrollably.

 

Is he… dead?

 

Is he really dead?

 

It couldn’t be. Can a person die so easily? Couldn’t he just be unconscious? But with that much blood pouring out, could it really be just unconsciousness? Lisbell couldn’t shake the first encounter with such violence from her mind.

 

What made her shiver even more at this moment was Ulrich, standing before the crushed Julian.

 

Despite having utterly destroyed a person, he remained eerily calm. Aside from his disheveled hair, there was nothing in his appearance that suggested he had just been in a violent struggle. His pupils showed no sign of disturbance. With the same natural demeanor, Ulrich casually ran a hand through his hair. Only then did Lisbell feel a strange sense of déjà vu from his gaze.

 

The eyes of the crow that pecked at her mother’s entrails.

 

Lisbell could no longer distinguish if it was a crow or him.

 

“That’s why I…”

 

Ulrich let out a sigh, as if truly exhausted.

 

“…warned you to choose your friends wisely.”

 

His words were strange.

 

It was Ulrich himself who had committed the violence. The reason Julian Scott was lying there in such a state was entirely due to him. But hearing those words made it seem as if… as if he was blaming her for the violence.

 

As if Julian suffered all that solely because of her.

 

Lisbell held her breath.

 

“Rotten corpse smell, I’ve heard everything about that strange smell coming from Mother’s hospital room. I….”

 

“From whom?”

 



 

“Who told you that?”

 

No.

 

I didn’t tell him who it was.

 

“There’s only one person in this mansion who would tell you such things.”

 



 

“That whore.”

 

Even if he deduced it somehow, I never said it was Julian….

 



 

Is that really what you think?

 

“That man has a hold on you. Even if it’s true, do you think he would answer honestly?”

 

“When will you start seeing reality?”

 

From the moment I brought up the subject, didn’t I already give him enough clues to guess? But, but does that justify him assaulting Julian Scott? Does that mean I’m partly responsible?

 

So, did I cause this person’s death…?

 

Did I kill someone?

 

The conclusion she reached after layer upon layer of thoughts horrified Lisbell to her core. She wrapped her arms around herself. If she didn’t, she would be suffocated by the panic rushing over her.

 

The reason she couldn’t outright deny it was because she had done it before. Lisbell had already tried to kill someone for her own selfishness.

 

The sickly blue guilt that had been etched into her bones like a bruise.

 

The wicked nature that had tried to kill her mother to survive….

 

“Make sure this never happens in front of me again.”

 

Ulrich, adjusting his disheveled shirt sleeves, gave instructions to the elderly butler who had approached. Then he walked toward Lisbell, who was standing frozen as if nailed to the spot.

 

The shadow that stretched toward her carried a scent.

 

A murderous, bloody scent that pierced deep into her lungs….


Lisbell looked at Ulrich with trembling eyes as he grabbed her arm. He turned away as if the reason he left the bedroom was insignificant.

 

The tip of his shoe was stained with blood after mercilessly beating Julian. It was impossible to tell whether the blood was from Julian’s nose or mouth. Although the carpet was clearly black, it seemed as though red footprints followed his steps.

 

“…Call the doctor…!”

 

As Lisbell was being dragged along, she looked back. Mrs. Altahart, who was as frozen as she was by her son’s atrocity, approached the fallen Julian. Seeing her lose her usual composed demeanor made Lisbell’s heart sink.

 

“Let go, let me go….”

 



 

“Let go…! Let me go!”

 

A sense of urgency overwhelmed her; she couldn’t allow herself to be dragged away. She had no idea what he might do to her in the bedroom after just beating someone.

 

No, the very thought of being in the same space as him was repulsive.

 

The dignified and calm demeanor he once had seemed to belong to someone else entirely. The current Ulrich Altahart felt like a ravenous beast tearing into another’s entrails.

 

“Let go, let go of me. Let go….”

 

As she twisted her body desperately to free her arm, a figure briefly passed by her blurred vision. Lisbell instinctively silenced herself. The gaze of that timid child….

 

Noah had stepped out of his room, possibly due to the commotion in the hallway. Could he have failed to realize the situation and left the room alone? Unfortunately, he was hiding behind a pillar, alone in this tense atmosphere. When their eyes met, his shoulders rose sharply, like a small mountain.

 

“…Huh!”

 

Suddenly, her vision flipped.

 

Annoyed by the delay in returning to the bedroom due to her resistance, Ulrich simply slung her over his shoulder like a sack.

 

From her stiffened gaze, she caught a glimpse of the child’s face, now upside down. Noah looked on the verge of tears. At that moment, she recalled the pile of letters scattered on the bedroom floor.

 

No. 

 

She instinctively knew.

 

She must never let Ulrich discover Noah’s existence.

 

Especially not after witnessing Ulrich’s brutal punishment firsthand. The thought that Julian Scott’s fate could befall a small child made nausea crawl up her throat.

 

Lisbell quickly shook her head toward the child.

 

Don’t come.

 

Go back.

 

Make no sound and quietly return to the bedroom….

 

Whether he understood her stern warning, Noah tearfully hid behind the pillar. Meanwhile, Ulrich turned the corner of the hallway. Thanks to that, Noah remained unnoticed.

 

But the situation was far from over.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Lisbell was thrown onto the cozy bed. Having been bent over, with her organs compressed, she struggled to breathe. Clutching her chest and gasping for air, she felt a dangerous sensation shooting through her brain, and she quickly backed away toward the head of the bed.

 

Standing in front of the bed, Ulrich checked his shirt sleeve and clicked his tongue when he noticed the bloodstain he had overlooked. Soon after, he sighed lowly, as if he found the whole situation tiresome.

 

“I asked you to be honest.”

 

His tone was somewhat indifferent, as if he had grown weary of pretending. Hearing this, Lisbell felt her heartbeat accelerate like never before.

 

“Your mother.”

 

Thump, thump.

 

“She’s already.”

 

Thump, thump, thump.

 

“Been dead for a long time.”

 

Finally, thump.

 

The most wretched part of her broke into pieces. The tension that had risen to her scalp drained away, leaving only a void in its place.

 

Empty, empty.

 

The sensation of emptiness was chilling to the bone.

 

It was ironic. She was clearly hollow. Yet Lisbell felt as if she was wearing away, like a piece of thin paper, so fragile that she couldn’t withstand even a light breeze, a handful of sand, or a fine needle.

 

This despair was so tragic.

 

“…Why?”

 

Her voice, dry as dust, fell into the moonlit bedroom.

 

“Why?”

 



 

“Why… is she dead?”

 

Lisbell forgot to keep her distance and crawled forward, stuttering. Ulrich remained standing in front of the bed, motionless, so the closing gap was solely due to Lisbell’s actions. Despite her intense aversion to the man, she couldn’t resist asking him now.

 

“You promised to save her….”

 



 

“You said you’d treat her, take care of her.”

 



 

“That’s why I came to the capital…!”

 

At last, she grabbed his clothes and clung to him with all her strength.

 

“To save my mother… I threw away my dreams, my future, and endured everything you did to me!”

 

“Mrs. Osborne died before arriving in the capital.”

 



 

“To be precise, she passed away during the journey.”

 



 

“If there had been anything I could do, I would have tried. But it was impossible, so she died.”

 

His calm tone, as if stating a fact beyond human control, made her want to cry.

 

Her shattered insides couldn’t take it anymore. Tears welled up in her eyes and streamed down her cheeks. Ulrich, who had been motionless, reached out and wiped away the traces of her tears. His gentle touch carried an unknown stench, making Lisbell realize her senses weren’t working properly.

 

“Then… you should have told me.”

 



 

“You should have told me sooner….”

 

That she had already stopped breathing before arriving in the capital.

 

If that were the case, why had I endured this excruciating time here? What was I holding onto as a light to guide me through this ordeal? If it was all leading to such a futile end, then I….

 

It wasn’t just this time that felt futile.

 

Had Ulrich confessed the truth even a little earlier, she might have been able to say her last goodbyes to her mother. At the moment her mother took her last breath, her only family, her daughter, was not by her side. Because this man hid it, because this man concealed it.

 

Because of this man.

 

In the midst of the emptiness that raged within her, something began to rise. It was too hot to be called mere anger and too solid to be mere despair.

 

Something akin to a dark blue hatred.

 

“How… could you?”

 



 

“How could you…?”

 

Lisbell clenched her fists so tightly that her knuckles turned white.

 

“My mother is dead. My mother!”

 

The rough grip on his clothing left harsh wrinkles. Ulrich glanced at them. His cold expression felt as if it were shattering the ground beneath her feet.

 

“The one who gave birth to me and raised me is dead….”

 



 

“How could you think of hiding that from me…?”

 

Gritting her teeth, she finally let out a cry.

 

“Do you… have no sense of humanity at all?”

 

Her mother always said that the end was what mattered most.

 

No matter how the beginning was, no matter how the middle went, as long as the conclusion was good, one could consider the task fairly accomplished. That was why she emphasized the importance of perseverance, even if the start and middle were a mess.

 

But Lisbell had failed her mother. No matter how much love and affection she had for her mother throughout her life, what did it matter? In the end, she became the most unfilial daughter who couldn’t even see her mother off on her final journey.

 

Some things in life can be undone, but some things cannot. Someone’s death, and especially her mother’s death, was one of those irreversible things. Because of this man, Lisbell had committed an irreversible mistake.

 

“I’m sorry, but…”

 

She let go of the fabric she had been clutching. Ulrich, who had been watching her every move with calm eyes, brushed her hand away with a loud smack.

 

“I didn’t shed a single tear when Gwen died.”

 



 

“And I probably won’t at my mother’s funeral either.”

 

Unlike Lisbell, who was overwhelmed with emotions, he remained consistently calm. His composure was so unsettling that it sent chills down her spine. It felt to Lisbell as if he couldn’t understand why she was causing such a fuss over something so trivial.

 

“How could I help being born this way?”

 

He muttered nonchalantly, his expression unchanging, as if to drive the point home.


She had often felt an inexplicable sense of discomfort and incongruity around him—something beyond the oppressive atmosphere he always exuded. It was as if, despite being the same person, there was an unfathomable aspect of him that felt like encountering a bizarre creature.

 

There was something subtly off about him, as if he lacked something that should have been inherent in every ordinary person. Although his perfect background masked this flaw, once discovered, it became a fatal imperfection—his inhumanity.

 

Lisbell especially sensed this in her interactions with her mother.

 

And now, too.

 

This man… What is he?

 

The overwhelming thought of not wanting to get involved with him surged. It was the fear that if she got entangled with him any further, it would be her, not him, who would be broken.

 

“Why didn’t you tell me?”

 

Ulrich grasped her chin, lifting her face to meet his gaze more directly.

 

“Because if I had told you, I wouldn’t have been able to bring you to the capital.”

 



 

“I’m still not tired of you.”

 

Was it some sweltering summer?

 

Back then, she thought that his interest would inevitably fade with time. But during that period, the hope she had clung to slipped away with the passing of two seasons. The engagement with Theodore ended with the summer, and without her even realizing, her mother’s death came and went with the fall.

 

Now it was winter.

 

Despite the bitter cold wind blowing and the snow covering the world in a pure, brilliant blanket, his interest in her remained.

 

By now, her sense of foreboding had found solid ground to stand on.

 

Would the day ever come when his interest in me fades?

 

“…That doesn’t mean anything to me anymore.”

 



 

“My mother is gone, so I have no reason to stay here any longer.”

 

His dominance was only valid when her mother’s life was at stake. Now that this was no longer the case, there was no reason to go along with his whims. His stubbornness no longer had any power over her. Whether he was tired of her or not was no longer her concern.

 

Lisbell climbed out of bed. Opening the wardrobe, she felt a wave of emptiness. Upon reflection, she realized that all her original clothes had been disposed of by Ulrich. The only clothes left were those he had chosen for her. If it weren’t for the winter, she would have ripped them all apart and left the mansion in just one outfit. She decided to take only the clothes she was currently wearing and closed the wardrobe door.

 

Clutching the doorknob tightly, she tried to hold back the crumbling emotions inside her.

 

“Please, at least give me my mother’s body.”

 



 

“That’s enough, isn’t it? Keeping it won’t be of any value to you… Just let me have it.”

 

He grabbed her shoulders and turned her around. Ulrich was standing right in front of her, so close she hadn’t even noticed him approach. His eyes, partially lit by the moonlight streaming in, gleamed with a chilling clarity.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

Suddenly, he shoved two fingers into her mouth. What…! Startled, her mouth opened wide, unable to close. His fingers, which had dug in as if to stake a claim, briefly touched the back of her throat before withdrawing. In that moment, Lisbell involuntarily swallowed whatever substance he had placed in her mouth.

 

“What, what did…?”

 

Ulrich slowly licked his saliva-covered fingers. There was not a trace of the usual smile he often wore. A pinprick of light in his dark pupils shimmered with a rough, crazed intensity. A strange tension rippled through the air around him like waves.

 

“What did you make me swallow?”

 

“I tried to be as gentlemanly as possible.”

 

“Ulrich…!”

 

“But you rejected that.”

 

Lisbell clutched her throat, coughing. She tried to vomit it out, but it was too deep to expel. Despite knowing it was futile, she clawed at her throat, feeling as if a toxic substance was lodged in her esophagus. Swallowing it could threaten her life.

 

So, she couldn’t stay still. Red scratches appeared on her tender skin, and blood soon beaded at the surface. Seeing this, Ulrich frowned and grabbed both of her hands tightly.

 

“Ah…!”

 

She was shoved against the wardrobe, her body slumping sideways. Now sprawled on the floor, Lisbell couldn’t push Ulrich away as he came in for a kiss.

 

Suddenly, her movements felt sluggish. She thought she was responding at the right speed, but she was actually much slower as she reached for Ulrich’s shoulders.

 

“Shh…. The more you struggle, the faster the drug will take effect.”

 

“What…”

 

“It’s just a sedative, so don’t be scared.”

 

Lisbell blinked, her eyelids growing heavier with each attempt. Her whole body felt as if it were sinking into warm water, an unnatural sense of euphoria washing over her.

 

“I was afraid that if I dealt with you while you were fully conscious, I might kill you in a fit of rage.”

 

“Th-ugh…!”

 

“Lisbell, you can be quite exasperating at times, you know.”

 

His voice stretched out like a drop of water hanging from the edge of a roof. Lisbell realized that every nerve in her body was slowly descending into a deep lethargy.

 

What is this…

 

A sedative?

 

She recalled a night when he sat in the pavilion, pressing down on some pills next to his wine glass. The thought was abruptly cut off, her mind forcibly shut down.

 

Some overwhelming force, akin to a strong wave of sleep, swept her away.

 

Lisbell drifted off to sleep.

 

And when she woke again, a shackle, precisely fitted to her neck, was locked around her throat, leaving no room for even a finger to slip through.

 

***

 

“……!”

 

A silent scream escaped Lisbell’s open mouth.

 

A wave of sensation, dense and overwhelming, coursed through her from head to toe.

 

Her legs, spread over the man beneath her, stiffened, and her unsteady hips buckled as tension coiled in her lower abdomen. The heat that had pooled beneath her navel exploded in all directions, like a powerful current, enveloping her in a wild, all-consuming ecstasy.

 

The intense climax struck her with a shivering, dizzying force.

 

“Ugh, uh…”

 

Painful breaths passed through her constricted throat, and the moans that slipped out were ragged and strained. Even if she had tried to form words, all that would come out were harsh, grating sounds. Her voice, hoarse from days of overuse, was reduced to a strained whisper.

 

“Haa, haa…!”

 

It lasted only a moment before she felt as though a hole had been drilled into the top of her head, releasing steam, causing her frail body to collapse sideways. As soon as her knees hit the soft bed, she began crawling away.

 

Run, I have to run.

 

Now that his hands were off her, this was her chance. As the dissipating pleasure left her with only a shattered sense of urgency, she knew this was the only moment she had.

 

As she dragged her bruised knees across the sheets, a clicking sound followed each movement. With trembling hands, she touched her neck. The coldness of the air transferred to the shackle tightly encircling her throat.

 

Lisbell felt the helpless itch inside the shackle and dug her nails into her skin. But the shackle, designed to be unbreakable by force alone, was impossible to remove. Instead of leaving scratches, the psychological pressure of the shackle tightened around her, pushing her to the edge. She desperately wanted to escape the suffocating sensation.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

Just as she reached the edge of the bed, a hand shot out of the darkness and grabbed her ankle. Already weakened, her body collapsed like a water-soaked clump of salt, and she was dragged back.

 

“Where do you think you’re going… Come back here.”

 

His voice, as rough and ragged as her own throat, carried an inescapable undertone of lust. Ulrich, staring into Lisbell’s trembling, fear-filled eyes, pulled her back onto his body. All her efforts to escape had been in vain. Despair washed over Lisbell as she began to struggle again.

 

“No… No. Don’t… Don’t do this…! Ugh…!”

 

Resistance was futile. His hands spread her buttocks apart, and his aroused cock, slick with her fluids, began to slide against the tender flesh below. Lisbell, now pale with fear, shook her head wildly. But before she could attempt another escape, the head of his penis pressed gently into her softened folds and began to push inside.


“Ah…!”

 

A sharp, tingling sensation spread across her abdomen, but it was short-lived. The intense pleasure, which had been building up moments before, quickly surged to a level that couldn’t be ignored.

 

It wasn’t like she was under the influence of any drug, but her body had become incredibly sensitive to sexual exposure. It wasn’t without reason. This scene had become a daily routine for the past few days.

 

The place he frequented seemed worn out. It was beyond her limit. Unlike before, when he granted her some freedom during the day, Ulrich no longer left the bedroom unless absolutely necessary. And during that time, he held Lisbell close, intertwining their bodies without restraint.

 

“Ah… look at how loose it is.”

 

“Huh, uh, mm…! Ah…!”

 

“Lisbell’s hole is so slippery now. I could go all the way in.”

 

Grabbing her buttocks greedily, he pushed in as if challenging himself, all the way to the thick base. The sensation of her inner walls being scraped was unbearably creepy. Not because she disliked it, but because it felt so good that Lisbell’s pupils flickered, losing focus.

 

“Ah, ah, mm… huh!”

 

“Come here, I’ll suck on your nipples.”

 

“No, I don’t want… Ah, mm…!”

 

“Do you think anything will change just because you say no?”

 

As if still ignorant, he hid a sly smile and pushed his lower body against her more firmly, making Lisbell lean on top of him. With the large cock sliding deep between her buttocks, Lisbell’s upper body eventually collapsed forward, unable to resist.

 

Ulrich’s lips covered her small breasts, suckling on the nipples that sat like seeds on top of the mounds. As his soft tongue brushed against the already stiffly swollen protrusions, they radiated a tingling heat. The sensitive nipples, sitting atop the plain flesh, remained erect, even without being touched, due to the days of intense sex.

 

“Inside is all so soft, ha, so tender. Even if I thrust into a piece of fruit, it wouldn’t be this soft.”

 

“Huh, uh! Mm! Ah…!”

 

“Finally, the color of the hole has changed a bit. It seems all the effort I put into you is paying off, huh?”

 

As if to show her exactly where he meant, he traced his fingers over the obscene connection between them. As his fingers brushed against the flesh that was stretched wide to accommodate the straight, long rod of flesh, her walls quivered. A stinging pain followed the path he traced. The flesh was swollen and sore from taking in his cock every day without rest.

 

Each time Ulrich leisurely parted her insides, he noticed a dampness flowing along the areas he touched. After rubbing the spread labia with his fingers, he shifted direction and slowly pushed them into her hole.

 

Lisbell’s face quickly turned pale as she shook her head in urgent refusal like never before.

 

“No, I can’t… Ah…!”

 

“I think you can.”

 

He was now inserting his fingers into the already full space where his penis was lodged. She was overfilled. There wasn’t a single area that wasn’t being pressed down due to the fullness. Just the sensation of various internal pressure points being prodded caused the space below her navel to tense up, and the area connected to him pulsed with a throbbing beat. The dizzying sensation of vertigo was just an added bonus. The pleasure that would be added from here was something she could never handle. Excessive pleasure was no different from a deadly poison.

 

“No, no, ah…! Please… huh…!”

 

Tears welled up in fear that she might tear down there. Ulrich, who had only inserted the first knuckle, felt his own penis trapped in the narrow inner walls as he calmly lifted his gaze.

 

Her eyes, like the sweet flesh of a peach when squeezed, and her cheeks, the bridge of her nose, and her lips were all flushed. Ulrich stuck out his tongue and licked the tears streaming down her well-ripened cheeks.

 

“Why are you crying?”

 

“Huh, sob….”

 

“Even when you cry, you’re cute, Lisbell.”

 

Although she was reacting as if facing a life-threatening crisis, he responded as though he was watching a child easily brought to tears by a trivial prank. Unable to continue toying with her panicked reaction, Ulrich reluctantly withdrew his finger.

 

“Here.”

 

“Ha…!”

 

The Ulrich below her suddenly began thrusting his hips upward. His well-toned waist, firm with muscle, moved up and down as the thick cock sank into her hole and then pulled out. Due to the abundance of moisture, their bodies meshed together smoothly without any resistance. The thick rod, engorged with blood, forced open the tight gap, plunging deep inside and then slipping out along with the fluids.

 

“Sometimes… there are men who put their fists in, ha, just so you know.”

 

“Mm, ugh, ha…!”

 

“That kind of thing exists, so what’s the big deal about one finger?”

 

It was unbelievable. That such strange and grotesque acts existed in this world. Judging by the lack of jest in Ulrich’s expression, he wasn’t just talking nonsense. He seemed genuinely disappointed that he couldn’t properly insert his finger as he forcefully thrust his hips.

 

“Ah, mm, ah…!”

 

Lisbell, who was bouncing atop him with each vigorous thrust, couldn’t hold back. Every time, the shackle around her neck rattled along with the chain connected to the bedpost, announcing its ominous presence.

 

Each time that sound reached her ears, Lisbell felt like her insides were being corroded.

 

What is this….

 

Why am I here doing this….

 

What am I doing right now?

 

The helplessness that had once struck her down, ruthlessly tearing apart her mind and body in Marnia, had not weakened just because she was in a holy place.

 

Rather, even with the hostage of her mother gone, Lisbell’s current life, in which she couldn’t escape Ulrich’s grasp and had to share her body with him, was gnawing away at her more viciously than ever.

 

With each thrust, as she became aware of her own breathless, helpless state, it felt like her brain was decaying from the inside out.

 

People are supposed to live by their own will, so what about me right now?

 

Trapped here, unable to cling to anything, what exactly am I doing…? The confusion, like rotting roots, boldly invaded the cracks of her mind.

 

The once vibrant purple hue of her eyes was darkened by the self-loathing that consumed her.

 

Ulrich, observing this up close, overlapped his lips with hers, biting down. As soon as he forced his tongue into her mouth, initiating a deep kiss, Lisbell’s tongue curled back into a corner. Snatching it up and sucking on it vigorously, he swallowed the sobs that poured into his mouth.

 

Delighting in the piece of wretchedness he had consumed, Ulrich spread her buttocks more forcefully with both hands, holding them in a stubborn grip as he continued to thrust deeply, relentlessly driving into the hidden recesses.

 

“Ha…!”

 

It was as if he had reached an impossible place, and her vision blurred and collapsed. The feeling of being completely filled inside, combined with another minor orgasm, caused Lisbell’s upper body to collapse.

 

Ulrich caught her with his chest, continuing to pound his still unsatisfied cock inside her.

 

The faint moans that escaped Lisbell’s mouth as her body, already weakened by a mild orgasm, rippled and tightened around him, served to spur him on. With a breathy, languid sigh of satisfaction, he quickened his pace, thrusting up into her. Lisbell’s limp body shook, her faint groans escaping her mouth.

 

“Show me how your nipples jiggle.”

 

Playing with her fine, wispy hair, Ulrich forced the limp Lisbell to sit up. His hand, which had been caressing her flat lower abdomen, moved upwards, grasping her small breasts.

 

As Lisbell’s thighs clenched tightly, a dampness spread across their entwined lower bodies. With a teasing laugh, he thrust his hips upward again, mockingly asking if she had come again.

 

“Ah…!”

 

“Ha… Stay like that. Let me watch while I fuck you.”

 

“Mm, uh, ha…!”

 

“Maybe it’s because your breasts are small, but your nipples are especially cute..”

 

As he sat languidly against the headboard, vigorously thrusting his hips, the sound of flesh slapping together rang out obscenely. Unable to withstand the force of the deep plunges from below, Lisbell’s body swayed back and forth. Each time, her small, protruding nipples quivered as if begging for attention. Ulrich’s heated gaze bore down on those tiny nubs as if ravishing them.

 

“Hut… ha!”

 

All of a sudden, Lisbell squeezed her insides tight around his cock. The unprecedented tightness made Ulrich furrow his brows pleasantly as a lewd groan escaped his lips.


The issue was that the chain connected to the shackle around her neck swayed in rhythm with her suggestive movements and ended up brushing against her n!pple. A strange glint appeared in Ulrich’s eyes—one of malicious mischief.

 

“Does this feel that good?”

 

“Mm, ah, no, I don’t…!”

 

Ulrich grabbed the dangling chain and swung it side to side, making it brush against her n!pple. Even though they were indoors, the inherently cold metal chain lasciviously scraped against her swollen protrusion. The chain, cold by nature, was too much for her feverish body, already flushed from the heat of intercourse, causing her lower abdomen to clench involuntarily. Ulrich smirked, a sharp contrast cutting through the tension between their bodies.

 

“Ah, tighten up.”

 

“Nngh, ah, aah!”

 

“At this rate, my cock might give out first, Lisbell… Haa…”

 

Though it sounded like a complaint, the reality was different. As her insides, which had slackened, began to tighten again, the force with which they sucked on his now fully erect cock increased. The suction was so intense that it felt satisfying enough to bring him to climax in an instant.

 

Ulrich thrust his hips forcefully, slightly raising his upper body as he prepared to bite down on her tangled, chained breasts.

 

Knock, knock.

 

A knock interrupted their midday sex. Ulrich, who had raised his once gentle, now sharp gaze, turned his head toward the door.

 

Though no permission had been granted, the door opened. Seeing this, he immediately recognized who would be visiting him at this time of day.

 

Behind the butler, who first appeared and bowed, as expected, stood his mother. Despite being inside the mansion, his mother was elegantly dressed as always, her heels clicking on the floor as she entered the bedroom, filled with the lingering heat of their affair.

 

Mrs. Altahart did not so much as frown at the sight of her son and the naked woman pleasuring him.

 

This wasn’t the first time they had seen such scandalous aspects of each other. Even when Ulrich had suddenly barged into the bedroom well past midnight, she had been rolling naked on the bed with her lover, Julian.

 

“What brings you here?”

 

Ulrich asked indifferently, licking Lisbell’s breasts, which had ripened to the point of being suckable.

 

Lisbell, who had been too distracted by the continuous stimulation of her sensitive areas to notice the presence of another, turned her head at his sudden question. Upon seeing the unexpected intruder, she recoiled in shock.

 

She hurriedly tried to hide her flushed face, trembling all over as her freshly marked body shivered. Ulrich held her close, reclining back lazily against the headboard.

 

“Are you asking because you don’t know? I sent people to call you for days, yet you didn’t show your face, so I came myself.”

 

“For that reason, you’ve left your bedroom at this hour, with the sun high in the sky. I must have accomplished something difficult then.”

 

He pulled the blanket that had fallen to one side and covered Lisbell’s trembling body with it. As he did so, he subtly bumped their lower bodies together. Under the blanket, he could feel her squirming as if in disgust, which only made Ulrich smile with pleasure.

 

Mrs. Altahart’s narrowed blue-gray eyes took in every detail of the scene. She remained silent for a moment, as if holding back a sigh, then spoke with a faint exhale.

 

“How long do you intend to carry on like this?”

 



 

“Postponing official duties, shutting yourself in, and playing with a mistress… This behavior is unbecoming of you, Ulrich. I don’t understand why you, of all people, are doing something that would suffice for Gwen alone. This lack of discipline doesn’t suit you.”

 

“I don’t see what the problem is.”

 

“What?”

 

“The succession process that I was supposed to inherit from Gwen is almost complete. I’ve been following a grueling schedule, leaving at dawn and returning after midnight for days. Now, only tasks remain that I can handle without leaving the mansion.”

 

“You…”

 

“In some ways, it’s fortunate that your lover caused a timely incident.”

 



 

“Though I can’t forgive him for trying to ruin my plans.”

 

Ulrich casually stroked Lisbell’s hair as she nuzzled against his chin, then kissed the side of her head.

 

The small squeaks from her concealed under the blanket were so adorable that Ulrich felt his lower body tighten once more as he subtly rocked his hips. The faint, weak moans that escaped her were sweet music to his ears.

 

“If it bothers you so much, you could think of it as me taking a few days off. You know better than anyone how I’ve been on a nonstop march since arriving in the capital.”

 

It was becoming too much. His lower body was itching with unbearable need. The crude, simmering lust gnawed at his entire body. He had thought he could endure it, but now he realized how weak he was against his own desires.

 

He removed the blanket that barely covered their connected lower halves and made Lisbell sit up again. Her eyes filled with tears at the thought of being exposed so shamelessly before someone else, her naked body engaged in lewd union with a man.

 

Ulrich firmly grasped her and slowly slid his swollen penis back inside her. No matter how much Lisbell resisted, her now thoroughly soaked walls easily swallowed his cock. With a blunt exhale, her eyes lost focus.

 

“No, ah, aah! No…! Ah!”

 

“She says she doesn’t want it.”

 

Mrs. Altahart, who had been watching their intense coupling from the doorway, retorted sharply with a face that suggested things were not going as she wished.

 

Ulrich chuckled lazily, bringing his knees up as he slightly adjusted his posture. Lisbell, who had been perched atop him, was helplessly lifted along with him.

 

“She’s just throwing a tantrum.”

 

“Ahh, ah, ah…!”

 

“Do you see? She’s completely soaked down there.”

 

The heated coupling was fully exposed to his mother’s view. As if inviting her to take a closer look, Ulrich grabbed Lisbell’s hips and plunged into her soft flesh.

 

With the sudden increase in intensity, droplets of liquid burst from the gap between their bodies. The thick, sticky fluid dripped down her thighs, soaking Ulrich’s smooth groin in the process.

 

“She’s crying out so desperately.”

 

“Nngh, ah, ah, ah…!”

 

“How can you say it’s just me enjoying myself?”

 

The deep, gruff voice, broken up by the rhythm of his thrusts, sounded almost like a criticism forced through gritted teeth.

 

Ulrich acted as if he had forgotten that his mother was present. His relentless movements, more akin to a beast devoid of humanity, were calculated and precise, driving his hips with quick, sharp thrusts.

 

With every creaking motion of their joined lower bodies, their senses were shamelessly overwhelmed. This applied not only to the two participants but also to Mrs. Altahart, who stood by the bed, observing.

 

Lisbell could feel her nerves being overly stimulated, making her shiver all over. Her mind, already lost in a mix of pleasure and shame, was overwhelmed by the burning embarrassment deep within her. Her senses had become so heightened that she could now vividly feel even the slightest touch on her skin. With her lower body being pounded so hard, it was impossible to maintain her composure.

 

“Ngh, ah, ah, mm, ah…!”

 

“You’re sucking it in so greedily because you want me to come inside, right?”

 

Ulrich couldn’t escape the heat searing through his lower body either. Instead, he indulged in his lewd desire, driving his hips more lewdly to expose his obscene hunger.

 

He grabbed Lisbell’s bouncing hips, guiding her down to ensure his mother had an unobstructed view of their intimate connection.

 

Thanks to this, Mrs. Altahart could see her son’s swollen cock, veins throbbing, driving into the soft, yielding flesh of Lisbell’s entrance. The loud, resonating slaps of flesh echoed in the room, punctuating each thrust with enough force to ring in the ears.


After a while, Ulrich thrust with such force that Lisbell’s back arched off the bed.

 

The fact that they reached climax simultaneously was evident in Lisbell’s reaction. She tensed her entire body, curling up tightly as if pulling herself inward. Her body became so rigid that it couldn’t relax even with the slightest stimulation.

 

“Ah, ahh…”

 

Lisbell let out a voice that sounded like she was crying and pushed his hand away from her abdomen. She flailed her limbs, trying to get off him. Ulrich wrapped his arm around her neck, pulling her back toward him, but Lisbell resisted, pushing against his chest with her palms.

 

Ulrich applied pressure and then released it. As a result, Lisbell tumbled onto the bed. She hastily grabbed the sheets and glanced toward the door.

 

Her eyes, which had sparkled as if she found a lifeline, quickly lost their light.

 

A moment ago, Cora Altahart, who had been standing there watching the obscene scene unfold, had vanished without a trace. She had long since left, unable to tolerate the shameless behavior of her son. Like when she arrived, Lisbell, caught up in the intensity of Ulrich’s advances, hadn’t even noticed her departure.

 

“No…”

 

A raspy voice, hoarse from crying, came out in a rough whisper.

 

Whether it was the lingering sensation of the orgasm or the cold chill seeping into her sweat-drenched body, Lisbell trembled as a robe was draped over her naked form.

 

Who else could it be?

 

Of course, it was Ulrich, who was tending to her with surprising gentleness. He even helped her lift each of her limp arms to put on the robe, carefully pulling out the chain of the shackles so it wouldn’t be hidden, almost as if to show off a beautiful piece of jewelry.

 

During all this, Lisbell could only stare blankly at the door.

 

When Cora had appeared in the bedroom, Lisbell’s mind had been in utter chaos. It wasn’t because it was Cora, but because the fact that a private sexual act was being displayed to someone else shook her to her core.

 

But that was only momentary; her thoughts changed.

 

Now, trapped in this place to the point where she couldn’t even move freely, Lisbell had secretly wished for someone to come. Among those she hoped for was Cora Altahart.

 

Perhaps she wanted her the most, thinking that maybe Cora could control Ulrich.

 

Since the day after he had drugged her, Ulrich had barely left the bedroom. He handled most of his duties inside the room through documents brought by his secretary or via a phone installed inside. Even when he had to leave briefly, he didn’t go far and returned quickly.

 

Hadn’t she once thought that she was nothing more than a sex tool for his amusement?

 

In retrospect, that was a very wrong judgment. Such a description could only be applied now when her lower body was so sore it felt shredded.

 

Ulrich acted as if he believed that he might die if he left Lisbell’s body. He spent most of his time in the bedroom on the bed. Even when they weren’t having sex, he would hold her close, biting and sucking on her as he idly passed the day.

 

After Gwen’s funeral, the once relentless schedule seemed like a mere facade, as his private life became incredibly indulgent. And Lisbell, who was imprisoned by him, knew better than anyone the reason behind this sudden change in behavior.

 

That’s why she had waited for Cora. No one else would do. She desperately wanted someone who had equal or even slightly more authority than Ulrich in this mansion. For someone of that status to show up meant that they could no longer overlook Ulrich’s lethargic lifestyle.

 

‘Why…’

 

But even though Cora had appeared as Lisbell had wished, things didn’t go as she had hoped. For some reason, Cora had left without even arguing with her son. Seeing the empty spot where Cora had stood, Lisbell felt an overwhelming sense of emptiness gnawing at her heart.

 

So, Lisbell was left once again with this dreadful man and the even more dreadful shackles. In this incredibly spacious yet suffocatingly claustrophobic space.

 

That’s why her despair grew even more.

 

If even his own mother couldn’t control him, then who in the world could stop Ulrich?

 

Does such a person even exist in Rechem?

 

If there’s no one to rein in Ulrich’s inhumane acts, then what about me?

 

How much longer must I endure this?

 

“……!”

 

Lisbell flinched as she felt a hand on her shoulder. Clutching the robe tightly at her chest, she crawled backward to the edge of the bed. Ulrich, who had reached out to touch her disheveled hair, glanced at his empty hand before smiling faintly.

 

The next moment, he grabbed the chain connected to her shackles.

 

“Ah…!”

 

There was no need to struggle in vain. With a single pull of the chain, Lisbell was dragged back to him. The cruel force radiated malice. Whenever she resisted him like this, Ulrich would openly display his displeasure.

 

“Ugh…”

 

As the chain was pulled, the shackle naturally followed, dragging her neck along. The sensation was bone-chillingly painful, like poison seeping into her skin.

 

The feeling of being dragged by the neck was always eerie and grotesque. It made her feel less than human.

 

It was as if her very identity was being annihilated.

 

The taut chain slackened into a graceful curve. Just then, his clear sea-colored eyes were right in front of her.

 

Ulrich leisurely caressed her gaunt cheek with the back of the hand holding the chain. This affectionate touch was a repulsive display of his dominance. And, of course, what made this possible was the shackle around her neck.

 

“This…”

 

She knew it was useless.

 

“Please remove this.”

 

She knew, yet her mouth opened, and her tongue moved reflexively.

 

“Please, I beg you, take it off….”

 

How could she not, when the environment was unbearable otherwise?

 

Lisbell clutched the dark shackle around her neck, panting as if she couldn’t breathe. Ulrich’s elegant fingers lifted her chin.

 

“Not yet.”

 



 

“I still can’t be sure you won’t run away if I take this off.”

 

Recently, dealing with him felt like confronting a thick gray wall. No matter what she did, she couldn’t penetrate it, and no matter how hard she tried, she couldn’t overcome it.

 

Lisbell glared at him with cold, watery eyes, then grasped his wrist that held her chin.

 

“Then at least let me see my mother….”

 



 

“Please, just let me see her…. Please?”

 



 

“Everyone knows now…. They all know my mother is dead, so why won’t you let me see her? Why?”

 

The truth had already been revealed. Ulrich’s attempts to keep her from the hospital with flimsy excuses had been fully exposed.

 

Her mother’s life could no longer be used as leverage against Lisbell, and the scorching guilt had become a heavy lump buried deep in her gut.

 

So, wasn’t it only right that this living separation should come to an end?

 

But Lisbell still hadn’t seen a single strand of her mother’s hair. She was trapped, and her mother’s body was still in the hands of this vicious man. That was what hurt the most. That the last traces of her mother, who died in such loneliness, were still with this man.

 

So the fact that I must continue to submit to him…

 

“Why…”

 

Her voice trailed off, losing its strength.

 

Her thoughts, like rain-soaked papers, slowly descended into darkness. Each time she reached a dead end, her mind would inevitably bleach out.

 

But now, it wasn’t just an empty void.

 

“Why are you doing this to me…?”

 

The relationship with Theodore, the last moments of her mother’s life—none of it could be properly resolved, all because of this man’s deliberate actions. Her insides churned as if swallowing molten lava. Her chest felt like it was burning.

 

“Why are you doing this to me!”

 

This fierce emotion could only be explained by the sheer injustice she felt.


Tears burst out. Every time her chest filled with an unbearable heat, her tear glands reacted as if they were malfunctioning.

 

Even though Lisbell knew well by now that this man had a twisted fetish for seeing her cry, and despite her determination not to give him what he wanted, she couldn’t help herself.

 

Lisbell bit her lip until it bled and glared at him.

 

While she sat on the floor, unable to properly gather herself, shackled and naked, Ulrich lounged against a pillow as if relishing the afterglow of their intimacy. He reached out to gently touch her slender jawline.

 

When she tried to twist her head away, he tightened his grip.

 

Ulrich, worried her lips might bruise from the biting, softly slid his thumb between them. Her red-stained lips parted without resistance.

 

He pressed against the wet flesh inside with his fingertip, then let out a light sigh, as if he’d remembered something.

 

“I forgot to finish inside again.”

 



 

“I keep forgetting. It’s either I’m getting terrible memory loss at this age, or I just don’t want to leave Lisbell’s body.”

 

Crazy bastard.

 

Lisbell cursed him inwardly, noting his attitude of not even bothering to listen to her. Was he always like this? Did she think that talking to a wall would be more productive from the very first moment she met him?

 

No, there had been a time when he was capable of communication.

 

Back then, he had even blessed her marriage to Theodore, and offered the best room in his villa so she could spend quality time with her mother….

 

Those memories had become more distant and blurry than an old dream.

 

Ulrich picked up the robe he’d left on the side and draped it gently over Lisbell’s shoulders. Then, he calmly searched for and slipped on his trousers.

 

Lisbell, still glaring at him, threw off the robe he’d placed on her. Ulrich merely chuckled, as if finding her defiance adorable. His attitude only added to her frustration.

 

“You… you must be mistaken about something.”

 

He, now standing, pulled out a cigarette from a case, lit it, and looked back at her.

 

“I’m not the kind of woman who could interest you.”

 

“Hmm.”

 

He hummed an indecipherable sound and then smiled slyly, as if a thought had crossed his mind. Ignoring the smile that was digging into her core, she continued her words.

 

“I know well now how influential you are in the capital. You are more… powerful than I initially thought. There must be many women who, not caring about your name or background, would seek you out just to be with you. Surely. Am I wrong?”

 

“There probably are.”

 

Though his response was somewhat indifferent, Lisbell clenched her fists at the rare, straightforward answer.

 

“There must be women around you who are far more beautiful than someone like me, with prestigious families, who can actually help you. Turn your attention to them. Then you’ll realize how mistaken you are. You’ll see that every second you waste with a worthless woman like me is a second you’ll regret.”

 

“Did you meet with my mother behind my back?”

 

“…What?”

 

“Never mind.”

 

He smirked again and lit his cigarette.

 

She didn’t pay much attention to his seemingly random remark. She simply swallowed the blood-red tears rising inside. The self-esteem that Theodore’s warmth and kindness had once filled was now crumbling with every word she spoke.

 

But this was necessary. Even if it meant lowering herself this way, if it could free her from these shackles, she would do it as many times as needed, even if it meant biting her tongue.

 

It wasn’t a lie, either.

 

In front of the massive name of Altahart, she was less than a grain of sand. There was no reason to feel humiliated for stating aloud what everyone already sensed or suspected. Lisbell pulled herself together, trying to suppress her frayed nerves.

 

“Yes, that could be true.”

 

Her ribs caved inward.

 

The hope that was of no benefit now mischievously reared its head again. Ulrich’s attitude, which had been rather cooperative in conversation, was turning into a sweet torture for her, trapped in this situation.

 

In her suddenly lifted vision, Ulrich had drawn closer.

 

He sat on the bed and brushed back Lisbell’s disheveled gray hair. The faint smell of burning came from his fingers. Her heart trembled as she worried his cigarette might brush against her skin.

 

“But don’t you think that makes you necessary?”

 

Ulrich pressed her soft lips with his, wetting them with his tongue. If she resisted, the cigarette might end up shoved into her mouth. The vivid memory of him choking her made her fear that he would carry out the threat.

 

“We need to keep you close to determine whether this is a mere passing fancy or something more.”

 



 

“If what I feel for you is nothing but a fleeting interest that will fade away, or if….”

 

He stopped talking, rounded his pretty eyes, and smiled softly. That smile, like an invisible hand, pressed against Lisbell’s throat.

 

Feeling an inexplicable threat to her life, she slapped his hand away from her face. The cigarette dangling precariously fell and rolled under the bed.

 

A sharp pain spread across her fingers. She had burned herself on the cigarette in her haste to interrupt him. The sensation gnawed at her skin.

 

Before Lisbell could clasp her injured hand, Ulrich grabbed it. He held it as if exacting payment for her defiance, gripping it with frightening strength as he stared intently at her.

 

“Should I tell you how to make me lose interest?”

 

He stuck out his tongue.

 

The wet muscle licked the long burn on her reddened skin.

 

Lisbell let out a muffled groan from her lips. Despite that, she couldn’t take her eyes off the man in front of her. His next words, which she had waited for so anxiously, couldn’t be ignored.

 

He licked her wound as if gouging it out with his tongue. The nerves in her fingers all contracted at once. Ulrich finally took her entire finger into his mouth and sucked deeply.

 

He was clearly trying to break her from within, not just heal the wound. His deliberate delay as he sucked her burnt finger only reinforced the thought.

 

With a loud, wet pop, her finger finally slipped from his mouth. Ulrich licked his saliva-covered finger horizontally and smiled darkly.

 

“Accept the situation.”

 

A single invisible arrow pierced her briefly trembling heart.

 

“Surrender.”

 

He slowly released her hand. Lisbell recoiled, curling her hand inward like a bug under attack. The sticky texture of his saliva dripping along her fingers didn’t even bother her. All she could focus on was him.

 

“The more you resist and struggle, the more curious I become about how far you can go.”

 

He leaned in close to Lisbell. Close enough to kiss, their lips brushed lightly every time he spoke, like a feather touch.

 

Despite the soft flesh and the sensation of it pressing more softly than crushed velvet, the atmosphere remained as cold as a subzero winter.

 

The more I resist, the more I might attract his interest?

 

Looking back, Ulrich had always observed how she would react. Throwing her mother as bait, taking Theodore as a hostage. It seemed like he was silently watching how she would respond in those moments of choice….

 

“Watching you is… strange. It makes me feel both itchy deep inside and outrageously irritable at the same time. Sometimes, just touching your soft body is enough, but when you don’t go along with what I want, I get so annoyed that I feel like snapping that pretty neck of yours so I don’t have to care anymore.”

 



 

“I really don’t know what this is.”

 



 

“Lisbell, do you know?”

 

I don’t know.

 

All she felt was the chilling horror.

 

Even though no physical object touched her throat, she felt as if she were suffocating, as if an invisible curse had been placed on her, preventing her from breathing freely.

 

A memory surfaced of him holding a gun. His appearance was as cold and merciless as that of a hunter with no room for mercy.

 

Lisbell wiggled her toes against the bed sheets.

 

The invisible trap felt like it was closing in around her, threatening even her heartbeat. Her neck itched unbearably, as if cursed, knowing she couldn’t remove it on her own.


Chapter 101

From afar, the sound of water running could be heard.

 

Lisbell, sprawled carelessly on the bed, habitually glanced towards the window.

 

She saw clouds floating lazily in the distance. Though she had thought they would all be of different shapes, they surprisingly looked quite similar. Or perhaps she had been staring vacantly at the sky for so long in recent days that she could no longer distinguish them.

 

How many days had passed?

 

She squinted, trying to dig deep into her consciousness, but no clear answer emerged. The monotonous days had dragged on so long that even the sky’s scenery had become indifferent. She had no energy left to count the days one by one.

 

Would anything have been different before?

 

Would she have strained, gnashing her teeth, hoping to escape this bedroom, struggling with shackles that showed no sign of loosening, no matter how much she tugged or shook them?

 

Perhaps.

 

But not now.

 

Ever since those words pierced deeply into her heart, breaking her will like straw in the wind, she had been like this.

 

“Accept the situation.”

 

“The more you resist and struggle, the more curious I get to see how far you can go.”

 

The thought that everything she did might become new prey for him soaked her mind in dullness time and again. A few words, hardly enough to be worth a handful, made her thoughts go blank. It was as if the gears of her consciousness had rusted and stopped in a bizarre form.

 

All Lisbell could see were the fluffy clouds in the sky, so clear and pure that they made her current situation seem even more bleak.

 

Hope shattered before she could grasp it, and despair rushed in faster, swallowing her whole. Lisbell found herself in this bedroom, as if she were nothing more than a wax doll, stripped of all sense of time and space that she was supposed to enjoy as a human being.

 

Ah.

 

A faint groan formed on her tongue and then crumbled away weakly.

 

No matter how monotonous the days, she had never spent so much time staring at the sky, observing the shapes of the clouds.

 

Back then, there was no reason to wonder about the shape of the sky, the air outside, or the trends of the outside world. Those were things she could confirm with her own two feet if she just stepped outside.

 

Ah….

 

Just like her lost freedom, her mind was too busy drooping, without anything to hold it up. There had been a time when she had been excited to see the clear sky after heavy rain, but now even such feelings had faded.

 

Everything was just too much.

 

Had sunlight always been this blinding?

 

Was it always this… dazzling and splendid?

 

Was this really the state, the appearance I knew?

 

Why does this truth feel so overwhelming?

 

Why….

 

The weight of reality, which had once seemed insignificant, now closed in, tightening around her like a noose, bringing a painful realization that spread through her like a heartbeat.

 

When did it start?

 

When did I stop looking forward to tomorrow….

 

Was it from the time in his little paradise, Marnia, or when life in this capital, his true cradle, began?

 

Lisbell slowly lowered her eyelids as if she would never open them again. She let the faint sound of water trickle into her hazy thoughts.

 

A burning sensation settled on her dry cheeks, which had dried from much crying.

 

Just as she was trying to swallow her breath, hoping to remain unseen like a dead person, she heard the sound of the door gently opening.

 

Come to think of it, Ulrich had just gone to take a shower after suggesting they have a meal together before he left the bed. She thought he would call for the servant after coming out of the bathroom, but perhaps he had already summoned them.

 

She was acting as if whatever happened in this bedroom was thoroughly irrelevant to her.

 

The presence that entered the bedroom was extremely cautious. Tap, tap, tap. The small footsteps sounded so light that it seemed like it would be tiring to walk that way. Lisbell recalled the servants she had encountered while staying here. Reflecting on their attitude of treating her like a ghost they shouldn’t get entangled with, she understood why they acted like that.

 

She just didn’t want to think about anything. She wanted to pull the blanket over her head. But soon, even that seemed too bothersome.

 

The footsteps drew closer. The person must have deliberately circled around the bed to reach the dining table. There was no smell of food. That was a relief. The scent of food in here would have only triggered nausea that pounded at her insides.

 

Eventually, the footsteps stopped. At that moment, Lisbell became aware of a faint presence over her body. It was so strange that her eyelids, which had been drooping without energy, twitched.

 

“Lis…”

 

The voice, as small and delicate as the footsteps, was immature.

 

Lisbell was startled when she felt a hand stroking her cheek. She hastily opened her eyes wide and saw a child, barely half her size, in front of her. She almost let out a scream but managed to stifle it.

 

“Noah, why are you here…?”

 

Her reaction was so astonished that Noah’s eyes widened in surprise as well. Lisbell felt the child’s gaze move to her neck, so she hurriedly pulled up the blanket. But it only covered up to her chest.

 

“Why, why did you come here?”

 

“Lis…”

 

The moment Noah saw the face of the kind person who had taken care of him for the past few days, he seemed to relax, and tears welled up in his eyes, rendering him speechless.

 

Lisbell extended her arms and embraced the child. Noah snuggled into her embrace, rubbing his face against her. She couldn’t believe the sensation of the child’s fine hair spreading under her fingers.

 

How long had it been since she had seen someone other than Ulrich in this bedroom?

 

The servants often finished their tasks without even meeting her gaze, as if she were a living piece of furniture, and the Altahart lady, whom she had so eagerly hoped for, had also left the room without taking any action, making it difficult to see her again.

 

Lisbell clutched the warmth in her arms tightly, as if it were her only lifeline.

 

“Did you… did you come to see me?”

 

Lisbell asked, lifting the collapsing child.

 

“Uh-huh…”

 

Noah, whose vision was blurred with moisture, wiped his eyes with the back of his small hand. Lisbell grabbed the child’s hand and gently wiped his eyes for him.

 

Noah, with his beautiful eyelashes fluttering, leaned against Lisbell’s chest.

 

The weight of the child leaning on her tugged at something deep in her core. A hot, swelling sensation spread within her, like warm water pooling and heating her up. Lisbell pressed her face against the child’s crown and let out a fragile sigh.

 

A day from the past flashed through her mind.

 

It was the day she had discovered the truth about her mother’s situation, and Ulrich had shed the mask he had been wearing. It was the day Julian Scott, who had played a part in that situation, was brutally crushed like a piece of meat beneath Ulrich’s foot.

 

Clang—

 

Memories she had buried away were unearthed, and a dreadful scene of a flower vase, shining in the moonlight, smashing against someone’s head was revived. After that incident, Ulrich had dragged her into this bedroom, and Lisbell had spotted Noah hiding in a corner.

 

Unable to explain anything to the child at that time, she had been locked in this bedroom, so he must have been so anxious.

 

Just as her own heart had been pounding with fear, the child must have also harbored a small drum deep in his belly, beating against his mind and body.

 

Lisbell stroked the small body with a sense of apology.

 

But that sense of security didn’t last long.

 

In the distance, the sound of water in the bathroom abruptly stopped. The ensuing silence struck her like a whip. Lisbell forced the child clinging to her away.

 

“Noah, you have to go quickly.”

 

As if mirroring her emotions, the child also showed a pale, frightened expression.

 

She desperately wanted to comfort him, but there was no time for that. Considering the violence and cruelty Ulrich had shown towards her, she couldn’t predict what punishment he might impose on Noah for sneaking into the bedroom.

 

Ulrich had now become such a terrifying figure to her that she didn’t want to expose such a fragile, delicate child to his sight.

 

“Hurry, quickly….”

 

Squeak.

 

She could hear him taking down the robe from the rack. There really was no time left.

 

But Noah didn’t follow her instructions. He shook his head, his face puffed up, unwilling to leave the warmth of Lisbell’s arms. “Lis, Lis…” he whimpered, clutching the blanket desperately.

 

Footsteps could be heard. The sound of approaching steps pierced her eardrums, getting closer and closer.


Lisbell could no longer stay still. She got up from the bed while holding Noah.

 

The combination of the aftereffects of their affair and having properly regained her sight after several days caused a bout of dizziness. The time spent staggering was too precious to waste. Gritting her teeth, Lisbell made her way toward the makeshift wardrobe.

 

“Don’t come out until I say so. And don’t make any noise until then. No matter what you hear outside, don’t come out. Understand?”

 

“Why…? Why?”

 

“Because I don’t know what might happen to you. Noah, please.”

 

Despite knowing it would make the child anxious, she closed the wardrobe door. As she extended her arm, the shackles’ chains tightened, preventing her from moving further. It was a relief that she could at least reach the wardrobe.

 

Lisbell returned to the bed with cautious steps. She positioned herself in a spot similar to where she had been before getting up. Just as she was pulling the blanket over herself, the tightly shut bathroom door opened.

 

She felt his gaze land on her back as she curled up. The sound of footsteps approaching the bed grew louder.

 

“Are you asleep?”

 

Her ankle, nestled between the blanket and the sheet, was suddenly grabbed. Her body, unable to resist, was pulled along. Lisbell’s limbs twisted in shock, already tense from the situation.

 

What a nasty man. Even if she had been asleep, this rough handling would have surely woken her, yet his actions showed no hesitation. It was proof that he was doing this on purpose.

 

Ulrich chuckled softly as he laid her down in front of him. He held a towel dampened with water in his hand.

 

“Stay still while I clean you.”

 

In truth, she more often fainted after their affairs than remained conscious like this. Whenever she regained consciousness after such incidents, her body was clean, leading her to believe that he washed her while she was unconscious. On days when she tried to stay awake, he would force her to take sleeping pills.

 

Lisbell stared at the ceiling, feeling completely deprived of free will. Yet, her nerves stood on end. Her focus was drawn to a single spot in the bedroom.

 

Her tongue twisted silently as she tried not to let her gaze wander toward the wardrobe.

 

“…I’m hungry.”

 

Ulrich paused as he wiped away the dried traces of semen from her inner thigh. His pale gray eyes shimmered like waves stirred by the wind.

 

His sudden lack of reaction made her glance up at him. Ulrich smiled with narrowed eyes.

 

“Oh, sorry. I wasn’t expecting that.”

 



 

“I thought your dream was to starve yourself.”

 

His tone was undoubtedly mocking her habit of skipping meals. In the past, she would have weakly pushed away his touch and stared blankly at the ceiling.

 

But now, she couldn’t afford to let her mind drift. Even that would be a luxury. In this wretched bedroom, there was a small, delicate life that she had to protect.

 

“Is it not your dream?”

 

“It would be too sad to say that.”

 



 

“I’m always worried about feeding you more.”

 

He spoke with a silver tongue. Lisbell turned her head away, not wanting to see his face. Ulrich bit her cheek playfully and then reached for the call button.

 

Seeing this, Lisbell hurriedly spoke up.

 

“You should go get it yourself.”

 

She needed time to get Noah out of the wardrobe and out of the bedroom. To do that, she first had to separate Ulrich from this space. The meal was just an excuse.

 

She had no appetite and wouldn’t eat, but she could keep asking him for food and conversation if it meant getting Noah out of there.

 

Ulrich’s eyebrows furrowed in mild displeasure, yet there was a clear curiosity in his expression. Lisbell felt her heart tighten as she silently swallowed her saliva and pulled the blanket closer.

 

“I don’t want anyone entering this bedroom.”

 

“Now you say that?”

 

“I didn’t want it from the beginning, but you never asked me and called the servants.”

 

Ulrich blinked. His perfectly shaped eyes seemed lost in thought, making her throat constrict bitterly.

 

He chuckled softly and gathered her tangled hair in his hand. As he bent down to press a kiss to the ends, his manner was reminiscent of the noble etiquette one might see at a banquet. Of course, given that this was a bedroom where the heat of their intimacy hadn’t fully dissipated, it was clear that his actions were just a mockery.

 

“Yes, my princess.”

 



 

“As you wish.”

 

The title, so unfitting for her situation, sent shivers down her spine.

 

With a smirk, Ulrich lifted his upper body. Lisbell remained motionless, waiting for him to leave the bedroom. Fortunately, there was no sign of movement from the closed wardrobe. Noah was following her instructions, much to her relief.

 

Ulrich grabbed a robe hanging on the side and headed toward the door. His long strides echoed in Lisbell’s ears. Or rather, it was her heartbeat. Her pulse pounded in her chest as if her heart might leap out.

 

Finally, Ulrich reached for the gold-painted doorknob.

 

All he needed to do was lower it, pull, and walk out.

 

But he stopped dead in his tracks. Ulrich, frozen as if he had turned to a pillar of salt, slowly turned his head. His sharp profile revealed as he glanced toward the bed. Then, unexpectedly,

 

“Shh.”

 

He brought his long index finger to his lips.

 

Lisbell, already tense, shrank further into herself. Ulrich’s normally mild eyes gleamed sharply, like a well-honed blade.

 

He suddenly turned and strode in a large arc.

 

Realizing his destination was the wardrobe, Lisbell hurriedly pushed herself up.

 

Ulrich moved with such purpose that he seemed oblivious to any sounds. Lisbell, realizing that he had somehow detected the foreign presence in the bedroom, crawled across the bed in a desperate attempt to reach him.

 

“Wa-wait…!”

 

But he was faster than her.

 

The tightly closed wardrobe door opened with a thud. By then, Lisbell, who had hastily climbed off the bed, tripped and fell to the floor.

 

Caught in the wardrobe, Noah was covering his mouth with both hands. His glassy eyes grew wide with fear as they darted toward Ulrich, and he began to well up with tears.

 

“…Hmm?”

 

Ulrich let out a puzzled sound upon seeing the unexpected figure. Shortly after, he brushed back his platinum hair with a helpless laugh.

 

He reached out and picked up Noah. Though they were blood relatives, Noah struggled and pushed his uncle away, overwhelmed by fear.

 

Ulrich handed the child over to Lisbell, unable to hide his bemusement. Relieved that he had handed Noah over without a fuss, Lisbell carried the boy to the bed. It was purely an attempt to put some distance between her and Ulrich. Of course, Ulrich was too bewildered to notice.

 

“Why is he here?”

 

“…He came to see me.”

 

Lisbell answered briefly, trying to soothe Noah, who burst into tears as soon as he was back in her arms. The little fists clinging to her wrist told her how frightened he must have been in that wardrobe.

 

Ulrich, watching his blood relative cling to a woman with whom he shared no blood, let out a knowing sigh.

 

His gaze quickly shifted back to Lisbell.

 

“So, you wanted to get rid of me, huh?”

 



 

“I was wondering why you were suddenly acting so out of character.”

 

He laughed softly and leaned closer. Lisbell tensed as she felt his lips brush against her ear.

 

“I didn’t realize it before, but Lisbell, you’re a terrible actress.”

 



 

“You’ll never make it as an actress.”


He couldn’t tell if the words were meant as ridicule or advice, but he quickly corrected his posture before turning his back.

 

“Well, fine. I was wondering who it could be. It’s hard to make an issue out of a child intruding into a bedroom. We’ll end it by reprimanding the person in charge. I’ll call for the nanny now…”

 

“Wait a moment!”

 

At the mention of calling someone, Noah trembled violently as if having a seizure and burrowed into Lisbell’s arms. Lisbell hugged the child with one arm and urgently spoke.

 

“Can’t you wait until Noah falls asleep… and then take him?”

 

“Noah?”

 

“…It’s the child’s name. I gave it to him.”

 

Lisbell hesitated for a moment, feeling regret, before replying quietly. Ulrich clicked his tongue, clearly displeased. But Lisbell, determined to protect Noah at this moment, held the child tightly.

 

“No one in this household even gave him a name.”

 



 

“For a short while, I am in a position where I have the right to teach this child. From that position, I gave him a name to facilitate smooth lessons.”

 

It wasn’t meant to make him feel guilty, but simply to state the facts about Altahart’s coldness. Nor did she expect him to feel anything about it.

 

However, as expected, Ulrich’s unflinching attitude left Lisbell feeling as if something within her was breaking apart. Whenever she glimpsed the eradicated humanity in the man, she felt the blow herself, ironically enough.

 

“Noah is trembling so much. Sending him away like this won’t help, as no one in this house will comfort him. So… please, Ulrich. Just for a moment.”

 

A pitiful sob echoed against her chest. Lisbell hugged Noah more warmly and held her breath.

 

She honestly didn’t expect anything. Sometimes he acted like a monster who fed on her despair. So, even though she knew showing vulnerability like this wouldn’t do any good…

 

She couldn’t abandon the warmth in her arms.

 

Why did she keep getting shocked and disappointed by Ulrich’s relentless coldness? Because something like that still remained within her. Like a small orange flame that could only be ignited by a single match…

 

She thought it had long since extinguished, leaving only gray smoke, but apparently not. And the more she desperately encountered him, the less she could let go of Noah.

 

A low sigh was heard. She mustered the courage to look up. Ulrich, arms crossed, was leaning against the table, staring at her. Despite repeatedly deciding to let go of all expectations, a slight hope rose like the morning sun upon seeing his stance.

 

“Fine.”

 



 

“Once he falls asleep, I’ll call for the nanny.”

 

The words were so unexpected that her mouth almost dropped open. But that didn’t last long, as she was soon busy tending to Noah, who was clinging to her and whimpering.

 

The time spent soothing Noah left Lisbell feeling oddly anxious. Ulrich was watching her closely as she comforted the child. She was also anxious, fearing that his cruel nature might lead him to suddenly change his mind and take Noah away.

 

But Ulrich did not do so.

 

He clearly didn’t seem pleased, but he quietly stayed in place. Every time she checked to see if his interest had waned, his steely blue eyes were relentlessly fixed on her, almost obsessively.

 

His gaze was so intense that it felt like more than just watching, as if he were observing with some specific purpose, which sent chills down her spine.

 

Lisbell was now terrified to the point of death of trying to uncover what lay beneath that gaze and did her best to avoid it.

 



 

Noah’s visits didn’t stop after just one.

 

That day, after falling asleep in Lisbell’s arms and being moved to his bedroom, Noah persistently visited Ulrich’s bedroom thereafter. It would have been right to tell him not to come for the child’s sake, but in this isolated space where she only faced Ulrich, she couldn’t bring herself to do so because she was too glad to see someone else.

 

By now, Lisbell could distinguish between Noah and a servant just by the sound of the door opening.

 

With Noah visiting so often, Lisbell could no longer just lie in bed idly staring at the clouds. Though she couldn’t cover the shackles, she had to at least cover her body, marked with various traces from their sexual encounters. Exposing her blemished body was not only harmful to the child’s well-being but also did nothing for her self-esteem.

 

There were many things to consider, but what puzzled her most was Ulrich’s behavior. His mercy, which she had believed would only last once, was surprisingly ongoing.

 

Noah, who initially visited with empty hands, now came into the bedroom carrying a book, asking her to read to him. While she was caring for Noah, Ulrich would always sit nearby, watching the two of them.

 

Sometimes he reviewed documents he hadn’t been able to check while confined to the bedroom, or he would answer something over the phone, but his eyes were always fixed on her and the child.

 

She wondered why he did this but never asked. By now, every word that came out of his mouth terrified her.

 

She also had a faint wish not to break this moment.

 

When Noah was there, she didn’t have to forcibly mix bodies with Ulrich, and for a brief moment, she could forget about the shackle around her neck.

 

Noah had once been curious about the shackle around her neck, but Lisbell had managed to redirect his attention to something else, so now he seemed to regard it as just a peculiar accessory. The child’s innocence allowed her to escape questioning.

 

Spending time with Noah under Ulrich’s gaze, which felt like the muzzle of a gun that could fire at any moment, was nerve-wracking.

 

At first, it certainly was, but as time went on, she began to feel sad. It was a small, newly opened vent. When she was with Noah, that vent pulsed as if it had a heartbeat, but when the child disappeared, it would hide like a ghost, functioning so subtly that she hardly noticed it.

 

It felt like living a life where day and night constantly switched places without rest.

 

The memory of yesterday, reading a book with Noah sitting on her lap, felt like day, while waking up now and groggily facing a table set with food felt like the dead of night.

 

Even if a ray of sunlight pierced through and sparrows chirped on the dry branches to announce the start of the day, it was midnight for Lisbell.

 

As she picked at her food without appetite, Ulrich, who had been reading a tabloid on the side, approached the bed.

 

“Even Noah eats more than you.”

 

There was a subtle threat wrapped in those words. Ulrich, who knew all too well how important the time spent with Noah was to her, was also the one who could control that meeting. So, the meaning was clear: if she wanted to continue seeing the child, she’d better start eating.

 

She knew it wouldn’t help to defy his will, but that didn’t mean she wanted to comply easily either. In a small act of defiance, Lisbell put down her fork and picked up her cup. As she took a sip of warm milk, Ulrich was already on the bed.

 

Her uncombed hair was pushed behind her ear. He swept aside her gray hair and kissed her pale cheek. Instead of pulling away, he licked her soft cheek and bit it gently with his teeth.

 

“If you’re hungry, you can eat yourself.”

 

As soon as she snapped at him, sensing he would devour her flesh if left unchecked, Ulrich laughed. She had hoped that speaking up would make him move away, but instead, he pulled Lisbell into his lap.

 

When she twisted her waist in discomfort at suddenly finding herself sitting on him, he grabbed the inside of her thigh tightly. Sensing a strange threat, Lisbell stopped struggling, and Ulrich slid his hand further inside, teasing the pubic hair under her triangle of underwear.

 

“Do you like the child that much?”

 

He asked as if genuinely curious.

 

Lisbell continued to drink her milk without answering. Watching her from an angle, Ulrich rested his chin on her slender shoulder and took the milk cup from her hand. As his hand suddenly intruded, Lisbell’s head naturally turned toward him.

 

“Suddenly, I’m curious.”

 

Ulrich grabbed one of her breasts with his free hand. The rough grip crushed the small mound of flesh.

 

It hurt as if her breast was being torn off, causing Lisbell’s face to contort.

 

“Does your breast swell when you’re pregnant?”

 

His voice, laced with lecherous curiosity, crept around her ear in a chilling whisper.


“Wh-… Ugh.”

 

“They say the nipples get bigger since they need to produce milk.”

 

Muttering like a scholar consumed by insatiable curiosity, Ulrich gathered Lisbell’s breast into a single point. What was once nearly flat was now bunched into a small lump.

 

However, it was clear that this was solely due to physical force, as the skin flushed red. Her delicate skin bruised easily under such pressure, leaving visible marks.

 

Ignoring whether she was in pain, Ulrich grabbed the thickened nipple at the center of her breast.

 

“Ah!”

 

A sharp gasp escaped Lisbell’s lips. As he twisted the already captured nipple, he stared obsessively at her breast with glazed eyes.

 

Lisbell tried to push his arm away, panting heavily. But every time he boldly rolled the rounded nub between his fingers, her fingertips trembled helplessly.

 

“If milk starts coming out here…”

 

As if something had come to mind, Ulrich tilted the glass of milk he was holding. As the milk dampened her chest, a rich, creamy scent filled the air. Lisbell’s eyes widened as the front of her upper body became soaked in the white liquid.

 

“Will it look like this?”

 

His chuckling laughter brushed against her ears. Realizing belatedly what he had done, Lisbell spread her legs clumsily, trying to shake him off. But with her breast already caught in his grasp, escaping was impossible.

 

“This, what is…”

 

“I’m really curious—would you like to try getting pregnant?”

 

The words that had formed in her mouth tumbled around wildly. Unable to hide her panic, Lisbell tried to grip his arm, but she couldn’t resist the force pulling her waist back down. Then he whispered crudely into her ear, “Ah, if you sit like that, you’re going to crush my cock.”

 

Then he bent his head down, aiming for her breast, which was firmly held in his grasp.

 

A milky white liquid dripped down her flat chest, pooling on the flesh tightly gathered in Ulrich’s hand, and eventually collected on the tip of her nipple, now a lush coral color.

 

Ulrich licked it up like a parched man. The sensitivity of the area made her body react instantly, her hips trembling as she threw her head back.

 

“Hngh…!”

 

Ulrich lifted her chin, tilting her face towards him. As soon as their eyes met, his lips pressed against hers. The rich taste and scent of milk lingered on the tongue that parted her lips.

 

“Shh…”

 

As soon as their lips parted, his soft exhalation caused Lisbell’s vision to blur. Ulrich’s arrogant gaze slid smoothly to a corner of the bedroom.

 

“If you make such a cute sound, the child hiding in the wardrobe might come out.”

 

A chilling shiver shot from the top of her head to the soles of her feet. Her fine hairs stood on end. Lisbell’s wide, round eyes darted to the wardrobe as if someone had grabbed her and twisted her gaze towards it.

 

The wardrobe was tightly closed, as usual.

 

It couldn’t be.

 

Noah couldn’t possibly be there.

 

The child had hidden there before, but that was only to hide from Ulrich before he knew of the boy’s existence. Since then, Noah had openly come to this bedroom without hiding.

 

Didn’t that happen just yesterday?

 

So, despite the clear evidence that Ulrich was lying, she couldn’t easily relax. There was always a lingering doubt at the back of her mind, even when spending time with Noah.

 

What was Ulrich’s true intention in letting her spend time with Noah?

 

Up until now, she had chalked it up to his fickle sympathy, but how could she know for sure that he hadn’t suddenly changed his mind? And even if he hadn’t, would he be so immoral as to lock the child in the wardrobe and force him to watch what they were doing…?

 



 

Did she still have a shred of trust left?

 

An unforgettable and unforgivable event existed between her and him. He was the man who had hidden his mother’s death and used her as a means to oppress Lisbell. Such a person, even if it was just a naïve child, wouldn’t hesitate to use Noah as a means.

 

As her thoughts raced to this conclusion, the blood vessels throughout her body tightened.

 

If her suspicion was correct, there was only one answer.

 

If there really was a child in that wardrobe…

 

“Hngh…! Ah!”

 

Ulrich suddenly took her nipple into his mouth. The force with which he sucked, pulling her breast as if it would tear off, instantly shattered her precariously stacked thoughts.

 

Lisbell swung her arms wildly, accidentally knocking over the bedside table.

 

Food spilled everywhere, and the crashing sound of falling dishes filled the air. The noise faded into the background as her embarrassment overwhelmed her senses.

 

With the bedside table out of the way, Ulrich grabbed both of Lisbell’s thighs, spreading them wide open towards the wardrobe. The exposed skin, covered in fine, sparse hair, was laid bare without any cover.

 

“Don’t, don’t… Please, don’t!”

 

There was no child.

 

Surely there wasn’t.

 

There couldn’t be.

 

But what if there was?

 

A moment ago, she hadn’t even thought about the wardrobe, but now she was obsessively aware of it. Every time she became conscious of the possibility that someone might be hiding in there, secretly watching, her private parts tingled with a sharp sensation.

 

It quickly became a reality. Ulrich had moved his hand from her breast to her lower body, rubbing and stroking her intimately.

 

“If you keep rubbing the nipple, milk might actually come out.”

 

“That’s… impossible… Hngh!”

 

One hand on her breast, the other on her lower body, he rubbed, stroked, and pinched her relentlessly. Every teasing touch made Lisbell feel like her body was being violated.

 

She tried to dig her nails into his forearm, but she quickly covered her mouth. Ulrich laughed wickedly, twisting her now hardened nipple with force.

 

“Noah, the boy you kindly named, was brought to this mansion as if he were kidnapped, without even weaning off his mother’s milk.”

 

“Hngh, ugh…!”

 

“Who knows? Maybe Noah always rubbed his face against you because your breasts still smelled like milk.”

 

He had clearly been observing closely whenever she held Noah in her arms, paying attention to even the smallest details.

 

Lisbell wanted to argue against him, but the tingling sensation in her back made her focus on closing her thighs. Ulrich slid a finger inside her, brushing against her inner walls deeply as he pushed it in.

 

“Nngh…! Hngh.”

 

“Already so wet again. It seems you get more excited when you think someone’s watching.”

 

He whispered lewdly in her ear, his breath warm.

 

He withdrew his finger, now coated with her moisture. His middle finger glistened with wetness.

 

Without hesitation, Ulrich brought it to his mouth and sucked on it. The more he played with his tongue, the heavier the object pressing against Lisbell’s hips grew.

 

“Do you like the idea of being seen while you’re being filled?”

 

Her mouth was full of saliva that she couldn’t swallow, but Lisbell felt her mouth drying out instead. Her thoughts refused to come together, crumbling like a damaged structure.

 

Biting her lower lip until it bled, Lisbell managed to push his thigh away, collapsing forward.

 

“Don’t… don’t do this. Please, stop… please…”

 

Clear fluid dripped from her private area, trickling down her inner thighs, which trembled uncontrollably. Unable to gather any strength, she began to crawl away. As she did, the air on her exposed back sent shivers down her spine.

 

He slapped her buttocks, which had turned a pale pink like ripe peaches, then got up from the bed.

 

Moving leisurely, he walked to the wardrobe and flung the doors wide open.

 

Lisbell, trembling in fear and unable to turn her head, finally dared to look and saw the wardrobe was empty. She stared blankly at the dark void inside, which seemed to mock her cruelly.


Ulrich approached the bed, keeping Lisbell, who had turned into a stone statue, in his sight. He bent down and sat to meet her gaze.

 

“Do you really think he’s here?”

 



 

“You can be so naïve at times.”

 

His tone still carried traces of a laugh he couldn’t suppress. As each of his words reached her ears, a strange, high-pitched ringing overwhelmed her mind.

 

The invisible form of contempt quickly morphed into an intense, stinging anger. Like a volcano erupting inside her, unbearable fury surged through her body. By the time Lisbell regained her senses, she was already lunging at him.

 

Smack!

 

The sound of her palm striking his cheek echoed ominously.

 

Even that didn’t quell Lisbell’s anger. She wildly flailed her arms, hitting him indiscriminately. Ulrich, though struck hard enough to feel pain, remained unbothered. Instead, he laughed heartily, as if he were truly enjoying himself.

 

One side was brimming with anger, while the other side remained leisurely and smiling. The scene in the bedroom resembled a strange phenomenon of winter.

 

Seeing him genuinely enjoying this only fueled Lisbell’s rage further. Just as she thought she could manage to strike his other cheek, her wrist was grabbed and pulled backward.

 

The moment her body collapsed onto the bed, it felt like she was falling from a great height.

 

“Let go, let go of me!”

 

She clawed at him with her nails. Ulrich deftly avoided her savage attempts to harm him and extended his arm, laughing aloud.

 

Her agitated words were cut off as Ulrich covered her mouth with his hand, pressing down firmly. It was a way to stifle her breathing without needing to grasp her neck.

 

Gasping, Lisbell desperately tried to inhale, but the air she took in couldn’t pass through her throat and instead leaked back out. As she became more exhausted, her lungs constricted, and her vision blurred.

 

Through the barely regained focus, she saw his cunning smile. Although he had been struck only once, the corner of his mouth had split, a small drop of blood forming there, making the scene even more grotesque and terrifying.

 

“I wondered how long you could keep up this innocent act for a few days… but as expected, you couldn’t last long, Lisbell.”

 

“Let… go…!”

 

“You’re such an exhausting and cute person.”

 

Her body was pressed deeper into the bed. It felt as though her entire body was being crushed under a boulder. Blood rushed to Lisbell’s pale face. At the moment when Ulrich’s gaze turned as sharp as the edge of broken glass, he removed the hand that had been holding her down.

 

As Lisbell struggled to catch her breath, Ulrich adjusted her legs, which had been splayed apart, and rubbed his hardened dick against her groin.

 

His swollen tip, already wet from the fluids he had leaked, probed for her soft entrance, parting her as it pushed inside her body.

 

Lisbell’s limbs stiffened like stones. But only for a moment, as he began to move his hips slowly, thrusting into her. Her toes curled inward and then straightened in time with his rhythmic movements. Her legs, bent at an awkward angle, floated in the air, gently tapping his shoulders.

 

“Forget about Gwen’s child now.”

 

The deeper he thrust, the more she felt like she was suffocating. Lisbell’s indistinguishable moans spilled out uncontrollably.

 

Ulrich grabbed her knee, pressing down to deepen their connection. Their joined bodies stuck together like they were desperately trying to meld into one. The fluids seeping out between them acted as a lubricant, aiding his movements.

 

“I’ll give you a child instead.”

 

“Ah… ah…”

 

“I used to think that children were noisy and troublesome….”

 

Ulrich let out a pleasant groan, as if expressing his heightened pleasure. His low, heavy breathing felt unnaturally hot, especially for winter.

 

“But if it’s a child who looks like you… maybe one wouldn’t be so bad.”

 

What… what is he saying?

 

What… is this supposed to mean?

 

I don’t understand.

 

It’s like my consciousness and thoughts are sinking into the mud.

 

Lisbell stared at the trembling ceiling, gulping for air.

 

For a moment, the bitter despair made her think it might be better if her breath just stopped, but that feeling passed quickly as her body began to respond honestly. The heat that started to pool below her navel spread like it was massaging her entire body.

 

The strange moans filling the bedroom air fueled her confusion. She felt herself involuntarily reacting below. Ulrich occasionally rubbed her clitoris, pulling at the insides of her thighs to drive his shaft deeper into her, pressing it all the way to the root. He roughly thrust his hips to scrape her inner walls.

 

A strange pleasure seeped through her delicate tissues, making her nerves tangle. Her scalp tingled with heat.

 

Ulrich, who had been energetically moving his hips like a racehorse since morning, came earlier than usual. Perhaps intent on keeping his word, he didn’t withdraw his penis.

 

Her fragile violet eyes rolled downward as if in shock. It was an expression of disbelief at what had just happened.

 

Seeing her reaction, Ulrich laughed joyfully as he covered her lower abdomen, still firmly lodged inside her. His hand moved over her belly as if hoping his seed would seep into every corner.

 

It felt like something filthy and vile was being poured into her.

 

Lisbell couldn’t bear the harsh reality of her relentless abuse and closed her eyes.

 

“Forget about Gwen’s child now.”

 

She vaguely understood the meaning of those words shortly after they were abruptly thrown at her. From the day after he released his vile discharge inside her, Noah was nowhere to be seen in this bedroom.

 

She only remembered two instances when the child had sneaked into this bedroom. After being caught hiding in the wardrobe, he had started coming and going openly.

 

What were the chances that Noah had suddenly matured overnight and realized he shouldn’t freely enter his uncle’s bedroom?

 

The likelihood was incredibly low.

 

What could that mean?

 

It probably meant that Ulrich, the master of this bedroom and the one with the most power over the child’s life after his wife, had blocked Noah from entering.

 

It didn’t make sense. Was it really his hobby to give hope only to snatch it away?

 

If he was going to do this suddenly, why had he allowed Noah to stay here? Why had he given the child, and me, small, warm moments only to take them away colder than the winter sea?

 

Without Noah, life returned to the pitch-black darkness it had been before. Lisbell lay on her side, weakly rubbing her eyes. Her feeble hand soon dropped to her navel. She thought she had no more tears left, but fresh ones welled up and soaked the bed.

 

“What did you do to Noah?”

 

“What did you do to Noah!”

 

“Why are you doing this to him? He did nothing wrong….”

 

It wasn’t that Lisbell had done nothing. She had clung to his clothes, desperately trying to get any news of Noah.

 

But Ulrich responded coldly. He never gave her the answer she wanted and instead forced himself on her whenever she mentioned Noah, leaving his mark inside her.

 

Each time, the words he had once said about giving her his child returned as a cruel echo, tearing at her eardrums.

 

It felt like a vicious ploy to quickly make her forget her brother’s illegitimate child, making Lisbell too terrified even to speak of him.

 

Pregnant with his child? She had never considered it until now. She had assumed he didn’t want children either. She thought that’s why they used contraception regularly. Despite their numerous nightly encounters, she hadn’t become pregnant, so she assumed that was the reason.

 

But now, the very thing she had dismissed might become a reality….

 

It was the worst. Perhaps even worse than that.

 

Lately, she was busy trying to rid herself of the negative emotions that surged like a rising tide whenever she regained consciousness. Fear, dread, anxiety, unease….

 

And when those were gone, there was nothing left inside.

 

She wondered if this was what it felt like to hold onto emptiness, as if grasping at anything would be futile. Whether she looked at or felt something, it all seemed in vain. Lisbell tried listing the differences between herself and a corpse in her mind, but the attempt only deepened her despair, so she gave up.

 

The bedroom was quiet. The silence wrapping around her was awkward.

 

It seemed that Ulrich had an important engagement, something unavoidable, and had left for the first time in a while.

 

It was still early, and as she woke from sleep, she vaguely remembered him holding her and saying something while pressing his lips to her temple. But she couldn’t recall what it was. Given his recent behavior, she didn’t want to remember.

 

All she felt was disgust at how this man treated her as if she were his beloved mistress.


As Lisbell shook her head, she felt the heavy weight of the shackles. The presence of the chains connected to the bedpost followed her every movement. Even when she remained still, the expected sensations, sounds, and weight continued to hinder her movements.

 

Reality was always overwhelming and immense, and the more she resisted, the more it seemed to consume her. Lisbell no longer wished to be strangled by the anxiety and unease that enveloped her.

 

If remaining still was the path to comfort, perhaps it was better to choose it. Unable to move of her own free will and incapable of achieving anything even if she wanted to, she gradually resigned, compromised, and submitted.

 

Footsteps could be heard in the distance.

 

Perhaps Ulrich hadn’t fully closed the bedroom door, or maybe it was something else, but she didn’t care. It was obvious that it was one of the servants who didn’t even treat her as a living person. It was better to let them pass by than to face them in this wretched state.

 

“She’s still alive, right?”

 

At the unfamiliar voice that pierced her ears, she froze.

 

A beat later, she abruptly sat up.

 

The dull throbbing pain climbing up her spine and the tightening pain in her cramped thighs couldn’t surpass the chilling sensation that caused the hairs on her head to stand on end.

 

It was only now that she noticed the wide-open bedroom door and the woman standing in front of it—Cora Altahart.

 

This wasn’t a dream.

 

She was undeniably real.

 

“I was surprised. For a moment, I thought my son had been holding onto a corpse all this time.”

 

Though she sounded somewhat relieved, her expression didn’t reflect it. As the sound of her heels clicked, the woman entered the excessively luxurious prison where Lisbell was confined and quietly surveyed the room.

 

The elderly butler, presumed to have opened the door for her, brought over a chair. Cora sat in it with a composed manner, in a spot where she could see the bed directly.

 

Thus, Lisbell was forced to face her without even properly adjusting her clothes.

 

“Miss Osborne, I’m someone who believes time is money.”

 



 

“Especially for people like us, every minute and second can sometimes realize something more valuable than gold.”

 

Lisbell’s frantic movements to pull the blanket over her naked body slowed down. Seeing that Lisbell couldn’t grasp the meaning behind her words, Cora stopped speaking in circles.

 

“It means I don’t want to waste much of my time in such a degrading place.”

 

She let out a faint sigh. It was unclear whether she found the time she was spending here truly regrettable or whether she found it distasteful that she had to personally step into this situation.

 

“It’s the first time Ulrich has behaved in such a manner.”

 



 

“Unlike Gwen, he’s usually rational and logical… He’s sharp enough to distinguish whether his actions will harm or benefit him.”

 

The blue eyes beneath her lowered eyelids quivered as if mimicking unending sorrow.

 

“I didn’t raise such a beast as my son…”

 



 

“So ignorant, so utterly vulgar.”

 

She clicked her tongue softly.

 

Lisbell quickly realized who Cora was thinking of. At the same time, she confronted an answer to a question she had long avoided.

 

Julian Scott—his death.

 

Having experienced the death of her son’s lover, Cora now trembled with emotions, whether sorrow or anger, that she couldn’t distinguish.

 

Cora’s gaze, previously fixed on a diagonal line, lifted. When their eyes met again, Lisbell felt as though an invisible spear had pierced her chest. Strangely, at that moment, she was convinced that this woman was indeed Ulrich’s mother.

 

“It occurred to me that perhaps you, Miss Osborne, are the one making Ulrich this way.”

 

It was something she had already heard once before—through the late Julian Scott.

 

“Perhaps you’re the one holding the core of my son…”

 



 

“As a mother, I can’t just sit back and watch such a pathetic situation unfold.”

 

Lisbell listened to Cora’s voice without blinking an eye.

 

“Of course, even if I separate the two of you like this, Ulrich will surely start tracking you down immediately. His stubbornness surpasses even mine and Gwen’s, so there’s no way he’ll just sit idly by while this situation, which started without his consent, unfolds. So, Miss Osborne, how about hiding and taking refuge under my protection for a while?”

 

“Refuge…?”

 

“People are curious about what they can see and want to know more about it. When it’s out of sight, their interest gradually diminishes. If you keep physically distant from Ulrich for long enough, there will come a moment when even the fleeting interest he had in you will wither away. I can hide you until Ulrich reaches that point.”

 

Two things became clear.

 

First, Cora had the ability to make her words a reality. Second, she was desperate to tear Lisbell away from her son, like a leech clinging to him.

 

Even if it meant wasting her golden time and money, as she had said.

 

By the time she realized this, Lisbell’s lips had already parted.

 

“My mother…”

 



 

“As long as my mother is held hostage, I cannot be free from your son.”

 

Cora’s eyebrows slightly raised. Having seen Ulrich make such an expression from time to time, Lisbell was filled with an indescribable sense of dread.

 

“You must be talking about your mother’s remains, which are stored at the Royal Hospital.”

 

“I have a request. I would like to hold my mother’s funeral.”

 

Knowing it was a difficult request, she still voiced it.

 

As expected, Cora reacted as if she had heard something utterly absurd.

 

“From now on, Miss Osborne, you will be a fugitive from my son.”

 



 

“Are you even aware of that?”

 

It was a harsh rebuke, questioning whether she thought she could hold such a ceremony as a fugitive.

 

But Lisbell couldn’t give up.

 

Given the current situation, their desires were evenly matched.

 

Just as Lisbell desperately wanted to escape from this bedroom, Cora was equally determined to sever her connection with Ulrich by any means. That was likely why she had secretly visited the bedroom while her son was away.

 

Unlike Lisbell, who could only harbor futile wishes, Cora had the ability and status to act on hers. And as someone with that power, perhaps it wouldn’t be too difficult for her to arrange a proper end for Lisbell’s mother.

 

“I was wronged by your son. If he hadn’t blackmailed me using my mother as leverage, I wouldn’t have been dragged to the capital like this. Given that I ended up in this situation trying to take responsibility for my mother’s life and death, urging me to run away while neglecting that issue doesn’t serve as any kind of incentive for me.”

 



 

“If anything, I might cling to your son for the rest of my life, driven by a desire for revenge, to harm him in any way I can. Or, when I get out of here, I might even report his actions to every newspaper.”

 

Though she spoke calmly, it was nothing more or less than a threat. Cora, realizing this, remained silent for a moment. Then her sharp blue eyes fixated on Lisbell as if they were piercing through her.

 

“What exactly do you want?”

 

“Is holding a funeral really that difficult?”

 

“I’m advising against it for your own sake. How many eyes do you think are watching our family in the capital? If word spreads that I’ve presided over the funeral of some commoner with no ties to us, whether you like it or not, you’ll be entangled with our family for the rest of your life.”

 



 

“Your mother’s funeral would become a noisy affair. There might even be some crazy journalist who would dig up her grave, trying to find some connection to our family. As you know, the capital is filled with vultures hungry for gossip.”

 



 

“Miss Osborne, if your goal is to see your name mentioned in the newspapers every day, I won’t stop you.”


The intention behind the warning was clear.

 

Just the thought made Lisbell bite her lower lip in disgust.

 

Indeed, holding a funeral was an excessive demand, even in her own eyes.

 

Even in ordinary circumstances, this would have been a difficult and overwhelming situation. But trying to complete it in such a fallen state was undoubtedly overreaching.

 

“…If there’s a church close to the hospital, I’d like my mother to be buried there. And I want to receive the belongings she had before she passed away as mementos. Even the clothes she was wearing would be fine.”

 

The lady, who had been deep in thought with a noble demeanor, nodded after a moment.

 

“Alright. We’ll handle it that way.”

 

Handle.

 

The cold, bureaucratic word sliced through her heart. Yet, a small measure of relief filled her. The thought that she wouldn’t have to leave her deceased mother in that hospital any longer loosened one of the tightly wound nerves that had been stretched thin.

 

“Pavil.”

 

“Yes, Madam. I’ll deliver the order.”

 

The butler left the bedroom after receiving the instruction.

 

“Ulrich will have to go on a business trip abroad next week. I’ll make sure of it, so there won’t be any scheduling issues. By that time, you should have dealt with Miss Osborne’s request regarding her mother. If that’s taken care of, there won’t be any objection to you following me, will there?”

 

“…Yes. But where are we going?”

 

“I have a villa on the Orkenian coastline in the northwest, bought under someone else’s name, so neither Gwen nor Ulrich knows of its existence. We’ll stay there for a while and observe the situation.”

 

It was as if the allotted time had ended, as the lady rose from her chair. Lisbell, not expecting any parting words, was struck by the coldness of her retreating figure and hurriedly spoke.

 

“Madam…!”

 

Thankfully, she stopped. Lisbell swallowed nervously.

 

“The child…”

 



 

“Is Gwen’s child alright?”

 

For a moment, the lady’s eyes wavered slightly. Though she quickly regained her composure, an inexplicable chill lingered.

 

“I don’t know.”

 

“What? You don’t know…? What do you mean?”

 

“The child was sent to Thukenia a few days ago. It’s a country with a systematic education and training institution for raising children to become extraordinary prodigies. Since the child is no longer staying at this mansion, I have no quick way to check on him.”

 

Lisbell had heard of Thukenia before. It was a country far from here, from Rechem—almost on the other side of the world.

 

Noah was sent there?

 

Why?

 

As Lisbell stood in shock, the lady sighed.

 

“I’m already aware that the child had been visiting here for some time. I also know it was because Ulrich granted your request.”

 



 

“Miss Osborne, did you really not foresee this?”

 

…What?

 

Lisbell’s lips parted like a fool’s.

 

Why, why is she asking me that?

 

Why is she asking me when I can’t even begin to understand why Noah was sent to Thukenia?

 

It felt as if an invisible hammer had struck her brain.

 

It’s my fault.

 

Because of me… Noah was sent there.

 

And the one who did it was undoubtedly…

 

“This is why it’s dangerous to give your affections indiscriminately. Do you think Gwen’s death and that child’s situation never once crossed my mind?”

 



 

“But such reckless interference can end up being a poison to the child, which is why I didn’t intervene. Sometimes, there are reasons behind neglect. As you can see, your inability to endure and your involvement have ultimately pushed the child into an even lonelier corner.”

 

With those words, the lady left the bedroom.

 

Left alone, Lisbell couldn’t move a finger.

 

Again.

 

Once again, a heavy weight pulled at her chest.

 

She had felt this before.

 

When it was discovered that Ulrich had hidden his mother’s corpse.

 

“I warned you.”

 

“I told you to be careful in choosing your friends….”

 

It was when Julian Scott collapsed, spraying blood, and the situation made it seem like it was all her fault.

 

This time, too. Although it was Ulrich who likely ordered Noah to be sent to that foreign land, following the chain of causality, it felt as though the root cause was her.

 

As if, as the lady said, Noah had been placed in a more impoverished environment because of her.

 

As if she were the main culprit tormenting that child….

 

“…Ha.”

 

Lisbell covered her mouth with her hand.

 

Her small, thin shoulders hunched. Her body, losing its balance, collapsed forward.

 

She gasped, her forehead pressed against the sheets. With trembling hands, she frantically touched her cheeks, chin, shackled neck, and arms. All were places Noah had touched when he brought books to the bedroom in the past.

 

She still remembered the warmth within them.

 

She clearly remembered the tiny hands that sought her out and relied on her….

 

“Ah….”

 

Her eyes soon became wet, and tears began to fall, drop by drop.

 

Lisbell couldn’t take her eyes off the sight of the sheets growing damp. What tormented her was the thought that Noah might be suffering even more than she was now.

 

And what truly shattered her mind was the realization that, despite this suffocating situation, she had no power to change it.

 

All she could do was sob uncontrollably, overwhelmed by the newly discovered truth. Even that brought more sorrow, and Lisbell wept, her body shaking until she finally collapsed.

 

“This is why it’s dangerous to give your affections indiscriminately.”

 

Is it really my fault?

 

Was Julian Scott’s death my fault, and the fact that young Noah was sent to an unfamiliar country overnight as well?

 

Is everything… my fault?

 

Guilt without direction stabbed at her lungs.

 

I can’t breathe.

 

I can’t breathe at all.

 

Why?

 

Why does everyone I get involved with end up like this?

 

Why do I keep bringing misfortune upon them as if I’m some living seed of calamity?

 

The outdoor sunlight, half-bent, played around her fallen ankles. But it didn’t reach Lisbell. She couldn’t feel it, as her lower body was trapped, being sucked into a swamp of ominous flames.

 

It felt as if her foot was stuck in the mouth of a monster.

 



 

The events unfolded just as the lady had said.

 

Ulrich mentioned an urgent matter that required immediate attention and spoke of a business trip, and Lisbell offered no reaction. Having shown signs of lethargy during her confinement, it wasn’t surprising that no one noticed the further blow to her spirit.

 

As soon as Ulrich left the mansion, several people entered the bedroom. The lady, the butler, and a man she had never seen before followed.

 

The unfamiliar man inspected Lisbell thoroughly under the lady’s orders. Only after a while did Lisbell realize he was a doctor. After completing various examinations, the doctor shook his head at the lady.

 

The lady sighed once more, but this time, it was different. This time, it was a sigh of clear relief.

 

“Pavil.”

 

She called the butler and made a small gesture. She handed him something.

 

It was a small, black key that gleamed.

 

Lisbell immediately recognized what it was. Since waking up after being sedated, a shackle had been placed around her neck, with a small groove in the center. This key was meant to release the shackle.

 

The butler approached the bed.

 

Click.

 

As the key fit into the groove and turned, the weight around her neck vanished. The shackle fell onto the bed, heavy enough to create a deep indentation without making a sound as it landed.

 

Lisbell couldn’t believe the freedom she had regained around her neck and touched it with her fingers, as if to confirm. But there was no time to dwell on it, as she quickly showered and dressed under the lady’s supervision.

 

Even as she walked outside, the reality of what was happening didn’t seem real. She only fully grasped it when the cold outdoor wind, with its chilly scent, hit her face.

 

She had finally escaped the nightmarish bedroom.

 

“Take us to Portley Church.”

 

“Yes, Madam.”

 

The sedan carrying the two sped toward the outskirts. A brief explanation was provided as to why they were headed there. The place where her mother, who had been taken from the royal hospital, would be properly buried was none other than there.



The Portley Church in the outskirts was a very small church. Yet, its simplicity was appealing. It had a serene and unique charm, suitable for shouldering the twilight of someone’s life. This was a place where anyone could close their eyes in peace.

 

Lisbell followed the lady’s secretary to the back of the church. A few mounds of earth, gently risen, were placed in the area perpetually shaded by the building’s shadow. The secretary pointed to one of them. Realizing that this was where her mother was buried, Lisbell approached.

 

She slowly bent her knees and sat down. With her white, slender fingers, she covered the not-so-rough soil. “Mother,” she whispered, her voice weak, as if it might shatter at any moment.

 

After a while, a shadow stretched long beside Lisbell. It was Lady Altahart, who had followed with her unhurried steps. The waiting secretary handed something to her, and after a brief inspection, she passed it to Lisbell.

 

“This is….”

 

“It’s the dress that Mrs. Osborne was wearing.”

 

Lisbell dusted off her hands and received it.

 

It was a strange feeling. Her last memory of her mother was of a lifeless figure, emaciated and devoid of warmth. Yet, this dress held a faint warmth, like a small flicker of a matchstick flame that had somehow been preserved.

 

Lisbell embraced the dress with a sorrowful heart.

 

“Are you sure… that my mother is really buried here?”

 

Her mother, who had been weighed down by so many doubts, had finally found peace. In this light, such skepticism was understandable. And it seemed the lady immediately understood the nature of her doubts.

 

“It’s only been three months since I buried my first son.”

 



 

“It means I understand the value of family.”

 

Lisbell let out a dry laugh. The son you speak of had no qualms about disturbing another’s family, as if he had been meticulously sculpted from a large glacier.

 

But in the end, hasn’t it all come to this?

 

There was no point in harboring further doubts here; it would only leave her feeling more exhausted. Now, she had to force herself to swallow her belief and leave. Though the situation seemed to be escalating somewhat urgently, Lisbell knew that this was a golden opportunity that would not come twice.

 

She gently caressed the grave as if to stroke her mother one last time. May you find peace here. As she silently conveyed her inner condolences, something fell on the back of her hand.

 

A white snowflake fell from the cloudy sky.

 

Its silent descent was the purest form in the world. Lisbell stared at the crystalline essence of winter, then slowly cupped it in her hand. The cold, dense energy was tightly grasped, only to soon crumble away.

 

“If you’ve finished your farewells, let’s depart.”

 

Lady Altahart had already turned around, avoiding the snow under the umbrella held by the secretary.

 

Perhaps because it fell equally on everyone, the feeling of snow piling up on her palm wasn’t unpleasant.

 

She slowly rose, observing the energy that would blanket the world in white. Then she turned her back.

 

The cold season that one must inevitably pass through before spring arrives.

 

On the day of that year’s first snowfall, Lisbell fled from the man.

 



 

A smoothly driving sedan stopped in front of the fountain in the garden.

 

After tidying his appearance, Victor, who had gotten out of the passenger seat, approached the rear seat and opened the door. A beautiful man, showing no signs of fatigue despite the grueling march, stepped out from inside.

 

He let out a slow sigh only after fully entering the mansion.

 

Only when it was certain there were no watching eyes did he slightly loosen the tightly tied necktie. Victor followed with an even more tired expression.

 

Due to a small problem that arose in the oil business, which had passed into Ulrich’s hands after Gwen’s death, Ulrich had to leave the capital temporarily.

 

The country where they had set up their oil fields was Berzel, a distant land where they had to change cars and trains several times from Rechem. Given that they visited such a remote place in just three days, the travel fatigue was bound to weigh heavily on them.

 

In truth, this trip had a sense of incongruity.

 

The problem that arose in Berzel wasn’t significant enough to warrant calling the main family, and by the time Ulrich and Victor arrived, the issue was almost entirely resolved.

 

It was a relief that the business had suffered no serious disruptions. Therefore, Victor expected they would take their time returning after staying one day in Berzel. Since there was no urgent reason to return to the capital immediately, there was no need to hastily prepare to leave.

 

However, after assessing the situation, Ulrich seemed lost in thought before suddenly asking Victor to find the fastest train back to Rechem.

 

While inwardly astonished, Victor easily guessed why Ulrich was in such a hurry. Even now, as he watched his superior head straight to the bedroom without bothering to check any other rooms, it was clear.

 

Like breaking a bird’s wings to prevent its free flight, Ulrich was rushing back to check on the woman confined in the bedroom, who was trapped as if shackled.

 

“Thank you for your hard work. Shall I rearrange tomorrow’s schedule to be handled as much as possible within the mansion?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Understood.”

 

Ulrich soon disappeared into the bedroom. Victor stood still, staring at the tightly closed door. Before long, he let out a groan and rubbed his forehead.

 

‘Could it be that the lady stepped in?’

 

Seeing Ulrich in such a rush, Victor briefly entertained that thought. After all, his boss’s recent actions were nothing short of criminal, to say the least.

 

He had always turned a blind eye, but as the one responsible, it was impossible not to think about it. Depriving a person of their dignity solely with wealth and power, trapping them in a bedroom like a bird without wings, was unthinkable.

 

But even the lady of the house had not spoken against her son’s bizarre behavior, so what could he, a mere secretary, possibly do?

 

Thus, he could only watch in silence, but this time, perhaps the lady had finally acted. If the suspicious Berzel trip had been a pretext for her, then even the pieces that had been difficult to understand would fit perfectly.

 

If this were true, Victor felt mixed emotions.

 

While it was right that Lisbell Osborne was freed from the bedroom as a matter of human decency, as a secretary, it was clear that his situation would be complicated for some time.

 

The fierce sibling rivalry between Ulrich and Gwen came to mind. The thought of that rivalry now transforming into a battle between mother and son made him feel as if he had aged ten years.

 

Victor rubbed his chest as if to soothe the discomfort, gave a pitying glance at the bedroom, and finally turned away.

 

Meanwhile, after entering the bedroom, Ulrich finally untied his necktie after ensuring he was out of sight.

 

He placed the long, flowing tie on the table, unbuttoned the top button of his shirt, and approached the bed.

 

The figure beneath the blanket, with its head covered, was so small that it looked like a tiny mound. Gray hair, longer than the tie, spread out over the sheets, soaked in the pale moonlight.

 

The more he took in the sight, the more his inexplicable unease from the journey gradually subsided.

 

After all, how could a woman, trapped like this, even dream of escaping? Ulrich was bemused by his own uneasiness during the trip abroad.

 

He sat on the edge of the bed and grasped the fine strands of hair to kiss them. Then he paused. Today, the hair didn’t have its usual waviness, and a foreign scent of perfume wafted up, faintly brushing against his nose.

 

In an instant, the knot that had been relaxing in his heart twisted unpleasantly.

 

His gentle, leisurely touch changed.

 

He grabbed the gray hair in front of him roughly.

 

“Kyaaah!”

 

The voice that rang out was high and delicate, but it was not the sweet voice he knew.

 

For the first time in his life, Ulrich experienced the sensation of goosebumps all over his body.


He failed to control his strength due to the unfamiliarity and swung his hand with force. The woman’s body was thrown unceremoniously beneath the bed.

 

Ulrich saw the woman’s contorted face and wiped away the last remnants of a smile. Her eyes, now filled with fear, looked at him with a vivid purple hue.

 

Gray hair and purple eyes.

 

Even the clothes draped over her body were an eyesore.

 

It was a lace slip that Lisbell used to wear when she wasn’t having sex in this bedroom.

 

So, this woman was nothing more than an imitation of Lisbell.

 

“Haha…”

 

He let out a hollow laugh and got out of bed, covering his eyes with his palm. His pupils rolled silently under his tightly shut eyelids. It was as if something was tearing through his mind.

 

After a moment, he stormed out of the bedroom with a loud bang.

 

“Young Master?”

 

Victor, who was walking down the corridor, turned around at the loud noise. Seeing the Young Master who had just entered the bedroom come out again, he quickly approached.

 

“Is it you?”

 

“Yes? …Ugh!”

 

As he got closer, Victor was grabbed by the collar and dragged roughly. Victor was pushed against the wall, unable to answer due to the sudden threat. A stern gaze bore down on his face.

 

Victor, who barely regained his senses, grabbed Ulrich’s arm.

 

“Why are you doing this! Please calm down and speak with words. Violence is not the right way, Young Master!”

 

“Do you really not know? Or are you just pretending not to?”

 

“What…?”

 

Victor looked puzzled. Ulrich’s fierce eyes darted around before he finally let go of Victor’s collar.

 

“Fine. If it’s not you, then there’s only one answer.”

 

“Yes?”

 

Without intending to explain, Ulrich immediately turned away. His steps were purposeful. Victor, who was tidying up his disheveled appearance after being grabbed by the collar, instantly realized where Ulrich was heading.

 

The sound of footsteps echoed through the moonlit corridor, as graceful yet strangely ominous as a swan cutting through water. With this dual intensity, Ulrich arrived at his mother’s bedroom and flung open the double doors without knocking.

 

There was a sense of déjà vu. He had been here before under similar circumstances when it was no ordinary matter.

 

It wasn’t hard to recall when it was.

 

Now that he thought about it, it was also related to Lisbell. He had come here to personally punish Julian Scott, who had filled her head with nonsense. Remembering this, a bitter smile crept across Ulrich’s lips.

 

“Oh my, Ulrich.”

 

His mother, sitting in front of the vanity, was just getting ready for bed. She gently caressed her blonde hair, which the servant had tidied up, and greeted her son with a soft gaze through the mirror.

 

“It seems you’ve just returned from your trip.”

 

“Are you surprised I arrived sooner than you expected?”

 

“Not at all. I was just praying to God, thankful that my only son has returned safely without any harm.”

 

Ulrich sat down in a wing chair near the vanity.

 

He crossed his legs slowly and rested his clasped hands on his knee, returning a bright smile to his mother, who was watching him.

 

“Aren’t you thanking me for successfully taking Lisbell away from me?”

 

“What nonsense are you talking about?”

 

“I’m sorry for only being honest now, but Mother, you’re not good at acting.”

 



 

“Stop putting on this boring act in front of your tired son and just answer me. Where did you take Lisbell?”

 

“If you’re referring to Miss Osborne, isn’t she in your bedroom?”

 

Ulrich’s gaze sharpened. His mother, undeterred by his piercing stare, calmly continued.

 

“Gray hair and purple eyes. A scrawny, flat body, and not very tall.”

 



 

“That’s the Miss Osborne I know.”

 

The Lisbell described by his mother was, judging by her words, close to an ordinary person with no distinct features.

 

The stark implication beneath her calm remarks was clear. She was subtly reminding him that Lisbell Osborne was so insignificant that even finding a substitute was easy, leaving no reason for him to be so obsessed.

 

One corner of his mother’s lips curled up.

 

“Calling it love seems insufficient in many ways, and calling her a mistress would be overly generous. My beloved son, is this the romance you so often spoke of to me?”

 

Watching his mother’s derisive smile, Ulrich responded with a sweet smile of his own. In stark contrast to his smile, his eyes were still, radiating a cruel heat that threatened to crush everything if provoked.

 

“Mother.”

 

Ulrich closed his eyes deeply, then opened them.

 

“Is there a reason you’re doing this to me?”

 

“A parent has a duty to guide their child down the right path.”

 



 

“I’m just fulfilling my duty, Ulrich.”

 

Haha, Ulrich laughed deeply from his throat.

 

He uncrossed his long legs. Leaning his body forward, he assumed a stance similar to a predator about to pounce on its prey. A deadly tension emanated from his slow movements.

 

“Mother, I don’t ask three times.”

 



 

“Where did you take Lisbell?”

 

His face, now devoid of any smile, was blindingly cold.

 

Even his mother, who rarely lost her composure, couldn’t help but freeze for a moment, taken aback by the intensity of his expression.

 

She let out a faint sigh. Had her son ever been this hostile toward her? Ironically, the more she encountered this unexpected side of him, the more she felt the urgency to hide that woman.

 

Lisbell’s growing presence, starting to take root in Ulrich as a new weakness, was enough of a threat to alarm his mother.

 

“I don’t know.”

 



 

“Honestly, I have no idea.”

 

Acting was always about pretending, even when you knew it was false. Both Ulrich and his mother knew her words were lies.

 

Still staring at his mother, Ulrich slowly straightened his upper body.

 

“I see.”

 

His low murmur lacked any weight.

 

His mother, looking away from him, spoke as she gazed into the mirror.

 

“While you were away on your trip, white snow fell in Lorraine. It was the first snow of the winter.”

 



 

“Spring will be very warm and refreshing. It will be the perfect season for your wedding to the Lady of Schwaben.”

 

Ah.

 

Ulrich now fully understood his mother’s intentions.

 

All of this was a ploy to fully quench the thirst for an engagement that had been grudgingly deferred in the past.

 

His suspicion was confirmed when his mother added lightly.

 

“I clearly told you, didn’t I? As long as the marriage is successful, I won’t interfere with who you choose to be with afterward.”

 

“So, if I go through with the ceremony, you’ll return Lisbell to me, is that it?”

 

“I couldn’t just sit by and watch you foolishly choose the harder path when there’s an easier one available.”

 



 

“Please don’t turn away from my intentions, which are only for your sake.”

 

Without another word, Ulrich stood up from the wing chair.

 

“Sweet dreams.”

 

It was a night where the usual farewell sounded like a strange curse.

 

After his one-sided farewell, Ulrich left his mother’s bedroom.

 

Victor, who had been waiting outside the door, quickly assessed his master’s expression. Without looking at him, Ulrich walked silently forward. Growing anxious, Victor hesitated for a moment before speaking up.

 

“What happened? Please give me a brief explanation, Young Master.”

 

“She’s become quite the thief while I was away.”

 

“Excuse me?”

 

“Mother has stolen Lisbell.”

 

Though it was anticipated, the reality still felt so far-fetched that Victor’s mouth dropped open in disbelief.

 

For the first time since leaving the bedroom, Ulrich turned his gaze toward his secretary. His firm stare was steady yet heavy, as if barely suppressing an imminent outburst of fury. This restraint only made his presence more menacing, as if the very air around him could slice skin.

 

Confronted with this almost superhuman self-control, Victor swallowed dryly.

 

“Find her.”

 

Though his tone lacked urgency, Victor heard it quite differently.

 

“Quickly.”

 

It was as if a massive, unimaginable tidal wave was looming on the horizon.


A week had passed.

 

Quick footsteps echoed through the quiet hallway of the mansion in the afternoon. Victor, who had rushed over with his eyebrows practically flying, only caught his breath when he reached his superior’s study. After swiftly adjusting his disheveled collar and sleeves, he knocked on the door.

 

“Young Master, are you there?”

 

Ulrich was seated not at his work desk, but on a sofa meant for relaxation. In front of him was a chessboard with black and white squares evenly spaced, forming a square pattern.

 

With one leg crossed, he leaned back deeply into the sofa, clenching and unclenching his rounded hand.

 

The chess pieces stood tall on the board. There was no one sitting opposite Ulrich. He was playing chess alone. It was a scene completely unchanged from what Victor had witnessed in the morning. Since the morning, Ulrich had been sitting there, playing chess alone.

 

Whenever Ulrich had something on his mind, he would pull out the chessboard like this.

 

Playing chess with others was merely a pastime, but when he played with such intense focus that even his breathing was inaudible, that was closer to the true purpose for which he used chess.

 

One might think that this was a frequent sight, but it wasn’t.

 

Seeing Ulrich play chess alone was a rare event. In this household, where everything revolved around money and desire, it was rare for anyone to face a problem complicated enough to warrant deep contemplation. For them, life was too obvious and straightforward.

 

This was one of Victor’s few consolations.

 

Because whenever Ulrich fell into such deep contemplation, it was usually followed by a major uproar. As he recalled, Ulrich had similarly played three consecutive games of chess by himself the day before he exposed his brother’s sordid scandal.

 

In other words, Ulrich was calmly preparing some sort of outrageous uproar that would turn the household upside down and dump a heap of work onto Victor, his secretary.

 

‘Calmly… if you could call it that…’

 

Is that really okay?

 

Victor had repeated that thought several times throughout the week.

 

Over the past week, Ulrich had been almost the same as usual. He handled his tasks as usual, drank coffee as usual, and smoked cigarettes as usual.

 

However, upon closer inspection, there was something subtly off from the usual.

 

Once while working, once while drinking coffee, and once while smoking. Yes, at those moments, he suddenly frowned. Since he was usually such a polished and well-mannered person, even such a trivial change stood out unusually.

 

Of course, it wasn’t the first time Victor had seen him frown, but there was a particular reason this time that made it especially worrisome. It wasn’t a common sight in everyday moments unless there was a specific circumstance, like a business plan going awry.

 

Being a noble, Ulrich had learned from a young age how to hide his emotions through his expressions. The reason Victor often found it hard to read his thoughts was because his face usually gave nothing away.

 

But as much as he had found it difficult to read Ulrich, Victor could clearly discern what emotions he was experiencing in those moments.

 

It was discomfort.

 

Victor, who swallowed dryly for no reason, approached the sofa.

 

“Find her.”

 

After issuing that order, Ulrich gave him a few additional instructions. Victor had rushed to the study to report on those matters.

 

“As you instructed, I have assigned professional trackers to follow the personal errand runners employed by the madam. They are currently tracking them based on the locations to which they have been dispatched, and I will report the results as soon as they arrive.”

 

Without a word, Ulrich placed the piece he was idly rolling between his fingers onto a black square.

 

“And one more thing, I must report a suspicious situation concerning the Schwaeben administrator. It’s information obtained from someone at the salon who was placed there on your previous orders, sir.”

 

Victor handed over the letter that he had carefully kept unwrinkled during his walk here. It was intelligence received from one of the informants Ulrich had stationed throughout Lorain to act as his eyes and ears.

 

Ulrich accepted it. His unwavering attention, which had been fixed on the chessboard, shifted to the small letter. He quickly skimmed through the contents, raised an eyebrow, and shortly after, laughed, rolling his tongue as if he had come across something amusing.

 

“Hmm, so that’s why.”

 

“This is a report based on circumstantial evidence, not something definitive yet.”

 

“No, it seems correct.”

 

Ulrich placed the letter beside the chessboard. Then he picked up the large king piece from the board. He pressed it down onto the letter.

 

“Indeed, the Daphne Schwaeben I know wasn’t the type to be desperate for marriage. She was closer to someone who loved freedom as much as I do. So I wondered why she was in such a rush. There’s always a reason for someone to act out of character.”

 

“Then… what do you think is the best course of action? Should we inform the madam about this?”

 

“No.”

 

Ulrich looked down at the chessboard, now missing the king, and then moved the remaining pieces again.

 

Victor watched his young master with complicated feelings, unable to discern what he was thinking. Unfazed by his gaze, Ulrich continued to focus on the chessboard and spoke casually.

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes, sir.”

 

“How much personal capital do I have available right now?”

 

Victor immediately pulled out a notebook.

 

After adjusting various figures with his fountain pen, he wrote down a colossal number on a blank sheet and handed it over. Even as he continued to write something, Victor added in a low voice.

 

“If you reclaim the bonds you currently hold, along with the interest accrued, and liquidate your company shares, the amount could potentially triple from this figure. You also have some jewelry and gemstones remaining. However, the value of these fluctuates constantly, so an appraiser would be needed to determine their exact worth.”

 

“Does this include inheritance?”

 

“No, the figure is exclusive of inheritance.”

 

“I’m wealthier than I thought.”

 

Ulrich muttered with a tone as if he might whistle at any moment.

 

“With this much saved up, I should learn to spend it wisely.”

 

“…Do you have any… plans in mind?”

 

“There are always plans.”

 



 

“I’m just debating whether to go safe or bold.”

 

What could be safe, and what could be bold?

 

Whatever it was, it clearly had to do with Lisbell Osborne. That woman, whose presence had escalated the situation to this point, had become nothing but a headache for Victor.

 

Victor opened his mouth, enduring the ache in his head.

 

“But, young master, do you think Miss Osborne really… went with the madam willingly?”

 

“And if not?”

 

“While assigning someone to follow the madam’s errand runner, a thought occurred to me… Could it be possible that she took this opportunity to leave and head to Theodore Mortier?”

 

Ulrich’s hand, which had been rolling a piece, halted as if it had encountered an unexpected obstacle. It had been a long time since he’d heard that name. Now that he thought about it, there was such a person.

 

Soon after, his hand began moving naturally again.

 

Ulrich, who softly stroked the engraved side of the piece, placed it onto an empty square. His gaze, sweeping across the balanced chessboard, gleamed meaningfully.

 

“That could be possible.”

 



 

“But we needn’t worry too much about that.”

 

Victor noticed the faint smile forming silently at the corner of his master’s lips.

 

“From what I know, Theodore Mortier has a rather outstanding character. He’s simple and diligent, no doubt about it.”

 

Simple? Diligent?

 

Why was Ulrich suddenly praising Theodore Mortier’s character?

 

Ah, whatever it was, Victor quickly got a sense of it. Ulrich must have been planning something behind the scenes again. Since nothing specific came to mind, it was likely that Ulrich had devised something without Victor’s knowledge or that Victor had merely followed superficial instructions.

 

Victor’s skin prickled with goosebumps at Ulrich’s skillful maneuvering in such matters.

 

At the same time, he felt an inexplicable sense of foreboding.

 

He had no choice but to follow orders and search for Lisbell Osborne, but… was this really okay? He had a faint feeling that he could already foresee the treatment she would receive upon her return, which made him slightly nauseous.

 

But as always, he was just a servant. Any doubts or emotions he harbored were nothing but a luxury.

 

“I’ll need to meet with the Schwaben administrator soon.”

 

“Yes, I’ll arrange an appointment.”

 

“As for the location….”

 

Ulrich’s deep eyes glanced out the window.

 

While he was away on a business trip, the mansion in Lorain had returned to its original state after being blanketed in snow. The winter scenery, which had quickly disappeared without a trace, seemed fragile, as if it would soon be pushed away by the onset of early spring.

 

Spring.

 

Yes, spring.

 

“The coming spring will be exceptionally warm and fresh. It’ll be the perfect season for your marriage to Lady Schwaben.”

 

Who decided it would be that way?

 

The sparkling winter sunlight cast a chilly glow on Ulrich’s smiling face.

 

Yes, indeed.

 

Who decided that?

 

Ulrich stood up.

 

Before him lay the chessboard where he had played over five games by himself. As he observed the pieces placed with perfect precision in their designated spots, Ulrich slowly ran his hand through his hair.

 

His deliberation had ended.

 

“The Schwaben Art Museum will be a good location.”


The Schwaben Art Museum was the largest museum located in the capital, Lorange. In terms of size, it was comparable to the pride of Rechem, the Alstad Department Store, situated on the boulevard of the square.

 

The three-story building housed multiple large and small exhibition halls, a special exhibition room primarily for VIP guests, educational rooms for nurturing future artists, and a glass greenhouse for visitors to take a break.

 

Recently, with no major exhibitions scheduled, the Schwaben Art Museum was quiet. It was the same on the day Ulrich arrived by car.

 

He followed the person from the Schwaben family who had come to greet him into the museum. The sound of his shoes echoed softly and broadly over the marble floor in the lobby.

 

The place he was guided to was the special exhibition room.

 

Daphne had already arrived. She was examining the works on the walls, her posture embodying the textbook example of nobility.

 

The smooth line extending from her neck to her waist was so elegant it could only be described as artistic. Her gloved hands gathered in front of her, her careful movements that made no sound on the floor—all of it clearly showed that her education had been thorough in every detail.

 

Ulrich, with equally fluid movements, stood beside Daphne.

 

The atmosphere in the special exhibition room was quite different from the general exhibition room that branched off to the left from the lobby. This place had luxurious sofas, a drink table with decanters and teapots ready to be served at any time, and even a personal calling device to summon staff.

 

This was, in essence, the VIP room where the Schwaben family privately hosted guests.

 

The paintings displayed on the red walls, which offered a subtle and restful experience, were rare pieces obtained through high-priced auctions from foreign countries or artworks personally gifted by the royal family of Lekem. Each piece was so valuable that its worth was immeasurable.

 

“I’m so glad to be able to invite you here, Ulrich.”

 

Daphne turned slightly toward him. Ulrich, who stood with his hands behind his back, examined the artwork leisurely, as if he were alone in the room.

 

Daphne asked, somewhat surprised, “You can’t seem to take your eyes off the exhibition walls. Are you particularly interested in art?”

 

“Not really.”

 

Ulrich paused for a moment, then smiled as if recalling something, and for the first time, turned his head towards Daphne.

 

“Correction, I actually dislike it.”

 



 

“Artists often say that their souls are embedded in their works. Maybe that’s why, whenever I enter a space filled with artworks like this, I feel an unpleasant sensation as if I’m being watched from all sides.”

 



 

“It’s like feeling caught even before committing a crime. Don’t you think?”

 

“Haha, that’s an amusing thought.”

 

Daphne chuckled softly, covering her mouth with her gloved hand. Ulrich quietly observed her smiling lips. Noticing his gaze, she straightened her expression and lowered her hand.

 

The topaz ornament on Daphne’s silk gloves shimmered delicately.

 

Topaz.

 

At one point, during the process of seizing control of the family business, Ulrich had shown interest in one of its branches, the gemstone industry. Remembering the meaning of topaz from that time, Ulrich smiled quietly.

 

Daphne suggested they sit on the sofa behind them, but Ulrich declined. As a result, the two stood side by side in front of the exhibition wall, as if they had come solely to view the artworks. Two awkwardly distanced shadows were cast on the floor.

 

“Did you hear about it from my mother?”

 

“Hear about what?”

 

Daphne’s deep blinking seemed incredibly insincere to him. His hands, clasped behind his back, curled inward and then released as he turned sideways. A coldness, different from the warm indoor air, emanated from his half-lit profile.

 

“Well, why don’t you take a guess, Director?”

 

“Hmm.”

 

Daphne pretended to be deep in thought. Ulrich thought she had more talent for acting than his mother. Or maybe she wasn’t interested enough to look deeply into him.

 

“Are you referring to the spring wedding we are supposed to have?”

 

Yes, she was sometimes a woman with such boldness and audacity.

 

Ulrich let out a rare, throaty laugh. He, who laughed as brightly as a lily petal fluttering in the wind, quietly scanned the paintings on the wall.

 

“I have a question for you, Director.”

 

“Yes.”

 

“What happens if one of the paintings here is stolen?”

 

“The thief would be caught and punished as a major criminal.”

 

“And the method of punishment?”

 

“After a trial to determine the sentence, they would either serve time in prison or pay a fine equivalent to the stolen goods.”

 

“I see.”

 



 

“Then, do you also know what happens if a person is stolen?”

 

Daphne’s eyes hardened. At that moment, Ulrich realized that his mother and Daphne shared more in common than he had expected.

 

It seems my mother is more serious about this marriage than I thought.

 

Ulrich suppressed a deep sigh that welled up from his core and lifted his well-defined chin.

 

“My mother stole my person to ensure our marriage.”

 



 

“In such a case, how should she be punished? I’d like to hear your opinion, Director.”

 

Daphne breathed quietly. She seemed to realize why this topic had come up.

 

Gathering her hands in front of her, she spoke clearly.

 

“I respect Mrs. Altahart. She is a woman who can always see beyond what is immediately in front of her.”

 



 

“I’m sure she had a reason for doing so.”

 

“So, no punishment is necessary?”

 

“Yes.”

 

How predictable.

 

Ulrich brushed his hand across his lips, frowning slightly as if he had tasted something bitter. A faint rhythm was embedded in the soft hum of his thoughts as he began to calculate how to pressure others—a subtle characteristic that emerged when he started scheming.

 

“Even though I, the victim in all of this, am so displeased?”

 



 

“Now I understand why I feel so weary whenever I see you. You resemble my mother.”

 

He let out a bitter chuckle.

 

“Well, regardless, I think differently. If someone causes harm, they should face the consequences. I pondered what punishment would ensure my mother never does something like this again, and surprisingly, the answer came quickly.”

 



 

“Oh.”

 

Ulrich tilted his head slightly.

 

“I must absolutely refuse this marriage.”

 

Meeting Daphne’s gaze, he articulated each word with deliberate emphasis, as if to declare that this was the most appropriate punishment.

 

“By any means necessary, I must break off this engagement.”

 

Daphne, who had been smiling as if she were a perfect still life, slightly trembled at the corners of her mouth. Sensing her psychological retreat, Ulrich’s eyes narrowed.

 

“I wanted to meet today to present an offer to the Director of Schwaben.”

 

“An offer?”

 

“I am interested in purchasing the mine owned by the Schwaben family.”

 

“…Excuse me?”

 

“I would like you to act as the intermediary.”

 

Even Daphne, who always maintained an air of tranquility like a rose, could not manage her expression this time. It was evident that her mind was overwhelmed by the completely unexpected proposal.

 

Standing next to her, Ulrich hummed leisurely as he turned his gaze back to the exhibition wall. Then, as if remembering something forgotten, he took out a small piece of paper from his jacket pocket and handed it to her.

 

“This is the amount I am willing to pay.”

 

Though she had no intention of selling the mine, Daphne opened the paper purely out of curiosity.

 

The amount written on the white background was absurd. To an uninformed person, it would seem like a random string of numbers rather than a price—so utterly preposterous it was.

 

Does this man really have this much money?

 

At a glance, it was clear that this wasn’t the collective wealth of the Altahart family.

 

Today’s meeting was secretive, and Ulrich’s offer was so private that even Daphne, the party involved, was only learning about it now.

 

In this context, the sum he offered to break the engagement was clearly part of Ulrich’s personal fortune, money he could move without consulting anyone else to achieve his own goals.

 

She had once vaguely speculated about the wealth of the Altahart family, but perhaps all of her assumptions had been mere petty imaginings. It might be on a level so astronomical that even a criminal’s wildest dreams wouldn’t approach it.

 

The Schwaben family was also a high-ranking noble family of Rechem, both in honor and wealth. However, in front of Altahart, they were nothing more than a feeble mouse, unable to show off.


Daphne lost her composure for a moment before folding the paper she had unfolded.

 

“I’m sorry, Ulrich, but I can’t accept this deal.”

 



 

“My father has no plans to sell the mine for the next few years.”

 

Of course, that made sense.

 

The mine in the northeastern part of the Pyrrileo Empire, which they owned, was a land of milk and honey, with its value only set to rise in the future. The land, still undeveloped, held countless hidden gems. This was what had caught Lady Altahart’s eye.

 

The Altahart family currently held the only patent for gemstone crafting techniques in Rechem. They had expanded their related industries through this and had steadily grown to the level they were at now.

 

The problem was the mine, which was to be their source of wealth. In Rechem, where most of the land was fertile, there were no separate mines.

 

Thus, they had been obtaining the gems needed for their business by paying exorbitant brokerage fees and procurement costs to companies from other countries that owned mines.

 

Of course, as more gems were discovered over time and their value skyrocketed, the Altahart family’s gemstone business, which involved processing and selling these gems, became increasingly profitable. Since the profit margin was much higher than the losses, it was a business they had diligently nurtured.

 

But now, a family in Rechem had acquired a mine for the first time.

 

During the process of dealing with rare items that had been handled by the Schwaben family, a prominent family in Pyrrileo was involved, and instead of a sale amount, they received a portion of the mine they owned.

 

After that, through a behind-the-scenes deal, the engagement between Gwen, the eldest son of the Altahart family, and Daphne was arranged.

 

Although the engagement was now with Ulrich, if the marriage were to proceed, Daphne’s dowry would be that mine, and the mountain of jewels would literally become the property of the Altahart family. There would be no need to struggle to procure raw materials from other countries at exorbitant costs.

 

This was the underlying reason for the engagement between the two.

 

Ulrich nodded as if he understood.

 

“So, I’m asking that Director Schwaben be the mediator for this deal.”

 



 

“I hope you can persuade the Marquis.”

 

Daphne smiled subtly. The formal smile she usually wore now had a touch of color.

 

She was genuinely astonished.

 

“Why should I do that?”

 



 

“Ulrich, I’m on the side that wants this marriage to happen. It’s almost regrettable that you don’t see it, I’m truly serious.”

 

Oh, she was even sarcastic.

 

Ulrich realized inwardly that she was more emotional than he had thought. At the same time, it was evidence of how desperate she was for this marriage. The intelligence report delivered by Victor flashed briefly in his mind and then faded.

 

“Even if you don’t intervene, the result will be the same.”

 



 

“The mine will be mine anyway.”

 

When confidence becomes excessive, it turns into delusion. Daphne couldn’t help but question the reason for his great delusion.

 

“I’m sorry, but I don’t understand. Ulrich, I said our family has no intention of selling, so how can you believe it will happen…?”

 

“Don’t think too negatively.”

 



 

“I’m trying to give the Director a way out.”

 

“A way out?”

 

“I’m sure I mentioned it earlier. I’ll do whatever it takes to break off this engagement.”

 



 

“There won’t be a wedding between us, even if spring comes.”

 

He recalled the white curtains of the Marniya villa fluttering in the wind of Moha. Amidst that bright scene, Ulrich had once thought of someone who would face a late summer wedding. He was consumed by the malicious intent of wanting to ruin what would undoubtedly be a dull ceremony, one that even the sweltering heat couldn’t suppress.

 

It was a nostalgic heat.

 

A season he didn’t particularly like because it drained his energy and easily tired him.

 

A season that, along with the dreamed-of wedding, had been completely ruined, with violet eyes looking at him tearfully.

 

As he mulled over it, a heavy tension pulled at his lower abdomen. Whether it was due to tension, excitement, or some other unknown emotion, the fog that had clouded his thoughts briefly lifted.

 

Come to think of it, what kind of eyes did she have when she followed her mother?

 

Eyes of resignation?

 

Eyes like withered flowers?

 

Eyes drained of the noble light he had been so eager to extinguish?

 

He wasn’t sure, but he wanted to see them.

 

Even that.

 

It was then that Ulrich realized he wasn’t obsessed with the emotional changes women go through. The thought that even witnessing that moment of despair wouldn’t satisfy this question seemed futile.

 

What was this, after all?

 

If even her despair couldn’t quench this thirst, what did he want to see from Lisbell Osborne?

 

Did he really have to kill her to find the answer?

 

His logical gears started turning in reverse, spewing out crude thoughts.

 

No matter what, the answer was clear.

 

He had to get her back. Whatever he wanted to do, she had to be by his side.

 

Ulrich recalled the sensation of the fine strand of hair that had wriggled and asserted itself even while trapped in his palm. The more he thought about its shape, which was as good for stroking as it was for gripping, the deeper the smile on his lips grew.

 

“So, I have no choice but to use all the information I have.”

 



 

“There are a few other things besides the mine. Like the rumor that your father, the Marquis of Schwaben, a representative of the royalists, recently had several inappropriate meetings with the head of the Citizens’ Assembly in a private club.”

 

Daphne inhaled sharply, as if she had been stabbed in the chest.

 

Isn’t it too early?

 

Thinking this, Ulrich smiled languidly.

 

“I could leak what’s in the Director’s belly to society right now.”

 

Daphne took a step back. The sound of her heels clicking on the floor of the special exhibition room was pale. Ulrich, like a gentleman dancing the waltz, extended his stride and closed the distance in an instant. The threat was unbelievably elegant.

 

“Now do you understand?”

 



 

“How considerate I am in trying to conclude this matter with the mine.”

 

“What do you mean…?”

 

“Surely, you know better than I that there can be no such thing as eternal secrets in Laurent.”

 

Despite having always addressed her formally as ‘Director,’ he now called her ‘Lady.’ The refined and calm tone, characteristic of nobility, instantly transformed into a very lowly threat as it passed through Daphne’s ears.

 

She blinked her fragile eyes several times.

 

“Ulrich. What are you talking about from earlier…?”

 

“Was it the son of Viscount Franklin?”

 



 

“Compared to either my family or the Schwaben family, he’s far below in rank.”

 

This time, her face turned pale. Her thin arms, wrapped in gloves, clutched her abdomen as if to hide something. Ulrich’s lips curled into a deep smile on one side.

 

“Winston Franklin, wasn’t he the one? I ran into him at the White Club once. By chance, I saw him drunkenly relieving himself, and he certainly lived up to his large frame. Isn’t that all you care about when it comes to men?”

 



 

“Even so, you must be quite bold to think of dragging him into the salon lounge to roll around. You really are daring. Or maybe the thought of prying eyes all around excited you even more.”

 

Daphne staggered. Ulrich kindly extended his arm to support her. Barely avoiding a fall, she looked up with a face filled with confusion. Ulrich smiled gently at the face so close to his.

 

“From your reaction, it seems the Marquis of Schwaben doesn’t know about this.”

 



 

“I’ll have to consider whether to use the Director’s information to blackmail the Marquis or vice versa. It’ll take a few days of busy thinking to figure out which would be more efficient.”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“If you don’t intend to give me the mine, I’ll have to ruin the Schwaben family’s honor to the ground and cancel this marriage.”

 



 

“No matter how much my mother wants the mountain of jewels, she’s not foolish enough to push for a marriage with a disgraced family. As you said, she’s very shrewd and intelligent.”

 

The warning, more brutal because of its calmness, pierced Daphne’s eardrums painfully. Ulrich, as if indicating that the conversation was over, turned toward the entrance of the exhibition room. His back, perfect without a flaw, made her shiver all the more, knowing she couldn’t hope for any mercy.


Based on his past experiences with her, she knew him as well as he knew her. Although he appeared endlessly compassionate and gentle, that was nothing more than the facade of a man aesthetically born with such a surface.

 

Once he decided to do something, he was a man without a drop of blood or tear, willing to go through with it by any means necessary.

 

That was why Daphne had no choice but to cling to him.

 

“I’ll persuade my father.”

 



 

“So that he can transfer the mine to you. So, please… just give me a little time.”

 

Ulrich looked down at the hand that barely held onto him.

 

The topaz attached to her glove lost its shine, perhaps due to the shifting position and the shadow cast above. He found the faded appearance, as if pretense had been stripped away and true innocence revealed, rather appealing.

 

“As you’ve confirmed the amount yourself, you know it’s by no means a small sum.”

 



 

“Even though things have changed, I didn’t want to act miserly over money.”

 

He slowly removed Daphne’s hand from him and bent down.

 

“Consider this the utmost sincerity I can show you, and please contact me as soon as possible.”

 



 

“I’m in a hurry right now.”

 

With those final words, Ulrich exited the special exhibition room.

 

Left alone, Daphne stood there stiffly until, at the moment when cold sweat trickled down her chin, she collapsed.

 



 

“He was so smitten by some commoner woman that he locked her up in his bedroom, put shackles on her… It was quite a commotion for several days. That didn’t seem like the Ulrich I knew at all. But now that that trouble is resolved, there’s nothing to worry about, Daphne. I hope this time you can get along well with my son. I can hardly wait for your spring wedding; it makes my heart tremble with excitement.”

 

This was the conclusion Daphne had also hoped for.

 

Ulrich was far better in looks and character than Gwen, who had originally been his fiancée, and he was the heir to a family that couldn’t even be compared to Franklin, the father of the child born out of a brief indiscretion.

 

She believed that if they held a wedding in the spring as the lady pushed for, all this disgrace could be hidden without being exposed.

 

But.

 

‘…Who is he?’

 

Daphne looked down at her hand.

 

It was trembling slightly.

 

She knew him as well as he knew her. Perhaps she felt closer to him than she ever did to Gwen, who had been his fiancée. After all, they had shared a bed at one point.

 

Back then, Ulrich acted as if there was no reason for him to remain on this earth if it wasn’t for sexual pleasure. He showed momentary enthusiasm only when they were intimate, and after that time passed, he would return to a detached, indifferent face that readily dimmed the meaning of life.

 

Daphne liked that face.

 

His lifeless, hollow, nihilistic aura was something that couldn’t be touched. There was a precarious feeling as if he might jump into any crime without hesitation. Every time they were intimate, she felt as if she were throwing off all the shackles and oppressions that surrounded her, as if in sync with him.

 

Perhaps many women who approached Ulrich at that time were similarly captivated by that mysterious atmosphere.

 

His human-but-not-human presence reminded one of a lone, noble flower blooming at the edge of a dizzying cliff. Even though they knew it would crumble meaninglessly if grasped, it stirred a reckless desire to hold it in their own hands somehow.

 

It was definitely like that.

 

‘That man…’

 

So, who exactly is he?

 

The Ulrich of now seemed like a person who had found a reason to live no matter what.

 

Desire for something was overflowing, to the point where it couldn’t be held even with both hands.

 

Color had filled his once colorless soul.

 



 

The sound of the waves waking the morning was still unfamiliar.

 

The environment that rarely became familiar made Lisbell feel as if she was dreaming, so even after waking up, she remained motionless for a long time.

 

It might not have been because of the sound of the waves. Perhaps it was the fragments of consciousness that gradually surfaced due to that sound.

 

Where is this place?

 

Why am I here now?

 

How did I end up here?

 

As she counted those things one by one, her thoughts dulled, and her body movements slowed.

 



 

She pulled the blanket, which was covering her shoulders, away and sat up. As she brushed her messy hair aside, a vague sense of reality returned.

 

Lisbell got out of bed and approached the window. In the distance, she could see the waves rushing to swallow the soft golden sand.

 

The weather was still very cold, as winter hadn’t yet ended. It had even snowed just yesterday.

 

She had wondered if the sea might freeze, but it didn’t. The sea remained solid, as if it wouldn’t even begin to freeze from just that small amount of snow, firmly crashing against the shore.

 

Before washing up, Lisbell headed toward the wardrobe. Kneeling down, she gently stroked the clothes stored inside.

 

The neatly folded garments were her mother’s clothes. In this harsh winter, where the cold relentlessly pierced her skin, Lisbell often touched those clothes, as if to hold onto her mother’s warmth.

 

Only after that did she get up and head to the bathroom.

 

After washing up, she noticed that a food tray had been placed on the table by the window, and the almost extinguished fire in the fireplace had been rekindled. She could easily guess who had entered the room while she was washing up.

 

It was the secretary who had come with her to the villa on the Orkenian coastline, under the lady’s instructions.

 

She knew that Ulrich had only one secretary, Victor Royce, but it seemed the lady had several secretaries under her command. Otherwise, she wouldn’t have been able to easily assign someone to assist her with such matters.

 

Though she was grateful for being taken care of and not forgotten… frankly, the uncomfortable feeling didn’t entirely go away.

 

Without thinking further, she sat down and ate. At least it was easier to eat than when she was at the villa in Marnia or the capital’s mansion.

 

“Haah….”

 

Perhaps because she had avoided eating while being confined, now even eating just half of the plate made her feel like her stomach would burst. Still, she felt grateful that she could at least taste the food and cleaned up the dishes. Then, she opened the window slightly.

 

A salty breeze rushed in with a whoosh. Lisbell rubbed her cheek in front of it. She couldn’t allow herself to adapt to this comfortable environment that made both body and mind lazy.

 

When she first arrived at this villa, she thought she had finally escaped from Ulrich.

 

She thought that if she hid under the lady’s protection, she could evade his relentless pursuit, and as time passed, Ulrich would eventually realize that she was a trivial existence and give up the chase.

 

Later, he would even forget that a woman named Lisbell Osborne had ever been by his side and would take another mistress as a replacement or enter into an arranged marriage between families, boldly erasing the past.

 

Though it felt like a waste of time to wait for his curiosity to shrink, and eventually fade away, it was a hundred or a thousand times better than wearing a collar around her neck and returning to that life where she was treated like less than a person.

 

At least she couldn’t deny that being under the lady’s protection, hiding like this, was far better in terms of treatment and everything else.

 

At first, she thought so, but…

 

After rubbing her cheek, Lisbell’s arm, which had been drooping down, grabbed the window frame. She leaned her head out of the window and looked around.

 

Here, the villa on the beach that the lady had arranged in secret was very quiet. The surroundings were enclosed by green mountains, and the sea, which lacked a proper port, showed no signs of human presence.

 



 

Yes, this excessively tranquil landscape suddenly planted a suspicion in Lisbell’s mind one day.

 

If she continued to hold out like this, waiting for Ulrich’s interest in her to finally dissipate, what would the lady do then?

 

Would she simply let her go?

 

Would she tell her that since her son no longer seeks her, she can return to her previous life before meeting him and live freely?

 

Would she let her go… just like that?

 

Nature has neither eyes nor ears. They breathe, but even that makes no sound. Being so desolate, they could not prove anything.

 

In other words, if Lisbell were to die here one morning, there would be no evidence left behind.

 

This chilling thought, which had struck her suddenly, was quickly shaken off with the belief that it couldn’t be true. But as time passed, it became harder and harder to dismiss.

 

The more she pondered, the more so.

 

The lady was undoubtedly protecting her, even using private power, only because Ulrich showed such strange obsession towards her. If any immediate threat to her life arose, it might change her son’s feelings, so she was keeping her around quietly.

 

But would it remain the same once Ulrich lost interest?


Faced with the moment she dreaded, she couldn’t trust that the lady would let her go easily, given all she had witnessed so far. Ulrich had always described his mother as thorough, and Julian Scott had mentioned how terrifying she could be.

 

Moreover, Lisbell had come to know too much about the family to simply cut ties. She was involved with the lady’s lover, connected to Gwen’s illegitimate child, and entangled with Ulrich Altahart in countless ways.

 

The lady might view these aspects as potential threats, uncertain of when or how they might backfire if left unattended. Considering this, Lisbell doubted whether the lady would let her leave alive once the situation was resolved.

 

In the end, even this villa couldn’t be considered safe.

 

Though she had some freedom of movement, this place was still a prison of Altahart’s making. Lisbell’s freedom remained mortgaged to that bloodline.

 

She gauged the wind blowing in through the open window. Though it only brushed her cheek for a moment, her skin quickly cooled. It was not a day suitable for taking a walk as an excuse to go outside.

 

‘Then…’

 

Her gaze slid diagonally to the half-eaten tray of food. Lisbell picked it up and quietly opened the bedroom door.

 

She descended the stairs, minimizing the sound of her footsteps.

 

“…Is that so? Then does that mean someone was tailing you? I need to know how much of the location was exposed to report to the lady. If they followed you all the way here, we can deploy people immediately…”

 

There was a telephone mounted on the wall in the villa. The lady’s secretary, whose face and back Lisbell had become familiar with, was standing in front of it.

 

He seemed to be handling some issue, as his tone was sharp while gripping the receiver. When he turned around by chance, he spotted Lisbell standing there, and abruptly stopped speaking.

 

After whispering something inaudible into the receiver, he hung up. Then, he immediately put on a businesslike smile.

 

“Do you need anything?”

 

“I finished eating and wanted to return the tray.”

 

“If you had waited, I would have come to retrieve it.”

 

Initially, she didn’t think much of such behavior. Being under the lady’s protection, she thought it was a kind gesture to prevent her from doing such cumbersome tasks.

 

But at some point, even this kindness began to seem suspicious.

 

“Did the meal suit your taste?”

 

“Yes, it was delicious.”

 

“I’ll take the tray.”

 

“Um, is there a problem?”

 

As he approached to take the tray, Lisbell asked cautiously.

 

“No, nothing at all.”

 

“But the phone call…”

 

“There was an issue with the bank in the capital. It’s an internal matter, so nothing for Miss Osborne to worry about.”

 

The secretary was adept at masking his emotions. If she hadn’t caught his behavior earlier, she might have believed him entirely.

 

“Since you’ve finished your meal, I’ll bring up some refreshments. Would you prefer coffee or tea?”

 

“Before that, could I ask… Is there a library in this villa?”

 

“A library?”

 

“Yes, it’s getting a bit dull staying in my room, so I thought I might read a book.”

 

“If you have a particular genre in mind, let me know. I can bring it to your room.”

 

This was precisely what fueled Lisbell’s suspicion.

 

Though the lady’s secretary seemed to care for her generously, his overly polite demeanor subtly restricted her movements.

 

He would come into her room while she was bathing to leave her meal, or, like now, insist on bringing her the book she wanted. These excessively polite actions seemed like tactics to keep her confined to her room.

 

And if that were true, the secretary wouldn’t be acting on his own accord. He must be following orders from above, which means the lady wanted it that way.

 

“…Any book on humanities will do. Thank you.”

 

“Alright, let’s head upstairs.”

 

As Lisbell ascended the stairs, she felt the secretary’s gaze clinging to her back. It was a feeling of being watched. Only when she entered her room did she let out the breath she had been holding.

 

Her slightly trembling hand reached for her collar.

 

It still felt suffocating.

 

This was no longer Ulrich’s bedroom, and there were no shackles, yet…

 

“…Ah.”

 

A sharp pain spread. Her subconscious was acting up again. Lisbell rubbed the area where the pain radiated, finding the skin raw and stinging.

 

Then, as she raised her head, the furnishings decorating the room rushed into her view.

 

The silver-framed sugar bowl on the table, the candle holders embossed with portraits, the small glass cabinet with gold trim, and the delicate ornaments adorned with colorful jewels inside.

 

This villa, which appeared purely antique, bore the living taste of Lady Altahart.

 

Altahart.

 

Yes, it was still Altahart.

 



 

The issue the secretary had been urgently discussing on the phone became clear a few days later.

 

“It seems we’ll have to relocate.”

 

After waking and washing up in the morning, Lisbell found, unusually, that the secretary had not disappeared but was standing in a corner of her bedroom. He then suddenly spoke.

 

“Relocate?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“…Why?”

 

“It appears that someone on the young master’s side has discovered this location.”

 

“I thought… this place was supposed to be safe?”

 

“They’ve hired professional trackers. While it’s not certain that we’ve been compromised, the location might have been exposed, so the lady issued special instructions.”

 

So the secretary politely urged her to pack as quickly as possible. Lisbell couldn’t even dry her wet hair before she had to prepare her luggage. She packed her mother’s clothes first and kept the rest to a minimum.

 

Once the bag was closed, the secretary immediately took it and headed for the door. Lisbell felt a sense of urgency as well.

 

“Where are we going?”

 

“To Ducasse. The lady has another private villa there.”

 

Just how many villas does she have?

 

The newspaper reported that the Altahart family owned over twenty villas. That number probably didn’t include these private villas. Lisbell was wondering how many there might be in total when she suddenly stopped in her tracks.

 

“Ducasse… Do you mean the desert country?”

 

“Yes, that’s correct.”

 

From the blue coastline to the scorching desert.

 

She wasn’t just surprised by the stark contrast. Ducasse was an inland region famous for its vast, sea-less deserts. It was geographically far from Rechem, a place closely connected to the sea.

 

Did they really have to go so far just to hide?

 

The only comfort in this villa was that it was within Rechem. If something terrible happened and she needed to flee, it was far more advantageous to be in her own country than in a foreign one.

 

But if she went to Ducasse, Lisbell might find herself in a situation where she couldn’t ask anyone for help.

 

The overwhelming anxiety she felt when Ulrich had insisted she come to the capital resurfaced, washing over her. The terrifying sense of dread was seeping into her heart.

 

“We’ll head to the Orkenian train station first. After that, we’ll move to Portman Harbor and board a ship.”

 

“…Are we leaving right now?”

 

“Yes.”

 

It all seemed so unplanned, but she was probably the only one who felt that way. The secretary had likely been informed in advance and had everything mapped out. The plan was probably to reach Ducasse as quickly and efficiently as possible.

 

And perhaps this sudden announcement was part of their plan. Lisbell couldn’t be sure if fleeing with these people to escape Ulrich was the right decision. Was it really the right choice to trust them in her bid to escape him? The doubts she had pushed aside in the urgency of the situation were now resurfacing.

 

“Please finish your preparations and come downstairs. I’ll be waiting in the lobby.”

 

As the secretary left, Lisbell turned to look out the window.

 

Beyond the rectangular frame, the clear seawater surged as if to swallow the world. The noisy waves seemed to whisper directly to her. Do you think you can escape from me?

 

Splash, splash.

 

The sound of the waves slapped against her ears.

 

A blue symphony.

 

Eyes that were both Ulrich’s and the lady’s.

 

Lisbell soon left the room. Behind her, the glow of one of the jeweled ornaments in the glass cabinet had mysteriously vanished.

 

They soon arrived at Orkenian Station.

 

Inside the station, where people hadn’t been seen in the past few days, it was now bustling with a crowd. Lisbell quietly clenched her hand beneath her sleeve. The jewels she had secretly taken from the villa’s glass case rattled inside her grasp. The hand holding them felt unbearably heavy. Perhaps it wasn’t just her hand, but her heart as well.

 

Stealing. 

 

Her conscience screamed silently, her turbulent mind refusing to calm down.

 

But what choice did she have?

 

At this moment, Lisbell had no means to protect herself. She didn’t even have a single penny in cash. And to Altahart, these jewels would likely be no more than trivial trinkets. Their loss would hardly be of any significance to them.

 

Reassuring herself, Lisbell straightened her back.

 

“Miss Osborne. It’s time to go.”

 

The secretary, who had finished the administrative tasks, approached. Lisbell boarded the train he led her to. Just then, another train arrived at the adjacent platform.

 

Ding, ding, ding, ding.

 

The bell signaling the departure rang out as if to pierce the sky.

 

Lisbell followed behind the secretary, glancing at the still-open doors of each car.

 

What should I do? What do I do?

 

Once she boarded this train, she would leave Rechem for good.

 

And once she left, would she be able to return easily?

 

As she wrestled with her thoughts, the bell ceased. Her heart, which had been pounding, shrank. Soon, the train began to release steam, preparing to depart. At that moment, Lisbell slipped sideways and threw herself out of the open door.

 

“Ouch!”

 

Her knees scraped painfully against the ground. The secretary, still unaware of her escape, continued walking straight ahead. Before he could turn and check behind him, Lisbell grabbed her fallen luggage and quickly stood up.

 

“Ah…!”

 

She barely took a step before collapsing forward. It seemed she had twisted her ankle when she landed. Panting heavily, she struggled to get up again. Her destination was just in front of her. Limping, she painstakingly took one step at a time.

 

Just then, the bell signaling another departure echoed across the platform. The platform was bustling as boarding time approached. Hiding amidst the crowd, Lisbell managed to slip onto the train at the adjacent platform.

 

No sooner had she boarded than the doors closed, and the train began to move. Lisbell sat down in the corridor between the cars, staring at the receding Orkenian Station. And even further away, the train she assumed the secretary had failed to disembark from.

 

‘…To act so recklessly.’

 

Now that it was done, she felt utterly drained.

 

As she buried her face in her drawn-up knees, a hollow laugh escaped her. It was the first time she had acted so rashly. She had fled without any plan, without even deciding where to go. After all, the thought of what would happen if she took that train had been too terrifying.

 

Lisbell slowly raised her bowed head.

 

She had run away from Ulrich.

 

And she had even run away from the lady.

 

She had finally regained her freedom from Altahart, but it was still incomplete. At any moment, Ulrich and the lady’s shadows could extend, grabbing hold of her again.

 

When she had been with the lady, she could at least avoid Ulrich, but now that she had fled from the lady’s side, even that could no longer be expected. And if she were caught next time, she could not expect to be treated as leniently as she had been this time.

 

But… she didn’t regret it.

 

Had she stayed with the lady, she would have been tormented by anxiety and fear in a different way. Most of all, as long as her fate depended on Ulrich’s fluctuating interest, she could not truly say she had escaped from him.

 

Was that why her heart felt so relieved?

 

‘…Where should I go now?’

 

The reality of her situation caught up with her before she could fully savor that relief. After all, she couldn’t abandon reality in favor of this fleeting sense of freedom.

 

Lisbell tried to stand up by leaning against the wall but gave up as pain shot through her ankle. As she gently examined her swollen ankle, memories—those annoying, spiteful things—resurfaced.

 

Why now, of all times, did she think of the person who had so carefully put shoes on this very foot?

 

A man who had dreamed of marrying her, who had said that the realization of that dream was just around the corner, had smiled brightly. His face was as inescapable as the sun, no matter what she did.

 

Theodore.

 

Lisbell lowered her head again and smiled.

 

How could she be so self-centered?

 

Just as she finally escaped Altahart’s shadow, as she could barely take a breath, she thought of him.

 

‘…Is it too late?’

 

Was it impossible to go back?

 

Lisbell rubbed her forehead against her knees.

 

Going back was out of the question.

 

After breaking off their engagement in the worst way possible, it would be cruel to return and tell him the truth.

 

But, but it’s too unfair.

 

It wasn’t by choice that I gave up marrying Theodore.

 

I still… Even now, the moment I lose my way, I think of Theodore’s face, which clearly shows what feelings I still have for him.

 



 

It felt too late.

 

But even so, she wanted to clear up the misunderstanding.

 

Theodore believed she had broken off their engagement because she had feelings for Ulrich. Though she had given up their future together, she wanted to make it clear that this was not the case.

 

She didn’t want Theodore to think of her as such a dreadful and horrible person.

 

Surely, that wasn’t too much to ask.

 

Lisbell carefully stood up, leaning against the wall.

 

The train, which had been racing along the tracks without a break, arrived at the next station. Just as she saw the train slowing down, a conductor approached from the end of the car to check tickets.

 

Lisbell fiddled with the jewel in her pocket. Then she turned around and moved to the next car.

 

While keeping her distance from the conductor, the train gradually slowed down and came to a full stop. As the train exhaled steam, the doors opened, and Lisbell stepped off. The pain in her ankle had significantly subsided.

 

Lisbell rolled the jewel in her hand as she exited the station, searching for someone. She needed to find someone who could exchange this jewel for cash. Just before arriving at the station, she had thought of someone who might be willing to make such a ridiculous deal.

 

Even in the crowded station, they were easy to spot once she decided to find them. Lisbell gulped and approached the scalper, who was wandering aimlessly around the station, wearing an octagonal cap.

 



 

“Can you see it?”

 

Ulrich, who was lounging deeply in a single-seat sofa, lifted his coffee cup and spoke. His soft, reproachful tone was directed at the person sitting opposite him, who had been silent for some time.

 

In his mother’s silk-gloved hand was a piece of paper. Ulrich, looking rather unimpressed, leaned his arm on the armrest, his long fingers gently twisting his platinum hair. Even this waiting time was starting to bore him.

 

“As you can see.”

 



 

“The mine in the northeastern region is now mine.”

 

“I can hardly believe it.”

 

“That’s why I asked the Schwaben family to send the documentation as soon as possible, so you wouldn’t doubt it.”

 

“I’m surprised you managed this, and even more so that the clever Lady Daphne would side with you and do something so costly.”

 

“Just to clarify, not a penny of the family’s common funds went into the mine. I handled everything with my personal assets.”

 

His mother put down the document she was holding. She touched her forehead, as if she had a headache from the unexpected situation. Although it was a bit surprising to see her not bothering to hide her irritation, he didn’t dwell on it.

 

After all, Ulrich had something more pressing on his mind.

 

“What will you do now? Will you still push ahead with the marriage to the Schwaben family?”

 

His tone was as light as a beautiful melody.

 

“How did you manage this? The Marquis of Schwaben surely knew the value of this mine.”

 

“So I blackmailed the head of the Schwaben family.”

 

A click of the tongue escaped his mother’s lips.

 

“That’s not like you.”

 

“The methods people use change depending on the circumstances.”

 

“Ulrich.”

“To be honest, it’s a bit much to call it blackmail. For the Schwaben head, it must’ve felt like a fair proposal. Instead of exposing the many secrets of their family that I uncovered, I sold the mine to them for an absurdly high price. I requested to break off the engagement as planned, while they got to keep their secrets hidden in exchange for an enormous sum. A win-win, wouldn’t you agree?”

 

“Secrets?”

 

“Surely someone as meticulous as you, Mother, wouldn’t have missed the fact that the Marquis of Schwaben has recently been in contact with the chairman of the citizens’ council.”

 



 

“And perhaps we might not have reached the life growing in the Schwaben girl’s belly. They did hide it quite thoroughly. If I hadn’t planted someone at the salon meetings she frequents, I might have been completely fooled and ended up walking down the virgin road with her as a groom destined for tragedy.”

 

A brief sigh escaped her lips.

 

“…Is it true?”

 

“You already know, Mother, that I was closely involved with Miss Schwaben for some time. She’s as free-spirited as I am. Even if she marries into a family of her choice in the future, she’s definitely not the type to cling desperately to someone.”

 

“Good heavens… Should I be praising you for this or reprimanding you?”

 

“If anything, I’d say I deserve praise. We almost ended up nurturing the worthless seed sown by some baron’s son.”

 

Ulrich set down his coffee cup, having summarized the situation succinctly. He then deliberately lowered his gaze, affecting a dejected demeanor.

 

“You may not feel it at all, but I’m deeply distressed right now, Mother.”

 



 

“Even if I wasn’t actively involved, I’ve clearly been a victim in this marriage arrangement. The fault for the breakup lies entirely with them, yet I’ve lost some of my funds due to a hasty transaction.”

 



 

“I trust you wouldn’t mention another marriage proposal to a son who’s struggling this much.”

 

That brazen comment summed up Ulrich’s true intentions.  

 

The lady looked sharply at him. Though he kept a seemingly affable smile, his eyes harbored an unyielding ferocity.  

 

“Have you found her?”

 

The lady found herself resentful for being the one to bring up the subject.  

 

Ulrich, on the other hand, responded as if he had been waiting, with an even softer smile. While his expression remained jovial, the atmosphere grew noticeably colder the more his smile deepened.  

 

“Not yet.”

 



 

“But I’ve got her trail.”

 

Of course he would. He’d hired several skilled trackers to tail her and surround her entourage.  

 

She sipped her tea in silence. Ulrich picked up the document she had set down and leisurely folded it in half. He recalled its contents as he began to speak.  

 

“If you return her now, I’ll entrust this mine to you.”  

 



 

“I’m saying I’ll transfer ownership of the mine to your name.”  

 

Her finger, hooked on the teacup’s handle, twitched slightly.  

 

Ulrich folded the document into a paper model and sent it flying. The paper flitted through the air before hitting the window frame and falling.  

 

“It’s only a matter of time. You know that better than anyone, Mother.”  

 



 

“If I find her first and stage a tearful elopement of love, what will you have left? The engagement with the Schwaben family would collapse, you wouldn’t be able to completely separate Lisbell from me, and you’d fail to secure the Schwaben family’s mine. Ultimately, you’d have nothing to show for your efforts but wasted time.”  

 



 

“And you hate wasting time more than anything, don’t you?”  

 

If she wanted to avoid that, she would need to take the mine and return his mistress, Ulrich’s calm voice suggested. To his mother’s ears, it sounded mad.  

 

How could he?  

 

What could that woman possibly be for him to handle things in such an atrocious manner?  

 

Moreover, the Schwaben family wasn’t the only one targeted by his threats. Her son had willingly placed her, too, on the chopping block, tightening his grip around her neck.  

 

It was madness.  

 

Unthinkable.  

 

No one bearing the name of Altahart should ever defy her like this. Least of all the son she had borne and raised to bring this family to greatness.  

 

Not an ounce of desire to return Lisbell Osborne stirred within her, even in response to his threats.

 

His mother silently swallowed her breath.

 

“I need time to think.”

 

The rhythmic tapping of Ulrich’s fingers against his knee ceased. His head, which had been lazily tilted to one side, slowly returned to its proper position. The movement was innocent, yet it carried an uncanny intensity that made it feel threatening.  

 

“You understand what I’m saying, don’t you?”

 

“Yes, I understand perfectly.”

 

Even so, this?

 

Ulrich felt a peculiar sense of discord.  

 

He studied his mother’s face carefully. Before long, his lips curled into a picturesque smile, one as lovely as a living painting, and he rose from the sofa.  

 

“Understood.”

 



 

“I was taught that pressing a lady is unbecoming of a gentleman.”

 

Ulrich clasped his hands behind his back like a dance step from polite society and brought one hand to his chest in an impeccably courteous bow before turning to leave.

 

The moment he turned away, the emotions drained from his face, leaving it as neutral as still water.  

 

Walking down the corridor, his platinum blonde hair shimmered like sunlight on rippling waves. The light streaming through the hallway’s windows bathed him, yet his mind was consumed with deep, persistent thoughts under the growing vigor of approaching spring.  

 

“You’re back?”

 

When he returned to the study, Victor set down the documents he’d been reviewing and stood.

 

“Shall I proceed with the transfer of ownership for the mine?”

 

“No.”

 

Victor froze, surprised, as if expecting a straightforward order to proceed. The astonishment quickly passed over his face.  

 

“Did the lady refuse?”  

 

“No.”

 

“…Then why not?”  

 

“She says she needs time.”

 

“Time…?”

 

“From your reaction, it seems I’m not the only one who finds it odd.”  

 

Time? She needed time to think?

 

Was there something lacking in his explanation?

 

The negotiation just now had been a veiled threat, explicitly outlining the benefits and losses she stood to gain. To reject it was nothing but a foolish act that would lead to unnecessary losses, something he had emphasized unequivocally.  

 

And his mother couldn’t possibly have misunderstood that.

 

So, if she understood and was still hesitating…  

 

“Why?”  

 

The mist-like question floated up, brushing against the crown of his thoughts. Suddenly, his eyes gleamed with realization.  

 

The answer was too simple.

 

There was a variable in his mother’s situation that he didn’t know about.

 

And the only person who could act as that variable right now was the one his mother had secretly whisked away from this estate—Lisbell Osborne.  

 

If something had happened to Lisbell, whom his mother was protecting, that might explain everything. She might want to accept the deal and hand Lisbell over but couldn’t because the girl was no longer within her grasp. Unable to confess this directly to him, she was instead wasting time—something she hated more than anything.  

 

Ulrich smiled, his expression as serene as a quiet night.

 

“It seems it’s time to call in a favor from our drug-peddling friend.”

 

“Excuse me?”

 

“Contact Colonel Craxson immediately. Tell him it’s an urgent matter.”  

 

Victor, without hesitation, grabbed the receiver.

 

“What should I tell him about the matter?”  

 

“Say it’s a top-secret search request.”

 



 

“If he’s uncooperative, transfer the call to my private line.”

 

Leaving Victor, who signaled his understanding, Ulrich returned to his bedroom.

 

The uncurtained window allowed sunlight to spill generously into the room, but despite the bright light, the atmosphere inside was strangely bleak.

 

Ulrich approached his bed and sat down on the edge.

 

The woman, disguised as Lisbell and lying motionless in this very room that day, had been promptly thrown out. What happened to her after that, he neither knew nor cared.

 

For some time now, whenever he returned to this bedroom, an endless wave of lethargy seemed to overwhelm him. Like a collapsing sandcastle, his upper body slouched until he was sprawled across the bed, utterly languid.

 

His outstretched hand fumbled over the sheets, his palm brushing against their frosty chill like creeping frost.

 

Lorraine was shedding the remnants of winter’s chill, stretching into the sluggish arrival of spring. Yet his bedroom alone seemed to defy this, remaining unnaturally cold.

 

How could the absence of just one person leave such a void?

 

He found the thought curious as he raised his hand into the air. His palm, opening and closing, felt the phantom touch of fine, silken strands of gray hair drifting like threads.

 

Ah, how he wanted to grab hold of them. To clutch them and never let go.  

 

To bite down and chew until they were gone…

 

And it wasn’t just the hair.

 

There was the soft flesh that melted faintly at his touch, the tender skin that flushed red at the slightest graze or lick, the delicate neckline that his face would nuzzle against, soaking him in her warm, comforting scent.

 

He wanted to crush that frail body with all his strength.

 

His hand dropped as if to grasp at the fleeting illusion, but nothing was there. His fingers brushed against something. Slowly, he pulled it up to his face with a lazy motion.

 

The coarse texture grazed his cheekbone.  

 

Thin eyelashes lifted slightly.  

 

It wasn’t the mirage of silken hair he’d imagined but a slip of fabric, held in his loosened gaze.  


He blinked, his eyes languid. His blue-gray pupils shrank, and the vision in front of him became blurry.

 

Ulrich dropped the slip he had been holding onto his face. The fabric that fell was so thin that he couldn’t even feel its weight.

 

However, lace decorated every part, covering every part of his face. He took a deep breath, his chest heaving.

 

His breath caught.

 

He could smell her scent very faintly.

 

Ulrich slowly lifted his palm and pressed the slip. Then he rubbed it so that it covered every corner of his face.

 

He felt his marble-like skin being scratched by the rough texture, but he didn’t care. Rather, the sensation of his lower body rising up as soon as he sniffed the subtle scent was a little more vivid.

 

A hot spark ignited near his navel.

 

Ulrich closed his eyes and took a deep breath. As if he was barely taking in a handful of clean air in a world covered in dust.

 

“Haa…”

 

The breath that filled his mouth and burst out was heavy and hot. The slip turned a little moist. Ulrich raised his chin as if he wanted to dig into the fabric and lowered one hand.

 

A hand that was large enough to hold anything with one hand easily untied his pants. The erection that had been rising with strength for a long time was quickly exposed to the air with a few gestures. It was so hard that the blood vessels were bulging.

 

“Haaa… ”

 

He wrapped his cock in his palm. As soon as he did, he realized that it had been a very long time. It was tingling with just the thought of her.

 

At the tip, liquid was condensing, flowing down like morning dew. The length of his penis was so big that it took ages to even reach the area where the balls were.

 

“Uhnng.”

 

The sound of the flesh being rubbed spread through the bedroom in the afternoon.

 

Ulrich unconsciously stuck out his tongue and flicked the hem of the slip. Even though he knew that the only thing touching his tongue would be a stiff piece of cloth.

 

However, his excitement steadily grew. As he did this, he felt like he was sniffing Lisbell’s hair. It felt like he was holding her from behind, burying his face in her light gray hair, and smacking her bottom lewdly.

 

Thinking that he was really holding her in his arms and completely burying himself inside her, his dick twitched a little more.

 

He gently stroked the flesh while repeatedly pulling up the slip that was about to slip from his well-toned face. He rubbed his erected dick with the calluses on each of his finger joints, and nudged his tip on his palm.

 

At long last, the hole opened up, oozing out sticky fluid. The space between Ulrich’s fingers was soon wet.

 

He imagined the pale liquid coming outside of him on Lisbell’s lips.

 

She would swallow it, her eyes tearful like a cat whose tail had been stepped on. Ah, the image of her cherry-colored lips and her throat clenching came to mind.

 

Ulrich stretched out his tongue and licked the slip, greedily.

 

“Hnng, haa.”

 

The well-built body that had been lying facing the ceiling spun around.

 

The slip draped over his face slid down and fell onto the sheet. Ulrich buried his face in it. He rubbed his eyes, nose, and mouth against the slip until he was almost out of breath, and quickly grabbed his p*nis which had risen enough to touch his belly button.

 

Squelch, squelch.

 

Every time his fingers showed a gap, sticky liquid spread out like foam. It flowed down his lower body even though he hadn’t come yet.

 

He didn’t have time to open his eyes to check the identity of the liquid. He let out a ragged breath. Like a snake entering a small hole where it had hidden its prey, it slowly wrapped itself inside the slip. The lower part of the slip that was shaped like a skirt was filled with his throbbing cock.

 

If Lisbell were wearing it, it would be between her legs.

 

As if he believed that there was a cradle-like hole inside that he could immediately poke open and enter, he bit and licked his lips and began to thrust, even putting his waist into it. He was so engrossed that beads of sweat ran down his forehead where the tendons were slightly raised.

 

If you looked at him from behind, it seemed so lewd that you would think he was really having sex with a woman. Even though he was wearing all the clothes from top to bottom, the scene was much more provocative than a naked person.

 

“Hah, haa… .”

 

Soon, his posture collapsed. His hands, which had been sticky, were helplessly covered in the gushing semen.

 

The bedroom, where only his rapid breathing had resonated for a while, soon became as cold as ice.

 

His eyes, which had been tightly shut, opened.

 

After the sexual fever that had been there for a very short time had subsided, an indescribable coldness poured down.

 

The space that had never felt empty was completely empty and noisy. It was so noisy that he felt the urge to destroy everything in this room, making my nerves tense. If it weren’t for the after effects of ejaculation that was gently biting his hands and toes right now, it might have been like that.

 

He slowly turned back to face the ceiling and lifted his hanging hand. The semen that he hadn’t been able to wipe off flowed down his palm.

 

He pulled the slip on the back of his head and wiped his semen-stained hand with it.

 

No, he thoroughly smeared the semen on it.

 

It was wet enough, but not at the same time.

 

Yes, this kind of thing wasn’t enough.

 

It wasn’t even a part of the real thing.

 

If it was real, he wouldn’t be feeling this sluggish. That fact really didn’t sit well with him.

 

How could there be something in this world that he wanted so much but couldn’t have it right away?

 

How could something like that exist?

 

If he had wanted to have it, he would have it.

 

Ulrich slowly blinked his eyes. Then, out of nowhere, a smile burst out.

 

The woman who gave me such a headache wasn’t just acting that way to him. She definitely acted as a variable for his mother, too.

 

As expected. She would have been relieved to be out of his mother’s shadow. She probably couldn’t end up bearing the pressure, so she impatiently ended up causing an accident.

 

“Oh, I love it.”

 

He really liked that uncompromising side of hers.

 

The fact that he is willing to consider her, and that she was not easily broken, is truly admirable. It was a much more admirable attitude to follow than the attitude of nobles who were always taught to maintain a straight line.

 

How was she so timid?

 

She was alert as she was gentle. Her attitude of keeping her invisible tail up high and never losing her guard made it impossible for him to resist reading her…

 

His chest tickled.

 

Ulrich rubbed his cheek against the sheets and chuckled.

 

His laughter echoed in the lonely bedroom. The strange resonance that filled the air was the only thing that filled the dull bedroom.

 



 

“… Bang!”

 

The sound of the luggage falling was loud.

 

Lisbell rubbed her arm, which was still covered with goosebumps. The passenger sitting next to her said, “Are you okay, Miss?” and held their hand out. Only then did she realize that she had dozed off and dropped her luggage on her lap.

 

“Thank you.”

 

As she took the luggage and gave a small greeting, the woman next to her wearing a beret smiled kindly.

 

Lisbell smiled awkwardly and rubbed her mouth in case she had drooled.

 

Her body was so tense that even the brief moment of sleep was fierce. She couldn’t remember what she had dreamed because it was so brief, but judging by how startled she was, it must have been a bad dream.

 

Her mind, which still couldn’t forget the crow, refused to make any further guesses. Lisbell straightened her back and looked outside the train.

 

“Um… did we pass Kings Morgan Station?”

 

“It’s the next station.”

 

Just then, the station appeared in the distance. Lisbell thanked her once more and opened her luggage. Before getting off, she checked her belongings first. Her luggage, which contained a few coins she had earned from trading jewels with black marketers, her mother’s clothes that she had kept inside, and a spare set of clothes, was very simple and, in other words, poor.

 

Lisbell counted her cash obsessively. She was glad that the deal with the black marketer went well. This was also the third time she had made a deal.

 

The black marketer she had contacted the first and second times was furious, saying that she had no idea whether the items were real or fake, and that she should just get out of here and there and not bother with her business today.

 

The third black marketer must have had an eye for jewels, so he looked around and handed over all the cash he had.


Lisbell recruited a few children playing ball in the shade near the historical landmark.

 

She handed them money, including a tip, and asked them to buy train tickets heading to three different destinations. This was to throw off any possible pursuit by Lady Altahart or Ulrich.

 

Not stopping there, she herself moved between distant, lesser-known suburban stations, places even she had never heard of. At each stop, she repeated the process, enlisting more children to purchase tickets to various locations. During the nights, she chose overnight trains where she could rest briefly.

 

This convoluted, evasive journey lasted three full days, ensuring her trail was nearly impossible to follow.

 

Feeling relatively confident she was no longer being tracked, Lisbell finally purchased a ticket to Renbruck.

 

At last, the Kings Morgan Station came into view. Her heart pounded as she realized she had arrived in the city where Theodore lived.

 

She felt the same anticipation as the first time she had left Theodore, boarding a train bound for Marnia and setting everything into motion. Slowly, imperceptibly, everything had changed since then.

 

She wished for the beginning and end to mirror each other.

 

That, by traveling on this train to see Theodore, her connection with Ulrich could finally be severed.

 

A thread, frayed and cut. A breath, exhaled and lost.

 

Her desperate thoughts accompanied her as the train slowed to a stop.

 

Lisbell stepped off awkwardly, setting foot on the soil.

 

‘This is Theodore’s hometown.’

 

Since it was part of Lekem, the lifestyle wasn’t vastly different from the places she had been. Yet, there was a vibrant, bustling energy unique to an emerging industrial city.

 

She looked off into the distance, where tall factory chimneys rose into the sky. Among them, Theodore’s father’s textile factory must be there.

 

Seeing this made her journey feel real. She had truly come to see Theodore.

 

First, Lisbell visited a general store near the plaza to purchase a cloche hat and cape. Being a fugitive of sorts, she couldn’t casually flaunt her appearance. Thankfully, the city catered to a bourgeois crowd, and the prices weren’t steep.

 

“Do you happen to know anything about a Mr. Motier, who operates a textile factory?” she hesitantly asked the shopkeeper assisting her with the cape.

 

“Mr. Kedin Motier, you mean? He’s a kind gentleman. Sometimes, when passing by, he buys flowers from the basket girls. He once told me it was to gift to his wife.”

 

Kedin Motier—that was Theodore’s father.

 

The anecdote reflected the warm personality Lisbell had experienced in Theodore, and she pondered it for a moment. The shopkeeper, noticing her expression, smiled knowingly.

 

“Are you looking for Mr. Motier?”

 

“Ah, yes. I have business with his son.”

 

“Oh, I see! I don’t know his name, but I remember his face. He’s quite striking, just like his father.”

 

Lisbell nodded absentmindedly. Memories of that striking face buried in her lap, weeping, came to mind. Whatever expression she made must have amused the shopkeeper, who gave her a mischievous grin.

 

“I admire women who take the initiative. Times are changing, and people need to realize there’s nothing shameful about a woman seeking out a man first.”

 

Moved by her boldness, the shopkeeper even shared Theodore’s home address. Though not the precise location, it was enough: a red-roofed house beyond the canal bridge leading from the central plaza.

 

Lisbell left the shop, the bell above the door jingling softly, feeling optimistic.

 

The weather was perfectly clear, without a cloud in sight. Her train to Kings Morgan Station had been free of trouble, and she had discovered Theodore’s residence by chance.

 

Pulling her top lower, she set off in the direction the shopkeeper had indicated.

 

The afternoon in Renbruck was serenely peaceful.

 

Basket girls sold flowers; boys with berets zipped around on bicycles delivering parcels. Couples strolled arm-in-arm, enjoying leisurely dates. A young man sat on a bench sketching pigeons.

 

The tranquil, refreshing atmosphere felt surreal. As if it were a world she could never truly belong to.

 

Not long ago, she had been trapped in a more luxurious mansion in the capital, a preserved trophy, like a specimen.

 

The thought of it still made her nauseous, so much so that she shuddered violently.

 

When she remembered the cruel man smiling at her, it felt as if winter, which had been slowly fading away due to early spring, had returned. A strange chill crept up her spine, making her pull her cape tighter, buttoning it fully.

 

The day was still relatively short.

 

After walking for a while, the street quickly darkened. Gas lamps lit up, casting a soft glow.

 

It was then that Lisbell entered a densely packed residential area. Thanks to the gas lights, it wasn’t difficult to find the red roof.

 

Standing at the door, Lisbell felt the tension she had nearly forgotten grip her insides, squeezing her stomach. She couldn’t believe she was so nervous now. Placing her hand over her heart, she exhaled, slowly trying to calm herself.

 

‘I’m just here to explain what I couldn’t say before and leave.’

 

‘Why am I so anxious over something so trivial?’

 

‘I’m not thinking of doing anything with him now.’

 

‘I know better than to try anything foolish.’

 

‘Then why do I feel like I want something so badly?’

 

Lisbell clenched her hands tightly, shaking her head to dismiss the thoughts. After a deep breath, she raised her small hand and knocked on the round door knocker, ensuring the sound reached inside. A soft voice responded from within.

 

“Yes?”

 

The familiar voice made her heart race in response. She felt the approach of someone coming to the door. Lisbell stood firm, gathering all her resolve.

 

“…Lisbell?”

 

But all her preparation was useless.

 

As the door opened, and she saw Theodore standing there, his face filled with disbelief upon seeing her, all the thoughts and emotions that had crossed her mind evaporated.

 

The overwhelming sensation that surged up was an intense longing—so strong that it was almost laughable to deny. It was as if the image she had so long imagined had become real, and she couldn’t stop herself from sinking into that feeling.

 

This was different from the descent she had felt before.

 

It was the fall of a hopeful sign.

 

“Theodore.”

 

She tried to smile, to appear cheerful.

 

When she saw him again, she didn’t want to bring up the painful memories from before. She had intended to give him a wide, bright smile.

 

But seeing Theodore, gazing at her with trembling eyes, made it difficult. Her voice cracked with emotion, and despite her best efforts to hold back tears, her mouth twisted in a way that betrayed her struggle.

 

“Lisbell… is it really you?”

 

Theodore, visibly shocked, seemed to struggle to believe it. He quickly stepped out and closed the door behind him.

 

“How did you get here…?”

 

“It’s… well, Theodore, that is…”

 

Her words came out awkwardly, mixed with shallow breaths, making it hard to speak.

 

Finally, Lisbell couldn’t hold back the tears any longer.

 

He had once been her fiancé, someone she had thought she would only ever encounter in dreams or memories. The person she had longed for, and though everything had shattered, she still held onto the precious memories.

 

“I came to talk to you.”

 

She didn’t care anymore.

 

No, she wasn’t here just to clear up misunderstandings.

 

Lisbell wanted to start over from the very beginning.

 

She wanted to apologize to Theodore, ask for his forgiveness, and rebuild the future she had thrown away with her own hands. She wanted to rebuild the bright future they had once dreamed of together.

 

She wouldn’t hide anything anymore.

 

Once, she had thought it was for his sake, but in the end, it was fear of being hurt that made her hide everything. Now, she would confess everything.

 

With him, Theodore, she believed it would be okay. She felt she could do it, to break free from his grasp, from the suffocating air that had oppressed her.

 

She only hoped it wasn’t too late.

 

Holding onto Theodore’s arm, Lisbell looked at him, hoping that some of the feelings they had shared still remained within him, even a drop.

 

“Theodore? What’s going on?”

 

Just then, a door behind them opened. A woman stepped into view, looking for Theodore.

 

Lisbell froze, her gaze slowly falling downward.

 

The woman had a noticeable baby bump.


‘Huh…?’ 

 

Lisbell doubted her own eyes.  

 

Her gaze darted from the woman’s rounded belly to her face, then back down again, only to rise once more. The erratic movement of her eyes betrayed the confusion she felt.  

 

“Jane.”  

 

Theodore turned around, seemingly startled to see her out there. Gently, he placed a protective hand on Jane’s shoulder. Lisbell’s eyes latched onto that gesture, unable to look away.  

 

“It’s still cold outside. Why did you come out?”  

 

“You weren’t coming back, so I got worried. But… who is this?”  

 

“Oh, this is…”  

 

Theodore glanced toward Lisbell. A moment ago, his gaze had been filled with warmth, but now it pricked like thorns. She could read the discomfort on his face as clearly as if it had been written there.  

 

In that moment, everything became painfully clear.  

 

The space beside Theodore was no longer empty. The relationship she had once hoped to restore had long since faded into the past. Theodore and Jane were deeply in love; anyone could see that. There was no place for her in their story now.  

 

No, there wasn’t.  

 

Her place by Theodore’s side no longer existed.  

 

“I-I’m sorry.”  

 

Lisbell staggered back a step, her face flushing with heat. She wasn’t sure what she was feeling.  

 

Shame? Embarrassment? Or perhaps… disappointment?  

 

The tangled mess of emotions left her dizzy, unable to sort through them. She only knew that she wanted to flee—right now, right away. To hide, to disappear into the smallest hole she could find.  

 

She wanted to vanish from this world.  

 

“Maybe I should… I mean, I’ll just…”  

 

What words could possibly fit this moment?  

 

None seemed right.  

 

Her very presence here felt like a mistake. She shouldn’t have come. Her decision to show up was nothing but selfishness. The raw, exposed truth of her motives made her want to shrink into herself.  

 

As she struggled to decide what to do, her eyes met Jane’s. That was enough to make her turn and run.  

 

She had felt it earlier—an ominous sense that today wasn’t going to end well.  

 

That feeling had solidified the moment she noticed Jane.  

 

Unfortunately, her hurried steps landed her in a puddle. She slipped and fell awkwardly, her knees hitting the ground hard. Pain shot up her legs as muddy water splashed everywhere, staining her clothes.  

 

A mess.  

 

Everything was a mess—her mood, her appearance.  

 

What made her feel most pathetic was knowing Theodore was still standing behind her, witnessing it all. His very presence turned her into the most pitiful figure in the world.  

 

“Lisbell!”  

 

She didn’t even want his kindness at that moment. She might have preferred him to ignore her entirely—it would’ve hurt less.  

 

But Theodore wasn’t like that. He never had been.  

 

He rushed to her side, kneeling in the mud without hesitation. The sight of his knee soaking in the muck made tears well up in her eyes.  

 

“Jane, could you go inside and bring a towel? Please.”  

 

“Alright.”  

 

She heard Jane’s footsteps retreating into the house. Lisbell pressed her trembling hands against the ground, biting her lip hard. Theodore’s hand gently rested on her shoulder.  

 

Her lips moved as though someone had nudged her.  

 

“I’m sorry. I’m so sorry. I shouldn’t have come. I’ll leave now. Right now.”  

 

“What? What are you saying? You can’t leave like this! Your clothes are soaked, and your knee looks hurt.”  

 

  

 

“Come inside for a moment. Wash up, change into dry clothes, and rest a bit before you go. You don’t look well at all. Lisbell, please, okay?”  

 

With his help, she slowly stood up.  

 

His touch was warm, just as it always had been. Even though they were no longer lovers, that warmth hadn’t faded. It weighed heavily on her heart, a bittersweet reminder of everything they’d shared.  

 

Theodore was a man who offered kindness to anyone, regardless of their relationship with him. Memories of how his gentleness had comforted her flooded her mind, making her chest ache.  

 

A dizzying sensation swelled within her. Lisbell knew this feeling all too well.  

 

It was the same despair she’d felt lying naked on Ulrich’s bed, staring up at a bright, blue sky that seemed so unattainably distant.  

 

The kind of shame that made her wish she could hang herself from that unreachable sky.  

 



 

“Drink this. It’ll help warm you up.”  

 

A gentle warmth spread through her hands. The soothing aroma of herbal tea wafted softly in the air.  

 

Lowering her gaze, Lisbell took a sip. The warmth spread through her mouth, and, as Theodore had said, her body temperature seemed to rise slightly. But the chill within her remained, as though an irreparable gap had been etched into her core—something no material comfort could fill.  

 

“Ah, as I thought. You’ve got a bruise.”  

 

It wasn’t until he spoke that Lisbell realized Theodore was kneeling in front of her, examining her injured knee. She opened her mouth, wanting to say she was fine or that he didn’t need to do this, but no sound came out. Her lips parted uselessly before sealing shut again, and her downcast expression hardened into a thin line.  

 

Meanwhile, Theodore had already finished applying ointment with his usual gentle touch.  

 

“If you need more towels, I’ll get some,” he offered.  

 

“No, it’s fine,” she replied softly.  

 

A brief silence followed. It felt as if tiny insects were crawling beneath her skin. Realizing the distance that now separated her from someone she had once been so close to filled her with a bone-deep unease.  

 

‘What happens now?’  

 

Would he leave the room, telling her to rest for a while? Or would he try to strike up a friendly conversation, as he used to? What was Theodore thinking? Was he, too, feeling the weight of this distance, recalling their once-precious moments as nothing more than a fleeting dream?  

 

“Do you have somewhere to stay tonight?”  

 

When he finally spoke, Lisbell felt like a foolish dreamer lost in pointless fantasies. Here he was, so grounded in reality, while she remained trapped in naive, wishful thinking. Bitterness filled her mouth.  

 

“How about staying here for the night? There’s a forecast for rain in the early morning. If you push yourself to leave in your current state, you might catch a bad cold. Lisbell, you’ve always been prone to getting sick when the seasons change.”  

 

“But staying here… it doesn’t feel right.”  

 

“Jane will understand.”  

 

Ah. There it was again—her name, spoken so casually from Theodore’s lips. His tone was neutral, unremarkable even, yet it sounded unbearably tender to Lisbell, as if he’d spoken it after holding honey on his tongue. The bitterness inside her turned coarse and raw, like swallowing a lump of sand.  

 

“So, it’s just the two of you living here?” she asked.  

 

“Yes. My parents used to stay here too, but when I brought Jane to live with me, they moved to company housing near the industrial district. I guess they thought it would be more comfortable for us this way.”  

 

“I see.”  

 

Though she responded dutifully, Theodore’s words barely registered. They flowed through one ear and out the other. As her mind drifted, Lisbell bit down hard on her tongue to regain focus.  

 

A soft laugh broke the silence. She looked up just as the bed dipped slightly under his weight. Theodore had sat down beside her.  

 

“Our conversation feels so detached, doesn’t it?”  

 

“What?”  

 

“To be honest, I was surprised. No, I’m still surprised. I never thought you’d come looking for me like this.”  

 

There was weight to his words—or perhaps it was Lisbell’s memories of him that twisted them into something heavier.  

 

Her hands curled into fists on her lap.  

 

“I’m sorry…”  

 

The wretched final moments of their relationship weren’t only vivid in Theodore’s mind—they haunted Lisbell too. It was that clarity, that painfully sharp memory, that had driven her to seek him out, determined to explain herself.  

 

That had been her purpose.  

 

But when she set out to see him, she hadn’t imagined this. She hadn’t foreseen another woman by his side—a woman who was pregnant, who already seemed to have built a life with him.  

 

At this moment, all Lisbell could offer was an apology. Anything more would only come across as a selfish attempt to plead her case.  

 

“I didn’t bring it up to hear an apology,” Theodore said. “I just… I never thought I’d see you again.”  

 

“I didn’t think I’d see you again either!”  

 

This time, the words burst out of her, unstoppable.  

 

“It might not mean much to you now, in any way, but I wanted to see you, Theodore. Just once more. That’s why I came.”  

 

He might think she was lying.  

 

He might grow angry, lash out.  

 

But it was the truth.  

 

This was her unfiltered, undiluted sincerity.  


But that was purely her perspective and will.

 

That was why she became afraid to see Theodore’s reaction.  

 

When she lacked the courage to face him directly, stubbornly staring ahead instead, she felt a soft, deflating laugh graze her ear once more.  

 

“After what happened between us…”  

 

Lisbell immediately realized what he was referring to. That day at Marnia’s villa, the day she had broken off their engagement.  

 

“It wasn’t long after I returned to Misley. When our engagement was called off, I was preparing to leave and return to Renbruck. My parents wanted that too. But just before leaving Misley, I went to the square for something I needed and met Jane for the first time. She was a traveler. She approached me to ask for directions.”  

 

  

 

“That was all there was to our first meeting. It was such a brief moment that we didn’t even have time to introduce ourselves. I thought that would be the end of it. But a few days later, I ran into her again at a tavern near the station. We recognized each other, naturally ended up sitting together, and started chatting. Surprisingly, our conversation flowed easily. We had similar tastes, and the more we talked, the more I lost track of time.”  

 

  

 

“At the time, I was living in a haze of sadness—something uncharacteristic of me. I had been sincere about our engagement. When that dream shattered, all I felt was loss and confusion. I wasn’t sure if going back to Renbruck was the right decision or if it was what I truly wanted. I was wandering aimlessly, you could say.”  

 

It didn’t take much to realize what he was saying. He mentioned going to a tavern. Theodore didn’t drink. For someone like him to set foot in a tavern was proof of how much he had been struggling.  

 

“Jane was the one who pulled me out of it.”  

 

  

 

“Jane was a traveler, moving from place to place, and her stories of her adventures were fascinating. At that time, her stories were the only comfort I had. I started visiting the tavern daily, not for the drinks—I barely touched alcohol—but just to see her.”  

 

Perhaps she and Theodore had endured the same period of time with similar emotions—wandering, lost in chaos.  

 

But for him, the solution hadn’t been her.  

 

“Then, a few days later, Jane told me about a city she had always wanted to visit. It was a modern city with advanced industrial technology, bustling with diverse and free-spirited people coming and going.”  

 

  

 

“Yes, Renbruck.”  

 

  

 

“When I heard her mention Renbruck, I couldn’t help but wonder if this was fate. I hadn’t told Jane that it was my hometown, not even once. So it felt even more remarkable.”  

 

Theodore smiled softly.  

 

It was a smile he wore while thinking of her—Jane.  

 

The woman who had resolved the anguish Lisbell had caused him.  

 

The woman he now believed was his destiny.  

 

“…I see.”  

 

Lisbell clenched her fists so tightly her knuckles trembled. Her nails bit into her palms, causing a sharp sting. She tried to keep her voice steady, but it was futile. Her vocal cords quivered pitifully. Biting down hard on her lips to keep them from trembling, she muttered under her breath.  

 

“I knew I shouldn’t have come…”  

 

“That’s not it, Lisbell.”  

 

  

 

“I told you this because I want you to feel at ease with me. I want you to know that I’m no longer clinging to our past.”  

 

Those words should have brought her relief. But instead, they brought a lingering sadness that wouldn’t leave her. It felt bittersweet. She was glad his wounds had healed, but there was a strange sorrow in knowing they no longer bound him to her. The conflicting emotions unsettled her spirit sharply.  

 

Part of her felt like sighing in resignation.  

 

He really hadn’t changed. Even now, when she had appeared without notice, he hadn’t questioned her reasons or her circumstances. Instead, he had shown understanding and even tried to comfort her. He had even spoken about something that must have been hard for him to share, all to reassure her.  

 

“…Then, I’ll stay just for today.”

 

‘And I’ll leave tomorrow.’ 

 

She didn’t bother saying it out loud.  

 

Theodore likely wished for it too, even if he hadn’t expressed it. After all, Jane was here. Lisbell hid her lingering bitterness behind a forced smile.  

 

She had a feeling that tonight would feel particularly long.  

 

  

 

As soon as she finished the meal Theodore brought her, she collapsed onto the bed and fell asleep. She hadn’t realized how exhausted she was from days of running, unable to get proper rest. The delayed fatigue hit her all at once.  

 

But her sleep wasn’t deep. Perhaps the anxiety coiled inside her heart wouldn’t let her rest fully. She tossed and turned before waking up in the middle of the night.  

 

When she opened her eyes again, a light drizzle was falling outside the window. She wanted to sleep until morning, but the sound of raindrops tapping against the glass kept her awake.  

 

Lisbell sat up and ran her fingers through her messy hair. Her fine strands were always sensitive to the weather, and the moisture in the air left her hair more tangled than usual.  

 

As she half-heartedly tried to smooth it out, she froze. She suddenly remembered someone who used to playfully bite at her tangled strands on such days, calling them “adorably stubborn”. 

 

Shaking lightly, Lisbell rose from the bed.  

 

That’s when she noticed the tray on the bedside table. It wasn’t the herbal tea Theodore had given her earlier to warm her up. He must have returned to her room after bringing her dinner. Lisbell sipped the tea, now completely cold.  

 

It was icy. So cold it chilled her to the bone. It felt as though the warmth she had managed to regain was sinking back to the floor. Lisbell quietly set the cup down.  

 

Perhaps it wasn’t just the coldness of the tea.  

 

It might be the disappointment, gnawing deeper into her heart and soul, that was the true culprit.  

 

Swallowing a sigh, Lisbell, now fully awake, opened the bedroom door carefully.  

 

The sound of the rain grew heavier as she stepped outside. The enveloping sound of water made her feel as if she were standing in the middle of the ocean.  

 

It was as if a tide was rising, slowly creeping from her toes to her calves, knees, and thighs, threatening to engulf her entirely.  

 

Lisbell stood before the window, letting the melancholy in her heart flow away with the gentle rhythm of the rain. She stood there, lost, like someone unsure of where to go.  

 

“Miss Osborne.”  

 

She flinched, startled, realizing someone had approached her in the dim light.  

 

Turning quickly, she saw Jane standing there—the same woman she had seen earlier. Lisbell froze, unsure how to respond, as Jane, cradling her rounded belly, walked forward with a serene smile.  

 

“You’re awake.”  

 

“Yes, I think I dozed off for a bit.”  

 

“Here.”  

 

Jane handed something to her.  

 

“These are the clothes you were wearing earlier. I had them laundered, but you were asleep, so I planned to give them to you tomorrow.”  

 

“Thank you.”  

 

Lisbell realized she was currently wearing Jane’s clothes, lent to her at Theodore’s suggestion. For some reason, this made her feel even more uncomfortable. She quickly took the clothes from Jane’s hands.  

 

“We haven’t even properly introduced ourselves yet, have we? I’m Jane Hince.”  

 

“Oh, Lisbell Osborne.”  

 

She shook Jane’s outstretched hand. It was just a handshake, yet she felt an inexplicable tightness in her chest. When she raised her head, her eyes met Jane’s, which were curved into a gentle smile.  

 

But there was something off about those eyes.  

 

They felt artificial, like a hollow shell devoid of any soul. Lisbell was sure she had felt this kind of unease before, though she couldn’t place when.  

 

“Lisbell… is it?”  

 

  

 

“Why are you here?”  

 

Shhh.  

 

The rain’s sound suddenly seemed to fade. The tension thickened.  

 

“…Pardon?”  

 

“I heard you were Theodore’s former fiancée. That you dragged things out only to rudely demand a breakup, claiming you no longer loved him.”  

 

  

 

“How could someone like that show up here so shamelessly? I’m genuinely curious.”  

 

Jane’s expression remained pristine, like an untouched snowy field. Her words, though sharp, carried no genuine malice. Yet, they struck a nerve.  

 

They called out the guilt Lisbell had been ignoring, forcing her to confront it.  

 

At the same time, they made her understand Jane’s perspective—the discomfort she must feel and the disdain she clearly harbored for Lisbell.  


It was something beyond doubt.  

 

She wasn’t just anyone, she was his former fiancée.  

 

The woman who had once been romantically involved with the biological father of the life growing inside Jane’s womb. The same woman who had unilaterally ended their relationship in a manner so inconsiderate it tarnished every memory they had built together.  

 

For Jane, there was no reason to look kindly upon Lisbell.  

 

Why had she only just realized this?  

 

If Jane were to drive her out of here right now, there wouldn’t be a single person who could fault her for it. Given their relationship and circumstances, Jane was the one who rightfully belonged at Theodore’s side. That legitimacy served as the foundation for Jane’s aversion to Lisbell.  

 

Even now, Jane gently stroked her stomach. It didn’t seem like a deliberate display but rather an unconscious act. Still, the sight gnawed relentlessly at Lisbell’s thoughts.  

 

It was already late. Far too late for a pregnant woman to be awake. In fact, it was too late for anyone to be awake.  

 

If Jane’s sleeplessness at this hour was solely because of Lisbell…  

 

“I-I’m sorry.”  

 

Lisbell took a hesitant step back, her face growing hot.  

 

The tangled threads of emotions that Theodore’s words had stirred within her gradually sank beneath the surface. What emerged instead was an acute awareness of her presence here, an overwhelming sense of shame for coming to a place where she clearly didn’t belong and imposing on everyone.  

 

It felt as though she had been handed an undeniable verdict: that her presence here was neither needed nor wanted. And it was Jane, Theodore’s partner, who had delivered that realization, making Lisbell’s pride crumble even further.  

 

“If my presence made you uncomfortable….”  

 

  

 

“No, if it upset you….”  

 

Her attempt at an apology was cut off by Jane’s calm, steady voice.  

 

“Why don’t you leave now?”  

 

Lisbell stared at her in a daze, forgetting even the heat rising to her cheeks.  

 

Jane’s expression hadn’t changed. There was no trace of hostility, nor was there any other discernible emotion. She appeared entirely devoid of feeling, as though she wasn’t capable of experiencing emotion in the first place.  

 

That wax-like stillness sent a chill through Lisbell. A peculiar sense of déjà vu that she couldn’t shake.  

 

It was as if she had seen this before, somewhere.  

 

For a brief moment, she racked her brain, but the answer eluded her. Lisbell couldn’t bear to look at Jane any longer and turned her head away.  

 

It was only then that Jane’s words fully registered.  

 

“You’d be better off returning to where you came from.”  

 

Perhaps Jane thought Lisbell hadn’t heard her, for she repeated herself with even more clarity.  

 

To where you came from.  

 

Even though Lisbell was certain Jane didn’t know the implications of her words, they still felt chilling. As if she were being cursed to return to the man who had turned her life into a ruin, desperate to grasp even the ashes that remained.  

 

Lisbell bit down hard on the inside of her cheek.  

 

Her despair in this moment was meaningless. Theodore had been kind enough to extend her some grace, and if Jane desired him, then leaving was the only right choice. In fact, she felt foolish for not reaching that conclusion sooner.  

 

Lisbell bowed deeply to Jane in apology. She returned to her room, changed, and packed her belongings. Her trembling hands dropped and fumbled with items several times, but she persisted until everything was in place. Then, she left Theodore’s residence.  

 

The door, which had been so difficult to approach and knock on, now opened far too easily as she exited.  

 

Pulling her hood tightly over her head, Lisbell retraced her steps back into the night. Without an umbrella, her body was quickly drenched by the rain, yet she found herself oddly numb to it.  

 

She walked along the dimly lit streets for about twenty minutes, passing a square before eventually reaching the distant silhouette of the train station.  

 

“Ha….”  

 

A breath escaped her lips, half a sigh, half a gasp, as she entered the station.  

 

Kings Morgan Station was nothing like it had been during the day. With no late-night trains running, the place was eerily empty. She had expected to see at least a few vagrants or drifters, but the station seemed to be meticulously maintained, with not a single soul in sight.  

 

For now, Lisbell found comfort in the silence.  

 

Having been driven out of a place where she had sought shelter, she felt like an unwelcome guest no matter where she went. In that sense, this desolate public space felt more tolerable.  

 

She decided to wait until dawn. When the first train began its morning run, she would leave.  

 

‘…But where?’  

 

Sitting on a bench, staring blankly ahead, Lisbell tilted her head back.  

 

The ceiling of the station, made of stone framework, came into view. Perhaps due to the rain, the sky was hidden. The clouds, the moon, the stars—nothing could be seen, and the surrounding darkness was overwhelming. It felt as if the darkness itself was peering into her mind.

 

‘Where am I supposed to go now?’

 

Her internal compass seemed lost, spinning in circles. The more she reflected on her own helpless situation, the more hopeless it became.

 

Occasionally, the breaths she exhaled turned into a bewildered laugh.

 

Why did it come to this?

 

The weak laughter that had started as a chuckle soon turned into sobs. Lisbell pulled her knees up onto the bench and hugged them close to her chest. She curled into herself, her body huddling so tightly that her forehead gently rested against her knees, gradually dampening with tears.

 

Yes, the truth is…

 

She had hoped, just a little.

 

She had hoped that there was still something she could turn back, that it wasn’t too late.

 

If she explained everything that had happened to her, kind Theodore would surely listen and eventually take her back into his arms.

 

She had to give up on her mother, but maybe, just maybe, her relationship with Theodore still had a chance.

 

Why had she never considered it for a single moment?

 

The assumption that Theodore might already have someone by his side.

 

Wasn’t it obvious? The hope she had been clinging to was blind. It wasn’t real hope but a base desire, nothing more.

 

“……!”

 

Suddenly, Lisbell’s shoulders jolted.

 

A pure, monotone sound echoed through the station, which seemed to be asleep. The silence was so intense that the sound struck her ears sharply.

 

She quickly located the source of the sound. It was a phone attached to the wall near the platform where the trains entered. It was for emergency use, where one could pay to call the station in case something urgent arose.

 

Right now, that phone was ringing.

 

The sound was loud enough to grab her attention, but it was only for a moment. Lisbell knew she had to decide where to go once morning came, before anything else. 

 

The world was vast, and there were places to go. However, they were mostly empty, lacking anyone who might remember her. Moving forward into a land where no one knew her seemed an impossible task. This was why she had tried to escape, defying her husband’s wish to go to Dukas. It had been the same reason.

 

While lost in thought, the ringing phone gradually faded into silence. In the sudden stillness that returned, Lisbell closed her eyes.

 

‘Are they still… looking for me?’

 

Moreover, this was not something that would be resolved simply by moving.  

 

Lisbell needed to be careful so she would never fall back into that man’s grasp. She might even have to abandon her former identity and completely transform herself into someone else, a risk she had never considered until now. The thought gave her a headache.

 

‘Why… why do I have to bear all of this?

 

Why can’t I be where I want to be…’

 

The unjustness rose up again, pressing heavily against her chest.

 

“Then, if you ever choose to become independent and start a new family, I want to remain a place where you can always come back to. Like a hometown, like a starting point.”

 

Her mother’s words suddenly came to mind, making her feel especially sorrowful today. When she thought about it, those words had almost seemed like a heartfelt will. Lisbell lowered her legs from her chest, grabbed the bag at her feet, and stood up.

 

At that moment, the phone in the distance rang once more. This time, she wasn’t as startled as before.  

 

Lisbell quickly opened the bag and reached to the bottom where her mother’s clothes were. It was a comforting gesture, one she had made many times before, but today it didn’t bring the comfort she had hoped for.

 

“This wrapping garment… didn’t it feel too tight for you, Mother?”

 

“I actually prefer it this way.”

 

Her mother always wore clothes that were so tight around her neck, shoulders, and limbs that it was almost suffocating. The clothes Lisbell was now handling weren’t much different from those. Her mother had once explained that it was due to her long years spent in a monastery, and this style of dress was more comfortable for her.

 

‘…A monastery?’

 

Lisbell’s hand suddenly stopped.


“Allante? Mother, what is Allante?”  

 

“It’s the name of a monastery where I once owed a debt before having you. In the world, it’s called St. Allante Monastery.”  

 

It was the name inscribed in elegant handwriting on the first page of her mother’s Bible—a Bible her mother had never abandoned, no matter how often they moved due to their difficult circumstances.  

 

St. Allante Monastery. Her mother had come from there.  

 

“A monastery…”  

 

Lisbell pulled her mother’s clothing into her lap.  

 

Whenever they spoke about it, her mother never seemed to regret being cast out from that place. She had accepted the consequences of her actions with quiet grace, likely shaped by the life she had led there.  

 

The church of Portly near Saint Laurent came to mind.  

 

It had snowed for the first time that year when Lisbell buried her mother there. The memory of leaving things unresolved still filled her with shame and frustration. Yet, at the time, there was nothing she could do but retreat quietly.  

 

Perhaps it was the monastery, not that lonely grave, where her mother should have been laid to rest.  

 

Wouldn’t that be the truest show of devotion a daughter could offer?  

 

It wasn’t too late. Her mother’s body may have been taken by that vile family, but she still had her mother’s clothes, almost like relics.  

 

If she could send her mother off properly, even in this small way, it would be enough.  

 

A clarity swept through her mind like a cleansing gust of wind. The scattered, chaotic thoughts that had clouded her judgment began to settle.  

 

She had a destination now.  

 

St. Allante Monastery.  

 

The rest could wait until she properly honored her mother’s memory.  

 

With her decision made, Lisbell neatly folded the clothes, packed them away, and closed her bag.  

 

She recalled her mother mentioning where the monastery was when she was younger. To get there, she’d need to cross the vast ocean. Even after changing trains several times, she’d eventually have to pass through a port.  

 

Renbruck, known as a leading industrial city due to its rapid industrialization, certainly had a port.  

 

She remembered something Theodore had mentioned once—about a port near a farm his father’s factory had a contract with. Occasionally, when his father took him to the farm, they would attend the auctions held at the port.  

 

Even if it wasn’t Renbruck, many cities in Rechem had ports. The seafaring routes that connected to other nations were vital for economic growth, enabling industrial development and strengthening local commerce. Rechem, which had grown into a prosperous nation, made full use of these functions.  

 

It didn’t matter which port she used—she just needed to leave.  

 

Lisbell stood from the bench, gripping her bag. She needed to find the quickest route. She turned toward the train station to check the schedules. Since she had to stay up all night anyway, she might as well make use of the time.  

 

But as her shoes hit the ground, a sound pierced her ears—the persistent ringing of a phone she had been ignoring.  

 

  

 

A strange unease settled over her.  

 

Lisbell froze, as if someone had grabbed her. Slowly, she turned her head toward the ringing phone.  

 

Now that she thought about it…  

 

“That phone… it’s not for receiving calls, is it?”  

 

Why had she only realized this now?  

 

The phone was clearly meant for outgoing calls, not incoming ones. Who would even try to call this phone, expecting someone to answer?  

 

Her suspicion turned into a chilling sensation in her gut, spreading like frost through her body.  

 

The ringing wouldn’t stop. It rang, paused, and rang again—a third time now. The sound seemed to beckon her, an unseen hand urging her to approach. The echoes of the ringing spread like toxic fog, filling the floor, shaking the air, and encircling the ceiling.  

 

What had seemed like a familiar noise moments ago now felt unbearably sharp, like a shattering sound in her ears.  

 

The world around her grew deafeningly chaotic.  

 

Now that she thought about it, the emptiness of the station was also peculiar. No matter how strictly law and order were maintained, could it really be possible for no one to be here? Especially on such a stormy night…  

 

It seemed more plausible that someone had deliberately driven everyone out to create this artificial stillness.  

 

If that were true… running away wasn’t the solution.  

 

The situation felt like a trap, leaving her with no choice but to answer the phone. Lisbell slowly moved toward the device. The ringing pierced her brain like a sharp needle. Nothing about the sound had actually changed. The decibel level remained constant, but her heartbeat grew slower and heavier. The tension twisted her chest, rising with each step.  

 

Before she knew it, she was standing in front of the phone. The saliva in her throat wouldn’t go down. As she picked up the receiver, the dizzying noise abruptly stopped. The receiver felt impossibly heavy, as though time itself dragged on as she raised it to her ear.  

 

— …….  

 

  

 

The line was connected, yet silence hung in the air. Neither Lisbell nor the person on the other end spoke. A razor-sharp silence lingered, slipping like a blade across a shared breath.  

 

Even without words, the presence on the other end was undeniable, vivid in her mind.  

 

— Hah….  

 

A low sigh scratched at her taut eardrums.  

 

The first sound.  

 

A blend of a lament and a sigh of relief, it marked the moment when time, which had seemed to stand still, began to flow again.  

 

Lisbell’s hand trembled as she gripped the receiver. As if he could see her trembling, a quiet chuckle echoed from the other side. It felt calculated, as though he’d timed the mockery he hid like a knife beneath his tongue.  

 

There was only one person who could be this cruel and venomous toward her.  

 

With just a sigh and a faint laugh, she could already identify him. She loathed her ability to recognize him so easily.  

 

— Lisbell.  

 

  

 

— I know you’re there.  

 

  

 

— How do you feel, playing this game of hide-and-seek with me?  

 

  

 

— Have you decided to keep quiet?  

 

His voice, dry and low as it filtered through the receiver, was even more provoking than if she’d heard it directly.  

 

Lisbell closed her eyes tightly, then opened them again.  

 

When she still didn’t respond, the man began speaking again, as if coaxing her with false gentleness.  

 

— Don’t do this. Do you know how much I’ve been waiting for this moment?  

 

  

 

— I can’t even remember the last time I heard your voice. If you’d just say my name with that cat-like voice of yours, I might lose myself entirely.  

 

  

 

— Stubborn as ever.  

 

He clicked his tongue, his tone playful. Lisbell bit the inside of her cheek hard enough to draw pain.  

 

To him, this was still a game.  

 

To her, each moment was a life-or-death struggle, a series of unbearable decisions. But to him, it was nothing more than a whim, a trivial indulgence. And that realization was pushing her pride into the suffocating depths of helplessness.  

 

— Fine, then. Just keep listening quietly.  

 

  

 

— I’m not fond of this situation, Lisbell. You see, I’m not accustomed to watching someone’s back as they leave.  

 

What did he mean by that?  

 

His words often left marks on her mind, searing like brands. Lisbell tried to brush them off, to let them pass. She even considered hanging up the phone. But she couldn’t. She felt as though invisible chains were tightening around her, her body growing rigid.  

 

This phone call was dragging out the memories she’d tried so hard to bury, forcing her to confront them one by one.  

 

— Still, since you’ve gone through the trouble of running, why don’t you try hiding well?  

 

  

 

— Not a single strand of hair in sight. Hide completely….  

 

Every word he spoke dripped with deliberate leisure, his tone overflowing with confidence. To her shock, he hung up first, ending the call with an air of dismissive ease.  

 

Lisbell lowered the receiver slowly as the disconnected tone buzzed faintly in her ear. Her hand finally dropped when lightning silently flashed through the station windows, illuminating everything in stark brightness. The burst of light seared her mind like blue bruises etched into her memory.  

 

The man knew where she was.  

 

She only had one thought in mind.

 

She had to escape.

 

Lisbell slammed the receiver down as if throwing it. Then she quickly turned her body. Grabbing the bag she had set aside, she tried to run toward the entrance of the station she had just passed through.

 

But before she could, another thunderclap struck.

 

This time, it came with sound.

 

Boom—

 

The noise sounded as if the world itself was collapsing, and it grabbed hold of Lisbell’s ankle.

 



 

What if… he was already here?

 

What if he was already set up outside, waiting for her? If that was the case, leaving now would be like willingly sticking her head into a beast’s den.

 

Her hurried steps faltered, and she stopped.

 

The cold sound of rain pierced through her body. Lisbell slowly released the inner cheek she had been biting, the tingling pain on her mucous membranes helping her regain some clarity.

 

She had to focus.

 

If the strange scene inside the station was something he had orchestrated, then it’s possible that his influence had already reached this station. That meant it was highly likely he was waiting outside, preparing for her to come out.

 

But if that were the case, why hadn’t he made a move?

 

If he had already made it this far, he could have simply forced his way in. There was no need to create a situation like this, with her on edge.

 

So maybe…

 

‘Perhaps he’s trying to exploit my fear.’

 

Lisbell absentmindedly touched her neck, then turned her head to look at the phone. If the line was open, she could still make a call from another location.

 

In other words, Ulrich might not have even arrived here yet.

 

And based on everything she had experienced so far, he often set up scenarios where she was thrown into a situation to see how she would react. If this were another such case… leaving the station right now would lead to reckless consequences.

 

Shivering, her hands feeling unnaturally cold, Lisbell took a few steps back. She had to leave through a different exit, not the main one.

 

She looked around.

 

To the left, there were stairs leading to the platform where the trains arrived. To the right…

 

‘…A coach depot.’

 

Given the industrial nature of the new city, a large amount of goods was transported into the city every day, not only through the distant harbor but also via the train station. Therefore, the station needed coaches to transport goods, and they were kept in the depot.

 

Lisbell quickly headed toward it.

 

Since this station didn’t operate late-night trains, the depot was dark and silent.

 

She could see the iron doors tightly shut in front of the coaches, preventing any light from coming through. Likely, someone would open the huge doors when it was time to start the trains, and then the goods would be delivered to their respective locations.

 

If she hid here, it might be possible to escape the station without needing to pass through the main exit.

 

Lisbell crouched low and moved between the coaches. Some were empty, while others were already loaded with goods. The latter had probably been delivered last night, but because it was too late, they were planning to deliver them early the next morning. If she wanted to escape quickly, she needed to pick a coach that was already loaded.

 

Luckily, the coaches with goods had tags clearly indicating the items and their delivery destinations. After inspecting them, she found a large wooden box covered with a black tarp—perfect for hiding.

 

Lisbell grunted as she climbed onto the back of the coach. She carefully shifted the box to one side, creating just enough space for her to hide inside. Curling up, she pulled her bag into her arms.

 

For now, she had to wait until dawn.

 

During that time, she might hear sounds from outside. Someone might be certain she was inside and come looking for her, Ulrich’s subordinates, or perhaps him in person.

 

Lisbell exhaled a shallow breath, suppressing the urge to make noise.

 

Despite the situation, an odd sleepiness began to creep over her. Perhaps it was a physiological defense mechanism, her body cooling down due to stress, triggering an overwhelming urge to sleep. They say that when trapped in a cold place, one often falls into a deep sleep.

 

Hoping that the quiet rain would mask her presence, Lisbell fell into a restless sleep, waking in between.

 

“…Damn. It’s been raining like crazy since dawn…”

 

“What’s with this rain since the morning…”

 

“Anyway, let’s head out right away. The weather’s been bad, so we’re already delayed more than expected.”

 

“Let’s do that. Be cautious, the roads are slippery.”

 

Clunk!

 

The cart suddenly shook violently.

 

Along with the vibration, the boxes that had been hiding her small body all shook at once, waking Lisbell up. The storage area, which had been pitch black, was now brightly lit, as if nothing had happened. She didn’t dare poke her head out, but it was clear that the iron door, which had been tightly shut, was now open.

 

As she had guessed, the cart she was hiding in began to move little by little. The smell of rain pouring in from the separate exit, not the one for regular traffic, grew stronger.

 

The mist created by the rain during the night had spread thickly around them.

 

After a short while, the cart, having left the station, disappeared into the fog.

 

How long had they been going?

 

The cart had been shaking for quite some time. Lisbell, who had been holding her breath, realized they had traveled a long distance and released the tension in her neck.

 

Rubbing the stiff part of her neck, she lifted the black tarp around her and peered out. Not seeing Kings Morgan station or the plaza around it, it seemed they had passed the busy main road.

 

Good, at least… she had gotten out of the station.

 

The world, stained with relief, was slightly slanted. It seemed they were climbing a hill.

 

She cleverly moved the boxes that had been hiding her body. Then, gripping the high railing to keep the goods from falling due to the cart’s vibrations, she stuck her head out.

 

Since the cart was climbing a hill, it wasn’t moving too fast. The moment when she had jumped off the train with Mrs. Altahart’s secretary came to mind. Lisbell squeezed her eyes shut and prepared to jump off the moving cart.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

She rolled to the side, but fortunately, only some dust stuck to her, and she wasn’t seriously injured. After a moment of catching her breath while lying on the ground, she stood up, clutching her bag tightly.

 

‘The harbor… Is it only the harbor?’

 

The train station would likely be under even stricter surveillance from now on. No matter how hard she tried, there were limits to escaping in such a confined place. She had to head to the harbor, which was much larger, more crowded, and difficult to track, with many ships arriving every day.

 

‘The farm is on the outskirts. And there should be a harbor nearby.’

 

It was still raining, and her vision was limited, but that was not an issue exclusive to her misfortune. The people chasing her, under Ulrich’s orders, were also experiencing reduced visibility, so she needed to keep moving steadily despite her current discomfort.

 

Lisbell slightly lifted the front part of the cloche she was wearing. The tilted brim blocked the rainwater flowing down her face, allowing her to see a bit ahead. She wiped away the rainwater that hadn’t yet fallen off her cheek.

 

Given the weather, it would be great to catch a ride, but… she couldn’t risk being caught, so for now…

 

As she looked around, something brightly colored caught her attention. A red roof, standing out even from a distance.

 

It was the very place she had set out from this morning—Theodore’s house.

 

Just seeing it made her heart ache. The more she remembered the conversations that had taken place there, the more it hurt.

 

She probably wouldn’t come back again.

 

There was no reason to return, no excuse to.

 

So this would likely be the last time she’d see it…

 

She regretted not leaving a short note.

 

Theodoree, who had no idea of what had happened early in the morning, would surely be shocked when he realized she was gone. With his delicate and kind nature, his mind would be filled with worries.

 

Lisbell bit her lip tightly, turning away. She barely managed to swallow the sob that threatened to rise in her throat.

 

Then, a small, bitter laugh escaped.

 

When had her feelings for him become so full of regret?

 

Gradually, the laugh subsided, and Lisbell took slow steps toward the direction of the farm.

 

She resisted the urge to turn around repeatedly.

 

Revisiting the wounds she had given him, recalling the words of the person who had been by his side, reflecting on them, and engraving them deep in her bones… This was the farewell that had required such relentless effort.


Lisbell arrived at the outskirts earlier than expected.

 

There had been a crisis along the way. Without an umbrella, she had ended up completely soaked like a drowned rat, and her body, which hadn’t gotten any proper rest during the night, couldn’t fight off the fatigue that clung to her in waves.

 

Though she had definitely left behind the city with its government buildings and shops, entering the barren wilderness left her feeling confused, not knowing which way to go. It felt as though she had lost her way.

 

She barely managed to find shelter under a large, rounded rock, beneath the wide, light green willow branches, when she spotted a cart slowly approaching in the distance.

 

Thinking it might be someone looking for her, she hid, but it turned out to be a regular hay cart. Once she realized that, she had an odd feeling. This cart might be heading toward the farm she was after.

 

So, taking advantage of the driver’s distracted moment, she stealthily climbed onto the back. How many times had she done this, sneaking a ride? Lisbell smiled wryly as she hid behind the haystacks piled high.

 

As expected, the cart smoothly headed toward the outskirts. During the journey, the rain that had fallen all morning stopped. When she saw the large fields stretching out before a farm, Lisbell quietly got off the cart.

 

The harbor was much closer to the farm than she had expected. Standing on the hill where she could see the farm, she could even spot the harbor in the distance—so close that it could almost be considered next door.

 

Even from here, the bustling atmosphere of the harbor surged toward her, waking her senses. The long pier, the ships docked there, the many merchants, and the rows of shops were visible.

 

The scale of the harbor was larger than she had anticipated.

 

In a corner, people had gathered in a noisy auction, shouting at the top of their lungs, while several sailors moved briskly between the large ships and the harbor in preparation for the imminent departure.

 

Above, the clear sky had opened up, and seagulls, with wings spread wide, flew freely. Cats with tricolor fur, drawn by the scent of fish, darted around nimbly.

 

The lively atmosphere, as bustling as a market, was certainly a perfect place for someone to hide.

 

Lisbell lowered the brim of her cloche, which she had previously lifted, and approached the harbor.

 

She was hoping to do something about her wet clothes and was fortunate to find a clothing shop among the row of stores. Although she wanted to change into a blouse and skirt, her purse was tight, so she decided to save as much as possible and only exchanged her cape for a new one.

 

Standing in front of a mirror, she lifted the cloche, but despite the hat, her hair, already a tangled mess, could not be salvaged. She tried to comb through it with her hands, but the more she touched it, the worse it got. Eventually, it became so tangled that she couldn’t even brush it properly. Lisbell sighed as she looked down at the mass of hair in her hands.

 

“Lisbell’s hair is just like the cotton blossoms I held back then.”

 

“Should I call it a cute feeling…?”

 

She couldn’t help but recall the actions of the man who had always touched, combed, and even bitten her hair, as if he really liked it.

 

When Theodore said those things, they had come across as warm as sunlight, but when Ulrich spoke them, they felt utterly ridiculous, turning into an offensive insult that left her feeling deeply displeased. Her face scrunched up, as though she had swallowed muddy water, and Lisbell hurriedly untangled her hair.

 

She quickly finished fixing her hair before anyone could notice and pulled her hat back on. Unlike before, this time she rolled her long hair into a neat coil inside the hat, tucking in the stray strands.

 

After a brief greeting, she stepped outside.

 

The afternoon light, gentle and slow like a breeze, streamed down from the clear sky after the rain. It was hard to imagine the violent storm and thunderclaps of the early morning.

 

The harbor was full of curious onlookers. Even those not intending to take a boat seemed to have come to see the lively atmosphere firsthand. Blending in among the crowd, Lisbell managed to buy a ticket for the boat heading toward the country with the monastery.

 

There were still two hours until departure.

 

To kill time, Lisbell went in search of a crowded tavern to grab a meal. The inside of the tavern was dim, relying only on a few lamps to light the space.

 

A few sailors in dark blue uniforms were gathered in one corner, playing darts, while some other customers were sitting opposite each other, puffing smoke from their cigarettes and playing poker, laughing.

 

Lisbell, sticking to the wall to avoid them, sat down at a table closer to the bar and ordered a simple meal and drink.

 

Lisbell had been worried about getting asked questions, but it seemed the staff had encountered travelers like her before and didn’t show much interest. From the way customers were ordering more food, it seemed there wasn’t much time to spare for single diners. This allowed Lisbell to breathe a sigh of relief.

 

Although she had no appetite, she forced herself to eat the ordered food. Occasionally, when the food got stuck in her throat, she washed it down with water.

 

Then, suddenly, she sensed movement at a table behind her, which startled her. Reining in her stomach, which had nearly turned over, Lisbell gripped the handle of her bag tightly. She was ready to leave the shop at a moment’s notice.

 

But luckily, it seemed they were customers of the harbor, as they loudly called the staff over to place their orders. Lisbell, who had been paying attention, subtly diverted her focus and continued eating her remaining food.

 

“Damn it. The sole of my shoe’s all soggy. I must’ve stepped into a puddle up ahead.”

 

“Should’ve been more careful.”

 

“Did I know this would happen? What am I supposed to do when the car can’t come this far in? Damn it, why is there such sudden street control? And with all that military force being mobilized.”

 

Lisbell’s brief sense of calm didn’t last. The fork she had been holding fell from her mouth. Her attention quietly shifted back to the table behind her.

 

“Seems like there’s some dispute among the high-ups, huh?”

 

“No, no. I heard they’re looking for a woman.”

 

“A woman?”

 

“Yes. I saw some soldiers grabbing the shoulders of every woman who passed by, checking their faces.”

 

The food that had gone down her throat seemed to twist in her stomach. Lisbell, trying to suppress her nausea, gulped down some cold water.

 

“What? Is that true? Ha, wow. If it is, they’re really wasting manpower! Which woman managed to sneak off with some bigwig’s back and run away?”

 

Lisbell wanted to observe the situation with the same detached amusement as them, but there was something unsettling that made it impossible for her to laugh. Instead of amusement, cold sweat began to trickle down her back.

 

Control. Soldiers. Women. Faces….

 

Lisbell calmly packed her bag and stood up.

 

“From the way they’re searching every shop like rats, maybe it’s true.”

 

“Do you think this shop might get a surprise inspection too?”

 

“Could be. I heard soldiers were right by the side of the shop.”

 

Her steps, which had been heading directly for the exit, stopped because of those words. Lisbell quietly watched the sailors at the entrance tossing colorful darts.

 

A moment later, through the open door, she saw a shadow moving, like the edge of a swamp, swaying. A sharp instinct hit the top of her head. The air felt ominous. She immediately turned her body and moved back toward the inner part of the shop, away from the entrance.

 

When she was about to open the warehouse door she had seen the staff go in and out of earlier, a commotion erupted behind her. While the shop had been noisy throughout, this felt different.

 

In fact, if you measured by sound, the shop had become eerily quiet.

 

She could sense all attention in the room focused in one direction, and it reached her even at the back of her head. As she turned to close the warehouse door, she caught a glimpse of the shopkeeper, who had been standing inside near the long bar, rushing toward the door while shouting, “What’s going on?!”

 

Click…

 

She quietly shut the door and turned the lock.

 

Her heart was pounding fiercely.

 

The frantic beats of her heart, no longer hidden by the rain, surged within her chest, tightening their grip. Lisbell leaned her forehead against the door, her expression pained. Her stomach had become so cold that she felt like the food she had just eaten might crawl back up her throat.

 

Please, please.

 

She silently prayed to the unseen force behind the door.

 

You have been indifferent to me until now. So please, just this once… Please, let me not be discovered. Hide me.

 

Her desperate plea went unanswered.

 

The sound of heavy footsteps entering the shop filled the air, like the approach of an inevitable despair.


The salty smell wafting from afar was revolting.

 

Was it the scent of the sea, the harbor, or perhaps… escape?

 

Ulrich’s lazily closed eyelids lifted. His pale grayish-blue irises, framed by elegant lashes, reflected the vast expanse of the sea stretched before him.

 

Perched on a wooden cargo crate, he stared at the distant horizon, looking like a man on the verge of dozing off. Everyone wandering around the controlled inner harbor stole a glance at him at least once.

 

It was inevitable. His appearance had a captivating pull that was hard to resist. His bespoke shirt and pants were tailored perfectly to his frame, but the lack of a tie and vest, with a few buttons casually undone, exuded a freedom that enhanced his mystique amid the balance of order and chaos.

 

Even his posture, gazing pensively at the horizon as though lost in deep thought, contributed to the allure. The crimson hues of the setting sun danced around him, enhancing his beauty. The undying brilliance of nature seemed to exist solely for him.

 

Faced with such radiance, Ulrich closed his eyes again.

 

Thump, thump, thump.

 

The pounding in his chest grew more intense.

 

This was a first—something entirely unfamiliar.

 

It wasn’t just this strange inner turmoil. His hands and toes tingled, as if swept by an electric current, and without realizing it, he kept clenching and unclenching his hands, while his toes fidgeted restlessly.

 

What was this?

 

He’d get her eventually.

 

She would inevitably fall into his hands, yet this inexplicable unease lingered, as if things wouldn’t go his way.

 

It was so close now.

 

The lead from Kings Morgan Station had long been acted upon, and the area was under control. Finding nothing there had expanded the search area to this harbor near the outskirts.

 

She would only have confided in Theodore Mortier, the one person she had deep ties with in this region. If she’d learned of his circumstances, she likely would have been unable to restrain herself and fled here.

 

Other than him, there was no other connection she could rely on in Renbruck. Thus, she would likely try to leave Renbruck, and to do so, she would have to pass through either the train station or the harbor.

 

If not caught at the station, she must be here.

 

And if not here, the next step would be to comb through all of Renbruck to find her. To prevent any interference, he had personally silenced his mother by acquiring the massive Pyrilleo Mines at an astronomical price.

 

Yet still, his nerves remained unsettled.

 



 

Ulrich reached into his pocket, retrieving a gold case. He opened it to pull out a cigarette, then clamped it between his lips. The sharp sound of the case snapping shut echoed unnaturally in the stillness around him.

 

He idly bit the cigarette, scanning the harbor bathed in the glow of the setting sun.

 

A slow smile spread across his lips.

 

Yes, the unexpected variable had been failing to catch her at the train station.

 

Lisbell Osborne had undoubtedly been present when the call connected. Ulrich had already pinpointed her location through his informant before arriving in Renbruck.

 

Kings Morgan Station didn’t operate at night, and he had planned to arrive before dawn. Naturally, she should’ve been in his grasp by now. But somehow, Lisbell had evaded the eyes stationed around the station and slipped away with unnerving composure.

 

“Like a frightened cat, sneaking so delicately…”

 

He tilted his head and chuckled softly, his tongue curling in amusement. He almost wanted to laugh out loud, clutching his stomach. The platinum-blond hair falling to one side glistened under the natural light.

 

“Young master.”

 

Victor, who had momentarily stepped away for urgent business, returned with a scowl. Ulrich immediately understood the source of his reaction.

 

“I’m not going to light it, so stop glaring at me like that.”

 



 

“I just needed something to bite on.”

 

It was an excuse, but Victor didn’t seem satisfied. He glanced around, checking the surroundings for reporters who might have followed them.

 

There was no need for such caution. Anyone intent on following would’ve already done so.

 

Amused by the unnecessary worry, Ulrich bit the tip of his cigarette.

 

The Ulrich family had a strict policy against smoking outdoors, fearing the risk of being photographed by reporters. Similarly, except for a light pre-meal drink, they refrained from consuming alcohol in public.

 

For a businessman, public image was everything. It played a significant role in securing large investments or being introduced to influential opportunities. In a society where every aspect of one’s behavior could ripple through the business world, appearances were managed with the utmost care.

 

And Ulrich had never once crossed that boundary before.

 

Yet now, unable to endure this brief waiting, he had taken out a cigarette. Victor glanced around the harbor with a heavy heart. Thanks to the well-placed bribes over time, Colonel Craxson had readily lent his troops within half a day of the request. The soldiers dressed in Rechem military uniforms wandering around the harbor, inspecting the faces of women, were the manpower mobilized for this operation.

 

“My stomach feels unsettled.”

 

“Excuse me? Your stomach? How so? Is it serious?”

 

Victor’s immediate reaction to the monotone remark was exaggerated.

 

“No…”

 

He felt uneasy. Uncomfortable.

 

Ulrich knew well that this wasn’t a physical ailment. That knowledge made him say no more, clenching the cigarette between his teeth. The bitter taste spreading across his tongue mirrored his inner turmoil.

 

Far off, the half-disc of the sun burned on the horizon. He had only looked away for a moment, but in that time, it had sunk a little further below.

 

Bit by bit. Slowly. Like an invasion. Like erosion.

 

Anxiety.

 

What was creeping into him, unsettling his core, was anxiety.

 

It had been so long since he last felt it that its presence was unfamiliar.

 

Anxiety. A sense of crisis. Restlessness. Fear.

 

When was the last time he’d endured the messy, clawing sensation of such emotions? Ironically, Ulrich’s life had been stripped of these feelings, and with them, the dynamic pleasures of existence had been lost at the root. On the other hand, now that the fierce throb of his heart was vividly resonating within him, he had no sense of how time was passing.

 

Every day since Lisbell had been taken from him had been like this.

 

Handling what needed to be handled, organizing what needed to be organized- somehow, today had arrived. He couldn’t even fathom how he had managed to gather information on Daphne Schwaben, annul the engagement with her, and leave a thread of leverage over his mother.

 

His memory of how he had come this far was blurred.

 

In the process, there had been no room to feel the boredom that had clung to his life like a shadow. He had simply been… busy.

 

Before meeting Lisbell, the years, weeks, days, minutes, and seconds had dragged on endlessly, filled with nothing but monotony. It was so dull that he had wondered if the thirty-year mark he had set as the goal for his life’s end might never arrive.

 

But for the past few days, it was as though his life had finally found its rhythm. Time, once incomprehensibly slow, had flown by unnoticed until today.

 

And all his desire centered on one thing.

 

How to bring her back to his side.

 

Truly…

 

When did it begin?

 

When had he stopped feeling the ennui that had so relentlessly eroded his life?

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Isn’t it blinding?”

 

“Excuse me? Oh, uh, yes. The sunset is bright.”

 

No.

 

That was not it, Victor.

 

Dropping his cigarette, he clasped his mouth and chuckled, unable to suppress it. A low, stifled laugh escaped him.

 

“I think I finally understand.”

 

“Understand what?”

 

The vivid red light of the sunset blanketed Ulrich’s azure eyes.

 

“You… have never loved someone, have you?”

 

Perhaps this is what you meant when you spoke of love.  

 

These past days, my mind, obsessively preoccupied to the point of suffocation, has plunged into the madness of incomprehension, and perhaps that’s why I’ve ended up like this.

 

But even that raised a question.

 

Why?

 

How can one person’s perspective change so completely, so suddenly?

 

The reality of an emotion I had never felt any fondness for now seems to clear my mind, leaving me strangely relieved. I had dismissed this sensation as petty and insignificant, but—

 

If not this, how else can I explain the sudden disappearance of the ennui that had long drawn me to the edge of death?

 

I must have been enjoying it all along.

 

This unease, this deep, overwhelming, and distasteful pounding, this urgency devoid of leisure.

 

Even if it’s a chilling experience, I must have been enjoying it.

 

If the light Lisbell always clung to, trusted, and relied upon is something akin to this sunset… or this realization that strikes so fiercely, so brilliantly, with a hope close to defiant resolve—

 

If this is what love is… 

 

Ulrich’s blue, no, crimson-stained eyes burned with an intense gleam. They seemed to blaze like a living inferno, magnificent and unstoppable.

“How far along is the search?”

 

Victor suddenly spoke up.

 

Ulrich, feigning calm, easily caught the impatience subtly laced in his tone.

 

He turned to look at his assistant, but the latter was solely focused on Captain Reagan, who had been assigned to oversee this search by the colonel’s orders. Even in his gaze, a hint of unease was evident… something rarely seen from Victor, who was typically unshakably composed.

 

Ulrich recalled the urgent message Victor had just received.

 

“We’ve completed the auction house and shipyard inspections and are now combing through the marketplace.”

 

“How much longer will it take?”

 

“If we find anything in the marketplace, it will end quickly. But if we don’t… we’ll have to move on to the ship area. If it comes to that, it’ll take significantly more time. Every hidden compartment on every vessel will need to be searched. It could take all night.”

 

Captain Reagan explained calmly, but Victor’s expression remained grim.

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes.”

 

“What’s going on?”

 

“Excuse me?”

 

“There’s a problem, isn’t there?”

 

Victor’s face momentarily faltered, betraying him. It was clear that he could no longer hide the truth. Sighing, he approached Ulrich, who was seated on a wooden crate, and leaned down to whisper.

 

“A message came from the main house.”

 



 

“They’ve issued a summons.”

 

Ulrich’s thin lips curved faintly.

 

A summons?

 

Even during his time in Marnia, this had never happened. A summons was essentially a red alert, a move that reflected both desperation and urgency. That it was being issued now, in this critical moment when Lisbell Osborne was within reach, was a direct message from his mother about how critical the situation had become.

 

But still—a summons?

 

This was a power reserved exclusively for the head of the family, used only against traitors who posed a threat to the household. To invoke it now was a clear indication of how high the stakes were.

 

It was both a measure to protect herself and a declaration of intent to forcibly strip Ulrich of his authority. His mother was determined to prevent this encounter at any cost.

 

“…Ha.”

 

Leaning back, Ulrich exhaled deeply. The long-repressed urge to smoke crept up like a stubborn mold. Running his hand over his face, he looked every bit like a man on the verge of exhaustion. A wry, bitter smile slipped through his features, revealing hints of frustration and disdain.

 

“What should we do?”

 

“What’s the penalty for disobedience?”

 

“The hotel management rights.”

 

“How excessive. Who do you think built the hotel into what it is today?”

 

The Alstad Hotel was one of Ulrich’s crowning achievements. For her to threaten to confiscate it in order to stop him was absurd.

 

At this point, it was almost petty.

 

The situation reeked of stubborn pride—an unwillingness to let things spiral further but also a desperate attempt to salvage her own dignity, no matter how broken.

 

“If you want to defend the management rights, you’ll need to leave immediately.”

 



 

“Sir.”

 

Ulrich’s gaze shifted upward. A lone white seagull cried out as it soared toward the blazing sun, its flight resembling an act of self-sacrifice.

 

Such outdated rules.

 

He had never felt resentment toward the family’s ways before, but now they grated on him.

 

Yet, even so, Ulrich welcomed it.

 

The things that had once seemed hollow and emotionless were now shifting, taking on new meaning. It was all because of her. Lisbell.

 

This change was unfamiliar but exhilarating. He found himself curious—how far would this newfound sensation take him? A quiet, bittersweet desire stirred within him to keep her as an eternal mystery in his heart.

 

“You can’t lose this, sir. You poured everything into bringing the chain strategy from paper to reality.”

 

Victor, standing beside him, was worried solely about the hotel. But Ulrich’s thoughts were elsewhere.

 

He silently watched the soldiers led by Colonel Crackson scour the marketplace.

 

Even if they found her here and brought her back to the estate…

 

Would it solve anything?

 

No.

 

His mother, the pillar of the family, still stood unyielding. Even after shattering his engagement to the Schwaben family to demonstrate his lack of commitment to that relationship, his mother showed no signs of backing down.

 

Taking Lisbell to the estate would lead to the same cycle all over again.

 

“…It’ll just repeat itself.”

 

“In a similar, or perhaps even more maddening, manner.”

 

That was not the result he wanted. Returning with Lisbell under such circumstances would be akin to indulging in foolish stubbornness. It was a pointless endeavor—why initiate something when the outcome was already so predictable?

 

“…Sir?”

 

Victor raised his head to follow Ulrich, who had risen from the wooden crate.

 

Ulrich brushed back his hair, which swayed in the sea breeze. His eyes, fixed on the far-stretching ocean, had darkened to a deeper crimson hue than before.

 

“Call for a retreat.”

 

“Excuse me?”

 

“Let’s head back.”

 

Victor, momentarily stunned, quickly signaled to the captain. The captain, who had been observing the scene with quiet attention, gave simple hand signals to the subordinates standing farther away.

 

Even as this unfolded, Ulrich’s gaze remained locked on the marketplace, where soldiers in uniform bustled about.

 

If she’s there…

 

He wanted to rush over, grab her by the hair, and force her to crawl to him on all fours, sobbing that she’d never try to run again. He wanted to see her fragile, tearful vulnerability as she confessed how hard it had been for her during their time apart.

 

But he knew better than to expect such a sight.

 

She was the type of woman who, even with her resolve repeatedly shattered, always found new light to cling to and hope for. She reminded him of the riotous hues of a dramatic sunset—something that instinctively made him frown yet captivated him nonetheless.

 

His heart pounded relentlessly in his chest, an almost unpleasantly intense rhythm that wouldn’t subside. The thought of turning away from what might be the embodiment of all his whims left him deeply dissatisfied.

 

As he finally turned, he spoke to Victor.

 

“The shareholder rights I inherited from the late Gwen—how much are they worth?”

 

“…Pardon?”

 

“If combined with mine, how much would that make?”

 

“Uh… What? Sir, why are you suddenly—”

 

Victor, caught off guard, instinctively reached for his notebook but couldn’t hide his bewilderment.

 

Ulrich, masking his turbulent emotions with a faint smile, leaned closer and spoke softly to his perplexed aide.

 

“I’m asking how much ownership I need to remove my mother from her position as head of the family.”

 



 

“Hey! Over here!”

 

Bang!

 

Someone kicked the closed warehouse door. Although it wasn’t her body that was struck, Lisbell flinched as if she had been hit herself.

 

“What’s going on?”

 

“The door’s locked.”

 

“Won’t it open?”

 

“Locked from the inside. Someone seems to be holding it shut.”

 

The doorknob began to rattle violently.

 

Voices from outside shouted for the owner and demanded the key to be handed over immediately. The clamor on the other side of the door felt like whiplashes against her nerves. Lisbell, her heart pounding, mustered all her strength to hold the door.

 

Then, the doorknob jiggled. They must have brought the key.

 

No…

 

Lisbell’s eyes welled up with tears.

 

She couldn’t be caught so easily.

 

Frantically, she looked around and spotted a long rod lying in a corner of the warehouse. She quickly let go of the door and grabbed the rod, preparing to strike whoever entered.

 

Her hands, slick with nervous sweat, gripped the rod tightly as she waited. Then, suddenly, the commotion outside came to an abrupt halt.

 

“…What did you say?”

 

“I said retreat!”

 

“What are you talking about?”

 

“We’ve been ordered to withdraw!”

 

“Withdraw?”

 

“Yes!”

 

A small clicking sound of annoyance came from outside, followed by the shadow near the bottom of the door fading away. The heavy, sharp sounds of boots against the ground gradually grew distant.

 

Lisbell watched the scene in a daze, her breath caught in her throat.

 

When the last signs of movement around the door finally disappeared, her trembling hands dropped to her sides.

 

The rod she had been clutching like a lifeline slipped from her grip and rolled into the corner.

 

They were gone…


He just left.

Without opening this door, he simply, simply backed away.

The blood that seemed to have completely drained out through the soles of her feet now finally filled her veins again, as if restoring her once-cold body temperature. Sitting on the spot, Lisbell panted, taking deep breaths.

Tears, which had welled up on her powerless eyelids, streamed down her cheeks.

A beam of light stretched across the narrow storage room. Lisbell followed it with her eyes. Forgotten sunlight shone vividly, as if to restore the warmth of the self she thought had been shattered and broken into pieces.

Rubbing her dazed face with her arm, Lisbell clutched her still-heaving chest, trembling with the aftermath. Taking a deep breath, she placed her hands on the floor to stand up. Grabbing her luggage, she unlocked the door handle.

Carrying the tension that prickled at her throat, she cautiously stepped outside.

As expected, the earlier search commotion had become a hot topic, with people gathered in small groups, chatting animatedly. Fortunately, since the soldiers had searched various shops simultaneously, there wasn’t much attention on this particular storage room. Using their indifference as cover, Lisbell quickly slipped out of the tavern.

Confirming that the group of soldiers in uniform was retreating in the distance, she pulled her hat down low and moved in the opposite direction.

After having a close call with danger, she could no longer roam the shops comfortably. She lingered in the back alleys and corners of the marketplace, enduring until the time for boarding arrived.

Finally, a distant, deep booooom of a ship’s horn echoed.

Oddly enough, there were no further disturbances. The ship, now fully prepared, pulled up its anchor from the depths and spread its white sails wide.

“Departure!”

The booming voice of someone giving the command was accompanied by a whistle that seemed to pierce the heavens. Lisbell watched the gradually receding port of Lenbruck with a gaze filled with suffocating silence.



Saint Alante Monastery was nestled amidst a breathtaking landscape, surrounded by cliffs with endless waterfalls cascading down their rugged faces.

In the age of chaos and disorder marked by ceaseless bloodshed from war, this magnificent cliff had served as a sanctuary for treating patients and hiding people, eventually leading to victory in a long, brutal conflict. It was a place whose sanctity and divinity were proven through history.

The inner chapel, reached after passing through a long corridor, was a cruciform dome carved and modified from rock. Its ornate mosaics and marble decorations along the edges were an indescribable spectacle.

“Miss Osborne, this way.”

Someone called out to Lisbell, who was mesmerized by the serene atmosphere of the chapel, momentarily lost in thought.

Snapping back to reality, she quickly followed the voice.

Since escaping the clutches of Ulrich, divine mercy seemed to have taken a faint hold of her, as things were going surprisingly smoothly.

When she first arrived at the monastery, she was filled with uncertainty. Her mother had lived here, but Lisbell herself had no prior connection to this place.

To come uninvited and ask for help in commemorating her mother’s well-being seemed quite audacious. Even so, clutching guilt and responsibility in either hand, she had barely managed to mention her mother’s name.

Lisbell had even resolved to write to the abbot if direct access was denied. Therefore, being led into the monastery’s premises now felt surreal.

Perhaps it was fortunate that the priest she met at the entrance had been familiar with her mother’s name. At first, there was no reaction to Lisbell Osborne’s introduction. However, upon hearing the name “Helen Osborne” who had once been a nun here, his expression changed subtly, then quickly turned to one of surprise.

“Please wait a moment.”

Politely excusing himself, he had left and returned shortly, informing her that someone wanted to meet her and guiding her into the monastery. It became immediately clear that this was due to traces of her mother’s connection to the place.

“Darien, I’ve brought her.”

The room they arrived at was a small reception room.

The priest stepped aside to let her enter. Lisbell’s gaze naturally shifted to the interior of the reception room.

A person dressed in a white monastic robe with a soft sky-blue veil and a long gold cross hanging from their neck rose slowly to face her. It was clear from their appearance that they were members of the clergy.

“This is Darien, the vice abbot of our monastery.”

The priest explained in a hushed voice. Unsure of how to act, Lisbell hesitated before bowing deeply.

Darien’s calm gaze examined her face intently.

“You look just like Helen.”



“There’s no need to ask further questions.”

Gesturing to the priest with his eyes, Darien motioned to the seat across from him. Lisbell approached and sat down, the sound of the door closing behind the departing priest echoing softly.

The now-silent reception room felt awkwardly still.

That tranquility suddenly felt ominous. While it was true that her mother had once resided here, she had left the place in disgrace after conceiving Lisbell.

After abandoning her aspiration to become a devout servant of God and returning as an apostate, it is uncertain what kind of impression her decision left on the people of this monastery.

If they viewed it negatively…

“…Is Helen doing well?”

Lisbell, who had been staring at the floor uncertainly, suddenly raised her head. She immediately noticed the warmth in Darien’s eyes, akin to the gentle sunlight of spring.

That expression felt as if it reassured her that her decision to come here had been the right one, melting away the tension that had built up within her. Lisbell, her eyes reddened, quickly reached to wipe her face, almost fumbling.

“Well… my mother… passed away recently.”

Her fingers, gripping her luggage, curled inward. Darien was momentarily at a loss for words, then cautiously asked:

“…What happened? Was it an accident?”

“No, it was an illness.”

“I see…”

“Well, that’s part of the reason I came here with a request.”

“A request?”

“Would it be possible to hold my mother’s funeral here?”

“Her funeral hasn’t been held yet?”

“Due to circumstances, we couldn’t conduct the service. And as for her remains… they’re buried in a church near the capital of Rechem.”

“Then why…?”

It seemed he didn’t understand why she was requesting a funeral when the body was already interred.

“I don’t want that place to become the site for remembering my mother. She… didn’t stay in the capital by choice. And I couldn’t properly care for her in her final moments.”



“While she lived with me, my mother often talked about this monastery. She always spoke with such joy and happiness, as though her memories here were incredibly precious. Even though she had to leave because of me, I believe she always carried a longing for this place in her heart.”



“So this place came to mind. If my mother could rest here, I think I, too, would find some peace of mind. I don’t need a grand ceremony for the funeral. A small grave where I can remember her would be enough.”

Lisbell spoke with a voice heavy with tension, barely holding herself together.

“I don’t have her remains to inter, but I do have some personal belongings she left behind.”



“Would that… not be enough?”

Darien, who had remained silent for a while, finally rose from his seat.

“Would you come with me for a moment?”

He led her to a cemetery hidden in the shadow of a sheer cliff, picturesque as if painted.

“This place was once a field hospital during the war. Countless lives lost meaninglessly to the bloodshed of battle were buried here.”



“Now, only those officially affiliated with the monastery or directly connected to its internal affairs may be buried here. That means creating a grave for Helen would be a difficult task.”

So, it was a rejection after all.

Then her attempt at atonement was also…

Her head, heavy with despair, began to droop. But Darien’s next words jolted her back to attention.

“However… I will make it happen.”


“…What?”

Lisbell couldn’t hide her surprise at the unexpected conclusion. Seeing her astonishment, Darien offered a faint smile, as if he completely understood her reaction.

“Helen and I joined the monastery at the same time. On a stormy day, with heavy rain and snow, the two of us were left in baskets at the entrance to this monastery. Perhaps because we were both orphans, knowing neither our parents nor our origins, I’ve always thought of her as my own sister.”

Darien, who had been kneeling in front of a gravestone, slowly stood and turned to face Lisbell. His expression carried the same gentle warmth her mother always showed when reminiscing about the monastery.

“Even though Helen left this place with a child, it doesn’t change how I feel about her.”



“When you walked into the chapel earlier, I felt as though I was seeing a younger version of Helen. I never thought I’d experience such a moment again in my life. It felt like an unexpected, precious gift. Turning you away would leave me with an unforgettable burden.”

“…Is it really possible? Even without my mother’s remains?”

“As I mentioned earlier, this place was once a battlefield. Many of those buried here were interred not with intact remains but with mementos such as dog tags or other belongings, as their bodies were too damaged or missing.”



“If you have Helen’s belongings, that will suffice. The merciful God understands and watches over everything, no matter how it is done.”

A wave of warmth surged through her chest. The knot that had been tied so tightly within her finally began to loosen, as if breaking free. It was a burden that might have weighed on her for the rest of her life if not for this moment.

“Thank you… truly, thank you so much.”

Lisbell bowed deeply, repeatedly expressing her gratitude. Darien lightly patted her shoulder in reassurance.

“Come to think of it, we haven’t introduced ourselves properly. I’m Darien Faye. And you are…?”

“I’m Lisbell Osborne.”

“Osborne.”

Darien repeated the surname, inherited from her mother, with a voice full of vivid nostalgia. Lisbell quickly wiped away her tears with the back of her hand, letting out a deep breath of relief.

Here, it was okay.

She felt she could finally let her mother go in peace.



Darien took charge of all the preparations necessary for the funeral. Thanks to his position as a sub-prior, he managed to streamline many of the formalities that might otherwise have been difficult.

As he had mentioned, Helen wasn’t an officially recognized member of the monastery anymore, so Lisbell had to remain discreet to avoid drawing unnecessary attention.

“Lisbell.”

Standing by the window, gazing at the picturesque view, Lisbell turned at the sound of her name. Darien was standing there, holding a tray of food.

“Am I interrupting your thoughts?”

“No, it’s fine.”

In truth, she had been anxiously watching the horizon, unable to shake the unease that had risen with the morning sun.

It felt as if the monstrous man who haunted her thoughts might storm into the monastery at any moment. But knowing that he would have to cross a vast ocean to reach her eased her fear slightly.

With her mind somewhat calmed, Lisbell clumsily voiced a question that had been buried deep within her amidst the chaos.

“They’ve issued an order to retreat.”

“Retreat?”

The men who had stormed the harbor that day were undoubtedly Ulrich’s soldiers. They had scoured every corner, searching for a woman, blocking roads and rummaging through the marketplace. There was no question they were acting under his orders.

But why the sudden withdrawal?

Whatever the reason, it must have been dictated by Ulrich himself. Perhaps he had decided to give up on finding her. Or maybe something else had happened.

Not knowing what led to her narrow escape frustrated her. While she was lost in thought, Darien appeared.

When she tried to take the tray from him, Darien shook his head and gestured toward the table instead.

“Did you sleep well last night?”

“Yes, very much so. It’s so peaceful here.”

“Being far from the city, it’s naturally quieter.”

“I didn’t expect you to give me a room to stay in. Thank you for your kindness.”

Darien smiled softly as he uncovered the dishes on the tray.

“This room was the one Helen used during her time as a nun.”

“Oh, so it was my mother’s…”

“The lack of new entrants last quarter may be part of the reason, but I’ve also been selfishly trying to keep this room vacant as much as possible. This place holds so many memories for me.”

It was clear that Darien had no problem letting someone stay here for a night, and even more so if that someone was Helen’s daughter, a sharer of those precious memories.

Whenever Lisbell sensed Darien’s goodwill toward her, a quiet warmth spread through her chest.

There was no hidden agenda or malice in Darien’s demeanor, which eased Lisbell’s wariness.

Yet, every time she faced this unfamiliar kindness, something surged up from her core—a hot and aching lump. Lisbell recognized it as the rare warmth of human connection, something she hadn’t felt in a long time. It reminded her of the uncalculated care and generosity she once took for granted when she was with her mother or Theodore.

Indeed, distancing herself from that man had been the right decision.

Only after losing him had she begun to regain what she had unwittingly forfeited. Slowly but surely, the ordinary, everyday moments of life that his suffocating presence had eroded were returning.

She hoped that these fragile fragments of normalcy would continue uninterrupted.

“After breakfast, let’s head to the cemetery together,” Darien said.

“Is everything ready?”

“Yes. Given the circumstances, only another priest and I will be present. It will be a quiet farewell.”

That was more than enough. The thought of finally being able to pray for her mother’s peace filled Lisbell with resolve as she picked up her cutlery.

After breakfast, Lisbell followed Darien to the cemetery. In a discreet corner where no one would notice, a new gravestone and a small burial pit had been prepared.

“Darien,” called a priest, who had previously guided Lisbell into the monastery grounds. He was holding a rectangular wooden box, and Lisbell immediately knew that it contained her mother’s belongings, which she had entrusted to Darien.

The funeral proceeded simply, with only the two clergy members.

After the box was placed in the ground, soil was gently shoveled over it, filling the pit. A few drops of holy water were sprinkled over the pristine gravestone. The water trickled down, soaking into the earth below. Darien closed his eyes and recited a prayer, pledging peace and farewell.

Unlike the one-sided goodbye at the Portley Church, this truly felt like a proper farewell for her mother.

Yet, as Lisbell watched the process, a complex emotion overcame her.

She felt a lightness, as if a burden she had carried for so long had finally been lifted, but there was also a deep sorrow. It struck her that this was the process of truly becoming alone.

Even though her guilt had been a heavy weight, it had also been a strange source of comfort—keeping her mother alive in her thoughts.

But now, with everything laid to rest, she realized that neither Theodore nor her mother remained by her side.

She was alone.

Completely and utterly alone.

Being alone meant being treated as an outsider no matter where she went. That was what her life would be from now on. Though she hadn’t yet faced such a situation directly, the thought of becoming a solitary wanderer left her feeling hollow.

“Where will you go now? Back to your hometown?”

It was as if Darien had sensed her loneliness. Lisbell hesitated before slowly shaking her head.

“No. I’m not going back to Reckem.”

“Then…?”

“…I don’t know.”



“Where should I go?”

Darien’s expression turned curious. She didn’t know the full story, so it was natural for her to find Lisbell’s aimlessness odd.

But Lisbell truly felt lost. She muttered almost as if she were leaning on the God she believed in.

“There was someone I loved… but I hurt him deeply, and we parted ways. My mother is no longer here either.”



“So… I don’t even know what’s left for me anymore.”

“…Lisbell. Do you have nowhere to go?”

Lisbell blinked slowly, her eyelids trembling with a dull ache each time they closed.

She felt relief, but also unease.

Everyone said the world was vast, but that didn’t seem to apply to her.

Why was it that she had nowhere to go?

“If that’s the case, have you ever considered joining the monastery?”

“…What?”

“As a nun, here in this monastery.”

For a moment, she thought it was just an impulsive suggestion meant to console her. But when their eyes met, she saw that Darien’s offer was genuine. Her gaze locked with his steady, unyielding eyes, and she spoke without thinking.

“…How much can religion truly protect me?”


“What do you mean by ‘protect’?”

“I mean, if someone tried to forcibly take me away from here, would it be possible to stop them?”

A profound expression crossed Darian’s face as she studied Lisbell’s features, as though trying to discern the underlying unease behind her words.

“…I’m not entirely sure what specific situation you’re referring to, but once someone is admitted into the monastery, they’re protected by the vow of lifelong devotion. Unless they choose to break that vow or renounce their faith, no one can easily interfere with them. It’s akin to a religious oath. In this country, such autonomy is inviolable.”

Before meeting him, Lisbell had lived in a world where such protections seemed a given. A world where rights weren’t so easily crushed by wealth, family influence, or power.

But… the world she had known and this place were different.

Religion, after all, was not a system dictated solely by capital. It was a sanctuary of miracles and divine intervention, a refuge where even the unsolvable brought people crawling to their knees before God.

Lisbell reflected on the incident at the harbor marketplace.

When the soldiers had stormed in for an unexpected inspection, only to leave without opening the locked warehouse, she had felt a deep relief. It was as if a slender thread of salvation had come from the very God who had always seemed to turn a blind eye to her.

Perhaps the man’s unpredictable change of behavior back then was divine intervention. Or maybe the capriciousness itself had been God’s hand at work.

What was certain was that whatever light had guided her through those moments had also brought her safely to this place. The warmth of that sensation was so sweet that it tempted her into thinking that maybe this was destiny—a comforting delusion of causality.

After all, if not here, where else could she go?

Even Darian’s current attitude seemed like a stroke of fortune. The way she so readily offered Lisbell a safe haven for no reason other than her connection to her mother wasn’t something to take lightly.

Lisbell wanted to surrender herself to that warmth.

Here, with Darian and in this place that finally let her feel the kindness of humanity again after so long…

Perhaps even this was a testament to God’s mercy.

A sign that He would no longer turn away from her.

How many times had she been crushed, tormented, and imprisoned under the man’s cruel whims, desperately praying for a God who might save her? If this was the fulfillment of that longing, Lisbell could not bring herself to refuse it.

“Could you give me some time to think about it?”

It was a decision that required careful consideration—whether to bind herself to religion for the rest of her life. Darian, seemingly not expecting an immediate answer, nodded in understanding.

Yet, by the time Lisbell returned to her room that evening, she had already made her choice.

For others, the life of a cloistered monk might seem stifling, but for her, that very confinement was a necessity. The restricted scope of movement and the sanctuary’s inviolability would serve as a protective shield.

That night, Lisbell borrowed a pair of scissors from a priest. Standing in front of the mirror, she cut off her waist-length hair. The wavy strands of gray tumbled to the floor, scattering like brittle leaves.

She thought of it as a symbolic act—a ritual of sorts. A way to sever herself from the monster that had thrived on her despair, leaving only its remnants behind.

A silent prayer accompanied the act, a desperate plea for the monster to be sated and finally leave her.



“Bell! Here you are!”

She was staring at the large cross mounted on the altar when she heard the familiar voice, accompanied by the sound of the chapel door opening and closing.

Lisbell turned her gaze toward the speaker, unclasping her hands as she did. Standing there, smiling warmly, was a woman about her age dressed in the same attire—a fellow nun named Delilah who had joined the monastery last quarter.

“Was it your turn to clean the chapel today?”

When pledging herself to the monastery, Lisbell had been given the option to choose a name. Most chose a baptismal name instead of their given name, and Lisbell had done the same. “Bell” was the baptismal name she had received through Darian. Perhaps because it was derived from the latter part of her original name, it didn’t feel unfamiliar.

“No, it’s Sonya’s turn.”

At Lisbell’s reply, Delilah narrowed her eyes knowingly.

“So you just came here on your own again? I wondered where you disappeared to right after lunch. Do you like the chapel that much?”

Lisbell smiled faintly and walked toward Delilah, glancing back at the altar.

The cross, adorned with a few unwavering candles, reflected refracted light, giving it a soft glow.

Ever since she had stumbled upon this sight, Lisbell had found herself returning to the chapel whenever she had time.

Unlike Delilah or Sonya, her circumstances were different. The silent unease planted within her churned in her stomach like dark, turbulent waters.

But whenever she sat in the calming atmosphere of the chapel and gazed at the large cross, she felt a semblance of peace returning, as though the chaos within her was soothed.

And though that solace was fleeting, it was solace nonetheless.

「To live as one consecrated to God alone.」

Before entering the monastery, the petition vow handed to her by the priest contained that phrase.

Celibacy.

While the term could be open to interpretation depending on the context, Lisbell immediately grasped what it meant in the monastery’s expectations.

It signified a body that had not lost its purity.

The formation process leading up to the lifelong vow was meant to shape an individual into a devout servant of God.

Thus, any external sexual stimuli were strictly denied and deemed corrupt. Lisbell’s mother had been exiled for violating this principle, hadn’t she?

After a brief hesitation, Lisbell signed the document as if nothing were wrong. Almost involuntarily, her mind vehemently rejected the implication.

It was assault. What I lost wasn’t purity but autonomy.

The act with Ulrich wasn’t something that could ever be called intimacy or lovemaking. To attach such words to it felt like a profanation in itself.

She could not, would not, accept that she was defiled by that act. When her thoughts reached that point, it was almost out of sheer defiance that she completed her signature. Matters of such physical nature were deeply private, and as long as she kept silent, no one would find out. With nowhere else to go, Lisbell clung to this loophole to remain in the monastery.

Yet she couldn’t completely ignore the discomfort weighing on her heart.

This was, after all, a promise to God.

The thought that her falsehood might one day be exposed and lead to her being mercilessly cast out haunted her relentlessly.

For that reason, she found herself drawn to the chapel whenever she had the chance. She would stare at the cross, seeking solace and subtly confessing her inner turmoil. It was less a confession and more a self-justification—a desperate bid to ease her conscience. Without such acts, she feared she would be consumed by guilt and despair.

“Let’s go. The afternoon schedule is about to begin.”

Delilah’s voice brought her back to reality. Nodding, Lisbell tore her gaze from the cross and followed her.

“Today, we’re in charge of cleaning the common room.”

Life in the monastery was divided into two main aspects: adapting to the communal environment and studying religious doctrine.

The former required rigorous education in cooperation and responsibility, as living together necessitated shared duties. Cleaning and maintaining the monastery grounds fell into this category. Yesterday, Lisbell and Sonya had spent the morning washing all the bedding from their dormitory.

“Aren’t you coming?”

Although Delilah mentioned the common room, her steps didn’t lead in that direction, prompting Lisbell to react with curiosity. Delilah, who had paused to admire the blossoming white fringe trees heralding spring, shrugged her shoulders.

“They said a guest is visiting today. I thought we should take our time since they might not be finished yet.”

“A guest?”

“Sir Philip.”

Lisbell tilted her head at the mention of the name as she inhaled the faint fragrance of the tree branch Delilah had handed her.

“Sir Philip? Didn’t he visit just last week?”

Seemingly understanding her confusion, Delilah replied in a matter-of-fact tone.

“Yes. Bell, you wouldn’t know this since you’re new, but Sir Philip is a frequent guest here. His family has been devout for generations, and they make substantial donations to the monastery every quarter. He’s practically a treasured patron here.”

Delilah added that such a distinguished guest’s visit shouldn’t be disturbed. Though her explanation was thorough, it didn’t entirely satisfy Lisbell’s curiosity. Something still felt unclear.

“But today isn’t even a day for regular worship,” Lisbell remarked.

What business could an external guest have at the monastery on a non-worship day? Sir Philip’s reason for visiting remained a mystery.

Delilah sighed lightly before continuing.

“He’s here to receive prayers from the priest. Or sometimes to offer them himself.”

“Prayers…?”

“Sir Philip has a young daughter who’s been battling a congenital illness since birth.”

 It was an unexpected story, and it surprised her a little.

“Oh, his daughter…”

“Yes, we only found out recently. From what I heard, the family doctor gave her a terminal diagnosis a long time ago, but Sir Philip’s daughter has lived far beyond the life expectancy the doctor mentioned at the time.”



“Sir Philip seems to consider it a blessing from God, which is why he’s been visiting more frequently than before.”

Lisbell understood. Few people could empathize with the pain of a family’s suffering better than she could. She had carried the burden of guilt and responsibility like a stain ingrained in her, unable to let go of it, which had led her to this place. She could completely relate to Sir Philip’s desperate efforts, even to the point of seeking solace in religion.

“Shall we head out now?”

Brushing aside the cluster of white petals that had fallen from the tree branch, Delilah turned toward the common room. When the two of them arrived, the timing seemed perfect, as the door that had been closed moments earlier opened just as they reached it. Straightening her posture and bowing her head, Delilah greeted the departing figures. Lisbell followed suit beside her.

Trailing behind Darian, a stranger’s face caught Lisbell’s eye.

Tall, with a thin and wiry frame. His lips carried a gentle smile, but his complexion was shrouded in a subtle gloom that seeped into every corner of his demeanor. Despite his somber aura, his attire was strikingly elegant and refined.

Lisbell instantly recognized him as Sir Philip, the man with a sickly daughter.

“What brings you here?” Darian asked, turning to the two of them. Delilah responded politely.

“Bell and I are assigned to clean the common room today.”

“I see. This is Sir Philip. Both of you, greet him.”

They bowed courteously, and Sir Philip returned the gesture with the noble smile characteristic of his status. After a brief exchange, he followed Darian and walked away.

Lisbell’s gaze lingered on his retreating figure a little longer than necessary.

“Bell! What are you doing?”

Delilah’s voice snapped her out of her reverie, and she quickly replied, “Coming,” before stepping into the common room. As she walked, Sir Philip’s image floated in her mind.

It was a face that evoked a sharp sense of déjà vu.

It wasn’t a matter of having seen him somewhere before. No, it was the expression itself—one that appeared composed on the surface but was painfully worn and hollow within. It reminded her of someone she had seen in the mirror while caring for her mother in Marnia.

It reminded her of herself, her past self.

She saw in Sir Philip a reflection of who she used to be.

Of course, recognizing this did not mean she could do anything about it. But the flood of raw memories he stirred up brought with it a sense of kinship and empathy, uncovering a wound she thought she had buried under layers of resolve.

Having a sick family member is a heavy burden.

It made perfect sense why Sir Philip visited the monastery so often, enough for the sisters to recognize him. He was clinging to whatever he could for hope, desperate enough to offer even his soul if it meant relief.

Who loves more deeply? A parent for their child, or a child for their parent?

Lisbell dismissed the thought as a pointless question, joining Delilah in cleaning the common room. At the time, she assumed her fleeting encounter with Sir Philip was the end of it.

So when she later found him alone in the chapel, she was taken aback.

It was a time when there were no regular services. Lisbell had never seen anyone else during her quiet visits for reflection. Thus, when she opened the door and noticed an unfamiliar figure seated in the middle of the pews, she froze for a moment.

At first, she didn’t recognize him as Sir Philip. She merely thought he was someone, like her, seeking a fragment of peace.

Then, faint sobbing began to rise, muffled and restrained, but audible nonetheless.

Lisbell, seated a few rows behind him, didn’t need to crane her neck to confirm the source. The man’s once-straight shoulders had slumped, and his upright posture had collapsed. He was crying silently, as if carrying the weight of a deeply personal sorrow. His whispered prayers rippled through the still air of the chapel.

She didn’t need to see his face to know who he was. The image of his melancholic expression from earlier came vividly to mind. Remembering his frequent visits to the monastery erased any doubt.

She could also guess the content of his tearful prayer.

He must be pleading for his daughter’s life.

It was no different from when she clung to each line of scripture, wishing desperately for her mother to open her eyes.

Feeling uneasy, Lisbell stood up earlier than usual, intending to leave him in peace.

But she didn’t make it far before stopping. Hesitating, she reached into her pocket and pulled out a handkerchief she always carried just in case. Weaving between the pews, she cautiously approached him.

As she got closer, she confirmed that it was indeed Sir Philip. So engrossed in his emotions, he didn’t even notice her presence. Lisbell hesitated briefly before opening her mouth to speak gently.

“Um…”

He startled and opened his eyes, which were brimming with tears. The intricate colors of the chapel, refracted through the mosaic windows, illuminated the deep sorrow pooled in his expression.

Lisbell hesitated, unsure of what to say, and ultimately chose to stay silent as she extended the handkerchief.

Sir Philip, clearly taken aback, accepted it with a slightly bewildered look. A moment later, he seemed to realize the gesture was meant to comfort him. Lowering his gaze, he let out a long sigh, heavy with unspoken emotions. Even his breath carried traces of lingering sadness.

“Thank you. I’ve shown you an unsightly side of myself.”

“It’s nothing.”

Using the handkerchief to wipe away the tears on his cheek, Sir Philip glanced at her briefly.

Soon, his gaze shifted, becoming more inquisitive.

“I am Philip Winchester. I’ve been visiting this monastery for many years, but I don’t recall seeing your face before.”

Though they had briefly exchanged greetings earlier, it was likely too fleeting for him to remember her. Lisbell thought it reasonable and responded calmly.

“I recently joined under Lord Darian’s recommendation.”

“And your name is?”

“…Bell.”

When introducing herself, she often found her full name, “Lisbell” almost slipping out. Only after a moment’s pause did she manage to offer the appropriate response.

Sir Philip nodded and fell silent for a moment before asking another question.

“Did you overhear my prayer?”

“No. I only heard… the sound of your sorrowful crying and came to check.”

He gave a faint, bitter smile.

“At my age, crying like this in front of others is hardly dignified. Yet, I can’t seem to help it. Whenever I come before God and speak, it feels as though the reins holding me together unravel completely. I have a sick daughter, you see. Thinking of her feels as though my heart is being torn apart.”

Although she already knew of his circumstances, Lisbell decided it was better to remain quiet and simply listen.

“Bell, you see…”



“I would do anything—absolutely anything—if it meant my daughter could live a better life. If she could go outside, bask in the sunlight, and run freely, I’d give everything I have to make it happen.”



“That’s how desperately I wish for it.”

Lisbell hesitated, her lips moving wordlessly for a few moments before she finally mustered the courage to speak.

“…I understand.”



“My mother was gravely ill as well.”

She refrained from adding that, unlike Sir Philip, she had lacked the power or resources to do anything about it. She couldn’t afford to make significant donations to the monastery, couldn’t frequent this place as if it were her home, or plead with God for a miracle. All she could do was endure, suffering under the whims of the man who loomed over her life, with no means to fight back.

Even though it was now a part of her distant past, the mere memory of it left a bitter taste in her mouth.

“So… I sincerely hope your daughter regains her health.”

He didn’t say anything in response. Concerned that she might have said something wrong, Lisbell carefully studied his expression, but it didn’t seem that way. Rather, it felt as though he was at a loss for words—or perhaps his throat had tightened.

It seemed her words, her shared experience, had resonated with him on a profound level.

This wasn’t mere human sympathy; it was a deep, bone-deep connection born from shared pain.

﻿Chapter 131


“Thank you for saying that. Oh no, my handkerchief…”

Trying to hide his emotions or perhaps out of embarrassment, he rubbed his lips awkwardly, only to notice the damp state of his handkerchief and let out a sigh.

Lisbell responded with a gentle smile, signaling that it was alright.

“You don’t have to return the handkerchief. I’ll take my leave now.”

“Wait, Bell.”

“Yes?”

“Would it be possible for us to meet again later… in the confessional?”

Lisbell blinked, startled.

Could just a few words have been that much of a comfort? At the same time, it dawned on her that Sir Philip must be going through such a hard time with no one to rely on. She hesitated before speaking.

“Well, since I haven’t taken my perpetual vows yet… I’m afraid I can’t oversee a confession.”

“It’s fine. You don’t need to offer prayers or blessings. Just listening is more than enough.”

“That’s….”

“If you don’t want to, I understand.”

“…I’ll ask the priest about it.”

Though she said this, it would likely be approved. Wasn’t Sir Philip considered an esteemed guest of the monastery? Even if it wasn’t for a formal confession, they’d surely allow her to simply lend an ear.

Perhaps sensing this as well, Sir Philip’s expression brightened. Was this really okay? She felt a brief pang of concern, but seeing his face, her doubts quickly dissipated. Lisbell couldn’t quite discern whether this willing heart was truly for Sir Philip’s sake or if it was to comfort her own, scarred past.



“…Could you hang this?”



“Bell.”



“Bell!”

Startled, Lisbell snapped out of her thoughts and turned to her side.

“Huh?”

“This, could you hang this up?”

“Oh, right.”

Lisbell took the laundry Delilah handed her, spread it out carefully, and hung it on the line. She smoothed out the fabric with her palm to avoid creases, gave it two quick shakes, and clipped it to the edge with a peg. The fabric fluttered in the wind that blew past.

Her gaze drifted unconsciously down to the cliffs below, where the wind originated. It was almost a reflex. A quiet chuckle came from beside her.

“Bell, you’re quite the thinker, aren’t you?”

“Huh?”

“Always going to the chapel whenever you have time, or getting lost in thought like this. You seem to ponder a lot.”

Delilah said, humming a tune as she pulled another piece of laundry from the basket.

Lisbell felt slightly awkward, wondering if that’s how others saw her. She couldn’t outright deny it—after all, she often caught herself, almost habitually, gazing at the scenic view beyond.

Of course, there was a reason why she often found herself in such a state.

‘…Too.’

Quiet.

Calm and serene, to the point where even the flow of air could be felt at her fingertips—peaceful, even.

For Lisbell, however, this overwhelming tranquility carried with it an odd sense of unease.

What kind of resolve had she embraced when she chose this place as her new haven? She had prepared herself for the oppressive presence of a man as tempestuous as a violent gale. What would she do if that happened? Would she have to leave? If so, where would she go next? Was there any place better than here? Her thoughts collided, fractured, and split apart, day by day.

But contrary to her worries, ever since joining the monastery, her days had been unthinkably tranquil. Lisbell bit hard on the inside of her cheek. A sharp sting spread. Could this all be a dream? Her body, still haunted by memories of a hellish past, occasionally resorted to such self-destructive actions to confirm reality.

She had longed for such a life, but now that she had it, she felt only anxiety. It was as though she alone was aware of an impending catastrophe, waiting in dread.

‘…Come to think of it, that day was strange, too.’

The day when, despite reaching the storeroom of the tavern, he had suddenly ordered a retreat—this recent memory began to nag at her.

It wasn’t a bad sign.

The abrupt withdrawal then and the unbroken tranquility of her current life seemed to point to a hopeful possibility.

‘Has he… grown tired of me?’

Could it be that the moment had finally come?

Yes, Ulrich was bound to wake up eventually.

She was someone he had no reason to oppress, bind, or obsess over. She had nothing to offer—neither family, personal gain, nor any political or economic advantage.

Perhaps, in the course of searching for her, he had come to this immutable realization. Facing the futility of his actions might have brought a storm of disillusionment upon him, and if so, yes, it was entirely possible he would give up.

Yet, when confronted with the possibility that it might really be over, she found herself bewildered.

Really?

Was this truly how it ended between them?

Was it true that the tiresome thread tying them together had finally frayed?

“…The weather’s nice,” Lisbell muttered suddenly.

“Hm?”

“I said, the weather’s nice.”

“Oh, yeah, it is. Then again, isn’t it rare for the weather to be bad here?”

Lisbell, matching Delilah’s cheerful laugh, reached into the basket and pulled out another piece of laundry. She was still mulling over the oddly liberating thought—like a bad tooth finally pulled—when Delilah struck up a conversation.

“Did you hear? The funds for the new cathedral they were planning to build in the capital have finally been raised. Apparently, Sir Philip made an enormous donation.”

“Really?”

Lisbell responded nonchalantly, holding the now-empty basket, but Delilah nudged her lightly in the chest with her elbow.

“Didn’t he say anything to you?”

“Say anything? About what?”

“Well, you’ve built some rapport with Sir Philip, haven’t you? I thought maybe you’d mentioned something that inspired him.”

“I… I didn’t do anything. I just listened to him.”

Lisbell’s homeland wasn’t here, and as a newcomer to the monastery, she wasn’t devout enough to claim deep faith. Though she occasionally lent an ear to Sir Philip’s confessions, she insisted that her actions carried no hidden intent.

“If he cherishes you that much, maybe you should try asking him for a personal donation.”

“What? That’s absurd. How could I take advantage of a man desperate over his daughter?”

“Oh, come on, I was kidding!”

Delilah, startled by Lisbell’s rare serious tone, quickly laughed and slung an arm over her shoulder.

“Still, this is something Darian should hear and praise you for. Even if you say you just listened, who knows? That might have meant the world to Sir Philip.”

“Maybe…”

“You’re heading to the confessional tonight, right?”

When Lisbell nodded, Delilah patted her on the shoulder, saying she worked hard.

After finishing the laundry, Lisbell had a bit of personal time back in her quarters. As the sky shifted from crimson to gold and finally to a dusky gray, she reflected.

Later, with her Bible tucked under her arm, she made her way to the chapel after dinner.

As expected, her request to oversee the confessional had been approved. It was an exceptional decision—normally, only priests or those of higher rank could occupy the confessional.

This spoke volumes about Sir Philip’s status within the monastery. It was evident they didn’t want to offend him.

As she’d told Delilah, it wasn’t a difficult task. Lisbell simply had to sit quietly and listen to the voice that came through the small confessional window. She wouldn’t offer absolution or lead prayers—her role was merely to be present.

Through the translucent glass, she caught a glimpse of gray hair sticking out from beneath her veil. Since cutting her hair short, she sometimes struggled to keep it neatly tucked away.

As she adjusted the stray strands, she felt a presence on the other side of the confessional.

Lisbell lowered her hand from her veil and quietly opened the confessional window.

The air that wafted in felt oddly cold—despite the fact that spring had already arrived.


“Bell. Are you there?”

Lisbell’s fingertips curled involuntarily.

The beginning was different from usual. From the sound of his voice, the person in the confessional was clearly Philip. When the confessional window was left open, he would not usually address her directly; instead, he would spill out long-winded complaints as if trying to release the burdens weighing on him.

“Are you there?”

“…Yes, Philip.”

She didn’t know why he was confirming her presence, but since she didn’t think it was an important matter, she answered willingly.

Philip seemed to have relaxed upon hearing her response and returned to his usual demeanor before speaking.

They had met like this about five times so far.

Through these encounters, Lisbell had gathered some vague information about his daughter.

Her name was Sawyer Vinchest, and she was only eight years old. Lisbell couldn’t help but wonder how one could be so devoted at such a young age. She was at an age where the days ahead were far more numerous than the days already lived.

Sawyer’s illness was a rare disease that even doctors had never encountered. It was so rare that it required the advanced medical knowledge of more developed countries, and there was so little information about it that relying on religion seemed to be the only way to hope for divine intervention.

“Bell. I have a request today.”

Philip suddenly said this, after previously opening up about his time spent with his daughter.

Lisbell, who had been listening quietly, widened her eyes in surprise.

“A request? What kind of…?”

“Would it be possible for you to pray for me, even if it’s briefly?”

She briefly recalled Delilah’s words, thinking that this moment might have been deeply moving for him.

Lisbell hesitated but then opened the confessional window a little more.

Given his recent donation to the cathedral’s funds, it was clear that he was someone deserving of utmost courtesy. To upset him would result in undesirable consequences for the monastery, and that could, in turn, have a negative impact on Lisbell as well.

It wasn’t actually such a difficult request.

If they weren’t in the confessional, it would be something Lisbell could do freely. She had often seen Sonya or Delilah earnestly fulfilling requests to pray for others who came seeking guidance.

“I understand,” she said briefly, and just as she spoke, a hand slid over the open confessional window.

Lisbell gazed at the hand, squinting. Was he asking her to hold it? She wasn’t sure if it was necessary, but she thought that if it could bring comfort to someone in distress, there was no reason not to do it. So, she reached out her own hand.

“…!”

Immediately, a powerful grip enveloped the back of her hand.

It wasn’t a cautious or careful grip; it was a near-snatch, almost like a sudden pull. It felt like being swept away by a strong wave, and for a moment, she couldn’t breathe.

Now that she focused, something felt off.

She had never truly seen Philip’s hand properly, but the one holding hers was far too pale and delicate for his. Compared to his thin body, the fingers were firm, the joints thick, and the shape was strikingly graceful, almost sculptural. If she were to describe it, she would say it was so exquisitely formed that it seemed out of place on Philip’s body.

Lisbell couldn’t help but think of a stranger as she looked at the hand.

A chill ran down her spine, and she shuddered.

As soon as their hands touched, his grip tightened like a vice. The rigid fingers dug into her, almost as if to forcefully separate her own. The joints of her hand seemed to scream silently as they were forced apart against her will.

Being physically caught only made the discomfort sharper. There was an unfamiliar feeling rising inside her, one she couldn’t shake.

This hand… where had she felt it before?

Her thoughts cleared, and a tingle spread down her neck. This sculpted hand had most likely been on her body before. Pressing against her neck, gripping tightly around her delicate throat, tightening the air passages cruelly.

“Wait…!”

Lisbell tried to pull her hand free from his tangled grip, but no matter how much she struggled or shook, she couldn’t escape.

“Let… let go… please, let go!”

The frantic movements of her body grew more intense as she suddenly stood, causing the chair to topple backward with a loud crash that echoed in the small space.

A wave of unstable vibration spread from deep within her chest. The terror of a deadly poison spread throughout her, consuming her sense of self. It felt as though she were about to die from touching some kind of disease. Lisbell swung her arm wildly in a frenzy, but the strength of the grip made it impossible to break free. Her arm felt like it might be pulled out of its socket instead.

“…Ugh…!”

It all happened in an instant.

The hand that had seemed intent on dragging her into a hellish abyss released her without hesitation. The sudden change in force made Lisbell stumble backward, landing hard on the ground. Her tailbone ached sharply from the impact, but there was no time to focus on the pain.

The door opened. The door to the confessional remained tightly closed, but the person on the other side had stepped out.

The sound of footsteps grew louder, and Lisbell, pale and trembling, slowly pressed herself into the corner, as if she wanted to escape even from the small space. When she realized there was no longer anywhere to run, she scratched the wooden floor so hard that her nails nearly tore.

Knock. Knock.

The sound of the knock echoed through the small space.

Lisbell, feeling as though she would hyperventilate at any moment, clutched her chest. It seemed like she shouldn’t even make a sound, not even a breath the size of an ant’s nail. She consciously suppressed her breathing, hoping that no one would notice she was here.

But, as always, the situation did not go as she wished.

As if the knock had sufficiently signaled the intrusion, the door opened without hesitation. Her trembling eyes couldn’t contain their fear and fell toward the floor, where shadows, like muddy water, pooled at her feet.

“Bell?”

The voice that came next drained the strength from her body.

The sudden relief that rushed toward her felt like a sharp jolt as Philip’s face appeared. The hand that had been clutching his chest so tightly that the wrinkles on his clothes were crinkling slowly dropped.

Lisbell, sitting there as if she had lost all strength, snapped back to reality at the sight of Philip’s face, which was full of concern for her.

Unfortunately, the shallow doubt that had already crept in couldn’t be dismissed so easily.

She hastily ran out of the confessional and threw open the door to the small room where Philip had been just moments ago. The space looked the same, as though everything had been reversed, but there was no one there.

It was empty.

Only then did a deep sense of relief settle deep within her. Yet, the aftermath of the malicious emotions seemed to root deep inside, and an anxious, racing heartbeat continued without stopping.

A sudden dizziness struck. With fear dissipating, panic filled the void, and it repeatedly nudged at her consciousness.

“Sir, I… I’m sorry, but I’m not feeling well today…”

She couldn’t even finish her sentence properly. However, just seeing her pale complexion, Philip could already tell that she was in no condition to continue, and he nodded with a look of concern.

She had no idea how she managed to return to her quarters.

‘Ah, the Bible…’

It wasn’t until she had arrived at her quarters that she realized she had dropped the scripture she had taken with her, like a lost item. There had been no time or mental space to focus on it. If she had, she would have dared to ask Philip, despite the impropriety, if he could just show her his hand once.

‘Was my mind… too far gone?’

Lisbell slumped onto the bed, unable to calm herself, muttering quietly.

The one who had been beside her was indeed Philip, and there was no one in the space he had just left.

If it were simply a misunderstanding, then it could be easily concluded. But that wasn’t so simple.

If it was indeed a misunderstanding, how far did that misunderstanding stretch?

What about the hand that had been wrongfully seen?

That overwhelming strength that had pulled her in—was that part of the confusion and misunderstanding as well?

But that sensation had clearly existed.

The cold, invasive touch that dug into her joints and the feeling of being bound, as though she had been struck by a whip and left immobilized. The strength that had pulled her, pushing the eerie feeling of déjà vu to the forefront, was something she couldn’t mistake. Her instincts screamed that it was unmistakable.

“…Ha.”

A dry, hollow laugh escaped her lips, wilting in the air like a dead flower.

What was this?

Was she losing her mind?

Could Ulrich have already found her and infiltrated this place? She denied it, though, as she had confirmed his absence with her own eyes. But the anxiety and unease she couldn’t shake were driving her into a state of near madness.

Or perhaps, it was nothing.

But if it was, what would she do?

What if he had already found her and was planning something sinister?


Should I run away from here right now?

 

But where to?

 

And until when?

 

It hadn’t even been half a day since she was happy thinking that his fickleness might have caused him to lose interest in her. The fact that her mood could turn as wretched as flipping a palm because of that man’s presence was undeniably unpleasant and unsettling. It felt like evidence that she could never escape from him in the future…

 

‘…again.’

 

She couldn’t breathe.

 

Lisbell, like someone who curses in silence, opened her mouth and rubbed her nape vigorously. The feeling of the shackles that had been fastened here at that time surged up, piercing through her current consciousness.

 

She tried to keep her nails down somehow, but by the time she came to her senses, she had already scratched herself enough to break the skin.

 

The sound of scratching reached Lisbell’s ears, but it felt quite distant. The delicate skin, unblemished by anything, was exposed to the nails, leaving long, stinging scratches.

 

Her body, which had slumped forward as if being dragged, fell over. She buried her forehead into the sheet and rubbed it back and forth, scratching her neck frantically. She knew her flesh was torn and the red blood was pooling inside her round nails, but her senses seemed to be malfunctioning and wouldn’t respond.

 

At least for now, the fear left by the sinister touch was pulsing more vividly than her stern command to pull herself together.

 

“Ugh… mm.”

 

For a moment, it felt like she had caught a chill, and her whole body became cold. The outside weather, which Lisbell thought had become warmer and that spring had finally arrived, felt unbelievably cold, penetrating deep into my bones.

 

Later on, it scratched her arms and legs as if it were contagious. The filthy sensations of the past, when the man’s large and beautiful hands would grip her wrists or press down painfully to spread my calves or thighs, were all awakening. Her throat felt constricted.

 

Why?

 

Why isn’t it coming off even though I’m scratching it?

 

Why does it still feel like it’s clinging to my body…?

 

The clothing that wrapped around her arms and legs became a mess. Even the veil that barely covered her hair slipped down gradually, coming undone with her spasmodic movements.

 

In an instant, Lisbell, who had become a ragged mess, suddenly stopped all her actions, gasping for breath as if she had been stabbed in the lungs.

 

After a while, the exhausted sheep collapsed in front of Lisbell.

 

Throbbing filled her senses.

 

It felt like an invisible blunt object was striking the back of her head, causing a sharp pain. She raised her hand with eyes drained of all strength. Lisbellt was the same side that had been caught in the confessional a moment ago. It felt as if an invisible bug was wriggling and crawling on it.

 

When Lisbell regained her composure for just a moment and saw that even her other hand was scratching with the opposite hand, a laugh that sounded almost deranged escaped her lips.

 

She let her arm drop, which had been held up to my eyes. The bloodstains smeared at the tips of her fingers drew a messy doodle on the white sheet. Even knowing the sheet would get dirty, one part of her mind was hazy. The faint smell of blood tormented her nostrils.

 

Slowly turning onto her side, Lisbell curled up her body. She kept gathering herself until her chest and knees almost touched.

 

With bloodshot eyes, Lisbell stared to the side and then tightly closed them.

 

Thud, thud, thud.

 

This was truly a fear without substance.

 

A fight that made her wonder if it will ever truly end.

 

It was as if she had already become a pitiful defeated soldier, helplessly being swept away, submerged, and devoured.

 

She closed her eyes not realizing when she fell asleep.

 

It might have been that she had become so worn out, that she finally fainted. When Lisbell opened her eyes again, she heard the chirping of sparrows outside the window, which was open just a crack.

 

Without even thinking of brushing aside the messy hair, Lisbell hesitantly sat up.

 

Only then did she see the clothes that had been torn off like peeling skin and her limbs that had been mutilated with ugly wounds. She couldn’t check immediately because there was no mirror, but her neck would probably be the same. It might even be worse. It was obvious that her anxiety would only deepen, so she didn’t bother to check.

 

Next, what caught Lisbell’s eye was the blanket she had spread out and slept on all night.

 

Pieces of flesh had clumped inside her nails, and the droplets of blood that had splattered down left faint traces everywhere. It wasn’t a gushing amount, but the white color of the blanket made it stand out.

 

She had to lift her aching body, which felt like it had been chewed up and spat out by a beast. A groan escaped her lips involuntarily.

 

First, she headed to the communal bathroom and washed her body clean with hot water. The wounds left from last night’s struggle stung in various places, but she only occasionally frowned, not letting out a single groan.

 

She woke up quite early in the morning, and no one came in and out of the bathroom while she was washing up. Nevertheless, not wanting to run into anyone, she hurried back to her room without properly drying her wet body.

 

As she rubbed her hair, which had become even fluffier with moisture, with a towel, Lisbell discovered the blanket with bloodstains still visible.

 

“…sigh.”

 

The traces that fully prove yesterday’s chaos poked at a corner of her heart.

 

The laundry from the accommodation was all collected by the person in charge of laundry around 10 AM, neatly washed, and then hung out to dry on the hillside behind the corridor and the cliff around noon when the sunlight was best.

 

As always, but today Lisbell couldn’t leave it to anyone else because of the bloodstains. If today’s person on duty found the stains while folding the blankets, they might ask if something happened last night or if she got hurt somewhere. This place was sometimes a problem because it overflowed with too much love and recognition.

 

Since she woke up early, there was still time before the official workday began. Lisbell rolled up her blanket and left the small room.

 

Even though spring had arrived, the morning air still felt a bit chilly. Lisbell tightly closed her mouth and headed to the laundry area, putting the blanket into a large tub. She pressed the wet blanket down with her bare feet. For the areas where there were still traces of blood, she scrubbed them with her hands to completely remove the stains.

 

It was time to wash the blankets with such dedication and sincerity.

 

“Bell? Is that you, Bell? What are you doing over there?”

 

The sound of splashing water stopped.

 

She lifted her head slightly and saw Sonya standing there. She wasn’t dressed in her usual attire for the monastery. Judging by the direction she was coming from, it seemed she had gone out after seeking permission from the higher-ups and had just returned at this hour.

 

“I was washing the blanket.”

 

“The blanket? This morning?”

 

“Yes. I spilled some tea.”

 

Sonya squinted one eye as if to say, “Why did you make such a bothersome mistake?”

 

“Sonya, what about you? Are you on your way back from going out?”

 

“Yes. I originally had some plans later, but I got a sudden request, so I came back a bit early.”

 

“Request?”

 

“It seems like an urgent message from the Vinchest family.”

 

Lisbell’s hands, which had been doing the laundry, suddenly stopped.

 

“…Vinchest? Are you talking about Lord Philip’s family?”

 

“That’s right.”

 

“If it’s urgent news coming from their side…”

 

Sonya, too, seemed to have an inkling and let out a deep sigh.

 

“It must be about his daughter.”

 

As expected.

 

Sonya checked the tower clock in the courtyard and waved her arms around.

 

“I really want to help you, but it’s more urgent to deliver this to the priest. I’ll go ahead, Bell. See you later!”

 

Lisbell looked at Sonya’s retreating figure and then glanced down at the tub filled with blankets. The water, which had consumed half of her hand, rippled.

 

Was his daughter’s condition getting worse again?

 

When?

 

Around last night?

 

When she saw him in the confessional, there was no sign of anything unusual about Lord Philip. But wasn’t illness like a sudden event that can overturn a peaceful situation at any time? If the situation changed so abruptly, it made sense that the urgent message to the monastery arrived so quickly.

 

It was around the afternoon when she was able to get a bit more accurate information about it.

 

Suddenly, everyone was called to the special room. Those gathered seemed to know the reason for the day’s tense atmosphere and were busy gossiping.

 

“Why the sudden call?”

 

“It must be because of Lord Philip’s matter.”

 

“Did you say an urgent report arrived this morning?”

 

“Has his daughter’s condition worsened significantly?”

 

“That may be so, but why call us? We’re just apprentice priests.”

 

“Could it be that the funeral has already been held…?”

 

“Shh! Watch your mouth. What if someone important hears you?”

 

“Yes. Just keep those thoughts to yourself.”

 

“It’s not such a grand issue, but… these days, it’s obvious that the higher-ups are paying special attention to Philip.”

 

“Is it because of that? The Temple Fund of the Monastery.”

 

“Or what? If we happen to offend Lord Philip and he asks for the donation to be returned, it would be troublesome in many ways, wouldn’t it?”

 

The whispers and gossip, each with their own story, never ceased. But soon, the closed door opened, and Darian and the priest appeared.


“Is everyone here?”

Darian, standing before the gathered people, spoke in a grave voice.

Lisbell hadn’t particularly felt it during their first meeting or while overseeing her mother’s funeral, but Darian possessed the inherent dignity of someone in charge. Even now, it was unmistakable. As if to prove it, everyone fell silent, closing their mouths and turning their attention to Darian.

Darian made eye contact with each of them one by one, then briefly glanced at the priest behind her before getting to the point.

“I apologize for calling you all together while you’re each fulfilling your duties. This morning, we received urgent news from the Vinchest family. Those of you who are already aware, know that Lord Philip, a cherished brother of our monastery, has a daughter who has been suffering from a chronic illness since childhood. Although she has somehow managed to survive until now, it seems she had a severe seizure last night.”

The atmosphere in the room grew cold as if a mouse had died. Even though some had vaguely anticipated the bad news, hearing it confirmed from an official source felt quite different. Lisbell fell silent, quietly clasping her hands.

Seeing the somber atmosphere, Darian nodded slowly, as if trying to offer some comfort.

“Although the doctor was urgently called, the prognosis is not good. Lord Philip has requested that we send a few of our priests and nuns to his estate to be by his daughter’s side. He wishes for them to pray earnestly for her.”

“Darian, I have a question.”

Someone from the back row raised their hand.

“Yes?”

“Exactly what should those chosen to go to Lord Philip’s estate be doing?”

It seemed that others had the same question, as they all waited silently, watching Darian. After a moment, she moved her lips slightly and elaborated.

“According to the doctor’s additional opinion, the next few nights will be critical. If she can survive this, she may recover for a while, but it will be a difficult time. Lord Philip hopes that the monastery’s esteemed members will visit his estate and pray with all their hearts for the Miss.”

It sounded simple, but it wasn’t quite so.

What if one of those chose to stay the night, only to have the girl succumb to her illness, her breath finally stopping?

Lord Philip wasn’t just a devout believer; he also played a pivotal role in the country’s major social projects, acting as a financial pillar for the construction of the temple. His daughter’s death would certainly cause a great deal of uncomfortable repercussions. That tension seemed to hang in the air, and Darian also seemed to have anticipated that no one would volunteer willingly.

She clarified that the decision on who would go would be made by the higher-ups, and quickly moved on to wrap up the meeting.

Then Darian suddenly spoke.

“Bell. I’d like you to stay behind for a moment.”

Unexpectedly called out, Lisbell nodded toward those leaving the guest room and stayed behind.

Once the door was closed, Darian approached her.

“How have you been adjusting to life here?”

“It’s still difficult in many ways, but… I’m trying my best to adapt.”

It seemed like the right answer, as Darian gave her a gentle smile.

“For someone saying that, it seems you’ve been doing quite well.”

“Really?”

“Lord Philip specifically requested for you to come to his estate.”

Her response didn’t provoke laughter. Instead, Darian was expressing satisfaction that Lisbell had performed her duties as a nun admirably. She had been worried when Lisbell was admitted into the order on her recommendation, but now, seeing how well she was doing, Darian appeared somewhat proud.

Lisbell, on the other hand, felt confused.

Not only had they met in the confessional, but now this? Was she truly a source of great comfort to him?

She couldn’t completely disregard what had happened the night before either.

The hand that grabbed her. The force pulling her. The dizziness as her nape was caressed. Even just briefly recalling it sent a sense of unease that had yet to be fully processed, clutching at her heart once more.

“Is… is it really a place where I am needed?”

Lisbell struggled to speak.

“I think it might be better for someone with more experience to go, for Lord Philip’s sake.”

“Even if Lord Philip specifically wants you to go?”

“I’m grateful for his reliance, but… I’m also afraid I won’t be able to repay him properly.”

Darian seemed to be lost in thought for a moment, but then, as if she understood Lisbell’s feelings, she nodded.

“That’s right. Even though you’ve been chosen, we can’t disregard your own wishes.”



“I’ll explain the situation to them, so don’t worry too much.”

Darian whispered with a gentle tone and a warm smile, indicating that Lisbell could leave.

As Lisbell stepped out into the hallway and began thinking about her next task, she suddenly recalled the Bible she had left behind in the confessional yesterday. Since she had some free time, she decided to go retrieve it.

However, she couldn’t shake off the lingering unease in her heart.

Despite being specifically chosen and relied upon, was it really the right thing to go and comfort someone whose daughter might die tomorrow?

One… the panic from yesterday wasn’t something she could easily move past.

The fragmented memories still left her in a haze. The fear was so strong that it prevented her from even wanting to revisit it. The protective instinct of a father toward his ailing daughter was touching and pitiable, but Lisbell didn’t have the mental capacity to focus on that alone.

Yes, it was the right thing to do.

Who was I to worry about anyone else, or think about comforting them in my situation?

Finally, after sorting through her wavering thoughts, she arrived at the confessional. Upon confirming that no one was inside, Lisbell cautiously opened the wooden door.

As she remembered, her struggles had caused the chair to topple, and the Bible placed on the stand had flown to the corner of the floor.

She expected it to be left in that state, but to her surprise, the Bible was neatly placed back on the stand as if nothing had happened. A small piece of paper was resting on top of it. Lisbell entered the small space and picked it up.

“I apologize if I startled you.”

Written briefly, with “P.Vin” marked at the edges. From the notation, it was clear who had left it.

Philip Vinchest.

Lisbell stood frozen, clutching the small piece of paper.

It was like a stone she had consciously ignored, now swelling into a massive snowball, settling heavily in her stomach.

It was impossible to overlook his genuine compassion, which she had tried to dismiss for simply feeling uneasy. The feeling that reminded her of her own past, when no one cared about her, tugged at her heart.

With the paper tightly gripped in her hand, Lisbell turned and hurriedly ran back to the guest room, where she had just spoken with Darian.

The question that had been haunting her was clear.

Could she live with not regretting her decision?

If, in the days she had ignored it, Philip Vintchest’s daughter, Soyer, were to die—if she failed to provide even spiritual support, if Lord Philip were to be hurt by her neglect, could she bear that without regret?

No, she would never forget it.

Just like she could never let go of her mother before she was buried in this monastery.

Turning away from someone who needed help and causing them pain would ultimately return that pain to herself. From the moment they met, it felt like she was facing a reflection of herself, and that connection made it impossible for her to turn away.

Some might think it was outdated, or perhaps a naive, angelic thought. But this was who she was.

Raised in the warmth of her mother’s nurturing arms, she learned that generosity and care were virtues of an intellectual being. She had grown up understanding that this was natural and right. She wanted to live by this ethical belief and never forget it.

“Darian.”

Breathing heavily, she quickly knocked and entered. Darian was still there, handling some paperwork. Surprised by her sudden entrance, Darian’s eyes widened.

“Bell?”

“I’m sorry for changing my mind so suddenly.”



“Would it be all right if I went to Lord Philip’s estate?”

Darian, looking slightly surprised, soon smiled gently.

“All right. It won’t be an easy task, but I trust you will handle it well.”

Her words, spoken with solid trust, settled warmly in Lisbell’s heart.

Lisbell didn’t want to betray that trust.


The car carrying three people came to a gentle stop.

As one of the doors opened, the air brushed against their faces, slightly different from the one they had experienced at the monastery.

The monastery beneath the jagged cliffs, reminiscent of a delicate landscape painting, had a fresher and more vibrant scent. On the other hand, this place carried the scent of daily life, the kind of smell that could easily be named as “the smell of people.”

It was both welcoming and, deep down, unsettling.

“You’ve come.”

As soon as they got out of the car, a voice, wet with emotion, greeted them. Lord Philip had come to the garden to welcome the guests.

It had only been two days since their last meeting, but his face looked much more worn. Without even asking, it was easy to guess that he had stayed up all night by his daughter’s side, who had suffered a sudden seizure.

Lord Philip extended his hand to each of the people who got out of the car: the priest Meteo, the nun Miriam who had been dispatched with Lisbell, and finally, Lisbell herself.

Before Lisbell could take the hand that was extended to her, she flinched. Fortunately, it wasn’t obvious, and Lord Philip shook her hand warmly, gripping it tightly before letting go.

Lisbell lingered her gaze on the back of his hand as he pulled away.

It felt different, indeed.

Visually, and tactically.

It was not the same hand she had touched at the confessional. Lord Philip’s hand was much drier, rough with areas that seemed to have been worn down by hardship.

It was a relief that it wasn’t the hand that had grasped her Achilles tendon so vividly, but she couldn’t let her guard down.

So, what had she actually felt back then?

Was it just a mistake?

Was it because of her bad condition at the time?

Or was it the disoriented aftermath of a sense of relief?

She didn’t have time to dwell on these thoughts. Lord Philip, seemingly moved by the visit from the monastery, dismissed the servants and took it upon himself to guide them. There was nothing strange about his courteous demeanor; after all, he had sent a carriage for the dispatched people to ensure they arrived comfortably and quickly.

As Lisbell walked at the end of the line, she looked around the corridor inside the mansion. Miriam, who had been ahead of her, was looking around with audible admiration. But Lisbell didn’t share that sense of awe. It was a very magnificent and elegant place, but having already seen the Altahart Mansion, she couldn’t help but notice the differences.

“I am very grateful that you came,” Lord Philip said. “Before you go to the guest room, would you mind meeting Sawyer first?”

“Yes, of course.”

Lord Philip and the priest exchanged a brief conversation, and they were soon headed to his daughter’s room. When they arrived, Lisbell couldn’t help but swallow in nervousness.

The bedroom felt almost empty, or rather, devoid of any sign of use. To be precise, there were no traces of it being lived in. The geometric patterned table with silver foil, the winged chair with a soft pink cushion, and the other furniture were neatly arranged as if they had never been used.

But there was one area that was clearly in disarray—the bed, which occupied most of the room.

Sawyer Vinchest was lying there.

Seeing the child in person for the first time, Lisbell only felt one thing: pity.

The child, who was supposed to be eight years old, was much smaller than expected. Though dressed in fine pajamas, her limbs were so thin that it was obvious she was frail. Her small face, on the other hand, was swollen, probably from crying all night due to pain.

The sound of Sawyer’s labored breathing echoed around the bed. Lord Philip approached the child’s head and spoke softly.

“Please forgive us, Sawyer has just fallen asleep and couldn’t greet you.”

“It’s alright. I heard her seizures were severe. Has she calmed down now?”

“She suffers from intermittent symptoms whenever she’s conscious, so we gave her a sedative, and she’s now asleep.”

Lord Philip then expressed his hope that the priest and nun would take turns guarding his daughter’s room. Since the main purpose of coming to the mansion was to watch over Sawyer’s condition and pray for her, the situation was quickly settled.

Before evening, it was decided that the priest would remain in charge, and Lisbell and Miriam naturally withdrew. Lord Philip seemed to have something else to say, so he instructed a servant to guide them. A maid who had been standing off to the side approached them and told them to follow.

It was as they were heading to the guest room on the second floor that a slight opening of a door caught Lisbell’s attention.

Perhaps because it faced the west, the room gave off the feeling of early dawn, with a soft, almost ethereal atmosphere. While sunlight flooded the garden and courtyard outside, this particular room seemed unusually pale in comparison. Inside, Lisbell noticed an object that blended perfectly with the background.

A chessboard.

It looked as though someone had been in the middle of a game and had to leave abruptly, as the pieces, black and white, filled the squares.

She only caught a glimpse of it as she passed by and didn’t linger any further.

The guest room Lord Philip had prepared for them wasn’t very bright, but it was undoubtedly luxurious. Moreover, it seemed that he wanted to give each person their own private space, as Miriam had a room of her own across the hall.

As Lisbell sat down to catch her breath, she heard a knock. It was Miriam, the same person she had just parted from.

“This room is so fancy, I can’t stand it. Bell, can I stay here with you?”

“Sure. Come in.”

Miriam had told her that she came from a rural mountain village. After spending time in the monastery’s modest lodging, with an old bed pushed against the wall and a worn wooden table, stepping into such a spacious room—large enough to accommodate at least fifty people—was undoubtedly overwhelming for her.

If it had been herself two years ago, Lisbell would have felt the same.

But now, after having tasted so many different aspects of wealth, Lisbell had become accustomed to the variety of the world. From the almost paradisiacal Marniya to the power-laden capital city, and the vibrant and colorful Lorant, there was no longer much that could unsettle her.

In spaces occupied by Ulrich, where his traces remained, there was a sharp and oppressive sense of power that almost felt like it was rotting away. Having experienced him firsthand, Lisbell didn’t find herself overly awed by visiting Lord Philip’s mansion for the first time.

“I’ve never been in a place like this before. Our monastery’s chapel was fancy, but this is something else.”

“Well, it is a noble’s mansion.”

“Bell, you’ve been really calm since earlier. Have you been to a place like this before?”

Just as Lisbell had observed Miriam, Miriam seemed to be scrutinizing her as well. Caught off guard by the question, Lisbell paused for a moment and then faintly smiled.

“No, I haven’t…”



“It’s my first time too.”

She had experienced such things, but they were memories she wanted to forget.

Everything related to that man was so chaotic and painful that she wanted to sever it all, to cut it off completely. If she could, she would erase it from her consciousness entirely. The anxiety she had felt a few days ago only made those memories more unbearable.

The fact that such horrible memories had been etched into her mind, restricting her like a chain around her neck, made her tongue stiff with frustration.

Lisbell swallowed once more and sat down in the wing chair. Miriam approached and quietly sat next to her, whispering.

“By the way, did you see earlier? Lord Philip’s daughter. She looked worse than I expected.”

“Yes… It’s really sad to hear that they had to sedate her to get her to sleep.”

“When Lord Philip was coming to the monastery every day, I wondered how desperate he must have been. Seeing his daughter in person, I can understand why. She’s still so young.”

The image of the frail girl, lying almost swallowed up by the large bed, flashed in Lisbell’s mind. She couldn’t help but feel a strange, almost painful sensation stir in her chest.

It reminded her of her mother.

As Miriam had said, before coming to the mansion, Lisbell had also wondered whether Lord Philip was asking too much, perhaps expecting more than was reasonable. Religious influence wasn’t something that could be imposed on individuals at will, and although she might seem somewhat unspiritual, Lisbell had doubts about whether the prayers of the faithful could truly heal someone suffering so deeply.

In a world where scientifically proven medicine existed, it felt almost naive to rely on such unscientific hopes.


But when she actually saw his sick daughter, Lisbell realized that such doubts could not even be considered. While medicine was being relied upon, it was not enough to ease the heart.

She had been receiving adequate medical support from Ulrich through a contract that involved her body, and while there was nothing more she could do, Lord Philip, on the other hand, had the position and wealth to at least place his hopes in religion.

If there was anything he could mobilize before his daughter’s breath truly left her, he would have done it, even if it were prayers whose efficacy was unproven.

Knowing the desperate longing of submission all too well, Lisbell couldn’t simply turn a blind eye to it.

With her eyes lowered, Lisbell murmured quietly.

“Let’s pray that Lady Sawyer can make it through the night.”

“Yes.”

After exchanging some casual conversation with Miriam, the sound of a knock interrupted them.

It was the servant who had previously escorted them to their respective rooms.

“I will escort you to the dining room for dinner.”

Though they were essentially commoners, the servant’s attitude was particularly respectful, likely due to the fact that they were guests personally invited by the master of the house. Lisbell, now feeling a bit uncomfortable, descended to the first floor with Miriam.

At the dinner table, Lisbell had expected it would just be the two of them, but there was someone already present—Lord Philip, whom she had parted from earlier in Sawyer’s room. She looked around, wondering where Father Meteo had gone.

Lord Philip, seated at the head of the table, mentioned that after the two of them finished eating, Father Meteo would join them for dinner. It seemed that, as had been arranged earlier, one of them was always meant to stay by his daughter’s side.

“Thank you both, and especially to you, Bell, for agreeing to my stubbornness,” he said, alternating his gaze between the two before focusing on Lisbell.

“Bell. I am especially grateful to you.”

For a brief moment, his gaze held an ambiguous meaning before he gestured to the dishes, urging them to begin eating.

Lord Philip personally served Lisbell by placing a dish in front of her, dismissing the servant who had approached with the new food. It seemed like he was concerned about her reaction to his shocking behavior in the confessional earlier, so Lisbell smiled slightly in appreciation.

During the meal, light conversation flowed, mostly about Sawyer. Eventually, the conversation ran out, and a silence settled over the table.

As Lisbell took a spoonful of the clear chicken soup Lord Philip had served, she suddenly had a thought and asked.

“Lord, is chess one of your hobbies?”

“Chess?”

“Yes. I think I saw a chessboard in a room with the door slightly ajar earlier.”

Expecting a response that would match the casual nature of her question, Lisbell was taken aback when Lord Philip seemed to respond as though he were hearing of an entirely unrelated topic.

“Well, I wouldn’t say it’s a hobby. When I was single, I played a few times at a social club, but I never really found it enjoyable, so I haven’t touched it since I got married. That’s why there aren’t any chess pieces in the mansion.”

“Huh? But I saw a chessboard earlier…”

“A chessboard? Well, I’m not sure… maybe you’ve mistaken something.”

No chess pieces at all?

Then what was it that I saw?

Lisbell felt a strange chill for a moment, as though she were playing some sort of foolish prank. But Lord Philip quickly moved on to a different subject, as though he genuinely believed she had made a mistake.

Lisbell, now confused, stopped chewing her food.

For a moment, an uncomfortable sensation lingered.

It felt as though her fingers had just brushed against a thin sheet of paper, cutting through her.

…Again?

Am I mistaken again?

The unease, which she could not swallow calmly, caught in her throat, and she couldn’t help but feel unsettled.

She forced herself to take another spoonful of soup. The flavor was rich and the taste exquisite, yet strangely, it felt as though she were eating sand.



After finishing their meal, Lisbell and Miriam made their way to Sawyer’s bedroom. As they walked, Lisbell cast uneasy glances around.

The chessboard kept swirling in her mind.

Did I really see it wrong?

But was it possible to mistake a square chessboard with pieces for something else?

It had flashed by so quickly, but it was clearly a chessboard.

In fact, if it had been someone else, she might have been able to lightly pass it off as, “Yeah, I guess I saw it wrong,” but Lisbell had a memory that she couldn’t do that. There had already been a misunderstanding once, one that she couldn’t figure out and couldn’t resolve.

 

The beautiful hand she had encountered at the confession.

 

Lisbell quietly rubbed the back of her neck hidden behind the veil. The unidentified cold air that had dug in again stimulated her wounds sharply.

 

If possible, she wanted to go back to the room she had seen earlier and confirm that what she had seen with her own two eyes was the chessboard, but it was realistically impossible. She had been guided by a servant earlier, so she didn’t know the exact location of the room that was open, and it was also urgent to exchange places with the priest who had been keeping watch with a hungry stomach while they were eating.

 

She gave up faster than she thought.

 

Lisbell arrived at Sawyer’s bedroom without being able to find out the truth. After a brief conversation with the priest, the two of them now stayed by Sawyer’s side.

 

While the two took turns reciting the prayer of rest in their mouths, the servants often approached the bed to check on the young lady’s comfort.

 

In the meantime.

 



 

Lisbell, who was holding the scripture, raised her hand and rubbed her eyes.

 

At some point, her eyelids became heavy. They closed against her will, as if a solid rock had been placed on them. For a moment, she thought she was falling asleep, but it was a little different. Rather than the temptation of sleep, it felt like her whole body was being spurred on by her unwillingness.

 

She shook the scripture in her hand a few times and cleared her dizzy eyes several times, and then something fell to the floor with a thud.

 

“Ah… Sorry.”

 

The strength in her hand completely disappeared and the Bible fell. Because it was quite thick, the sound of it falling was quite loud. Lisbell noticed the eyes gathering here and there and offered a formal apology. Even in this situation, her eyes were spinning and it was hard to maintain her posture.

 

“Bell? What’s wrong?”

 

Miriam on the other side asked Lisbell, whose complexion had changed from a moment ago. Lisbell, who had bent her legs to pick up the Bible, realized that her body was in a state where she could collapse, so she covered her forehead. As she closed her eyes tightly, she felt her nerves lose strength one by one as if they were all loose. It wouldn’t be strange if she fainted right away.

 

“Miriam. Sorry… I don’t think I’m feeling well.”

 

“What? Really?”

 

“Uh, um…”

 

Miriam quickly turned around the bed and came over, realizing the seriousness of Lisbell’s condition, who couldn’t even put together a sentence properly.

 

“Why are you acting like this all of a sudden? Did you have some trouble while eating?”

 

“I don’t know… uh. But if I keep going like this… I’m just going to be a nuisance…”

 

Even though she was standing still, it was hard to keep her wits about her as if someone was grabbing her hair and shaking her back and forth. Miriam looked around in confusion as she whispered in a tone that seemed to be flowing intermittently, then whispered softly.

 

“Bell, you go back to your room first and rest. As I said, if you collapse first, it would be a big deal. There are two of us, so it wouldn’t be a big problem if only one of us remained. I’ll tell the priest later.”

 

Lisbell nodded her head in gratitude for Miriam’s consideration and left the bedroom with slow movements.

 

When she returned to the room she was guided to, she was almost crawling in. Lisbell barely made it to the bed and collapsed.

 

What was the problem?

 

The meal?

 

Did she maybe have food poisoning? However, it was far from the symptoms of poisoning. Or maybe a medicine she took… However, she herself didn’t remember taking anything like that.

 

She blinked her eyes a few times, but her consciousness quickly dispersed. Her vision suddenly blacked out with an unknown number of shivers.

 

And when she came to her senses again, it was already well past night.

 

“… Hmm.”

 

Lisbell barely opened her dry eyelids, which seemed drier than the desert.

 

An unfamiliar ceiling greeted her.

 

She stopped as she moved her arms to rub her eyes. She hurriedly raised her upper body, which had been frozen in that state. The blanket covering her shoulders slid down.

 

A bright beam of light pouring down from the open curtains illuminated her naked body, which was not covered by a single thread.

 

Naked…?

 

She had no memory of sleeping naked the night before. The discomfort that her body had acquired first covered her entire body with goosebumps. Her hands, which had begun to tremble, lifted the blanket that had flowed down to her navel.

 

A silent gasp formed on the tip of her tongue.

 

The inside of her thighs were soaked with an unknown liquid.

 
“What is this…?”

 

She hurriedly pulled off the blanket. It wasn’t just the unknown, viscous substance on her thighs.

 

The flesh on the inside of her thighs was mottled with reddish bruises. Just looking at this area, it was in such a terrible state that it looked like she had a horrible skin disease. As if she had been savagely bitten by a wild dog.

 

She, who had been looking down in shock, quickly covered her mouth with her hand. Holding her breath tightly, Lisbell suddenly lifted her head.

 

Her violet eyes, filled with fear, turned as if unable to find their composure. However, contrary to her worries, the bedroom was exactly as she had seen it yesterday. It still displayed an intricate neatness, as it was a room reserved for guests, while maintaining its formality and dignity.

 

The only one who had become horrifically strange in this room was me.

 

Lisbell hurriedly got out of bed.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

As she pushed off the ground with his foot, it felt as if someone had kicked her in the back of the knee, and she collapsed forward.

 

She lay sprawled in a pitiful state, gasping for breath.

 

It felt like dark storm clouds were gathering behind her, unseen. Believing that if her sky were covered by them, it would truly be the end, Lisbell crawled slowly.

 

When she finally reached the bathroom, she gagged and heaved up the contents of her stomach. As the stomach acid surged back up, her throat felt as if it were being stabbed with a burning knife.

 

Her eyes, which had been shaking for a long time, stopped moving. Her fingertips, as pale as her complexion, brushed over the bodily fluids that trickled down her thigh, making a faint sound.

 

Just her imagination…?

 

Again?

 

Was this also her delusion?

 

“No…”

 

That can’t be.

 

How could this be called a delusion?

 

The lingering creepy sensation on her body, the gruesome marks left on her pale skin, and this unpleasant residue on her fingertips.

 

It was all real.

 

Something had really happened to her!

 

Even amidst all this, it was utterly absurd. Even after pushing her to the brink of confusion, she still couldn’t find that person no matter where she looked.

 

The panic she experienced a few days ago and the anxiety that she couldn’t help but feel from time to time were all a real nightmare personally delivered by that man. It wasn’t her who was imagining things; it was him who was causing such things.

 

Even going so far as to use such methods that didn’t reveal himself until the very end.

 

Lisbell mustered all her strength to steady her trembling legs. She turned the faucet and jumped into the torrent of water. She scrubbed so hard and painfully that her skin felt like it was peeling off. She scrubbed every inch of her body, leaving no trace behind.

 

Under the hot water, her delicate skin turned red, but she didn’t care. By the time she felt that rubbing wasn’t enough, she instinctively used her nails. The barely healing scratch was once again torn open without any satisfaction.

 

When she turned off the faucet that had been pouring water for quite a while, an eerie silence enveloped the bathroom. Lisbell raised her hand and slowly wiped her face. The dampness dripped from her palm with a plop. The sensation of the droplets crawling down her skin was enough to induce a strange chill.

 

“Clothes… my clothes.”

 

Lisbell hurriedly rushed out of the bathroom and frantically searched for her clothes.

 

She found them behind the bed. Without even thinking of drying herself with a towel, Lisbell shoved her arms and legs into them haphazardly. She knew the buttons were mismatched and ugly creases were forming in the clothes, but she couldn’t stop. Lisbell acted like someone incapable of normal reasoning.

 

The cloth covering her shoulders became damp from her thoroughly wet hair. Still, she was steadfastly buttoning her clothes.

Knock knock.

The sound of knocking roused her consciousness in an instant.

To say it knocked might have been an understatement—it felt as though her brain had been physically struck.

Every nerve was on edge, bristling like needles.

Lisbell turned toward the door with an unnatural, puppet-like motion. Though she had no mirror before her, she was certain her face had gone completely pale.

Knock knock.

The knock resounded again, this time like a hammer blow.

Frozen in place like a statue, Lisbell finally moved toward the door with halting steps. Just as she reached for the doorknob, her pupils dilated. Her temples throbbed, as though a foreboding presence was rushing toward her from the distance.

She pressed her dry tongue against the roof of her mouth.

Exhaling slowly, she opened the door impulsively, almost without thinking.

“Bell. You’re awake? Sorry to come so early, but—what’s wrong with your face?”

It was Miriam.

The tidal wave of tension that had crashed over her ebbed away like a retreating tide. The heightened sensitivity in her mind deflated abruptly, leaving her feeling weak.

Lisbell stood still for a moment, then clutched her forehead as dizziness overcame her.

“I… didn’t sleep well. What’s the matter?”

“Didn’t rest well last night? Actually… the priest said we need to return to the monastery right away.”

The hand rubbing her forehead froze.

“Right away? Why? Did something happen at the monastery?”

“Well, to be precise…”

Miriam glanced around nervously, as if wary of eavesdroppers, then lowered her voice to a whisper.

“We need to leave. Lord Philip has issued an expulsion order.”

Lisbell’s hand clenched tightly around the doorknob.

…What?

She thought she must have misheard, but Miriam’s expression remained unchanged, confirming what she’d just said.

On Lisbell’s already pale face, a flicker of bewilderment surfaced. Just yesterday, she’d been greeted with such a warm welcome—what could have caused this sudden reversal overnight?

“An expulsion order?”

“We need to go. The priest is waiting. Do you have anything else to pack?”

Miriam’s urgency made it clear that something serious was going on. Flustered, Lisbell hurriedly followed her out of the room. By the time they reached the front entrance, a car was already waiting.

As soon as they got in, the car started without delay. Unlike the warmth of the previous day’s reception, the send-off was cold and unceremonious.

The car ride back to the monastery was steeped in silence. Of the three passengers, Lisbell was the most perplexed. There had been no time to process what had happened before she was dragged away.

After some hesitation, she leaned toward Miriam and whispered, “Did something happen to Miss Sawyer?”

“No. I stayed with her until dawn, and she was fine the whole time.”

Lisbell had wondered if something had happened to the young lady’s health, causing the lord to become unbalanced, but it seemed that wasn’t the case. Then why? The lack of clarity only deepened her confusion. She turned to stare out of the window, her thoughts churning. Beneath her long skirt, she couldn’t ignore the sensation between her legs. Was it a relief that she’d left the estate? If she’d stayed there any longer…

No. She didn’t know.

She truly didn’t know.

What in the world was going on?

What had caused her body’s strange state the day before, or the fluid and marks she’d found on her inner thighs that morning? Why had Lord Philip’s attitude shifted so dramatically overnight?

‘…Ulrich Altahart.’

Could it really be… that he was here, somewhere near her?

Fragments of speculation, unconfirmed and nebulous, swirled in her mind. The car eventually arrived at the monastery. The priest who greeted them instructed the two women to return to their quarters. Frustrated though she was, Lisbell complied.

The day passed in a haze, the plans for it disrupted and left in limbo.

It was as the sun dipped below the horizon, casting the land in shadow, that the priest came to Lisbell’s room.

“Bell, Darian has asked to see you.”

A chill ran down her spine.

It felt as if an ominous gun barrel, teetering all day, had finally taken aim squarely at her.

Swallowing nervously, Lisbell followed the priest.

Darian was waiting in the same private room they had used two days prior—where Lord Philip had first introduced her. Though the setting was familiar, the atmosphere was far heavier now. It was suffocating in a way it hadn’t been before.

“Bell, given the gravity of the situation, I’ll get straight to the point. What happened at Lord Philip’s estate?”

“What? What do you mean…?”

“A formal complaint has been lodged by Lord Philip. He claims you committed a deeply offensive act last night.”

“…What?”

The absurd accusation left her stunned. If she hadn’t braced herself, she might have collapsed under the weight of the sudden dizziness. The image of Lord Philip smiling warmly at her the previous evening flashed in her mind, only to dissipate.

“I pressed him for details, but he refused, saying he found it too distasteful to recount. He suggested I ask you directly. Bell, I need you to answer truthfully.”

Lisbell instinctively shook her head.

“I didn’t… I didn’t do anything, Darian.”

Her voice trembled, stretched thin by anxiety.

She knew exactly what kind of questioning would follow such a statement.

“According to Priest Meteo’s report, everything was fine through dinner. He mentioned that you separated afterward. Where were you, and what were you doing?”

Ah…

Another sigh escaped her, laden with despair.



She was innocent and upright.

She could place a hand over her heart and assert it with conviction.

Not once had she considered, much less attempted, anything that might offend Lord Philip, who had looked upon her with pity as if seeing his younger self. She had never harbored any malicious intent to harm him.

But now, the words she was about to speak felt like they would undermine her resolute will and drag her into deeper trouble. Darian’s sharp gaze seemed to scold her silent lips mercilessly.

Lisbell’s eyes dropped weakly to the floor. She couldn’t bring herself to meet that gaze.

“Well, I… last night, the truth is…”



“After dinner, I wasn’t feeling well. I informed Miriam and rested in my room.”

“Do you have anyone who can corroborate that?”

“…No.”

“What did you do after returning to your room?”

“I fell asleep.”

“And that’s all?”

“Yes.”

Darian covered her mouth with her hand, seemingly lost in thought or at a loss for words.

Standing there, Lisbell felt as though she were a criminal on trial, her chest tightening painfully. Her senses were paralyzed, unsure where to look, what to say, or how to act.

It felt as though she was being slowly driven into some unknown abyss.

A hard, shallow breath rose from the depths of her lungs.

“Is that really all? Do you have no other memories?”

“That’s… all. Nothing unusual happened. I mean, I fell asleep and… but I’m sure that after falling asleep…”

“Is it possible that you unintentionally did something that might have upset Lord Philip? Think carefully, Bell. This is a serious matter for you as well.”



“Lord Philip has included a petition alongside the formal complaint, requesting your expulsion from the monastery. As you know, Lord Philip is a guest we cannot afford to overlook at the moment. The stronger his claims, the harder it will be for us to protect you.”

Darian’s long statement struck Lisbell’s mind like a bolt of lightning.

Expulsion from the monastery.

A guest they couldn’t afford to overlook.

Protecting her would be difficult.

“…Ah…”

She was utterly dazed.

Now she finally understood.

Since when?

Since when had the foundation of her world started to crumble like this?

She didn’t know much, but one thing was certain: someone was trying to force her out of this place, even resorting to such insidious pressure.

And that someone was undoubtedly…

“So, before I joined, didn’t I ask?”

Darian, who had been staring at the wall with a troubled look, turned toward her. Their gazes, however, didn’t meet. Lisbell’s empty, half-dead eyes were fixed beyond Darian’s shoulder.

“How far can faith protect me?”



“At the time, you told me that if I so wished, no one could remove me from here. So why has that changed now? I felt a sense of stability in this place—a stability I thought I would never feel again. That alone made me happy. But now, why… why am I being cast aside again?”

The bitterness of being stripped of her autonomy and reduced to a pawn in someone’s base desires reared its head, fueling her sense of injustice.

“It’s not me. I swear, I’ve done nothing to insult Lord Philip. This must be that man’s doing…!”

Her voice, rising like an impassioned denunciation, was abruptly cut off, as if severed by a blade. Even her lips, poised to spill more, froze. Instinct demanded it, and rationality followed a moment later.

How far could she go?

If it would prove her innocence, Lisbell would have stripped bare before Darian without hesitation.

She wanted to scream that her body had undergone inexplicable changes the moment she collapsed into bed in the guest room, that it was not Lord Philip but herself who had endured some unspeakable act in the night.

But she couldn’t.

“A celibate body.”

She had fallen victim to the very rules she had rationalized her way into breaking.

Even though she had washed away the fluids, there was no immediate way to erase the bite-like marks left on her skin. To Lisbell’s experienced eyes, those marks were unmistakable signs of a passionate encounter with someone.

She couldn’t speak.

If she did, she’d be expelled for violating the rules.

“Bell?”

Darian’s concerned voice called her name as Lisbell, who had been vehemently defending herself, suddenly fell silent as if her tongue had been cut. But Lisbell couldn’t hear her. The chilling cold that gnawed at her limbs made it feel like all the blood was draining from her body.

“…I don’t know.”



“I don’t know… either.”

Trapped in a dreadful state of uncertainty, the only words Lisbell could muster were irresponsibly vague.

With a sigh, Darian told her that she would speak with Lord Philip again and sent Lisbell away.

The long corridor was swallowed by the night, its ambiguous darkness consuming everything diagonally. The shadows pooled heavily, feeling especially damp and oppressive tonight. Lisbell’s steps seemed to sink into the void as she walked.

‘How…?’

Her footsteps echoed in the silent night.

‘How can I stay here…?’

Without revealing her flaws.

Without falling into that man’s grasp.

How?

Whenever she tried to think through the situation, her mind would blank out completely. An ominous sense that any attempt to resolve things would only lead to further disasters gripped her by the nape, refusing to let go. Even if her body escaped, her mind felt shackled, endlessly bound to someone’s cruel domain.

“You’re so naive…”

Flinch.

It was as if someone were mocking her weakness. A man’s derisive laughter, sickeningly sweet in tone, lingered in her ears.

“I can do as I please.”

“Do you really think so?”

“Lisbell, you overthink for someone so naive. That only ever makes things worse.”

Slap.

Lisbell slapped her own left cheek forcefully.

The unsettling hallucination ceased.

But only briefly. Her resistance seemed to provoke it even more.

Ha-ha.

A cruel chuckle filled with mockery and disdain clawed at her ears, as if the voice were looking down on her with contemptuous amusement.

Ha-ha-ha.

It felt like a venomous insect crawling through her ears, writhing its legs grotesquely.

“Shut up…”

Slap! Slap! Slap!

She slapped both her ears repeatedly as her pace quickened. Her cheeks burned from the sharp sting of her blows, yet she felt nothing but cold. It was as though she’d been plunged into the depths of a freezing winter.

“Shut up. Shut up. Shut up… Shut up, shut up…! Shut up!”

Why won’t it stop?

She knew it was a hallucination, yet it wouldn’t fade away.

Lisbell found herself running through the corridor. The endlessly stretching passage felt oppressively claustrophobic tonight.

How strange.

This wasn’t Marnia. It wasn’t the Altahart mansion, nor was it Ulrich’s extravagantly decorated bedroom.

And yet, the laughter that had always dragged her into darkness refused to stop following her.

“Huff, huff…”

She ran until her throat tasted of blood. Leaning against a pillar, Lisbell wavered like a straw doll before collapsing to the ground.

Her body alternated between cold and heat. Her ears and cheeks, reddened from her impulsive self-inflicted blows, ached, while her overworked lungs felt like they were about to burst. Yet her hands and feet were numb, as though frostbitten and decaying.

Feeling the contradictory sensations, she looked up in a daze. For the first time, the moon came into view, dispelling the surrounding darkness. The moonlight was so bright it felt like her eyes might go blind. Staring into the blue luminescence, Lisbell finally faced the truth she had long avoided.

‘…It’s over.’

This place could not be her salvation.

Even if she survived this ordeal, could she guarantee there wouldn’t be another? How many more dishonorable accusations would she have to endure? How much longer before her very presence became a burden? If this cycle continued, would her existence itself not eventually turn into a sin?

Lisbell couldn’t bear to let it go that far.

She didn’t have the strength.

The brief time she had spent here had been precious and comforting, like fertile soil on barren land.

The wind howled.

The veil covering her head fluttered weakly like a surrendered white flag. She gripped it and slowly pulled it off, the gesture one of resignation.

The wind blew harder.

The spring night’s breeze, sharp and relentless, teased her unevenly cut gray hair, making it dance. Somewhere nearby, the sound of fabric flapping accompanied the gusts.

“What a waste.”

Step.

What followed was the sound of measured footsteps.

“There’s no internal rule saying you have to cut your hair.”

The wind stopped abruptly.

The moment she became aware of it, Lisbell’s world was overtaken by the overwhelming presence of the speaker.

…A hallucination?

Again?

Lisbell slowly raised her hand, intending to escape through self-inflicted pain as before, but her body refused to obey. Her instincts had already recognized that what was happening was not merely a sensory illusion.

This wasn’t a hallucination.

“Why would you cut such beautiful hair…?”

The deep, languid voice curled around her ears like a liquid, now resonating directly behind her.


A chilling shiver ran down Lisbell’s stiffened nape, like icy beads crawling over her skin.

Something brushed the ends of her hair.

Was it just the playful teasing of a gentle breeze?

No, it wasn’t.

“This is all mine. Who gave you permission?”

Fingers.

Without even needing to look, Lisbell could vividly picture the delicate, refined fingers of the man who now entwined strands of her unruly gray hair in his grasp, idly twirling them. Though his gesture was lighthearted, the air around them seemed to freeze further. The veil clenched in her hands crumpled miserably as mounting tension made her grip tighter and tighter.

Lisbell was all too familiar with what those hands could do. For now, they moved with an unsettling ease, but she knew how abruptly they could turn savage, how suddenly they might seize her hair in a brutal grip.

And those hands—graceful yet massive—could easily encircle her neck, suffocating her with a single motion. She had experienced that choking grip often enough to know the terror it brought.

Her mouth filled with sticky saliva, a physiological response to the unbearable tension. Yet, she couldn’t even swallow it, so acute was her fear.

Though she desperately hoped otherwise, the likelihood of escape seemed slim.

Her stiffened neck creaked as she slowly turned her head.

And when she finally looked back, Lisbell felt as though her very heart had been pierced.

“Hello.”

The man’s sculpted face smiled serenely under the radiant moonlight that poured down upon him.

“I’m back.”

His voice carried the tone of someone who had wandered long and finally found his cozy cradle. The deliberate, melodic drawl in his words hinted at an intimate eagerness, like someone ready to throw himself entirely into that cradle.

This wasn’t an illusion. Nor a hallucination.

The voice, the demeanor, the overpowering presence that smothered her in its terrifying tranquility—it was all unmistakable.

Unfortunately for Lisbell, he was exactly as she remembered him.

In a clumsy attempt to rise, she tripped over her feet and fell.

But even then, she couldn’t stop moving, desperately crawling backward.

She knew all too well how futile it was. Such feeble resistance wouldn’t even take her beyond his shadow, let alone out of his sight. Still, when faced with the calamity now standing before her, her mind had shrunk to the level of a mere insect, seeking escape by any means, however pitiful.

Meanwhile, Ulrich leisurely rose from his seat, watching her retreat with a composed gaze. His trench coat fluttered gracefully in the breeze over a perfectly tailored suit.

His platinum hair, far richer in luster than her dull gray locks, shimmered as he ran a hand through it.

The oppressive intensity of his gaze, which bound her like chains, disappeared momentarily as his hand covered his eyes. That brief respite allowed Lisbell to stagger to her feet, bracing herself against the ground.

Clenching her teeth, she bolted in the opposite direction.

“Hah…! Huff…!”

She hadn’t even run far, yet her lungs already burned, as though they were collapsing under the strain. This wasn’t merely physical exhaustion. Her chest felt as though anxiety itself were simmering within, intensifying with each beat of her heart.

She crossed the long corridor and burst into the grand chapel ahead.

“Please, please…!”

There were two ways to lock the chapel doors: with a key or by using the latch at the top of the frame. The keyhole was at waist height, but the latch was positioned far higher. With no key on her person, she tiptoed frantically, reaching up with trembling hands to grasp the latch.

“Please… just…!”

The latch, which was usually within easy reach, now felt as distant as a flower on a cliff. She knew it was her panic clouding her judgment, but she couldn’t calm down. Her erratic heartbeat and suffocating dread made any semblance of composure impossible.

In stark contrast to her frantic efforts, the man approaching behind her walked with leisurely grace. He neither hurried nor faltered, exuding the serene poise of a swan gliding across a lake. She could vividly picture him beyond the chapel doors, his coat swaying gently as he advanced with unsettling ease.

“…Ah…!”

Finally, she managed to grab hold of the latch. She just needed to turn it now—just one motion, and a temporary barrier would separate them.

But before she could secure it, an overwhelming force suddenly shoved the door open, throwing her backward.

What had been tightly shut flew wide as if it had been nothing more than paper.

Ulrich slowly lowered his left leg, which had just delivered the devastating kick. The brief display of brute force gave him an air of lawlessness, but just as quickly, his polished demeanor returned, his posture resuming its calculated elegance.

Yet to Lisbell, who knew his true nature, he remained nothing more than a harbinger of darkness.

“Ah… hic…!”

Tears of despair welled in her eyes as she choked on her own gasping breaths.

Lisbell, unable to withstand the force of the door slammed open by Ulrich’s kick, was flung backward, collapsing onto the floor.

She needed to escape, to find another path, but her ankle seemed injured from the fall—she couldn’t put much strength into it. In the end, all she could do was crawl across the chapel floor, desperately trying to put distance between them.

The wide-open door groaned as it slowly swung shut again, plunging the chapel into a dim, shadowy gloom.

“Of all places, why hide in a church?”

The sharp, deliberate sound of his footsteps echoed in the silence—click, click.

That sound alone carried the weight of something dreadful, like darkness itself striding toward her. Lisbell instinctively sought out the nearest source of light.

“As much as I dislike meddling with religion, even I have my limits,” he mused, his tone light but sinister.

Flickering candlelight glimmered in the distance.

It came from the altar. A sacred area forbidden even to most priests unless explicitly permitted. Only the abbot and vice abbot were allowed to access it, where ceremonial relics were kept alongside rows of candles encased in glass domes, ensuring their flames never extinguished.

Lisbell crawled desperately past rows of pews and finally reached the altar’s steps. Just as she grasped the edge of the first step, a hand clamped down on her ankle.

“Still, I guess it’s fine. After all, we’ve finally reunited.”

Her efforts to reach the altar were for nothing; she was dragged back across the floor.

“Lisbell, why do you keep running away?”

“Agh…!”

“It’s been so long. Don’t you think that’s a bit cold of you?”

“Let go, let go of me… let go!”

“Or should I call you Bell? That fits the mood better, doesn’t it?”

Her struggles became frantic as she tried to shake off his serpent-like grip. But her wide, terrified eyes met his face as he loomed over her, a crooked smile tugging at his lips.

“Ah, that dumbfounded expression of yours….”



“It’s been so long. How exciting.”

Ulrich tightened his hold on Lisbell’s ankle, dragging her closer.

Her heel brushed against the open coat he wore over his perfectly tailored trousers. The polished fabric shifted under her skin, transmitting the sensation of something rigid and alive beneath. His excitement swelled, unrestrained, against her exposed ankle.

Disgust surged within her, boiling over.

“Stop it! It’s disgusting—so disgusting!”

“Disgusting?”

Ulrich let out a sharp laugh, as though she’d just said something utterly absurd.

Even as he chuckled, his hands moved deftly. He stripped off her shoe and sock, exposing her bare foot. Without hesitation, he pressed it against the bulge in his trousers, grinding it against him with obscene force.

“Ah… I feel like I could finish just like this,” he murmured, his voice laced with lewd satisfaction.

Despite the pressure her foot applied, his arousal only seemed to grow. He groaned softly, savoring the sensation.

Lisbell clenched her teeth, then lashed out with her free leg, kicking with all her might. The movement was wild and frenzied, driven by sheer desperation.

Her heel struck his face with a dull thud, jerking his head to the side. His grip on her ankle weakened, and she seized the chance to wrench herself free. Scrambling to her knees, she crawled up the altar steps.

Something, anything—she needed a weapon.

Her frantic gaze darted around until it landed on a golden candlestick. She grabbed it tightly, but as she turned to defend herself, she was yanked backward with brutal force.

Her knees scraped harshly against the floor as she collapsed, losing hold of the candlestick.

“Ugh…!”

Before she could recover, a hand seized her arm, spinning her around.

Light filtered through the stained glass, painting her surroundings in cold, pale hues.

“That hurts.”

“Ughhh….”

“Is it okay for a nun to resort to violence like this?”

A faint smear of blood glistened on Ulrich’s split lip.

Yet he seemed utterly unfazed, brushing his hand carelessly across his mouth. The disinterested look on his face, coupled with the way he narrowed his eyes in mock pain, made it painfully obvious he was putting on a show.

Lisbell could only watch, paralyzed with rage and dread, as he loomed closer once again.


And as if he had no intention of hiding it, he immediately curved his eyes into a sly smile.

“Well. You wouldn’t be able to become an official priest anyway.”



“Why that expression? You know it better than anyone.”

Ulrich’s hand touched Lisbell’s face. She flinched at the motion of him cupping her cheek. His thumb pressed down firmly on her soft skin as he lowered his face.

The distance between them became dangerously close, and at that moment, his voice struck down like a sharp blade, disturbingly lighthearted.

“I already own this body.”



“Isn’t it too filthy to be offered to God?”

His delicate fingers touched the center of Lisbell’s collarbones, then traced downward over her clothes, stopping just at the curve of her navel. The long, deliberate line he drew resembled the foundation of a cross. His cunning touch exposed everything she had desperately tried to conceal.

As expected…

There was no way out of this.

Even if she somehow covered up the incident with Sir Philip this time, Ulrich had an absolute weapon.

The truth that Lisbell had no choice but to hide upon joining the monastery. The one thing she had dismissed as nothing but violence—but in reality, it could not be categorized so simply.

Within the confines of this narrow monastery world, what she had done with him was considered a sin. Whether she had consented or not, once a body was tainted, it could never regain its former sanctity.

Even so, having her own corruption defined by his words tore at her heart. Had she wanted it? No. It had all been driven by the man’s base, vile amusement.

“What did you do… to Sir Philip?”

Memories she had buried resurfaced like shattered glass, making it impossible to suppress the question.

Ulrich smiled brightly, as if genuinely delighted that she, who had always avoided and ignored him, was finally speaking to him. The joy in his face was so pure it almost seemed moving.

“Nothing worth calling a crime. I simply proposed a tempting deal for his sick daughter.”



“If he helped me a little, I would arrange for her treatment at the royal hospital in Rekem.”



“You may not know, but Lekem’s medical advancements are far superior to those in this country.”

Of course. A hospital capable of making even corpses appear alive—what couldn’t they do?

Lisbell swallowed the surge of nausea and took slow, steady breaths.

“What… did you make me take yesterday?”

“Yesterday?”

His eyes rolled slightly as if searching his memory. Soon, he let out a soft ‘ah’ and smirked, his eye corners folding lazily.

“A sedative. It happened to be in that mansion.”

Without warning, Ulrich’s hand slipped beneath the hem of her black skirt. His fingers kneaded her knee, making Lisbell recoil inward, trembling. The memory of her retching violently that morning flashed through her mind.

“I needed you to sleep soundly.”



“I wonder if the marks I left are still there…. I sucked on them all night, so my lips are still sore. To be honest, I was so hard it hurt—I almost just put it in, but I don’t really enjoy rushing things.”

As his words dragged on, Lisbell discreetly scanned her surroundings. Though his vulgar remarks made her mind reel and nausea stir again, she endured it, focusing on locating the fallen candlestick she had dropped earlier.

Once she had identified its position, she took advantage of the moment when his attention wavered and swung her foot at him once more.

“……!”

But Ulrich had anticipated this. He effortlessly caught her ankle before her kick could land. Her foot, still clad in its shoe, stopped just beside his cheekbone.

Frustration boiled within her, only for her breath to suddenly catch in her throat.

His gaze bore into her.

His pale blue-gray eyes gleamed, glossy and dark, like glass doused in water. The look he gave her was that of a mischievous delinquent with a particularly wicked thought.

“Disobedient legs…”

Ulrich adjusted his grip on her ankle, making Lisbell thrash, desperately trying to pull away.

But he was faster.

Like a thick, merciless tide, his chilling eyes shone with predatory hunger.

The grip on her ankle tightened. Not just to a threatening degree—but to the point of sheer terror. The sensation sent chills down her spine, and a faint, incoherent sound escaped Lisbell’s lips.

“Ah…?”

“It’s better if you can’t use it.”

Crack. Snap.

Something twisted out of place.

Before the sound even registered, the pain did.

Agonizing, overwhelming pain flooded her senses.

“Aaagh!”

A wretched scream ripped through the air, echoing across the chapel’s walls. Tears burst forth instantly, and her vision wavered. She couldn’t even close her mouth; her entire body shook uncontrollably.

“Hah… haah, agh, aah…!”

Lisbell’s struggling grew more violent, verging on convulsions. Her vision spun and distorted, the sheer intensity of the pain clouding her consciousness. It was unlike anything she had ever experienced.

By the time he finally let go with a touch sickeningly gentle, she collapsed onto the floor, writhing in agony.

“Ugh… haah, ahh….”

Her sobs spilled out in ragged gasps, overtaking even her breath.

She couldn’t tell what had happened to her ankle. She wanted to look, but the very thought terrified her. If she lifted her skirt and saw the damage—if it was so ruined it could never function again—she might break completely. But the pain alone already told her it was that severe.

‘Why….’

Curled up, gasping through the shock, Lisbell stared blankly into the void.

‘Why is this still happening…?’

She had believed it was over.

She had thought, with certainty, that it had ended.

She had convinced herself that he had finally faced reality and put an end to his wretched whims.

What was the sky like that day?

The moment she had felt truly severed from him, the weather had been perfectly clear. The breeze had been light and crisp, brushing against her nose and filling her lungs with a fresh, gentle warmth.

“Hic…”

That was the first time she had realized how peaceful an ordinary day could feel.

She had never fully appreciated how precious normalcy was—how happy it was to bask in the sunlight when she wished, to feel the wind when she desired. She had taken those things for granted, only to have them ripped away.

And just as she fully grasped that the peace she had believed was within reach had now become an unattainable dream—something inside her snapped.

“Why me…?”



“Why, hic, why… why…! Why does it have to be me?!”



“There must be plenty of women looking for you! I’m not the only one—there are dozens, hundreds alone who would line up for you! You could have any one of them! So why… why this fickle obsession, why… why does it have to ruin me? Why won’t you leave me alone? What the hell did I do to deserve this? What crime did I commit to suffer like this…?”

In a one-sided relationship like this, seeking justice was meaningless.

Because it was, by its nature, utterly one-sided.

There was no right answer.

A relationship dictated by someone’s capricious whims—a standard as fleeting and unstable as idle curiosity—was nothing but a vicious cycle of destruction.

And the most terrifying part was the creeping realization that she might be the only one rotting away in this endless spiral.

That thought settled deep in her gut like a heavy stone, filling her with a stark, paralyzing fear. At times, she felt a surge of injustice, only to be swallowed by sheer terror. Anger burned through her, bitter and helpless, as if her very flesh were being torn away.

She sobbed uncontrollably, her gasping cries breaking apart into choked breaths—until suddenly, a hand reached out and cupped her cheek.

Her body jerked violently, as if her very heart had been seized.

“If that’s what you wanted, you shouldn’t have looked at me like that in the first place.”



“You shouldn’t have looked at me with those eyes.”

“Wh… what….”

“I think I might be in love with you.”



“That’s why I came to find you.”

Each word fell with quiet precision, clipped and steady. And at the end of his sentence, Ulrich smiled—like a sunflower turning toward the sun.

Radiant.

Overwhelmingly bright.

And beneath that light, Lisbell felt, with suffocating certainty, that she had truly been abandoned by God.

 If the pain creeping up from her ankle had been even slightly weaker, she might have let out a hollow laugh, unable to resist the numb shock spreading through her entire body.

How was this any different from the ridiculous premise she had once scoffed at in her mind—the one she had declared to her fiancé, Theodore?

‘I must leave him because I love him.’

It was an utterly incomprehensible notion.

And because she couldn’t understand it, everything about it felt grotesque.

“Love…?”

She had once spoken that word to this man’s face. But never in this way.

Back then… it was because he had felt less like a person and more like a slab of ice, something no human warmth could ever melt. Overwhelmed by his cruelty, the word had escaped her lips in a desperate breath.

And what had Ulrich’s reaction been?

He had laughed at her for even mentioning love, as if spitting on the very idea. Then he had forced her onto the table, lifting her skirts with absolute ease, as if crushing her dignity was no more than a passing amusement.

And yet now, that same man spoke of love.

Claimed to love her.

At some point, Lisbell’s tears had stopped falling. She gazed up at him, utterly hollow, as if someone had reached inside her and stolen her soul.

“You…”

Her throat was tight, but she couldn’t even swallow. It felt like staring into something beyond the limits of human comprehension.

“Do you even… remember what you just did to me…?”

“Hm?”

“My ankle… just now… y-you… you broke it….”

Love?

He called this love?

Was what he understood as love something entirely different from what she knew?

The love Lisbell knew was like the first snowfall of winter—pure, clear, and white.

But what he spoke of was something else entirely.

His was suffocating, an all-consuming blackness with no exit, no escape.

White and black. Opposites so extreme that calling them the same was laughable. Suspicion surged inside her, choking her. As she struggled to form the words, Ulrich merely tilted his head with innocent curiosity, then hummed as if in thought.

“Well, you brought this on yourself.”



“I thought you were asking me to break it completely.”

His voice was so smooth, so effortlessly deceitful, that anyone listening without context might actually believe her to be at fault.

Unfortunately for him, Lisbell was not someone so easily fooled. But all she could do was gulp down her horror and stare at him in mute disbelief.

No matter how many times she tried to wrap her head around it, the result remained the same. She couldn’t understand. Her mind moved too slowly, her thoughts lagging behind. All she could do was curl in on herself, desperately trying to retreat from his shadow.

Something moved toward her, blurring in her unsteady vision.

Before she could flinch, Ulrich’s finger traced down her pale cheek.

Wiping away her pitiful tear stains, he glanced at his damp fingertip—then brought it to his lips and licked it.

And smiled.

“Let’s go back to Lekem together.”



“I’ll make you a beautiful bride of spring.”

…A bride?

A spring bride.

No.

No, that wasn’t right.

She had once dreamt of being a bride—but in late summer, not spring.

And that dream had long since vanished, evaporating into nothing before she could even grasp it.

Lisbell no longer wished for such things.

That was why she didn’t immediately realize what was happening—that this man, who called his twisted emotions love, was now uttering words akin to a proposal.

A bride.

His bride.

The bride of this man with those pretty, sickening eyes.

Her head felt like it was about to split open. Or perhaps it was her insides being twisted and wrung dry. The sheer, violent revulsion hit her both physically and emotionally.

She had to get away.

Right now.

With every ounce of strength she could muster, Lisbell forced herself upright, inching backward toward the display case lined with shining candlesticks.

“No….”

She crawled backward on her hands, but even that was difficult.

Any slight movement sent unbearable pain lancing through her ankle, as if her very bones were being shredded apart. Cold sweat drenched her forehead, her back—every inch of her body.

And yet, she moved.

Because if she didn’t—if she stopped—she wouldn’t be able to endure it.

“No… No, no. I don’t want this… I hate it…!”

What had started as a feeble shake of her head escalated into a near-hysterical rejection. She was shaking so hard that she was on the verge of screaming.

Then, a hand seized her hair.

Her head was yanked back by an overwhelming force, and piercingly cold blue eyes bore down on her.

“Why?”



“Why do you hate it?”

His voice held genuine confusion.

“I don’t understand. Shouldn’t you be happy, Lisbell? I’m no longer treating you as a mistress—I’m making you my lawful wife.”



“And just think, how many women in Lorant dream of marrying me? You won. You should be celebrating… shouldn’t you?”

The sheer arrogance in his voice was suffocating, a twisted self-righteousness that dripped with malice. It was as if he truly expected her to weep with joy, overwhelmed by his supposed generosity.

“Celebrate…?”



“You’ve tormented me, humiliated me, crushed me… You even did this to my leg, a-and now you… y-you call this love? And now you expect me to—?!”

“I told you already, you brought this upon yourself.”



“And besides, is it really such a big deal? It’s not like I severed a nerve and left you crippled. Just rest for a few days, and you’ll be fine.”

Ulrich smirked, his gaze laced with condescension. The sheer transparency of his malice sent a chill through her bones. He spoke as if his actions could never be considered cruel, as if he truly believed he was in the right.

“Or wait—”

His grip on her hair tightened.

Her scalp burned as if her skin was being ripped away, her face twisting in agony. Fresh tears spilled down her cheeks.

“Are you still hung up on Theodore?”



“My, my. I didn’t take you for someone so… pathetic, Lisbell.”

He laughed coldly.

Even hearing Theodore’s name come from his lips felt like an unforgivable sin.

Because of this man, she had lost Theodore—her love, her future, everything.

Perhaps this was an even greater insult than the twisted love Ulrich had tried to claim just moments ago.

Lisbell glared at him with seething hatred.

Ulrich only smirked, as if something amusing had crossed his mind.

“Come to think of it… how was your little reunion with your ex-fiance?”

Lisbell’s hands clenched involuntarily.

Ulrich finally released her hair, instead brushing his fingers over the back of her head in a disturbingly gentle gesture. Lowering himself to meet her gaze, he studied her reaction with quiet amusement.

“He’s still the same. Ever the responsible man.”



“Almost… painfully so.”

His words weren’t idle chatter.

There was a deliberate weight behind them, a veiled meaning that sent alarm bells ringing in Lisbell’s mind.

Not just his words—the timing, the phrasing, the way he spoke of responsibility and pity—it was all too deliberate.

And the way he spoke about Theodore… as if he knew him better than she did.

A terrible realization clawed at her mind.

Memories of her visit flooded back, scenes flashing through her head like scattered puzzle pieces.

She had gone there to see Theodore.

And what had she found?

A woman at his side. A woman whose stomach was softly rounded. A woman who did not bother hiding her disdain toward Lisbell.

Jane.

There was no proof.

But instinct took over.

Lisbell’s trembling fingers shot forward, clutching the fabric of Ulrich’s coat.

“What… did you do?”



“What did you do to Theodore?”



“Tell me. Tell me right now!”

“Lisbell, you keep saying such unpleasant things. ‘Did’ something to him?”

Ulrich effortlessly pried her fingers off his coat, leisurely intertwining his own hands before bringing them to his lips.

Then, with mocking gentleness, he pressed a kiss to her bloodless, trembling knuckles.

“All I did was ensure that Motier could settle down with someone new.”



“Since I took his future wife away, well… consider it my way of making amends.”

Lisbell’s lips parted in shock.

Her frozen eyes took in every inch of his face, her mind reeling.

“Are you saying… you sent Jane?”

“Jane?”

He rolled the name around his mouth, as if it was unfamiliar. Then, with a brief chuckle, he mused,

“Ah. She must have changed her name.”

“Actors do that sometimes, you know. They’re so used to playing different roles that they change their names to fit the situation. When we signed the contract, she was Solah Hines.”


Ah, now she finally understood the vague sense of deja vu she felt when facing Jane. It was the same shadow she had occasionally encountered from Julian Scott during her time at the Althahart estate. That inexplicable, shell-like feeling, the sense that something was artificially crafted, had been emanating from Jane.

In other words, Jane was really…

“…Why?”

Lisbell’s stiffened lips trembled with effort. Ulrich, who had been gently biting her fingertips without causing her pain, softly lifted her eyelids, making her gaze meet his.

“Why… are you doing this?”

Why are you… really doing this?

“Why… what does Theo have to do with you…?”

His brows twitched.

Even though she was consumed with anger, there was still a part of her that felt she needed to lash out at his shameless face. Her chest burned with so much heat that her eyes were aching.

“What did Theo ever do to you…?”



“What kind of crime did he commit to deserve this… Why, why…! Why?!”

Tears poured out uncontrollably. It was a storm of sorrow. If her ankle had hurt so much earlier, now her heart ached so badly that it felt like it might break. Perhaps, this single blow was worse than any suffering she had endured so far.

She had worked so hard to keep this misfortune, which she had unknowingly swallowed, from spreading to Theodore. She had endured parting from him, hurting him, and even becoming nothing more than Ulrich’s plaything, all to protect him. Despite all that effort, why did this outcome have to be inevitable?

Why…

Theodore, whom she had met again, at least seemed happier now than when he had been dragging out the broken engagement.

Jane, the woman who had used a false name to approach him, seemed to feel a deep responsibility for him, and she would now work with him to build the stable future they had both dreamed of.

And Ulrich Althahart, that b*stard, had employed this woman to manipulate him.

Wasn’t that a sign that she had ruined Theodore’s life, becoming part of the destruction herself?

No matter how beautiful the relationship might seem, if beneath it all, Jane Hines was only pretending to love Theodore, it was nothing but a lie. It was most likely a contract motivated by money, and in the end, Theodore’s entire life was being toyed with.

Despite deciding to leave him, despite betting everything on it, Theodore’s life had already become tainted. The fact that she, Lisbell, could never be involved with anyone else felt like a curse, and it was impossible to deny that she had become such a horrible person. She couldn’t hide the internal wounds that seemed to be festering deep within her.

The bottled-up resentment was now directed squarely at the true culprit.

Lisbell cried out like a young beast, pushing and hitting at Ulrich’s chest and face with all her might. But her ankle was too painful, and with tears welling up faster than her anger, she collapsed exhausted, her strength drained.

“Ugh…!”

A scream burst from her lips.

The pain in her ankle suddenly intensified, and Ulrich’s hand clamped down on the area, as if to force her to feel it.

Lisbell’s body, leaning against the display case, slid downward. Ulrich grabbed her messy hair and pulled it sharply back. Shards of rainbow-colored stained glass fell wildly, scraping her retina painfully. She winced instinctively.

The voice that followed was soft but, strangely enough, sharp.

“When I confessed, you didn’t shed a single tear.”



“You’re reacting way too strongly to this, don’t you think?”

It was almost as if—although this was an unsettling thought—she was acting jealously. As she muttered in response, Lisbell froze, her breath caught. She had unknowingly grabbed the candleholder that had rolled away earlier. Without thinking, she swung it at the side of Ulrich’s head. The sound of impact was sharp and strong. The sudden blow caused Ulrich’s grip to loosen.

“Huff, hhh…”

Lisbell crawled desperately to escape his hold.

“Ha…! Ack! Ugh…! Hhh…”

But it was no use. Her ankle was caught, and she was dragged back. The pain from the already broken area felt like it was being torn apart again, and Lisbell lay there, her dazed eyes blinking open.

“Ha… Looks like you’ve really turned into a cat while I wasn’t looking. You’re scratching like crazy…”

Ulrich, now on top of her, restraining her with his weight, muttered irritably. Blood trickled down his ear, and as she noticed, the smell of iron-filled blood seemed to hit her all at once.

“Not sure what I should do to make you calm down. Should I find some shackles?”

Even though there was no satisfaction in the physical result, Ulrich seemed completely unaffected. His tone was still that of a gentleman, and he even made it look like he was leisurely searching for non-existent shackles.

A large hand gently covered Lisbell’s eyes. Instinctively, she twisted her body, resisting, but Ulrich clicked his tongue in disapproval.

“Ahh…!”

The hand that had urged her into the darkness released, only to be replaced by his tight grip on her hair, pulling it so hard she thought it might tear. Her tears overflowed, too much for her to shake it off.

Finally, when she managed to unwrinkle her brow, she found Ulrich’s icy blue eyes fixed on the nape of her neck. The harsh, biting gaze sent a chill down her spine.

Soon after, he grinned, and from his charming smile, a terrifying energy seemed to emanate. It reminded her of the moment when he had grabbed her ankle earlier. An unsettling, indescribable unease swelled up in her chest.

The soft sound of fragile glass breaking rang out. A faint, flickering light passed by in the direction of the search. It vanished from the retina, and only then did Lisbell realize it was the flame of a candle burning in the shape of a long teardrop.

“What is it…?”

“Heh, ugh…”

“What’s so inferior about me compared to Theodore?”

The elegant flame tilted, shaped as smoothly as her own figure. Completely absorbed in the heat of the flame, she didn’t even notice the slight oddity in the angle of the object. It was only when—

“…Ugh! Hah!”

A hot sensation rose from her neck. The melted wax dripped and stuck to her skin, causing a mild burn. Even without seeing it, the scar would have been horrific, and once again, she couldn’t touch that spot.

Her delicate body, pinned beneath his solid frame, struggled violently as if fighting against an illness.

What was he doing? Even as Lisbell thrashed wildly, Ulrich easily restrained her, continuing to drop hot wax. Plop Plop. The candle wax, melting with a sizzling sound, fell in long teardrop shapes onto her neck.

The movements filled with resistance slowly died down. Her vision blurred, multiple images stacking before merging into one. It was almost too much—her face first went pale and then turned blue. Cold sweat ran down her temples like tears.

A sharp cough escaped from her mouth as her voice cracked from the strain. Her throat felt like it was turned inside out, and it felt as though her lungs had flipped. After a while, no sound came out at all.

On the brink of losing consciousness, Lisbell scratched the floor with her nails. Her hand trembled uncontrollably for a long while, and finally, Ulrich casually tossed the candle aside.

“Does it hurt?”



“Then why would you make me feel this disappointed…”

She couldn’t tell anymore. Could such a bitter, pitiful voice really be feigned?

There were only two possibilities. Either she no longer had the strength to distinguish between them, or the man had such deeply sincere emotions she couldn’t relate to or understand…

As Ulrich’s hand, now empty of the candle, moved up toward her neck, Lisbell instinctively tensed her waist. She squirmed as if trying to hide from the encroaching darkness, but Ulrich easily stopped her and began peeling the hardened wax off her skin, one by one. He then adjusted her posture to ensure he could see her clearly.

His loose and warm breath brushed over her collarbone.

“It looks like it’ll leave a mark…”

As he said this, Ulrich grinned in a seductively soft tone.

“It’s fine, it’ll look beautiful.”

Ah, only then did Lisbell understand what he intended.

If she had even a bit of strength left to strike, she would have scratched at her throat until her skin necrotized, severing her nerve endings and shattering her bones with her nails, tearing away the suffocating sensations.

The inability to do so was tragic.

It was truly an endless tragedy.


With vacant, rolling eyes, she took in the cross of the church.

It felt entirely different from when she had observed it while seated. Back then, she had been overwhelmed by an aura of mystery, often lost in reverence. But now, seeing it up close, it seemed nothing more than a simple structure, making her former reverence feel foolish.

If God was truly there, was He watching this unfold?

And if so, was He merely standing by, refusing to intervene?

The glimmer of light she had once felt in the tavern by the harbor was fading. The moment she had been certain that divine hands had graced her and granted salvation—one by one, those fragments were shattering into pieces.

So this was how a soul crumbled so hopelessly.

He said something, but she barely heard him. He was speaking of rituals, marriage—something along those lines—but it felt as if he were speaking in an unfamiliar tongue, the words slipping through her mind like mist.

Lisbell merely blinked vacantly. Even as tears blurred her vision repeatedly, she kept staring at the cross-shaped structure before her.

Before long, even the cross faded from view. In its place, the face of a man filled her sight. He had been speaking but now furrowed his brows, perhaps realizing he had been talking to himself all along.

But it was only for a moment. As if it did not bother him in the slightest, he merely chuckled and leaned down to press his lips against hers. Her lips must have been chapped and broken in every possible way, yet he kissed her without hesitation, as if his tolerance for disgust was boundless.

As her lower lip became soaked with his saliva, Lisbell remained dazed.

This man had now blocked her view of God.

Was that why God could no longer see her?

Even in the very end, she did not want to admit that she had been abandoned by the divine. If she did, she felt she would truly be swallowed into an inescapable abyss.

Perhaps… she already had both feet submerged, sinking into its suffocating depths.



She could only tell that she had been asleep for a long time.

The lingering echoes in her faint memories carried different scents. During one moment of consciousness, she detected the sharp scent of medicine. In another, the salty air of the sea. And in yet another, the thick, suffocating stench of smoke.

As if she had traveled far, led only by these unrelated scents. The realization struck her only after she was fully awake.

The insides of her eyelids, which had been shut for so long, felt parched, as though all moisture had been sucked dry. Even with her blurred vision, she instantly recognized where she was.

Because this was the worst place she could possibly be.

The familiar wallpaper and framed pictures, the placement of the table, the precise dimensions of the window frames—every detail was seared into her memory, whether she liked it or not. Everything screamed that she had returned to a living hell.

Lisbell scrambled to rise, thrashing her limbs.

“Ahh—!”

Her frail limbs missed the edge of the bed, and she tumbled to the floor. As she tried to put weight on her ankle, a searing pain shot through her, and a sharp cry tore from her throat.

Her panicked gaze dropped to her right ankle. It was wrapped in layers of bandages, so thick they made it look nearly twice its original size.

Belatedly, she noticed a similar discomfort around her throat. Her fingers trembled as they traced over the wounds. Bruises and injuries covered her body from top to bottom.

She couldn’t believe it.

This wasn’t a nightmare.

It wasn’t some twisted, fleeting vision.

Lisbell tried over and over to rise, desperate to flee this room. But her limbs felt unbearably heavy, and her injured foot refused to cooperate. She couldn’t even stand without grabbing onto something for support.

“Ugh… ngh…”

Just as she gritted her teeth and forced herself upright, her gaze landed on an object she hadn’t noticed before.

A chessboard.

The very same one she had glimpsed before—inside that eerie, cold room, bathed in a pale blue hue.

She knew all chessboards had the same shape, size, and pattern, but the chilling sensation running down her spine whispered otherwise.

This was the same one from Sir Philip’s estate.

No mistake.

She wasn’t imagining things.

And if that was true… then this reality was inescapable.

A creeping panic clawed at her throat, pressing down until all she could think was that she needed to get out of here. Now.

“What are you doing?!”

A voice, filled with shock, suddenly struck her ears.

Lisbell flinched violently, her breath catching as she turned toward the source.

She recognized the man entering the room.

Victor Loisden.

Ulrich’s secretary.

Lisbell’s pupils trembled.

This confirmed it.

If he was here, that meant Ulrich was here.

Which meant… she was back.

Back in the detestable Altahart mansion.

Victor hurried toward her, his voice edged with concern. “You shouldn’t be moving yet! Your right ankle, and your throat—”

“Let go of me!”

Lisbell violently shoved away the hands trying to support her. Victor paused, momentarily startled by her forceful resistance. She clutched the shoulder he had touched and collapsed back onto the floor.

“Why… why am I here?”

“…You’ve been moving around for so long. Now that you’ve finally arrived, you need to rest.”

“This mansion… the Laurent’s estate?”

“Yes.”

Victor, who gave a solemn confirmation, gave up on trying to lift her back onto the bed and instead placed the tray in his hands onto the side table. Lisbell, staring at the door he had entered through, suddenly spoke as if possessed.

“Let me meet with the madam.”

Victor, who had been turning the empty cup and medicine to a more visible position, turned to look at her. Lisbell was too busy hastily spilling out her words.

“I—I made a mistake last time, but I had no choice. I didn’t have enough reason to trust and follow her back then. So if she was deeply offended by what happened before, I can apologize. If she wants me to kneel, I’ll do it willingly. Just please, call her here. Let me meet with her. Or at least relay my words to her…”

“…What do you intend to do by meeting her?”

Victor’s sudden question barely left his lips before he grabbed his forehead with a sigh.

“No, don’t answer that. I didn’t ask because I was genuinely curious.”



“What I mean is… It won’t change anything.”

Lisbell, who had been fixated on the door as if it were her only goal, slowly turned her head toward him. Her bloodshot eyes, ringed with a faint, watery haze, must have been difficult to meet, as Victor averted his gaze this time.

“Ms. Osborne, I don’t know what you’re planning, but if something like this happens again… Honestly, I can’t guarantee what will happen then. This time, it ended like this, but next time, you might get hurt even worse.”



“You should know his nature by now… Once he sets his mind on something, he never backs down.”

As she listened to his words, which were somewhere between persuasion and protest, the moisture in Lisbell’s eyes gradually dried up. Her now dull, murky gaze reflected the cold stillness overtaking her mind.

She had a vague idea of why he was saying this.

Ever since Ulrich had begun his madness, Victor had been unable to completely hide his discomfort whenever they encountered each other. Though he followed his superior’s orders without question, it was clear he found the situation distasteful.

So, this message was likely meant as a warning—to stop making things worse and protect herself.

But to Lisbell, who was lying here in this miserable state, it was nothing more than an infuriatingly complacent remark.

A warning coming from someone who, unlike her, was free to move as he pleased, unrestrained by any chains. A piece of advice to “stay put” from someone who could leave whenever he wanted—no matter how well-intentioned, it was impossible for her to accept without resentment.

“I’ll deal with the consequences. Your moral dilemmas aren’t my concern. If you’re worried about your status or position, you can blame it all on me. Say that I was stubborn, that I threw a tantrum. Just—please, let me see her….”

“That’s what I’m trying to tell you. It’s pointless. The young master convened the last quarterly board meeting and officially removed the madam. He is now the undisputed head of the family.”

Lisbell’s eyes widened in disbelief.

“…What?”

“He is no longer just the young master—he is now the master of this household. The madam no longer has the power to stop him.”

Only now did she realize—Victor’s quiet, careful words weren’t mere persuasion. They were a warning.

A warning to abandon her foolish hopes, because no matter what she did, nothing would change.


“Still… still.”



“Still, there must be some way… there must be… there has to be… there must be, right? Otherwise, what am I supposed to do? Do I really have to become that man’s bride? To hold a wedding I don’t even mean and live my life trapped here?”

“There must be something… a way, somehow, right? There has to be… there must be… or else, what will happen to me? What will I do…!”

Lisbell desperately crawled and clutched his pant leg.

“Th-the monastery. That’s right. I… I officially joined the monastery. I made a vow and registered there! So, what you’re doing… this is kidnapping! It’s an unjust act! If the monastery finds out, they will take immediate action…”

“You left the monastery several days back. By now, you’ve likely been classified as someone who committed a serious crime and disappeared, probably even formally expelled. Even if that’s not the case, I’m sure the young master has already taken care of it.”

Victor answered with a sigh, carefully pulling her hand off of him.

“I’ve brought the medicine, so don’t forget to take it.”



“I hope you recover quickly.”

With that, he left the room without looking back.

Lisbell, who had clung desperately to his pant leg, was now left in the dust, unable to keep up with his pace. Despite her efforts, the door slammed shut, leaving her overwhelmed by a deep sense of failure.

“Hey! Over here… come back! Just once, come back and talk to me again… Hey… Loisden! Hey!”

This time, she couldn’t stay quiet.

How did I escape from here before?

How did I get out of here?

After being dragged here, wounded beyond recognition, she was now being told not to even try to escape. That was like telling Lisbell to bury herself alive.

She desperately wanted to rise, but her body stubbornly refused to cooperate. Lisbell dragged herself to the side table near the door. She grabbed the glass sitting on it and hurled it toward the door.

Crash!

The glass shattered with a sharp sound, pieces scattering across the floor. Some of the larger shards rolled all the way to her knees. Gasping for breath, her chest heaving, she stared at the door.

“Why, why isn’t he coming…?”

No matter how much she waited, there was no response. Lisbell’s eyes, filled with resentment, began to soften as she let go of her frustration.

“Why isn’t he coming? Why, why isn’t anyone coming? Why…!”

Someone, anyone, please come.

Don’t leave me here alone in this space.

Anyone, please get me out of here right now…

“Uhh, uhh… Ahh…”

Lisbell collapsed to the floor, crying as though she had lost all hope. Pressing her face into the damp carpet, she replayed where things had gone wrong. But she still couldn’t pinpoint what had gone wrong. No matter how much she tried to think back, she couldn’t understand what she had done wrong.

One mistake, though, did come to mind.

“You’ve now reached a point where even the mistress can no longer stop him.”

Should she have quietly followed Madam’s wishes back then?

Should she have left for Ducas instead of running away?

If she had, would she have been at peace by now, without worries?

Could she have been free?

It was a pointless reflection. No matter how much she thought about it now, the past couldn’t be undone. Just like she couldn’t erase the journey to Marnia to see her mother, the conflict with the mistress remained the same. Knowing this, tears kept flowing from her chest, as if they were pouring from a deep well.

“Why! Why, again… why, why, why…!”

Hoping that it was all a dream, she slammed her forehead against the floor, but nothing changed. The only thing that spread was the painfully real sensation of physical pain. It was clear it wasn’t a dream. Despair, thick as mud, filled her chest, burning away her mind.

Ah, I…

Yes, I…

I am destined to wither and die in this paradise.

Forever trapped here.

Without anyone ever knowing that fact.

I will fade away, and eventually, I will be nothing but a dying ember, giving up on revival, turning to ash.

A breath, pushed up from her abdomen, flowed through her parted lips. It was so bleak that she had the impulse to crush it all, to destroy everything.

Just like always, she would break alone. After losing her mother, after Theodore’s remaining life was shattered, she too would reach the point where she must abandon herself.

That man, the one who caused all this, would lose nothing at all…

‘…Why?’

It’s unfair, right?

‘Why?’

Why must it be only me who ends up like this?

Her tightly clenched fist trembled for a moment. Raw anger planted a thought in her heart that mirrored the direction she was heading.

Lisbell, who had been motionless, as if she were trapped in a tragedy, slowly began to lift her upper body with sluggish, laborious movements. The sunlight illuminated only a sliver of her face, still calm, even with moisture on her eyes, nose, and lips. Her eyes, though focused, seemed unfocused, not knowing where to look, landing instead on the shards of glass scattered by her knees.

I don’t want this.

I don’t want to die here, withered away.

If I’m going to end like this, if I’m going to refuse to let it end like this…

Her trembling hand grabbed a piece of glass. As she wrapped her palm tightly around it, the sharp edges of the broken glass scraped her skin, drawing blood. The liquid, dark with pain, dripped onto the transparent shards, turning a cruel shade as it mixed with her tears.

Lisbell raised her arm, swinging the shard diagonally. When she slammed it onto the floor, blood burst from her palm in a spurt.

But strangely, it didn’t hurt.

Once, then again, she swung her arm over and over. With each swing, the shard shattered, unable to withstand the impact with the bare floor.

As she opened her palm, the shattered fragments, no longer in their original form, fell to the ground with a soft sound. Her hand was also scratched and bleeding, but the result, though somewhat self-destructive, solidified her resolve like a seed planted deep within her.

The best defense is always an offense.

So, in other words, I must strike Ulrich Altahart first…

Hatred settled into her chest like frost, creeping coldly, filling her. The winter of decay enveloped her. Every corner of her heart became twisted, breaking in ways she could not fix.

Something she had long fought to protect seemed to erode alongside it, but it was okay. She was already in tatters. No matter how much more she was broken here, it would no longer matter.

Her swollen, bruised face slowly turned away.

She saw the mirror adorning the side of the room.

Her messy, tangled short hair, her face drained of color, and her eyes—though still clear—appeared as though they had been ravaged, their imperfections unhealed, decaying.

It was the gaze of someone resigned to their downfall.



The spring sun was gently warming the air.

Her bare skin, exposed to the sunlight, felt prickled, as if it had been pierced by countless thorns. Lisbell, lying with her back turned to the bright window, wiggled her left ankle.

Clink, clink.

The shackles on her barely functional ankle made a stubborn sound as they followed every little movement. She moved her foot like a child playing a game, but there was no playfulness on her face. Her face, devoid of expression, seemed as if someone had drained all its life.

Swish, swish, swish.

The chain connecting the shackles made a scraping sound as it swished through the air, cutting it like a whip. But it still felt better than when it had been around her neck. Though, truthfully, whether one was better than the other seemed a trivial matter.

Perhaps Ulrich had wanted to place it around her neck again, but hadn’t done so, likely because her neck was still healing from the burns.

She didn’t know how long she had been neglected after being burned that day, but every now and then, her bandages oozed with fluid. The new skin was regenerating more slowly than expected, and the healing process was taking longer. Even though her palm, which had been badly treated while clutching shards of glass, seemed nearly healed, it was clear the recovery was slower than anticipated.

“I’ll make you the beautiful bride of spring.”

The realization that those sinful words might be delayed was due to these very injuries.

At the time, she had thought that as soon as he dragged her to Laurent, she might be led directly into the wedding hall. But the fact that he didn’t seemed to indicate that even he recognized how wretched Lisbell’s appearance had become.

Though her swollen ankle might be covered by the wedding dress, the wound on her neck, which was still leaking fluid, would make it impossible to present herself at such a joyous occasion.

Wearing a dress that hid her neck on such a bright spring day would surely invite unwanted stares.

This delay was Lisbell’s only hope.


Swallowing back a groan, Lisbell staggered toward the mirror. Her body was wrapped in bandages from top to bottom, and the one relatively intact foot bore a dark shackle.

Perhaps because shock had its own stages, she barely reacted as she looked at her pitiful state with indifferent eyes. She raised a hand to her bandaged throat and, having done this several times already, skillfully unraveled it. The cloth, damp in places with pus and fluid, unwound and fell away.



The torn and swollen flesh beneath was festering from within, refusing to heal. It was clear that it would take a long time before the wound even began to close.

Lisbell dug her nails into the wound, scratching furiously. There was a reason why even rest and medication did nothing to help her heal. Whenever she was alone in her bedroom, she would touch, prod, and rip at her wounds like someone who had lost their mind. A burning sensation, as if living flames were wrapped around her throat, flared to life.

It hurt. It hurt, and it kept on hurting. In this moment, pain was all she could think about.

“Ugh… Hngh…”

Unable to endure the searing agony, she wobbled before collapsing onto the floor.

Her trembling hands fumbled for something to hold onto before eventually grasping the fallen bandages. Slowly, with unsteady fingers, she began to rewrap them around her throat.

She imagined the moment Ulrich would remove them tonight, his brows knitting together in irritation at the worsening injury. The thought, sharp like a thorny path, brought her the faintest sliver of relief.

She didn’t know how long this method would work, but she had no other choice. She had chosen self-destruction. Ulrich, after all, was the type of man who would drag her to the altar even if her throat was in this state.

Before that happened, she had to—

Clutching the side table for support, she forced herself upright. Like a newborn fawn taking its first steps, Lisbell struggled forward, inching toward the window bathed in the fading afternoon light.

She grasped the curtain and gazed through the clear glass. The barren winter branches had begun to regain their vitality, and the brittle, withered grass was now tinged with a fresh green hue. Buds, prepared for their grand display, painted their tips in shades of yellow, pink, violet, and sky blue, ready to bloom at any moment.

As those flowers patiently embraced the changing seasons, Lisbell, too, thought—thought, and thought again. She reflected on the hatred that had consumed her ever since she lost the two people she had truly loved, after they were ripped away from her.

“I didn’t realize it before, but Lisbell is terrible at acting.”

At the end of her contemplation, she wanted that confident declaration to turn against him, to rip him apart.

Just as he had humiliated her with his deceit, just as he had turned Theodore’s life into nothing more than a cruel stage play, she wanted him trapped in a web of lies, utterly unable to escape.

For that, Lisbell planned to begin a quiet performance with him as the sole audience.

It couldn’t be too sudden, but it also couldn’t be too late.

She would lull Ulrich into complacency and then strike.

Before his patience wore thin and he dragged her to the altar by force.

In this temporary reprieve, Lisbell resolved to wear a tear-stained smile.

With a sharp flick, she pulled the curtains shut and stumbled back to bed, collapsing onto the mattress. She was sure she had closed them properly, yet somewhere, light still leaked through, spilling onto the sheets.

Like a spring rainstorm, the sun’s piercing rays poured in.

It was so blindingly bright that it made something inside her ache.

Curling up, she crawled deeper into the shadows, hiding herself as best she could.



She dreamt of misstepping and plunging straight into a blazing inferno.

The scorching heat climbing up her throat had seeped into her unconscious.

She woke when she felt something cool, like a night breeze, repeatedly stroking her forehead.

The moment she struggled to open her eyes, a hand seized her chin.

“You didn’t take your painkillers, did you?”

It seemed Ulrich had just returned to the mansion, still dressed in his outdoor attire. Lisbell only blinked in response.

That was all he needed to confirm the answer. Without another word, he slid a hand behind her back and forced her to sit up.

It was only when beads of sweat trickled down her temples that she realized a fierce chill had overtaken her body. Her trembling hands clutched at the blanket.

“You probably skipped your meals, too. Let’s start with that.”

Ulrich rose from the bed, likely intending to call for someone.

Lisbell, watching his retreating figure, murmured softly.

“Bring me some alcohol, too.”

“…What?”

He turned back to her, looking as if he had misheard.

Lisbell met his gaze with an unwavering, unreadable expression, pressing her silent request into his mind.

After a pause, Ulrich let out a scoff and shook his head in disbelief.

“You shouldn’t drink on an empty stomach.”

“It hurts.”



“That’s why I just want to drink and fall asleep quickly.”

“You might as well take a sleeping pill instead.”

“I don’t want medicine.”

Ulrich didn’t bother to hide his curiosity.

Ever since he had brought her back from Saint Allante Monastery, she had barely been more than a living corpse. A conversation lasting this long was rare, and it had been even longer since she had insisted on something so stubbornly.

And of all things, she was asking for alcohol—something she usually barely touched.

So she still had some of that strange defiance left in her. Then again, considering she was asking for liquor, she must be in quite a bit of pain.

With a thoughtful hum, Ulrich turned away from the door and instead returned to the bed.

Loosening the tie around his neck, he perched on the edge of the mattress, a meaningful smile tugging at his lips.

“Kiss me.”



“Then I’ll give it to you.”

Their dealings had always been like this. Whenever Lisbell asked for something, Ulrich would demand a price—not anything extravagant, but just enough to make her degrade herself in some way. And he relished the humiliation it brought her, as if savoring a fine delicacy.

“You know how this works, don’t you?”

He stuck out his tongue slightly, gesturing toward it with his finger.

“I only count it as a kiss if you use your tongue.”

He had made such proposals before, but back then, Lisbell’s mother had been held hostage. Now, after an entire season had passed and she had lost everything, she had fallen completely into his grasp.

Given what he knew of her nature, she wouldn’t comply easily.

His anticipation made the side of his head throb—the very spot where she had struck him with a candlestick before. The wound had been stitched up immediately and had since healed without a trace, yet for some reason, it still felt tight and sensitive.

How would she react?

Would she twist her expression like a crumpled piece of paper? Turn her head away in utter disgust? Or maybe she’d clench her fists and charge at him, swinging in futile rage?

Just imagining the possibilities delighted him. The laughter that bubbled up from within was dry yet genuine—proof that he was finally starting to feel the reality of her return.

Lisbell’s gaze was calm.

In the past, she had been unable to hide her revulsion, her irises trembling violently around her pupils. But now, she looked as hollow as the ruins left after a storm had passed. Too still—like the eyes of someone already dead.

Then, she placed a hand on the blanket and crawled forward on the bed.

Was she going to slap him? Shove him away?

He held his ground, not bothering to move.

He had a firm hunch that whatever happened next, it wouldn’t be what he wanted.

“……!”

Which was why, when she leaned in and kissed him without hesitation, Ulrich was genuinely taken aback.

For the first time in his life, something had slipped past his expectations. His senses stood on edge, his perception sharpening as if to make up for the surprise.

His widened steel-blue irises betrayed his shaken composure.

Whenever they shared physical contact, it was usually Ulrich who initiated. But this time, with him frozen in place, their lips simply pressed together, unmoving.

What shocked him even more came next.

Lisbell tilted her head slightly, parting her lips.

At that moment, his tongue lashed out instinctively, invading her mouth without hesitation.

 A sticky sound was heard. Ulrich stirred deeply within, as if he couldn’t breathe without taking from her.

 

Although he had kissed her occasionally while safely bringing her under the influence of sleeping pills, it was definitely different from when she was conscious.

 

The tingling sensation from the friction of their tongues, and the act of touching those now-familiar sensitive spots that drew out sweet moans, naturally led to a sensation so intense it was almost intoxicating. The tingling joy that spread from the friction of their tongues reached the tips of his hands and feet.

 

“Ugh…”

 

Hearing the slightly suppressed moan, Ulrich bit down hard on Lisbell’s lower lip. The pressure released a burst of fluid, like squeezing juice. Her mouth, which had been craving alcohol, overflowed with saliva.

 

Without pausing to catch his breath, Ulrich alternately sucked her upper and lower lips. Every time he circled the roof of her mouth with his tongue, her small mouth twitched and trembled. The tight contraction squeezed his tongue as it was enveloped within. In an instant, he felt an aching heaviness in his lower body.

 

His pen!s, trapped in his pants, throbbed with impatience to be released. Feeling the heavy weight in his groin, he pulled Lisbell’s waist close and lifted her into the air. The change in height broke the connection between their lips, which had been sharing breaths.

 

Ulrich licked the remnants of her saliva from his lips and whispered with a sigh.

 

“Isn’t this the first time?”

 



 

“That you’ve kissed me first.”

 

He had expected her to be difficult, so it was unexpected that things had ended this way, but he didn’t feel bad about it. In fact, the gentle warmth that spread within him was so clear that it made the corners of his mouth lift.

 

It was ridiculous. Such a simple act made him feel like his heart, not his head, had been struck.

 

‘It feels like a first kiss…’

 

The more he thought about it, the more it felt that way.

 

Before, it was obvious when she was forced, but today, it wasn’t particularly noticeable. He thought he should find out why she suddenly became so compliant, but before that, the primal lust that made the veins in his pen!s swell took precedence.

 

Lisbell let out a faint moan. It was the moment when her body, which had been lifted high in the air, was laid back on the bed. However, the moan was swallowed before it could properly escape, as Ulrich immediately followed her and devoured her lips again.

 

Her upper lip was sucked with a force that felt like it would tear. His tongue rudely invaded, tickling her even teeth with its rough taste buds. Their lips met again, sticking together tenderly.

 

“Hngh…”

 

The thin fabric of her slip, which barely concealed her skin, was lifted. As Ulrich continued to kiss her, nibbling and holding her, he gradually moved down. When his platinum hair brushed her neck, he immediately sucked on her nipple.

 

“Ah!”

 

Lisbell arched her back, letting out a nasal sound. Her ashen hair, uneven in length, spread evenly across the sheets. Had Ulrich seen it, he might have been tempted to gather it in his mouth and chew on it, but unfortunately, at that moment, his attention was entirely absorbed by her barely visible nipples under the slip.

 

Despite her flat and modest chest, the small nub was endearingly firm. It was a pleasure to roll it with his tongue and graze it with his teeth until it was slick with saliva.

 

“Ugh, hm…”

 

She let out a suppressed moan. In the bedroom, where the air was dry and chilly, the signs of life finally began to mix in.

 

Ulrich bit down on the slip covering her belly and pulled it up to her neck. Although not overly ample, her breasts had a distinct volume that could properly arouse a man’s lust. They were now exposed to his gaze.

 

Her coral-colored nipples were temptingly erect, inviting attention. Ulrich pressed down on them with his hand, rubbing the slightly indented center.

 

After a moment, he bent down and took the hardened nipple into his mouth, sucking and rolling it while his hand moved downward. His middle finger, slightly bent at the tip, parted the sparse pubic hair and pressed deeply into the tender entrance.

 

“Hah…!”

 

“Hmm.”

 

Their breaths escaped simultaneously, one urgent and the other hesitant. Ulrich pushed his fingers into the dry, stiff flesh and twisted them around. No matter how much he sucked and bit her nipple, there was little change, so he eventually lowered his position.

 

Lisbell’s legs were lifted high into the air.

 

Her right ankle, which had become accustomed to being in a cast due to a complete fracture, and the shackle that clinked with a discordant noise every time it moved, emphasizing its isolation, filled his view. In that state, he forcefully sucked below.

 

“Ugh, ugh… hm.”

 

Ulrich’s tongue, which had been licking around her entrance, traced the fissure inside her groin before slowly entering. He moved his tongue in and out as if he were thrusting his pen!s. The sensation of the soft flesh slipping and sliding inside was intensely peculiar.

 

Every time his tongue brushed the tender parts of the inner walls, it felt like it touched a sensitive spot, making her legs twitch. The chains clattered and swayed with each movement. The sound, like something being thinly sliced, brought a sharp chill to her chest.

 

He adjusted his grip on Lisbell’s ankles. As her legs closed tightly, her labia also plumply closed together. Ulrich buried his nose in between, believing that sweet nectar flowed within. The sound of him greedily slurping echoed loudly in their ears.

 

The foreplay wasn’t long. As he buried his face between her legs, fully intent on devouring her, Ulrich quickly unbuttoned his shirt. Like the violent rhythm of a beast, he shrugged off his shirt roughly, his hand naturally falling to his belt buckle.

 

His pen!s, clean and unblemished, was pulled out. When he stroked it, the pre-cum beading on the head grew thicker. The clear, viscous liquid ran down the side of the cock.

 

It was a clear sign that he wanted to plunge inside her and rub against her until he was fully spent. The smooth, hairless organ soon glistened with a slippery sheen.

 

“Aah…!”

 

He forcefully spread Lisbell’s thighs wide and pressed his flushed, red pen!s head against her twitching entrance. The blunt tip was slightly strained as it pushed into the tight flesh.

 

With a quick thrust of his hips, the shaft sank in halfway. A breath, whose origin was unclear, escaped into the air.

 

“It’s so tight.”

 

“Hngh, ugh…”

 

“Relax a little. Hah, it feels like it’s going to snap.”

 

“Hngh… ah…!”

 

He briefly uttered a sharp word and knelt up. The direction of his buried pen!s changed, and the rounded tip scratched at a strange spot inside. The sensation of being deeply squeezed made Ulrich let out a sharp breath.

 

“Should I c*m once? It might be better to wet it a bit first.”

 

Finding it too tight, he gently grasped the penis half-buried in the dry flesh, stroking it as if to masturbate. He even cupped his densely packed testicles in his palm, squeezing them to encourage ejaculation.

 

Lisbell lowered her eyes deeply. Ulrich, gazing down at her face, which seemed innocent yet fully aware of the impact inside, suddenly began thrusting.

 

Her delicate features instantly crumpled. Seeing her finally react, he wore a sly smile.

 

The thick organ stretched the ridiculously small entrance with sharp thrusts, pushing beyond what seemed manageable. With a skilled twist, he pried open her insides as he straightened his back.

 

The flesh pierced at a sharper angle, forcing open the tight inner walls. The entrance, usually too dry to fully close around him, gradually relaxed as it stretched wider with each thrust.

 

“Hngh… ah…!”

 

Ulrich didn’t miss the opportunity, lowering his licked fingers. Spreading her pubic hair, he pressed firmly on the small nub above her labia, rolling it with his fingers.

 When he directly touched her clitoris, an electrifying pleasure coursed through her belly, making her inner walls throb and tighten around his cock. The thing inside her twitched as if rejoicing at being inside.

 

He followed through by letting a lump of saliva, created by scraping the inside of his cheek with his tongue, drip out.

 

“…Ah…!”

 

Lisbell’s stiff body, which had been rigid like a piece of driftwood washed ashore, gradually loosened up. Ulrich, smiling as if pleased with this, thrust himself in more deeply.

 

The soft spot where the tip of his cock squirmed in felt particularly tender as it slid in. When he repeatedly struck that spot, targeting it, red marks appeared on her pale skin. Each time, as if the pleasure that had taken over her long ago swelled inside, she would tighten her belly in sync with his pounding.

 

“Mm, ah, ah…! Ngh…!”

 

The mixing of his pre-cum and her sticky fluids from the friction of his dick against her inner walls began to create a lewd squelching sound at their joining point.

 

Splish, splash. Now that the inside had finally become slick enough to move smoothly, Ulrich habitually grabbed her ankle and twisted it.

 

“Ah… Aah…!”

 

The coquettish moan that had been flowing from her suddenly turned into a stiff cry. Ulrich, who had tried to change her position to one more comfortable for penetration, unconsciously realized that he had grabbed her broken foot and loosened his grip. A displeased sigh followed.

 

“Because of your leg, this is, ngh, becoming a problem.”

 

“Ah, mm… Ah…”

 

“There’s no position we can do other than this, haah.”

 

Although he grumbled in discontent, his vulgar hip thrusts, twisting her lower body, didn’t stop. As if the only place he could find vitality was inside her, his heated, rigid cock rubbed and ground against her vaginal walls without rest.

 

As he glanced down at the already swollen entrance that had been struck a few times, Ulrich’s lips curled into a sly smile.

 

“I’ll carry you… ngh, should I break your leg a bit more?”

 

His hand slowly moved up her milk-white calf, eventually grabbing her right ankle, which was tightly wrapped in bandages. Lisbell’s gut turned cold as she swallowed down the intense revulsion that surged up, even suppressing her breathing.

 

As the vivid and tumultuous pain of that time when her ankle had been twisted and broken in the dim chapel resurfaced, her vision darkened.

 

As her entire body froze solid, the muscles between her buttocks tightened, clenching around his thick cock. Ulrich let out a wicked moan, squinting one eye in apparent pleasure.

 

“I’m kidding, so relax your hole; you’re too tight. Heh… How adorably scared you are.”

 

Whether it was truly just a nasty joke or not, he casually smiled while his hands roughly repositioned her buttocks on the sheets.

 

“Do you want to spread your legs a little more? I want to go in harder.”

 

Though his tone seemed to coax her, his hand roughly pressed down on her thigh. Lisbell’s lower body spread wide open as if it had become one with the sheets.

 

Taking full advantage of the now accessible entrance, he braced himself on the bedpost and thrust deeply into her slick interior. A sticky heat rose from where they were joined.

 

“Ah, mm, ah…!”

 

As the thick cock plunged into her like an iron hook, rudely battering the passageway leading to her womb, her heart felt like it was being dug out. Lisbell looked up at the man with hazy eyes, at the man who nonchalantly made horrifying jokes that threatened to dull her consciousness.

 

Her gaze did not focus on one point but scattered. Every time she saw him, she also saw her own foot draped over his shoulder.

 

At first, it appeared to be her right foot, wrapped in bandages, but then it seemed like her left foot, shackled to prevent her from leaving this place. Eventually, it became difficult to tell which foot was which.

 

It just felt as if her entire body was being tossed around like a worn-out straw doll. Her insides churned, and a deep nausea, akin to seasickness, welled up.

 

Her wavering gaze soon returned to the man’s face. His sharp features, as meticulously crafted as a jewel, were fully aroused as he took possession of her stiff body, which had become rigid like a shattered fragment.

 

His slightly roughened eyebrows, the wild jawline that tensed occasionally, and the overflowing lust in his eyes were so blatant that anyone could see the lustful residue lingering in them.

 

Not only his face but also the palpable weight of the flesh thrusting endlessly between her thighs conveyed his sexual urge.

 

She had expected this.

 

Lisbell had anticipated that he would be aroused to a certain extent, but now that things had turned out exactly as she had predicted, she felt a slight sense of satisfaction, despite her miserable state. She could now more clearly understand what the man wanted from her.

 

In truth, what Ulrich wanted from her had been clear from the beginning.

 

“If we’re going to have sex, it’s better if we both enjoy it.”

 

“If your fiancé is gone, shouldn’t you be able to enjoy it more freely?”

 

He wanted her to lose her conscience.

 

He wanted her to lose herself, to become one with him, to wriggle in the hellish pleasure.

 

It wasn’t because he was uncomfortable with her trying to live without losing her conscience. He simply had a primal desire to see her fall deeply into depravity.

 

That was his world, after all.

 

The world where he lived, breathed, indulged, and wallowed—a paradise of depravity.

 

Now that she had finally tasted the pleasure of someone acting exactly as she expected, Lisbell quickly realized that to catch him off guard and find a gap, she too would have to cross that boundary. Nothing less would suffice. She had already prepared herself for the fact that he would not be an easy opponent, as she gathered the shattered pieces of her heart.

 

“…Mm?”

 

Lisbell’s hand quietly lifted.

 

As Ulrich, who had been busy thrusting his cock into her with all his might, suddenly stopped his actions.

 

His clear eyes, which seemed to be unable to comprehend the situation, slowly slid toward where she was pointing. At the end of his gaze was Lisbell’s palm, clasped around Ulrich’s collarbone.

 

Lisbell gently caressed the sturdy collarbone that had emerged robustly like a beast’s hide, contrasting with his pale, porcelain-like skin.

 

Although his face was delicate and beautiful, the man’s body was solid and well-toned, like a weapon forged and tempered evenly, with no weak spots.

 

In the next moment, Ulrich’s lips curved into a smooth, almost irresistible smile.

 

Seemingly deeply moved by the fact that her hand was touching some part of him, he displayed an expression as warm as a spring sunbeam, and then immediately seized her hand, bringing it to his cheek.

 

Not stopping there, he tilted his head slightly so that her palm would brush against his lips.

 

It was an affectionate and familiar kiss, starkly contrasting with the scars left by shattered glass shards, where red sorrow and dark blue melancholy swirled and pulsed.

 

When he pulled his lips away with a soft “smack” Lisbell lowered her hand again.

 

As she fiddled with his collarbone, which had grown masculine and prominent like his broad shoulders, she felt his penis stiffen inside her. Twisting her waist slightly in response to the internal stimulation, Lisbell gradually raised her hand.

 

The hand stopped near his nape, where the blood vessels turned a faint blue under the surface, covering the area where his lips had just touched. Motionless, as if she were trying to suppress even her own pulse, she felt the subtle yet strong pulse of life throbbing there.

 

It was faint, yet powerful and vigorous.

 

And therefore, all the more uncomfortable.

 

“What are you doing?”

 

Ulrich, who had paused in their intense coupling to watch her, asked.

 

Lisbell subtly moved her hand, trying to conceal her attempt to feel his pulse. She wrapped her arm around his neck. It was indeed a burden to embrace such thickness. She wondered if she could even tear apart this thick hide with her own hands.

 

“…Ugh!”

 

Suddenly, her pelvis was pressed down as her lower body was struck forcefully. Her entire body trembled, and Lisbell’s eyelids quivered.

 

Whether he was overwhelmed by her unusually assertive behavior today, he spoke in a voice wrapped in both suspicion and undeniable pleasure.

 

“Why are you acting like this today? It’s really, haah, strange.”

 

A man who had no resistance to being touched first by others. It was as if she could feel the pent-up thirst that had made him persistently torment her for so long.

 

On one hand, it was amusing. It was so funny that she was on the verge of sneering.

 

Strange, he says. After treating someone so cruelly, did he think she would be fine? That Lisbell had come this far was all because of him.

 “Ugh, ah, ah…! Ah, hng!”

 

The gentle thrusts that had allowed for brief moments of breath suddenly turned intense. The rhythm was completely abandoned, and the speed increased to the point where breathing became disjointed and erratic.

 

He adjusted his posture so drastically that it was as if he were kneeling upright. Lisbell’s lower body, entwined with the man’s, naturally lifted into the air. Her hips, which were connected to the now-wet slit, and even her waist, lifted off the sheets.

 

Ulrich thrust his penis in forcefully. The relentless movement of his hips made it feel like the walls of her vagina were being scraped. The sensitive inner flesh around the penetrating column was stimulated to the point of almost being peeled back, sending a sharp tingle deep into her abdomen.

 

“Ah…! Mm! Ugh, hng…!”

 

Moreover, each time he entered her, now in a more intimate position, a throbbing heat spread inside her, making her lower region pulse. The inner walls, previously filled with pent-up moisture, now released a blatant spray of fluid outside.

 

It was a violent act of sex, barely disguised by the term “passion.” The pleasure dragged out of her against her will was just that—dragged out.

 

“Hng, mm, mm, ah…!”

 

The inside was hit repeatedly. The vulgar electric current recklessly heated the crown of her head. Her vision whitened, and suddenly, tears burst forth. Her cheeks grew wet as pitiful cries filled the bedroom, almost piercing the ceiling. Her hands and feet trembled uncontrollably.

 

Each time Ulrich’s length filled the narrow cavity completely, Lisbell’s most vulnerable parts tightened as if struck. Of course, Ulrich didn’t allow her to relax, instead digging deeper, almost as if he was seizing her climax.

 

“Hng, mm…! Ah, ah, ah…!”

 

Her moans shortened to the point where they could no longer be any briefer. The heat that threatened to melt her overtook her body, causing it to convulse uncontrollably. The air carried an obscene wave.

 

The man, who had been repeatedly plunging into the flesh that eagerly swallowed him, suddenly drove in with fierce intensity. She felt something wet burst out, soaking her lower region. Between her crossed legs, a thick, lewd scent arose.

 

“Hng…!”

 

As soon as he started to release, Ulrich, now limp over Lisbell’s body, turned his head to the side and muttered something. It was hard to hear, but it seemed like a curse. It was an uncouth word for someone who usually spoke with a deep, aristocratic accent.

 

Perhaps aware of how he was pinning her down with his large frame, he soon propped himself up on the sheets, raising only his upper body. His chest heaved as he tried to catch his breath, and then his hand grabbed her chin. His hot breath, inflamed by arousal, invaded her mouth, wildly swirling around as if to steal away what little air remained.

 

“What is this?”

 

He pulled away from her lips, which had been teasing hers so vigorously that saliva trailed between them, and whispered with a curious tone.

 

“Why do you keep doing these pretty things that don’t suit you…?”

 

The question he had held before the act now finally found voice. He pulled her chin up a bit more.

 

Though he asked, it seemed he wasn’t expecting a proper answer, as he soon left a light bird-like kiss on her lips, lost in thought. When their lips parted, Lisbell whispered in a fragile tone as if she were about to break.

 

“…I want to be at ease.”

 

It seemed Ulrich hadn’t heard her well, as he responded with a drawn-out, “Hmm?”

 

Lisbell fidgeted, curling up under his body.

 

“I… don’t want to hurt anymore.”

 



 

“If I refuse you… you’ll keep hurting me.”

 



 

“So, just….”

 

My throat itches.

 

Unconsciously, she raised her hand to rub the bandage while mumbling.

 

Her tone, dazed and disconnected, passed through her own ears, blending despair and emptiness, as if resigning herself. She hoped that he would perceive it the same way.

 

Ulrich looked down at her in silence. If looks could bore holes, her face would have been pierced by now. He studied her that intensely.

 

Then, he removed her hand from her neck and stood up from the bed.

 

When he returned, still half-naked, wearing only his pants, his lips met hers again. But this time, instead of a tongue, a lukewarm liquid flowed into her mouth. As she swallowed, her throat tingled and burned. The dense scent of liquor filled the air. She finally realized he had given her the drink she had requested.

 

“You’ve made a good decision.”

 

After swallowing nearly a glass’s worth of liquor, all delivered through a kiss, Ulrich’s face finally came into focus.

 

He was smiling. It reminded her of the eerie laughter that had gnawed at her mind, but it quickly vanished like a mirage. Perhaps because his current smile was too gentle to be considered sarcastic. There was a hint of the spring Lisbell had yet to recover in that smile.

 

“There’s a saying that everything depends on how you accept it.”

 



 

“If you stay by my side, you’ll surely be happy.”

 

Though he spoke with a smile, there was an inexplicable murkiness around his pupils.

 

It was the smoke of doubt.

 

For Lisbell to accept his words so easily would require forgetting the desperate resistance she had shown thus far, which he surely remembered vividly.

 

Yet, she couldn’t entirely shake the joy from her expression. It was a reaction she swallowed along with the poisonous doubt. Lisbell thought how truly despicable he was.

 

But then, so was she. The stench of deceit that had only belonged to him now clung to her as well.

 

“Don’t scratch your neck.”

 

She didn’t realize until Ulrich grabbed her hand and pulled it away again. Whether it was itching, hurting, or just feeling tight, she didn’t know. The faint taste of liquor lingered in the breath she swallowed. That was all she could rely on for now.

 



 

The first thing that came to mind as she reoriented her thoughts, lying still as a mouse, was alcohol.

 

It was the burning pain of the scar that intensified each dawn that reminded her, followed by the deep, unshakeable melancholy that left her in a downward spiral, devoid of any will to stir. Finally, she sought it out to endure the nights she would inevitably spend with Ulrich.

 

Since the day she broke off her engagement with Theodore and drained an entire bottle, Lisbell had sworn off alcohol. The breakup was bad enough, but the mistake she made while drunk that day had been shocking. It was a disgraceful secret she vowed never to let anyone know, one that had tormented her for days.

 

“You were the one who clung to me, Lisbell.”

 

“You kissed me first, don’t you remember?”

 

“You wrapped your legs around my waist, begging me not to go.”

 

Lisbell still had no memory of such things. Nor did she want to. The very thought of it was something she would burn from her mind if it surfaced, leaving only unrecognizable ashes behind, ensuring not even a trace remained.

 

But at this moment, she needed the same level of assertiveness she had shown then.

 

Just as she had been so eager to kiss first and touch his body, making him ecstatic in the past, she began drinking again. A glass a day, even if only as an aperitif.

 

At least she had an excuse to rely on. When the skin on her neck had sizzled under hot wax, she had thought she might die, but now it was useful enough to delay the wedding and justify her drinking.

 

The man had been right about one thing: how you interpret and react to something ultimately depends on your own mind.

 

She knew her thoughts were becoming a bit twisted, but it didn’t matter. After all, being docile by his side was something she couldn’t do in her right mind.

 

It was better to spend her days slightly unhinged, rationalizing her self-destructive thoughts, than to be consumed by endless depression.

 

“I want to read a book.”

 

Lisbell, lying on her side like someone whose life’s posture was laziness, suddenly spoke.

 

The man, who had been fiddling with his cufflinks, looked her way. Sunlight streamed through the window, licking at his body as if in adoration.

 

When he turned his body toward her, his lips curled into a subtle smile. The tender spring light fell on him, exuding an infinite gentleness.

 

“Do you want to spread your legs so I can see?”

 

But contrary to his gentle demeanor, his open mouth issued a crude command as if crafted from vulgarity.

 It was a good idea to have a drink in the morning.

 

Lisbell thought this as she hiked up the slip that only covered half of her thighs. She knew that spreading her legs while the slip was still in place wouldn’t show her what she wanted to see. In the end, he was a man who would push her to vulgar acts to get what he wanted.

 

The flimsy slip slid upward, revealing her hips and the rounded curve of her buttocks. As he approached the bed, she spread her legs to give him a better view. She could feel his ocean-blue eyes roving over her exposed skin.

 

Ulrich’s hand, which had been adjusting his sleeve, dropped, and a stifled breath escaped his lips. With a self-deprecating smile, as if mocking himself for falling into temptation, he crawled between Lisbell’s slender thighs.

 

His slippery tongue licked the still-swollen entrance, the aftermath of last night’s activities. His thorough, persistent licking made her twitch involuntarily.

 

It was revolting how accustomed to pleasure even humans could become. The inside of her stomach began to heat up, and though she felt slightly nauseated, she could manage. The drink she had in the morning helped her maintain her composure, even as she felt herself sinking lower.

 

Ulrich, who had been touching nothing but her tongue, suddenly grasped her knees, spreading them wider. His grip reminded her of his arousal, which was already evident.

 

The sound of his tongue flicking between her legs was unrelenting. Each time he moved his head, his fine platinum hair tickled the sensitive skin of her inner thighs. While the man indulged in her, Lisbell gazed at the ceiling, her mind hazy and unfocused.

 

“You made a good decision.”

 

After that remark, Ulrich’s suspicion persisted steadily from that day onward. He constantly tried to gauge if Lisbell had truly abandoned the hope that lay outside and accepted the tragedy that surrounded her.

 

The routine was always the same.

 

Lisbell would make a demand, and he would propose something in return.

 

Just like when she asked for a drink, Lisbell began to make requests of him, one by one.

 

From specific requests like “I want to bathe alone,” “I want to open the windows whenever I want,” to more meaningless and capricious demands like “I’m bored,” “I’m hungry,” “I’m cold,” she threw out anything that came to mind.

 

Each time, Ulrich would naturally expect something in return—usually something involving her body. Yesterday, she had sucked him off while lying on the bed, and the day before that, they had kissed until her tongue was sore.

 

Of course, Ulrich never stopped at mere teasing.

 

“I’d like to hold the wedding at our hotel. I plan to decorate the banquet hall with sweet peas that will be in full bloom before summer. They’re pink, just like your insides, so you’ll love them.”

 

Sometimes he would bring up the wedding.

 

“By the way, did you have a good conversation with Mr. Mortier? How was he? Did he seem happy with Ms. Hinse?”

 

At other times, he would mention Theodore.

 

Lisbell always remained calm, occasionally adding a “Yes” or “No.”

 

Whenever she responded like that, Ulrich would stare at her, as if trying to dissect her reaction. Though he often smiled, there was always a sharp intensity in his eyes. He seemed desperate to keep testing her.

 

“…Ugh, mm…”

 

Her legs lost all strength. Ulrich, who had buried his tongue deep inside her and was rolling it around until her insides became mushy, finally lifted his head when his lips were thoroughly soaked.

 

“What book?”

 

Seemingly satisfied with his morning activity, Ulrich asked pleasantly, his voice still playful. As Lisbell licked her lips, trying to shake off the tingling sensation between her legs, she answered.

 

“I’d like to choose it myself…”

 

Ulrich, who had been licking her lips, paused.

 

His once indifferent gaze now hardened into a cold stare. He then gave her a smile that was clearly superficial. That’s right, his expression seemed to say, I should have expected this.

 

“Do you want to leave the bedroom?”

 

To the man, that’s what her main intention must have sounded like. Lisbell looked at Ulrich without bothering to pull down her slip, then slowly turned her body away. She lay down, turning her back to him, and muttered indifferently.

 

“Never mind if it’s not allowed.”

 

Ulrich didn’t respond. However, she could feel his icy gaze raking across her back. Lisbell stared blankly at the wall, as if nothing could change her mind.

 

Before long, a shallow sigh broke the silence.

 

“…Ha.”

 



 

“This is just as nerve-wracking.”

 

Her body was suddenly pulled to the edge of the bed. Ulrich had tugged on the chains connected to the bedpost. The sensation of being dragged against her will was always unpleasant and unnerving.

 

By the time she blinked, she found herself pinned beneath him. Ulrich lowered his upper body and bit one of her round buttocks hard. The feel of his teeth sinking into her soft flesh sent chills down her spine.

 

“Well, since you’ve so generously spread those expensive legs…”

 

He spoke as if doing her a favor, and shortly after, he called someone in to bring the shackle key. He must have been too lazy to dress her, as he draped his house robe over her slip-clad body, then swiftly unlocked the shackles.

 

As soon as he finished, Lisbell’s body was lifted into the air.

 

“I’ll carry you instead.”

 



 

“If you don’t want that, we can forget about it.”

 

He raised his eyebrows with a playful smile. It was clear he was eager to see how she would react.

 

Lisbell stared at him closely before slowly moving her arms.

 

Ulrich’s smile quickly faded. When the woman’s thin arms, as fragile as tree branches, wrapped tightly around his neck, he nearly dropped her but quickly regained his composure and adjusted his grip on her.

 

At the same time, he let out a faint chuckle.

 

“…See?”

 

The hand supporting Lisbell’s back pulled her closer into his embrace.

 

“I feel like I’ve never won.”

 

Muttering to himself in self-mockery, Ulrich shook his head slightly as he walked toward the door.

 

Honestly, until they were walking down the corridor toward the library, she wasn’t sure how sincere he would be. She assumed he’d pick out a few books, give instructions to the servants to bring them to the bedroom, and that would be the end of her unexpected outing.

 

But the man surprisingly invested his time with genuine sincerity.

 

He looked over each of the two-story-high shelves, allowing Lisbell to choose the books she wanted. He even recommended some, mentioning they were enjoyable reads. When Lisbell examined the books he handed her, he seemed pleased, rubbing his lips against her temple as if it felt rewarding to have her attention.

 

At one point, Victor entered the library. He seemed to be there to discuss some schedule, but Ulrich dismissed him with an unrecognizable gesture, letting Lisbell continue her leisurely book selection.

 

It was while she was aimlessly wandering through the library, enveloped in Ulrich’s arms, that something caught her eye.

 



 

It was a chessboard set up on a library table. The square grid, square pieces, square layout—everything about it was geometric. The moment she saw the object full of angles, a shiver ran down her back.

 

“Hmm?”

 

Ulrich, noticing that her attention was elsewhere, followed her gaze to the chessboard and asked.

 

“Curious?”

 

As if in a trance, she nodded. Ulrich left the bookshelves and approached the library table.

 

“Have you ever played?”

 

“No.”

 

“Shall I teach you? It’s worth trying.”

 

Ulrich whispered as he toyed with the king piece, moving it to incorrect squares. Lisbell hesitated before slowly lowering her hand. Seeing that she couldn’t reach the chessboard from where she was, Ulrich bent his knees to let her touch it.

 

The cool edge of the square brushed against Lisbell’s fingertips.

 

No.

 

It was too blunt.

 

It was far too dull to pierce the strong, calloused flesh she had once covered with her palm. It seemed sharper from a distance, but it wouldn’t do. The size was also too large for her to wield with one hand. A book corner would be better than this.

 

“…Alright.”

 

Ulrich responded with a soft laugh to her seemingly absent-minded reply.

 When she returned from exploring the library in the morning, the bedroom was filled with sunlight.

 

He naturally found the shackles and attached them to her ankles after laying her down on the bed. Lisbell opened the book she had brought with her, as if his behavior was expected, without frowning once.

 

Ulrich, who stood close by, watched her with a curious gaze. After a moment, he heard someone calling him from outside the door. Ulrich slowly lowered himself and brushed his lips against Lisbell’s shackled instep.

 

“What could it be….”

 



 

“I wonder what’s going on in that little head of yours.”

 

Muttering as if he was genuinely confused, he announced that he’d be right back and planted a kiss on the side of Lisbell’s head before leaving the bedroom. Even at the sound of the door closing, Lisbell didn’t move as she continued reading her book.

 

After several pages, she gently lowered her head.

 

The shackles that had vanished just moments before were now securely fastened, as if by magic. The most tangible proof that her freedom was in his hands.

 

Lisbell shook her shackled foot as if out of habit. The sound of the chain rattling against the edge of the bed was like the crack of a whip.

 

Clank, clank, clank.

 

Clank, clank….

 

The sound ceased, and the ominous vibrations that had echoed through the bedroom subsided.

 

Lisbell lay still as if dead, determined.

 

First, she needed to remove these shackles.

 

Only then did it seem possible to get what she wanted.

 



 

The days passed in leisurely succession.

 

For the man, certainly. But for Lisbell, the days were far from carefree.

 

“…It’s your turn.”

 

Lisbell’s voice, slightly breathless, echoed after moving the white bishop.

 

“Huh? Oh.”

 

Ulrich seemed oblivious to the fact that they were playing chess, preoccupied with toying with Lisbell’s body, which was seated on his lap.

 

Even now, his hands were slipping inside her slip, crudely fondling her flat chest. Her breasts, squeezed repeatedly, were tender, and her nipples, pinched and rolled like toys, had become stiff and protruded through the slip in an obscene manner.

 

It wasn’t until Lisbell’s voice reminded him that it was his turn that his hands withdrew from inside her slip, grasping the black knight. Without hesitation, he made a bold move that quickly overwhelmed the board, easily bypassing the pieces Lisbell had set up.

 

Since returning from the library in his arms, a chessboard had appeared in the bedroom. Ulrich wasn’t much of a teacher. Whenever he tried to explain the rules, he’d take every opportunity to touch her somewhere, and when he was particularly aroused, he’d push the chessboard aside and bury himself between her legs.

 

As a result, it took three days just to learn the basic rules.

 

What started as a simple pastime increasingly puzzled Lisbell.

 

At first, as an inexperienced beginner, losing was only natural. But even as she gradually learned the game, the results remained the same.

 

Even when she thought she had come up with a clever move or a suitable variation, Ulrich would make a single gesture, and all her strategies would crumble, the entire board collapsing in an instant.

 

It was incomprehensible how he managed to win despite his lack of focus, constantly groping or sucking on parts of her body while they played, without any apparent interest in the game. The reason she continued to play chess, despite planning to quit out of frustration, lay in that mystery.

 

A few turns passed. Eventually, Lisbell’s white king was surrounded by his pieces. Checkmate. She was thoroughly defeated. Though it was just a game, her heart sank. The feeling of something breaking inside her, already fragile, was overwhelming.

 

“…Why?”

 

The question slipped out.

 

Ulrich, who had achieved victory with indifferent ease, let out a casual breath as he bit her earlobe.

 

He chuckled softly, as if he had already guessed what was on her mind. His hand, which had slipped between her thighs without her noticing, slowly withdrew and approached the chessboard.

 

“Lisbell, your moves are too predictable.”

 



 

“I can read them after just a glance.”

 

He licked her ear, adding, “Well, that’s part of your charm.” Ulrich’s comment was not something Lisbell particularly cared about. She watched as his hand touched her fallen king.

 

“And you’re too conservative.”

 

His touch was light, driven purely by base curiosity, just as when he toyed with her.

 

“You’re too hesitant to bring your king to the front lines.”

 



 

“It’s obvious how you try to protect and hide what’s precious to you.”

 

Hide the king?

 

Lisbell looked at the chessboard again. Indeed, while her king had barely moved from its starting position, Ulrich’s king had ventured dangerously close to the heart of enemy territory. It was more of an offensive move than one aimed at ensuring safety.

 

“If you want to win.”

 

He knocked over Lisbell’s king. Then, he picked up his own dark king, moving it a square or two to occupy the spot where her king had been.

 

“You have to be bold.”

 



 

“Victory belongs to those who take risks.”

 

It was as if he were coaxing her. Lisbell straightened her fallen king. She remembered a rule she had learned on the first day: the king is the only piece in chess that cannot be captured. When a checkmate occurs, the player declares defeat and topples their own piece.

 

She hadn’t declared defeat, yet her king had fallen. It was as if the fallen king mirrored her own crumbling self, and she couldn’t just leave it lying there.

 

After playing a few more rounds with Ulrich, they were interrupted by a phone call. Lisbell, now seated properly in a chair after getting off his lap, continued moving the pieces, even though her opponent was gone.

 

At one point, her hand slid off the board, and she felt along its edge. Her gaze soon shifted to the glass on the side table, placed there earlier for amusement. She imagined throwing it to the floor, shattering it. She even imagined picking up the sharp shards. The sensation of her healed palms stinging as the wounds reopened was almost palpable.

 

‘…No, that won’t do.’

 

It’s not enough.

 

She quietly moved her hand back, positioning the rook at the edge, lost in thought. When Ulrich returned after a surprisingly long absence, possibly due to an extended meeting, he was startled to find her still sitting by the chessboard, diligently playing.

 

He approached with a wry smile, as if to say she was hopeless.

 

“Is it really that fun?”

 



 

“Should’ve told you sooner.”

 

The chair turned toward him so he could see the chessboard. He lifted her off the chair, his thick arms making it clear that even if she stabbed him with the broken glass, he probably wouldn’t even bleed.

 

“No matter how fun it is, it shouldn’t be more fun than playing with me.”

 

Whenever they played chess, she couldn’t escape a feeling of crushing shame.

 

What am I doing?

 

Is this really the time?

 

I should be finding a way to … as soon as possible.

 

But then, when she saw how Ulrich enjoyed himself without hiding his pleasure, she couldn’t help but think it wasn’t a bad decision after all.

 

After all, her cooperation surely bred a subtle, insidious complacency within him. Just as she had sneaked into enemy territory and surrounded his king without his knowing.

 

Bold and daring, he had said.

 

As Lisbell was moved from the chair to the bed, his words floated through her mind. The chains of the shackles rattled as they stretched far and then wound back to the bed, making a chilling noise. It sounded like a snake slithering through the dark grass towards her feet.

 

“Otherwise, I’d be so disappointed….”

 

His voice poured over her like the afternoon sunlight, lazy and content.

 

Without needing to say much, she could tell that he was thoroughly satisfied with their current life.

 

As she considered how he filled his days with deep satisfaction, her nape began to itch. Lisbell closed her eyes tightly. Her heart pounded lightly. She recalled the sharp pain still lingering in her palms. She remembered the hot blood that had flowed from the open wounds.

 

It didn’t matter if she failed at chess.

 

Winning or losing in such games wasn’t what mattered to her.

 

If she could be bold in reality, if she could achieve what she wanted, then she would ultimately win. She had to endure, to be patient, for that one goal alone.

“Lisbell, wake up now.”

Her temples were gently pressed. Even in her faint consciousness, she could guess that it was the man’s lips.

It was the first time he had woken her since she had returned to this bedroom.

Given that rest was necessary for her injury, and knowing that staying awake would only bring more fatigue, he never attempted to wake her up in the mornings when she wasn’t ready to get up.

So, this morning felt a little special.

Still half-asleep, Lisbell sat up, and Ulrich, already neatly dressed as if ready to go out, swept his tousled hair away with his hand. He kissed her forehead gently and smiled faintly.

“Shall we have breakfast first?”

At first, Lisbell wondered why he had woken her up, but it seemed to be just to have breakfast. He brushed his hand through her hair once more, and she got up from the bed.

Without thinking, she placed her weight on her injured foot and stopped in surprise.

She hadn’t realized it, but the pain in her broken foot had become much weaker. In fact, it was almost completely gone. Before, even the slightest touch would send a sharp, grinding pain through her bones, but now, she could stand perfectly fine on that foot.

“Is your foot all healed?”

Ulrich asked as he reached out his arm to help her but paused mid-motion. Lisbell nodded and sat in the chair he had set out for her.

There was only one serving prepared on the table. She had assumed he woke her up to join him for breakfast, but it seemed that wasn’t the case. She felt puzzled but didn’t ask and picked up the cutlery.

Ulrich lowered himself to sit in front of her chair. Lisbell, breaking off a piece of the crispy crumpet, glanced down. It was clear that the swelling had gone down a lot. Satisfied with his observation, he didn’t re-wrap the bandage but simply placed it aside.

She expected him to stop there, but his hands moved toward her other ankle—the one that had no injury, but still bore the weight of a manacle.

His touch on her uninjured ankle felt awkward. Lisbell mechanically chewed her food, as if suppressing the discomfort.

Her chewing slowed, and a few moments later, the tension in her ankle was released. The tightness eased, and the sense of weight on her ankle vanished, leaving an odd emptiness.

She had been freed from the manacle a few times before. After she had asked to go to the library, Ulrich often removed it when she requested, and he would carry her there in his arms. She didn’t need to think too deeply about this.

Yet, today, something felt different. Ulrich had removed the manacle without any request from her. It was unusual.



As she continued to stare blankly at the floor, Ulrich flicked her nose lightly. That snapped her back to attention, and she slowly resumed eating.

After breakfast, it was as if it was already planned—she was placed in the bathtub. The warm water wrapped around her, lifting her spirits.

Ulrich hummed softly as he washed her, carefully avoiding her neck, which had suffered burns. He washed her limbs, armpits, and every part of her body with great attention, ensuring no spot was missed.

Lisbell, sitting in the water, absentmindedly shook her left ankle, still feeling the strange lightness. The sound of her foot brushing in the water was oddly clear, and the same sound seemed to echo in her mind.

Even after stepping out of the water, she kept shaking her foot. Ulrich chuckled at her actions, straightening his back and bringing a towel from the rack to gently dry her hair.

“The weather’s warmed up a bit, so a blouse and skirt should be fine, right?”

After the bath, it was time to get dressed.

Ulrich moved toward the wardrobe and pulled out several outfits he had already picked out, handing them to her. Although she wasn’t sure of his intentions, Lisbell had no choice but to pick one of the outfits he had chosen.

Once she was dressed, Ulrich led her toward the bedroom door.

“Shall we go?”

He opened the door and spoke.

Where to?

She was burning with the urge to ask, but she held back. An odd tension tightened in her chest. She had a feeling that if she was to make sense of the strange chaos of this morning, she would have to quietly follow Ulrich without asking.

As she walked behind him, her mind drifted.

Is it really right that I’m walking on my own two feet? Could it be that the unbelievable part is my own condition, or the position I’m in? Is it strange that I’m walking normally now, without the manacle or injury? Or is it simply strange that I’m walking through the corridors of this mansion in such a normal state? It was hard to distinguish which one felt more surreal.

She looked at Ulrich’s back ahead of her.

His back, wrapped in a thin shirt for spring, looked so strong that even if she tried to run and leap onto him, it wouldn’t break. The sight made her feel as though her blood had drained and her whole body had wilted, as though standing before an endless desert.

A moment later, Ulrich opened a door to what appeared to be a reception room.

The first thing Lisbell noticed was a clothing rack filled with dresses, tightly packed and seemingly all the same type.

They were all white, with simple frills and lace—delicate but not excessive.

Lisbell’s feet stopped, unable to go any further.

“You’re a little late, Madam. I’m sorry to have kept you waiting.”

The woman standing in front of the clothing rack, giving instructions to an assistant who seemed to be a subordinate, turned toward them with a lively face. She was probably the madam of the tailor shop, invited here by Ulrich.

“You don’t need to apologize. I was so excited and thrilled that I lost track of time waiting,” she said with a bright smile.

Ulrich, smiling as if relieved, looked over at Lisbell, who was still standing by the door. He reached out and gently pulled her forward. Lisbell hesitated but followed, unable to tear her eyes away from the dresses hanging on the rack.

In contrast, the madam’s gaze remained fixed on Lisbell, and she couldn’t seem to look away.

“Oh my, could this be…?”

The madam’s anticipation grew, and Ulrich answered with a soft smile.

“This is my fiancée.”

The madam’s smile deepened. She extended a business card, the size of a palm, and greeted them.

“How do you do? I’m Yvonne, the madam of Rettoile Tailoring. I’ve been looking forward to meeting you ever since I received the request from Mr. Altahart.”

“A request…?”

“Yes. It was a request to make the wedding dress for your wedding.”

Yvonne, with a pleased smile, looked at the two of them, seemingly pleased with how well they matched. Ulrich smiled back. In the meantime, Lisbell could not bring herself to smile.

She didn’t even consider looking at the business card in her hand and kept glancing over at the dresses on the rack.

As expected.

They were all wedding dresses.

“Shall we begin?”

While Lisbell was lost in thought, Yvonne asked Ulrich, turning toward him. Ulrich gestured as though to confirm, then walked over to a sofa in the reception room and sat down. Shortly after, a servant entered and handed him a glass of wine.

“I’ve selected several styles as samples, would you like to pick one, Miss?”

Yvonne kindly spoke to Lisbell, who was still standing stiffly in front of the rack.

Lisbell was filled with a burning desire to crumple the business card in her hand and set fire to the wedding dresses on the rack. But she knew she couldn’t do that.

She had… been pressured countless times already.

By his tongue and its tests.

This was likely just another one of them. If she caused a scene here, everything she had painstakingly achieved, enduring the peeling away of her heart’s shell little by little, would be for nothing.

In a way, this wasn’t entirely bad news. The fact that he was expanding the test like this meant that his heart was also stirred. In other words, he was getting closer to truly being affected. If things continued this way, it seemed that he might easily be deceived by her—she might even end up believing him, which was a dangerous game she had to play carefully.

“Don’t want… don’t want, I don’t want it… no…!”

She vividly remembered how she had screamed and recoiled from his proposal.

If he wanted this, then she had to go along with it.

That way, she would be closer to her goal too. Shaking off the loathing and scorn crawling up from her toes, Lisbell grabbed one of the wedding dresses on the rack.

 “Did you say the flowers to be used as decoration will be sweet peas?”

Yvonne asked Ulrich, who was sitting on the sofa, leisurely swirling a crystal glass with ice in it. Ulrich nodded. Yvonne carefully selected several dresses from the rack. Several flowing dresses were then thrust in front of Lisbell, who stood like a mannequin in front of the mirror.

“Since your skin is so fair, I think these colors might look nice on you.”

“Still, it should at least look like a wedding dress, right?”

“Do you prefer something even whiter than this? Understood.”

Although Lisbell was the one to wear the dress, the exchange of opinions was solely between Yvonne and Ulrich. It couldn’t be helped, since Lisbell had been confined to the bedroom and had no knowledge about the venue, the flowers, decorations, or anything else related to the wedding.

Yvonne also seemed to have received some kind of hint, as she directed most of her questions toward Ulrich. At first, Lisbell had been uncertain, but when Yvonne glanced at her neck in the mirror—specifically the bandaged area from her burn—it became clear to her what was going on.

Of course, they didn’t completely disregard the doctor. Whenever Lisbell seemed to lose herself mentally, Ulrich would pull her back into reality by gently starting a conversation.

“What do you think, Lisbell?”

“…I like it.”

“Which one?”

“The one I’m wearing right now.”

“You said you liked the one you tried on earlier.”

“They’re all so beautiful, I can’t choose.”

Through the large full-length mirror, Lisbell occasionally met Ulrich’s gaze. Every time their eyes met, he would pause, holding his glass to his lips, and flash a small, almost amused smile.

Can you really endure this?

Can you really stand here, choosing a dress to walk down the aisle with me?

You want to feel comfortable, don’t you? That’s a lie, isn’t it?

This is all just an act, isn’t it?

Come on, show your true self.

Go back to when you were screaming that you hated me, that you were disgusted.

Expose all the hidden thoughts you’ve been keeping inside.

The beautiful and grotesque pale blue gaze directed at her seemed to pour out such temptations. Lisbell deliberately did not avoid his eyes and steadfastly put on the dress. The subtle applique decorations on the dress swirled around the hem, making it look like a living flower.

Ulrich behind her let out a low exhale.

“Hmm… Madam?”

Yvonne, who had been carefully unrolling the train of the dress, turned toward him. Ulrich, sitting with his legs crossed, leisurely swirled his glass while offering an awkward smile.

“I’m afraid it’s going to be difficult for me to step out for a moment.”

“Do you have an urgent matter?”

“Well, it’s somewhat urgent…”

His hand, not holding the glass, reached down to rest on his knee and gently stroked it. There was something strangely intimate about the touch. Yvonne, who had been watching, quickly realized his intentions. Once she understood, it seemed rather blunt.

“Oh, my.”

She, a seasoned professional, seemed flustered for the first time in such a situation. Her smile, which had been unshaken despite Lisbell’s indifferent attitude, wavered for the first time.

“It seems you really like this dress.”

“Seems so, since I want to be alone with her right now.”

The smoothness of his voice contrasted with the shocking content of the conversation, leaving Yvonne at a loss as to how to respond.

Knock.

There was a knock on the door.

The door opened, and Viktor appeared.

“Sorry to interrupt. Sir, there’s something urgent…?”

Viktor, with no intention of further conversation, immediately approached Ulrich.

Ulrich, seemingly disappointed, took a sip of his drink and set the glass down before standing up. As expected, his pants bulged awkwardly. Despite that, his face remained remarkably calm.

Approaching the door, Ulrich briefly listened to Viktor’s message, then turned to look at Yvonne.

“Looks like I need to step out for a moment. I’ll be back soon, so please take care of things in the meantime, Madam.”

“Yes, don’t worry.”

Ulrich left with Viktor, and the situation came to a close. Just the absence of the man’s gaze made Lisbell feel a lot more at ease.

Unlike earlier, when she could hardly breathe, she was able to relax a little now.

Yvonne began explaining the dresses that Lisbell hadn’t yet tried on, showing them one by one. Lisbell half-listened, her attention wandering around the room. She was cautious not to let on that she was wondering whether Yvonne had received some kind of hint. Fortunately, Yvonne seemed to remain focused on the clothing.

As Yvonne was organizing the back of the dress that Lisbell had just tried on, she let out a short exclamation.

“Oh dear, I completely forgot about the veil.”

“The veil?”

“Yes. A wedding dress isn’t complete without considering the veil. I’ll go get it right now, so would you mind waiting just a moment?”

“Ah… yes.”

If she could leave the room too, it would be a welcome relief for Lisbell. Yvonne asked for permission and hurriedly opened the door and left.

Now alone, Lisbell, in her stunning dress, began to inspect every corner of the reception room. Not stopping there, she also looked over the rack she had just stood near and the tools that Yvonne had been busy handling. She was searching for things like pins attached to the clothes or scissors used by the madams to cut threads. But none of it satisfied her. They were all less than worthless—mere shattered pieces of glass.

‘No… something else…’

Just as her thoughts were starting to deepen, a sudden silence disturbed her.

Only moments ago, there had been the soft rustle of fabric, laughter, and the hum of voices filling the space. Now, it was as if the room had been washed clean by water, leaving an eerie quiet.

When she realized what had happened, she understood.

She was the only one left in the reception room.

At that moment, the injury to one of her ankles had fully healed, and the shackles that had bound her other ankle were removed.



Her violet eyes, which had been dim under dark clouds like violets in the shade, suddenly surged, trembling. Her gaze, carrying the tremors of her inner turmoil, slowly turned toward the door.

The door was closed.

But it could be opened.

She was no longer in the state where she couldn’t walk alone, and she wasn’t physically held back by shackles either. Both the man and the madam who had been attending to her were gone.

Recalling the days when she had freely roamed the mansion, the hallways were always quiet. Few people passed by, and there were plenty of hiding places.

So if she was careful…

‘Escape…’

Could she do it?

The realization struck her mind like a collision, and every cell in her body screamed in excitement.

Run. Escape. Get away. Go far.

The rejection that soaked her chest was raw and vivid. Her thoughts, trying to roll forward smoothly, were blocked. She just wanted to take the opportunity to distance herself from Ulrich, to find a way to get away from him. She longed to drink in that desire to the point of intoxication.

From that man’s side…

Once more…

Her two feet, covered in the white dress, moved toward the door. The tension she had barely suppressed shot up again, and her lower abdomen chilled.

When she grasped the doorknob, a flash of pale blue light suddenly shone in her mind. In the darkness, in the light, under the ceiling, those arrogant eyes had been looking down at her.

Lisbell opened the door with a sudden motion.

“….”

The regret came instantaneously.

What if this was some kind of trap set by him? What if he had someone stationed outside the door, watching to see how she would react? What if he had planned to watch her and see what she would do next? How could she have been so reckless?

Before she even realized it, her breath had become ragged. Lisbell, barely able to make a sound that no one else could hear, turned her stiff neck from side to side.

No one… was there.

There was no sign of anyone waiting to watch her leave. No matter how long she waited, she couldn’t hear a single sound. It was just eerily quiet, like a scene from everyday life, so much so that it felt strange.

A shiver ran down her spine. Lisbell, gripping the hem of her dress, took a deep breath. She could see the long hallway ahead. If she ran down there, descended the stairs, and turned right… she would be at the entrance of the mansion. Once she passed through there, she would be out of the mansion for good. She would leave behind the shackles that had gripped her ankles like a snake, the wedding dress that had been meant to make her a bride of hell.

The doorframe, which had been drawn as a line in the sand, loomed ahead.

Just one step.

One step, and freedom would be hers.

 Ulrich’s hand moved smoothly over the documents.

After completing yet another review and corresponding signature, Victor, who had been standing before him, occasionally glancing at his watch, quietly informed him,

“It’s been an hour since Madam left.”

The hand that had been moving without hesitation suddenly stopped. The sharp nib paused mid-stroke, causing ink to pool and form a large blot.

Ulrich slowly lifted the fountain pen. He lightly tapped the round ink blot with the nib before setting the pen down and rising leisurely from his chair. When he was told thirty minutes had passed earlier, he hadn’t reacted, but apparently, an hour was his limit.

Taking out a cigarette, he placed it between his lips. Victor immediately stepped forward to light it for him. Exhaling a stream of smoke, Ulrich moved toward the door and asked,

“What do you think, Victor?”

“…Pardon? What do I think?”

“What do you think happened?”

It was clear what his superior was implying.

As if he took some perverse pleasure in observing Lisbell Osborne’s response to the predicament he had orchestrated—a kind of sadistic curiosity.

“…I’m not sure.”

No more, no less—that was his honest answer.

I really don’t know.

Considering everything she’d endured, one might assume she had learned her lesson. But recalling her desperate pleas to see Madam, she didn’t seem like someone who would break so easily. Yet, if she had fled again, it would just be history repeating itself.

“What I mean is… I don’t think it matters.”

What state of mind had he been in when he said that?

Victor felt not only the exhaustion of dealing with whatever situation Lisbell might create but also the simple discomfort of having to witness it all up close.

Having served Ulrich for many years, he knew his master’s temperament well. He was stubborn and self-reliant. The more someone resisted him, the more inevitable it became that they would be overwhelmed.

For that reason, Victor’s feelings toward Lisbell were akin to watching glass charge toward a collision, knowing it would shatter into pieces. It made him anxious just observing it unfold. That was why he had urged her to give up—because persuading Ulrich was out of the question.

“Do you really need to go this far?”

Fortunately, Lisbell seemed to have heeded his advice, judging by how the two of them had been getting along these past few days.

Despite pretending otherwise, Ulrich was someone whose moods were quite transparent—at least to someone like Victor, who had served him for so long. And for days now, he had been calm. What did that signify? It meant that the conflict with Lisbell, who had sought refuge in religion to escape him, had significantly eased.

Just the other day, he had unshackled her ankle, even taking her into his arms and leading her around the study at a leisurely pace. Bathed in the multicolored light streaming through the windows, the two had looked almost like an intimate couple. That was the peace created by Lisbell’s surrender.

It would have been nice if things ended there. But this madman had devised yet another scheme to test her true feelings. Under the guise of work, he had first excused himself and then had Madam leave after a suitable delay.

Naturally, this left Lisbell alone in the reception room.

A cunning strategy, designed solely to see how she would react to the taste of freedom—it was nothing short of malicious.

“These days, she’s been doing something cute.”

“…Excuse me? What has she been doing?”

“She says she wants to be comfortable now.”



“She doesn’t want to suffer anymore, so she’s going to accept me.”

Following Ulrich as he strode toward the reception room, Victor quietly swallowed. He had wondered if there had been a sudden shift in their relationship, but it turned out she had been the first to say something like that.

Ulrich, walking ahead, suddenly chuckled.

“Isn’t it adorable?”



“It’s obvious she’s playing me, isn’t it?”

Victor unconsciously clenched his fists.

Ulrich had been in a good mood these past few days, no doubt about it. He was even reconsidering a terrible investment proposal he had previously dismissed and had called in a lawyer for legal advice. Until now, Victor had assumed it was all thanks to Lisbell’s sweet words. But had Ulrich been harboring suspicions all along?

“The problem is me.”



“I keep wanting to be fooled.”

His tone carried a hint of self-mockery.

“I keep wanting to fall for it… That’s the problem.”

With doubt so deeply embedded in his mind, trust seemed unattainable, no matter how Lisbell Osborne acted. Victor swallowed the words that threatened to surface.

By then, their brisk steps had come to a halt in front of the reception room.

The door was closed.

Just as it had been when he left.



With the cigarette still between his lips, Ulrich stared down at the doorknob.

He recalled the quiet eyes that had watched him as he unshackled her ankle that morning.

Cute and detestable eyes.

At some point, her gaze had become paradoxical to him. Softer than before, yet somehow, that very gentleness only sparked an ominous sense of foreboding. Sometimes, he wanted to grab her by the throat, squeeze tightly, and demand to know if she was sincere—if she truly intended to stay by his side.

In the past, he would have done just that.

But now, with her acting this way, he couldn’t bring himself to do it. Perhaps because he couldn’t discard the ridiculous glimmer of hope that her determination wasn’t just a shallow ploy but something real.

If that was the case, one wrong move could shatter the delicate sandcastle she had painstakingly built through all her trials.

…Yes, the truth was, he was already more than halfway convinced.

Half? No, perhaps it wasn’t an exaggeration to say he had already lost his composure entirely.

Feeling disgusted with his own foolishness, Ulrich shook his head slightly and gripped the doorknob. Exhaling the smoke lingering under his tongue, he pushed the door open. It swung smoothly without a sound.



The room was quiet. So silent, it seemed no one was there.

A tense vein bulged in Ulrich’s mind. He removed the cigarette from his lips and stubbed it out against the door frame.

Even though he had expected it, the disappointment that settled into his bones was profound.

Of course, she wouldn’t stay.

Looking back, it was absurd to think he could trust a few flattering words. Why had he unlocked the shackle, left her alone, and walked away?

Why did I do that?

I must have been completely out of my mind.

Where did she run off to this time? Did she even have anywhere left to go? He had already torn apart everything—her fiancé, her mother, even the religion she had sought refuge in—so where else could she possibly turn?

Well… where should I start looking? She was probably still within the townhouse. Should he have Victor block off the station first? No matter what, when he brought her back this time, he would—

Just then, a small sound reached his ears.

“…Ouch.”

It came from behind a large clothing rack, about as tall as he was.

Ulrich, who had been standing still with only his fingertips twitching, suddenly snapped out of his daze and strode forward.

Rounding the clothing rack, he spotted a small figure nestled among the dazzlingly colorful dresses. Soft gray hair swayed with her slight movements.

“…Lisbell.”

She was right there.

He had no idea what she was doing, crouched down, staring at her hand as if she had hurt her finger. Only when he called her name did she finally notice his presence.

Calmly, she lifted her head. Her violet eyes turned toward him, creating a surreal feeling—as if he were seeing an illusion.

“…Pfft.”

Ulrich let out a laugh.

Only when the sound of air popping like bubbles reached his ears did he realize—he was the one laughing.


Precisely…

 

Lisbell’s gaze reached the face of the man pressing close to her cheek.

 

Her freedom was in the hands of this man.

 

As long as this man treated her like a toy in his hand, simply distancing herself physically was not the solution. No matter how much she ran away, became disillusioned, struggled, or despaired, unless she destroyed the root of oppression named Ulrich Altahart, it would be an endless cycle.

 

That’s why she didn’t run away.

 

There was no longer any use in curling up and raising the white flag.

 

“If you want to win, you have to be bold.”

 

Did he know?

 

What kind of feelings the person giving him that advice truly held.

 

He probably didn’t know.

 

That’s why, from that day on, he didn’t shackle Lisbell’s ankles.

 



 

Clang, clang.

 

Unlike the sofa in Ulrich’s bedroom, the velvet sofa in the reception room with its arched legs shook noisily with the slightest movement.

 

Thud, thud! Lisbell’s waist twisted uncontrollably, unable to withstand the force pushing up from below. Each time, the man’s hands, sculpted like stone, grabbed her hips and thrust more deeply into her groin.

 

“Mm, mm… Ah… Ahh…!”

 

Their lower bodies, locked together, became wet. The column-shaped hole was already covered in a foamy haze from the relentless piston thrusts.

 

Each time the thick manhood slid along the slick, sensitive path, Lisbell’s calves trembled lightly as they pointed towards the sky.

 

Like a stallion lost in the taste of lust, Ulrich was busy rocking his hips. Each time, he grasped her ankles again and planted a soft kiss near her ankle bone.

 

The eerie sensation of a shackle often lingered there, making the man’s bird-like kiss unbearably unsettling. Even while her body rocked, a subtle chill didn’t leave her.

 

“Ah, here… It’s incredibly soft.”

 

As he thrust up into her connected depths, the line of his back, tightly clad in a shirt and vest, displayed a sinful rhythm. The morning sunlight shone in a way that couldn’t hide it.

 

“Lisbell, because you’re relaxing… Ha, it goes in even deeper than usual. Can you feel it? Here, mm…”

 

As if he wanted her to feel it, he pushed his pulsing organ deep into the tight inner flesh. The swelling sensation spread as if her cervix was being pierced. It was so full that it made her dizzy.

 

As the rounded head pushed up like a greeting, a flickering tremor spread across her vision. Lisbell’s lower abdomen involuntarily tightened, and her half-closed eyelids quivered deeply.

 

Ulrich, who chuckled at her receptive response, lazily shook his rod, buried deep in her hole.

 

Though his thrusts weren’t strong, the vivid sensation of his glans rubbing against her inner walls left Lisbell’s lips parted. Ulrich eagerly leaned forward and thrust his stiff tongue into her open mouth.

 

“Mm, mm… Mm! Huh, ah, ahh!”

 

As their bodies tangled, the sofa began to groan sorrowfully again.

 

Ulrich carelessly rolled up the dress he had personally chosen for her. The intense stimulation made him want to tear apart everything his hands could reach.

 

The intense surge of excitement was expressed through his thrusting. Thud, thud! He struck her wide-open perineum, spreading and widening her tight entrance.

 

The slick, foamy connection emitted obscene sounds that echoed throughout the reception room. The air grew hot with the steamy atmosphere of their erotic encounter.

 

Knock, knock.

 

A knock suddenly interrupted.

 

“Master, it’s time for you to leave.”

 

Victor’s voice faintly came from outside.

 

Lisbell flinched momentarily, but Ulrich, lost in the heat of the moment, was engrossed in exploring her as if he were deaf to all other sounds. Even if a bomb dropped right in front of him, he seemed ready to bury himself in her flesh and lose himself in lust.

 

“Ha, mm, outside… Mm… Ahh…!”

 

“Mm…?”

 

“Outside, there are people, mm, mm, ugh…!”

 

“It’s okay, ha, you don’t need to, care.”

 

It was clear that he didn’t want her to care about anything except him.

 

As Lisbell, spread wide open, was pressed deeper into the sofa, Ulrich swallowed his ragged breath and increased his pace.

 

His thrusts grew rougher as the flesh inside her pushed against her vaginal walls, reaching the brink. Her entire body contracted, unable to breathe, and Ulrich’s breath melted out in response.

 

“Did it go deep, mm?”

 

“Mm, mm…!”

 

“It’s squeezing so tight. Mm? What should I do? If it’s like this, I won’t want to leave….”

 

He chuckled and lifted Lisbell’s skirt. Grasping her plump buttocks, he spread her wide open to reveal her perineum. Then, he shot forward and thrust his manhood deep inside.

 

“Mm, ahh, ng, ha…!”

 

As the rough surface of his veined manhood scraped her tender entrance, Lisbell gulped down her breath.

 

She reached out and caressed Ulrich’s body. Slipping her hand through the open neckline of his shirt, exposed by the loosened tie, she touched his skin. A raspy, hoarse sound escaped Ulrich’s mouth. The organ buried inside her shivered in sync with its owner, swelling with arousal.

 

Ulrich could never resist when Lisbell touched him of her own will. His jaw muscles clenched violently as he hugged her thigh and roughly thrust up.

 

Though his size was formidable, the lubricating effect of her juices and foam allowed her inner walls to soften enough to embrace him. With each piston thrust of his hardened manhood, the pleasure quickly escalated.

 

“Master,” came Victor’s voice again from outside, urging him to leave.

 

Ulrich gripped Lisbell’s lips, kissing them forcefully as he intensified his pace. His neat attire became disheveled, but he continued his thrusts with no regard for his appearance.

 

“Ah, ha…!”

 

“Mm, hoo.”

 

His intense yet controlled movements were frighteningly persistent. Finally, Lisbell’s insides reached their limit, and she squeezed her entrance tightly around him. Ulrich, his base swallowed up, couldn’t resist the suction of her inner walls and climaxed.

 

“Mm, mm…”

 

“Ha…”

 

As the two tangled together, their intertwined bodies let out a shared sigh of release.

 

Regaining his composure, Ulrich, still caressing Lisbell’s buttocks, continued his idle hand-play.

 

Lisbell, who was catching her breath, her hand still tracing his neck, met his eyes. Ulrich smiled seductively, like a red rose.

 

“Today, I’ll be back after just a simple dinner gathering….”

 

Thump!

 

The sound of someone impatiently banging on the door was heard then.

 

Ulrich, who had been busy groping her body even as he climaxed, finally withdrew his hand reluctantly. His low, smooth voice, tinged with irritation, softly called out, “Victor Loisden….”

 

Lisbell, lying there with a dazed expression, looked up at him.

 

Perhaps he was pleased with her submissiveness, beyond compliance, to the point of being as docile as a lamb. Ulrich, who had lowered her skirt himself, rolled it up again and spread her legs.

 

He kissed her entrance, soaked with his mark, and said, “I’ll be back.” If anyone saw, they would be shocked by such a shameless act, yet he committed it with a nonchalant expression as he stood up.

 

Soon after, the sound of the door opening and closing echoed.

 

Lisbell, trying to steady her breath even after Ulrich had left, closed her eyes tightly.

 

Her hand fell and grazed between her legs. She lifted it to her eyes. Her index, middle, and ring fingers were covered in his white semen that had spilled out as he withdrew.


Lisbell rubbed her palms against the sofa seat as if she had just come into contact with something vile. Her movements grew increasingly erratic, almost convulsive, as though she were in the throes of a severe fit.

Then, abruptly, her limbs went limp. The hand that had been obsessively scrubbing at the fabric lifted to cover her eyes.

Blocking out her vision and plunging herself into darkness, she finally managed to steady her breath. Yet, no matter how desperately she tried, the lingering sensation of semen on her fingertips refused to fade, tormenting her with every passing second.

The trace of a man left within her body.

The weight of what that meant.

The inevitable, horrifying consequence twisted her thoughts into chaos.

‘No….’

She couldn’t even fully form the thought—not even in fragments. The mere idea of carrying his child was so grotesque, so repulsive, that her mind recoiled from it. But more than anything, what terrified her most was the possibility that it could become reality.

‘I have to do something….’

I must.

If this continues, my child will—

Thankfully, she had been granted some degree of freedom within the mansion. Ever since the wedding dress fitting, Ulrich had stopped imposing restrictions on her movements, even when she returned to the bedroom. That was how she had managed to slip away today, retreating to the drawing room unnoticed.

Of course, he was still keeping an eye on her.

He was the kind of man who could feign warmth while plotting something sinister in the shadows. Lisbell knew she had to remain vigilant, pretending to accept her circumstances as if she had lost all hope of escape. As if there was nothing left for him to break—not even a fragment.

Enduring his touch and not resisting the traces he left on her body was part of the game she was playing. If she truly wanted to destroy him, she had to be willing to lose herself in the process. Without that level of resolve, she wouldn’t even be able to leave a scratch.

But still.

The feeling of lying there, his presence clinging to her skin—

She forced herself to swallow down the dark emotions rising within her. Pushing off the sofa, she steadied herself.

‘Should I look for the medicine? Didn’t they put something like that in my food before? But where? The kitchen? Or is there a separate storage room? What if Ulrich hears of it? What if he grows suspicious? I haven’t even found the right tools yet—what if he puts the shackles on me again…?’

She sat there in a daze, slowly fastening the buttons of her dress, which had loosened to reveal her skin.

“…Please, madam! The master has ordered that no one be allowed in here for the time being….”

A commotion erupted outside the closed door. Lisbell turned her head just as the door suddenly swung open. The intrusion was forceful, as though someone had insisted on entering despite the servant’s protests.

“Who is inside that I am forbidden from seeing?”

The voice belonged to none other than Mrs. Altahart.

She halted upon seeing Lisbell seated on the sofa.

This was the first time Lisbell had encountered her since arriving at the mansion. Despite wandering the estate for days, she had never once crossed paths with the woman, leading her to assume she had been staying elsewhere. Apparently, that wasn’t the case.

Behind the lady stood a flustered servant, his unease palpable. Clearly, Ulrich had issued an order barring anyone from entering this room—something Lisbell had been unaware of until now.

Seeing the servant hesitate, uncertain of what to do, Lisbell gave him a small nod. Understanding the silent command, he quickly bowed, shut the door, and disappeared.

Mrs. Altahart let out a derisive laugh.

“I wondered why I was being kept out, and it turns out… you were in here.”

Her refined voice, as polished as a classical performance, was laced with invisible thorns.

“If anyone saw this, they might mistake you for the mistress of this house, Miss Osborne.”

The way she spoke left no room for doubt—this was not a misunderstanding.

Of course, she must have been utterly baffled. After all, she had once extended a helping hand, only for Lisbell to flee on her own, only to end up back here—captured and dragged into the mansion again.

Mrs. Altahart crossed the room, settling on the opposite sofa. Meanwhile, Lisbell quietly continued fastening the buttons of her dress, saying nothing.

The lady’s cold gaze swept over Lisbell’s body, still marked by the remnants of intercourse. Her blue irises darkened with disdain, like vines creeping over an icy lake. It was the look of someone staring at a leech, one that was draining her precious son’s wealth and power.

Under her scrutiny, Lisbell finished buttoning her dress to the very top. She appeared calm, lost in thought, but her silence seemed to infuriate Mrs. Altahart further.

“Have you had a change of heart?”



“Well, I suppose the position of mistress in this house must be quite appealing for someone of your station.”



“I thought at least some of the courage and defiance you displayed when demanding your mother’s funeral would remain, but it seems I overestimated you. Then again, with such a frail constitution, it’s no wonder you let things reach this point.”

It was clear she believed Lisbell had chosen to stay by Ulrich’s side of her own free will. After all, she was now part of the family, and no doubt, the lady had heard whispers of the wedding Ulrich was preparing alone—without consulting anyone.

“Madam, do I look happy to you?”

After a long silence, Lisbell finally spoke.

Mrs. Altahart’s lips parted as if to respond, but the words stalled.

Her icy blue eyes took in Lisbell once more—her gaunt frame, the bandages still wrapped around her neck, the unmistakable frailty that even Ulrich’s expensive clothes could not conceal. It was a wound wealth could not heal, a scar too deep to be hidden.

“Do I look like I’m doing this by choice?”



“No, I’ve given up.”

Mrs. Altahart’s expression flickered, ever so slightly. Lisbell continued, her voice composed.

“Have you ever felt molten wax drip onto your skin, burning you?”



“Have you ever had your ankle snapped beneath someone’s hand?”



“Do you know what it’s like to live in constant fear, only to have the safe haven you finally found ripped away from you?”



“Madam, I’m exhausted by the pain.”



“So I’ve simply given up.”

Her voice was smooth, as if reciting a decision long since made.

There was a time when she had begged Ulrich’s secretary.

‘Please, bring the madam to me. Let me meet her, or at least send her my words….’

But the response had been unchanging.

‘He is no longer just the young master—he is the head of this family. Even the madam can no longer stop him.’

Even Mrs. Altahart could no longer be her shield. If anything, she was now in greater danger. And judging by her bitter attitude, she knew it.

Mrs. Altahart was not overtly hostile, but she was hardly an ally. She was someone who prioritized the family above all else.

Even so, Lisbell saw an opportunity.

“I don’t want to be here—I’m only enduring this, waiting for your son to grow bored of me. As I said, I’ve stopped fighting back because I can’t bear the suffering anymore.”



“But… I don’t want to have Ulrich’s child.”

For the first time, Mrs. Altahart’s composed expression wavered.

“When Ulrich is done with me, I want to leave without any ties. And in this matter, I believe our interests align, madam.”

“…You’re asking me for medicine?”

“If you don’t want the noble bloodline of your family to be tainted.”

Even as she spoke, the words felt wretched—describing her own blood as unworthy. But it was a thousand times better than allowing that nightmare to come true. She would rather scar herself than bear his child.

Chapter 156

For that, she desperately needed the lady’s cooperation.

 

Even though she had freed herself from shackles and gained her liberty, she was still in a position where I could not afford to arouse any baseless suspicions. She had to be cautious in my actions and behavior at all times. If she got caught by Ulrich while trying to procure medicine in this situation, it would be the end.

 

The lady remained silent. She seemed deep in thought, so she didn’t say anything further and just stayed quiet.

 

Occasionally, eyes that resembled Ulrich’s would glance over, scanning every corner of her face. It seemed like she was trying to determine if her words were sincere. So she deliberately hid her tension and held her breath.

 

While this was happening, someone came looking for her. Judging by the attire, it seemed to be a secretary. After receiving a whispered report, the lady stood up from the sofa as if she had to leave. Without leaving any response, she exited the drawing room.

 

Left alone again, Lisbell stared at the door where she had disappeared, then slowly raised her hand. She placed it over her flat belly, rubbing up and down. It was flat and smooth. There was nothing inside.

 

It had to be that way, and it would stay that way.

 

If something were to fill up and swell inside here…

 

“…Ugh!”

 

A rough wave of nausea surged, as if her stomach had turned upside down. Lisbell covered her mouth and swallowed hard several times. She quickly erased the thought. She forced her mind to empty itself of the depraved imagination that had filled it, and only then did the queasiness in her stomach subside a little.

 

“Ha, ha…”

 

No.

 

I really won’t be able to endure it.

 

So please, madam.

 

Please, please, please…!

 

Grasping the secrets she couldn’t tell anyone, she raised her hand to her neck. Scratch, scratch. Her fingers clawed at the bandages wrapped around her neck, as if invisible blood was flowing from the motion. Her fingers were already covered in invisible blood.

 



 

It was that afternoon.

 

After completing only his morning schedule, Ulrich returned to the mansion. While he briefly left his place due to a report, someone came to their bedroom.

 

Hearing a knock, Lisbell initially thought that he had returned and was playing one of his silly pranks again.

 

Lately, Ulrich had been pulling strange pranks with a mischievous grin, like a child. He would sometimes demand that she sit on his lap to tie his tie in the early morning when she was still half-asleep, or ask her to sing him a lullaby before bed at night.

 

Since no one except Victor ever visited this bedroom, she naturally assumed that he was up to something bizarre again. But when the door opened, it was a man she had never seen before. It was only after a closer look that she recognized him as the lady’s secretary whom she had met in the drawing room that morning.

 

“The madam sent me.”

 

As if to confirm, he whispered softly and handed her something. The moment Lisbell grabbed it, she realized it was a medicine packet. And she also realized that the lady had responded to her desperate plea.

 

“You should take it once a day.”

 

Leaving a brief explanation, the secretary carefully left the bedroom, making sure not to leave any traces. Lisbell stood there blankly before quickly walking to the bathroom.

 

She locked the door tightly and opened the medicine packet. She immediately swallowed the pill inside, chewing it. The pill crumbled under her teeth with a bitter taste spreading across her tongue, but she didn’t mind. She felt like she could swallow several more in succession.

 

She didn’t forget to rinse her mouth thoroughly, concerned that any trace of the medicine might be discovered. As she was hiding the medicine packet in a discreet corner of the bathroom, she sensed someone outside. Pretending to wash her hands, she stepped out of the bathroom.

 

Ulrich, who was wetting his throat with a glass of alcohol she had poured, heard her footsteps and turned towards her. As soon as he saw her, a subtle curve appeared on his lips. The moment she got close enough, he extended his arm and pulled Lisbell towards him. Their bodies collapsed onto the bed together.

 

“Could you help me take off my tie?”

 

Ulrich, lying under her, lazily requested.

 

Lisbell’s hands landed on his firm abdomen. Every time he wanted her to unbutton his shirt, he would assume this position, and her hands would unconsciously touch the area that felt like a wall, composed of well-defined abs.

 

Though hidden under his shirt, the solid thickness of his chest was undeniable as she traced her way up to grab his tie. She held the long blade of the tie with one hand and fumbled behind to remove the silver pin.

 

Ulrich, who had been watching, took the pin and tucked her disheveled hair behind her ear, securing it in place. Then he chuckled as if he was watching a very entertaining scene. Meanwhile, Lisbell finally reached the knot.

 

‘If I tighten it…’

 

What reaction will he have?

 

No, more than the reaction, can I even succeed?

 

It seemed highly unlikely. She had imagined tightening his neck with the tie dozens of times but finally untied the knot obediently.

 

The loosened tie draped over his shoulder like a discarded skin. Ulrich slightly tilted his head and tapped the collar of his shirt with his fingers.

 

“Here too.”

 

He meant for her to unbutton it.

 

Lisbell, gazing down at him under the soft light, moved her hands.

 

As she unbuttoned one after another, her hand was suddenly grabbed. Ulrich guided her palm to his collarbone, exposed between the unbuttoned areas. Then, using his other hand, he continued unbuttoning his shirt.

 

The front of his shirt gradually opened, revealing his bare skin beneath. Ulrich slid Lisbell’s hand inside. When she reached a certain point, he withdrew his hand.

 

Despite this, Lisbell didn’t remove her hand from his abs. She continued to touch his skin as if finishing an unfinished task. She felt something tight and swollen pressing against her lower body. It was a familiar sensation by now.

 

Every time they made love, Lisbell would touch various parts of his body.

 

One day, it would be his face. Another day, his nape. Another day, his abdomen. And yet another day, his lower body.

 

It was partly an act to make him lower his guard, but it was also a form of investigation. She was trying to find the weakest part of Ulrich’s body. And the more she touched him, the more her resolve hardened coldly.

 

‘Stabbing won’t work.’

 

At first, she had considered using a sharp object, but it seemed impossible. His body, unlike hers, had very few vulnerable spots. Even his neck was so thick that she doubted whether she could strangle him in one go.

 

Of course, stabbing a vital area like the neck with a well-sharpened blade would cause blood to pour out, but whether it would be enough to take his life was uncertain. Above all, if her grip was too weak and she only managed to injure him, it would end in the worst possible way.

 

It had to be swift, without failure.

 

Lethal.

 

Thud.

 

As she was lost in thought, the body she was straddling fell back, causing the mattress to bounce loudly. The impact resonated through her body. The sensation of her limbs being enveloped in the loud movement felt strangely familiar.

 

‘…A gun.’

 

Where have I encountered that before?

 

Ah, Marnia.

 

And it was none other than this man who had personally handed it to her. When she stood in a straight line with the target and loaded the gun, the brief tension that caused an unfamiliar stiffness throughout her body came alive deep inside her.

 

And bang!

 

The explosive sound that shattered my eardrums and left my palms tingling.

 

The terrible sound of the gunfire and the target board, completely shredded in her line of sight, those grim things were sprouting in her hand.

 

But this was just an imagination that could never materialize.

 

How could she even get a gun?

 

Had she ever seen one since coming up to the capital?

 

No, even before that, before Ulrich handed it to her, she had never seen a gun in her life. It was not an item that could be easily or casually obtained just because you wanted it. It was purely by chance that he had a gun in Marnia.

 

As he said back then…

 

“And besides, the capital mansion isn’t exactly a place where you can practice comfortably.”

 

…so he said.

 

Oh?

 

Back then, the reason was clearly…

 

“My mother gets extremely upset when it comes to guns.”

 

She gets upset when it comes to guns…

 

“As a result, the gun that was discovered that day was confiscated. It was a rare piece, one of the few guns manufactured in the world, specially commissioned. It was a stunning gun, with gold foil wrapped around the slide.”

 

Confiscated, to the extent that…

 

The capital mansion, her getting upset, gun getting confiscated…?

 

Does that mean it happened at the main mansion in the capital? If so… could the gun that was confiscated from him still be somewhere in this place?

 

As Lisbell wrapped her arms around his neck, pulling him closer, she stared up at the ceiling. In the darkening purple of her eyes, an odd glimmer flickered.

“Why are you sleeping here like an abandoned cat?”

 

A warm voice accompanied by something brushing against her forehead woke Lisbell, who had dozed off, crumpled into a single-seat sofa.

 

It was only when she lifted her heavy eyelids, as if weighted down, that she realized she had fallen asleep in the living room on the second floor.

 

When did I fall asleep? I thought I was just closing my eyes for a brief rest…

 

Her vague consciousness gradually cleared as the drowsiness faded away. Taking advantage of Ulrich’s absence, she had left the bedroom to explore the mansion and had suddenly felt tired, so she had decided to rest here. It seemed that he had just returned and noticed her as he headed to the bedroom.

 

‘It’s gone.’

 

Since that day, Lisbell had been searching the mansion whenever she could, trying to find the gun that his mother might have confiscated.

 

But no matter where she searched, she couldn’t find it. She had looked everywhere she could think of, but the fact that it was nowhere to be found suggested it was stored in a place out of reach. After all, it wasn’t something one would leave in an easily accessible location, especially since it was a confiscated item.

 

“Are you still not fully awake? You look dazed.”

 

Ulrich gently bit her cheek, not enough to hurt. Ah… In her dulled state, she let out a slight groan, which made him chuckle briefly. After a moment, he slipped his hands under her knees and lifted her up.

 

Her broken ankle had healed, yet he still often carried her around. It didn’t seem like there was any particular reason or problem, but simply that he wanted to. Then again, when had he ever needed a special reason? He was the type who had to do whatever he wanted, no matter what.

 



 

Her heart had felt stifled for days. If possible, she wanted to ask this man for answers.

 

You had your gun taken away, didn’t you?

 

Where is it?

 

Do you know where it is?

 

Does your mother have it?

 

If so, where did she put it?

 

Did she leave it in this mansion?

 

Can I find it on my own?

 

Questions that she couldn’t bring herself to voice hung from the tip of her tongue.

 

Once again, there was nothing to show for today. She had searched nearly every possible place. The only remaining spaces were those where entering without permission would arouse great suspicion—like his mother’s bedroom, for instance.

 

If she had solid evidence, she would break in, but without it, acting rashly would only…

 

Lisbell lifted her weary eyes, the light of hope she had held onto a few days ago dimming. Through the open curtains, she could see a car parked next to the fountain outside.

 

A man got out of the back seat. He adjusted his appearance and reached inside the open door. A hand adorned with lace gloves was placed on his, and with his support, the elegantly dressed Mrs. Altahart stepped out.

 

‘A secretary?’

 

Among those staying at the mansion, there was no one who wasn’t busy, except for herself.

 

Although she was no longer the head of the household and had stepped down from the front lines, Mrs. Altahart was still involved in managing business, so her outings didn’t really concern Lisbell.

 

What did catch her attention was the person assisting her. At first glance, she thought it might be a secretary from the past, but it wasn’t. As the man’s face gradually became clearer in the sunlight, she noticed he was quite handsome. Around that time, Ulrich moved out of sight of the window, and naturally, Lisbell’s view of the two vanished as well.

 

But before that, she had an inkling of who the man was. The subtle and devoted air in his smile toward Mrs. Altahart… He wasn’t just a subordinate; there was a strange, almost sensual tension between them… The man was her new lover.

 

Well, she had always been that kind of person. Wasn’t it said that she used to pick male actors she liked from the theater and make them her lovers? Since that incident, Lisbell hadn’t seen her with anyone, so she thought maybe she had stopped that sort of behavior. But apparently not.

 

I thought she was grieving…

 

But then again, he wasn’t even her official husband, just a lover. She might not have been that attached to him from the start.

 

It just seemed a bit regrettable. Why didn’t Ulrich take after such a mother? Why couldn’t he inherit that fickleness, that ability to quickly replace someone he once showed affection for?

 

“Don’t look at me like that. I did it to survive too. Do you think I joined the theater company purely out of luck without any connections?”

 

Did that man also join the theater with the sole intention of becoming her lover?

 

Was he after the benefits Mrs. Altahart would throw his way, hoping to get as much as he could from her while staying at this mansion?

 

That man too…

 

“Lisbell?”

 



 

“It hurts. Why are you suddenly doing this?”

 

It was only when she heard his exclamation that Lisbell realized she had been gripping his arm tightly. When she released it, she saw a nasty wrinkle where she had held him.

 

She stared at it quietly, and her mind drifted back to a conversation she had suddenly recalled.

 

“Beram was someone who received quite a bit of favor from Mrs. Altahart, and he must have asked her about that box after watching it for a while.”

 

Beram. Why had that name come up?

 

Ah, right.

 

“Maybe it’s in that box.”

 

The box.

 

She had learned about it while trying to find out where Noah’s stolen necklace had gone.

 

“Have you ever been inside Mrs. Altahart’s bedroom?”

 

“There’s a box in there that doesn’t really fit in. Unlike her usual taste for luxurious things, it’s just a plain wooden box with no jewels or gold plating.”

 

“If she confiscated the pendant, it would probably be in that box.”

 

“She has a habit of shoving anything she finds unpleasant into it.”

 

Anything she finds unpleasant…

 

“Mother has a fit when it comes to guns.”

 

She has a habit of shoving them into that box.

 

Could there be a chance that Ulrich’s confiscated gun was in that box?

 

It wasn’t impossible.

 

This was the very suspicion she had been hoping for. The justification and reason she needed to proceed with this, knowing it wouldn’t be a pointless endeavor.

 

Her body, which had been floating in his arms, fell somewhere. The soft bed sheets cushioned her as she landed.

 

“Do you have a fever? You seem particularly distracted today.”

 

Ulrich brushed her side hair and touched her forehead. Lisbell tilted her head slightly, feeling his hand on her forehead. She spotted the bottle of alcohol she had begun drinking two glasses of every day on the side table next to the bed.

 

She pretended to glance at it casually, then returned her head to its original position. She pressed her cheek against his palm to fully dispel any suspicion.

 

She felt him pause ever so slightly. When he resumed moving his hand, his touch was even gentler than before. He brushed her long eyelashes and softly swept across her eyelids. It felt so tender that it was hard to believe this was the same hand that had strangled her neck and broken her ankle.

 

But it was a memory that could never be erased.

 

No matter how many lives she lived, she would never forget what this hand, and the man attached to it, had done to her.

 

It would remain forever buried deep in her heart, serving as her own private penance.

 



 

For several days, she observed Mrs. Altahart’s movements through the living room window.

 

This time, she realized that from this living room, she could see who was leaving and entering the mansion in real time. By simply opening the curtains, she had a clear view of the fountain in the center of the garden, and every car managed by the household passed by there.

 

So whenever Ulrich left, citing his schedule, she would come down to the living room and stay there.

 

If she wanted to sneak into Mrs. Altahart’s bedroom and find what she was looking for, she needed to understand her routine. She needed to know when the bedroom would be empty.

 

After carefully observing for days while deliberately aggravating the wound on her neck to delay the wedding as much as possible, she realized that Mrs. Altahart always went out on Tuesdays. Sometimes she was accompanied by the man who seemed to be her new lover, and sometimes by her secretary, but in any case, she always left the mansion in a car.

 

While it would be fortunate if she could sneak in unnoticed, she also had to be prepared for the possibility of being caught. For this reason, Lisbell waited for Ulrich to go out as well.

 

She had to be cautious not only of Mrs. Altahart, the owner of the bedroom but also of Ulrich, who would be immediately informed if something went wrong.

 

Rushing could ruin everything. So she cultivated patience, waiting and waiting while deliberately digging her nails into her neck, which was now healed enough to no longer need bandages.

 

Then, on a Monday night, when her patience was nearly at its limit, Ulrich, who had been carefully examining her neck, spoke.

 

“I have to visit a hotel after lunch tomorrow.”

 “…A hotel?”

 

“There’s an art dealer coming. I need to pick out some pieces to hang in the rooms.”

 

Ulrich lifted Lisbell’s slender chin. As he applied ointment to the nape of her neck, more visible under the light, he whispered softly.

 

“Shall we go together?”

 

It was quite an improvement.

 

He was even thinking of taking her out with him. What if she used the opportunity to escape? But on second thought, it also meant that his trust in her had deepened significantly. It was the carelessness that Lisbell had been waiting for.

 

Tomorrow.

 

Tomorrow, when his mother is out and Ulrich is also away, she must stay in the mansion at all costs.

 

“No, I’d rather stay here.”

 

She only hoped her voice sounded natural.

 

“I don’t really know much about art….”

 

Ulrich didn’t respond to her hesitant reply, which she had made in an attempt to sound subtly awkward.

 

In fact, it was he who had first suggested the idea, but she wondered if he actually preferred this kind of answer. Wasn’t he the one who had been so eager to confine her? In this situation where she declared that she would stay of her own accord, wouldn’t he be not just pleased but utterly satisfied?

 

She lowered her gaze to gauge Ulrich’s expression, but before she could, he brought his face close to hers.

 

His light gray eyes, so close that they seemed to merge with the surrounding darkness, glinted dully. It felt as if her heart had plunged into the deep, dark, and murky water. Her pulse slowed, and a slight shiver ran through her. A strange tension tingled across her skin.

 

“It’s fascinating….”

 



 

“That a person can change so much with just a single resolve.”

 

His low voice sounded more like a soliloquy, pondering over an enigma rather than addressing anyone in particular.

 

Then, he lightly nipped at the bridge of her nose. Shocked, she widened her eyes, and into her vision came his face, mischievously smiling.

 

It wasn’t a smile he habitually put on. It was transparent joy, so genuine that it felt as if she was seeing his true self for the first time.

 

And at that moment, she realized.

 

Ah, I’ve been deceived.

 

I let my guard down….

 

Thump, thump. Some emotion kicked violently within her chest. For the first time, Lisbell couldn’t define what she was feeling.

 



 

The next day, after confirming that the car carrying Ulrich’s mother had left from the living room, Lisbell immediately returned to Ulrich’s bedroom.

 

She picked up the bottle of liquor from the table and uncorked it without hesitation. Then, she tilted it over her palm. The liquid, which she would normally pour into her mouth, pooled in her hand like golden fluid. Lisbell rubbed it evenly on her arms, legs, shoulders, and the nape of her neck.

 

After the commotion, the smell of alcohol was so strong that it could sting someone’s nose just by standing near her. If someone found her in an unexpected place, they would surely think it was a mistake due to intoxication.

 

Lisbell set down the bottle, grabbed a waist strap from the closet, and headed to the bathroom. She tied the strap tightly around her waist under her clothes and tucked a dry towel inside it. Then, she left the bedroom.

 

She vaguely remembered where the Madam’s bedroom was. She had followed Ulrich with growing frustration as he searched for Julian Scott. The vase that Ulrich had used to smash Julian’s head was placed on a display cabinet, and the structure of the surrounding furniture made it easy to locate the Madam’s bedroom.

 

Lisbell grabbed the doorknob and looked around. Sensing no signs of anyone nearby, she carefully entered the room.

 

As expected, it was empty. She leaned against the door, scanning the area as she turned the lock. There was a soft click as the door locked from behind her.

 

She took her time waiting to confirm that there was no one inside. Once sure, Lisbell began to thoroughly search every corner of the room. Under the tea table, beneath the sofa, near the bed, on top of the wardrobe, and inside every drawer.

 

But there were too many places to search. The Madam’s bedroom was just as large as Ulrich’s. Moreover, even without the bathroom, the room was divided into several sections like a suite, so every turn presented a new area to inspect.

 

She had heard before that the Madam rarely left her bedroom, and now it made sense. The space was so varied and luxurious that such a reclusive lifestyle seemed entirely feasible.

 

‘The box, the box….’

 

Recalling Julian’s description, Lisbell’s eyes darted around busily.

 

As Julian had described, the Madam’s bedroom was incredibly ornate. It felt like stepping into a meticulously preserved chamber of a palace.

 

Ulrich’s bedroom was also decorated in every corner, but not to this extravagant extent. Just glancing around was enough to make Lisbell feel a heavy weariness.

 

Which made it all the more puzzling. Julian had said the box was plain, not matching the opulence of the bedroom. Shouldn’t something so out of place be immediately noticeable? She felt she had already checked every possible hiding spot.

 

‘It’s not here….’

 

Was it really in here?

 

Lisbell was nearly running around the room in search, her breath catching in her throat. She stood still for a moment, exhaling slowly. She tried to remain calm, but it wasn’t easy, knowing that she had already spent considerable time searching. If she had gone to such lengths, there had to be some reward.

 

She didn’t know what the outcome of today’s events would be, but it might be her last chance to enter the Madam’s bedroom on her own two feet. Biting the inside of her cheek, Lisbell lowered herself to check under the bed once more. The darkness beneath greeted her with an empty stare. Even though it seemed like there was nothing, she kept probing with her arm, moving it around.

 

“…!”

 

The spot she assumed was a wall gave way slightly when she pressed against it.

 

A false wall…?

 

Why would something like this be installed here?

 

Lisbell quickly pulled herself out from under the bed. She headed towards the headboard, pulling back the curtain drawn to block the morning sunlight.

 

What she thought was just a wide bed frame gave way completely when she kicked it, sliding inward like a door.

 

“…It’s here.”

 

Lowering herself almost flat to the ground to confirm, she found a black wooden box. Lisbell grunted as she pulled it out.

 

Finally, when the box was fully visible in front of her, a sigh of relief escaped her lips. The joy of finding what she had so desperately searched for was short-lived. Lisbell hurriedly opened the lid of the box.

 

“…Ah….”

 

Didn’t Julian say it was used to store things too unsightly to be seen? She had expected it to be filled with all sorts of junk, but that wasn’t the case. There were only a few items inside.

 

Even in this dimly lit space, a diamond ring and a pendant with a metal ornament suitable for a child gleamed brightly, and at the very bottom….

 

“It was a special order from one of the few places in the world that produce firearms. A gun with a slide wrapped in pure gold leaf.”

 

There was a black gun adorned with gold leaf patterns on its surface.

 

It’s here.

 

A gun.

 

It’s really here.

 

When she realized that the object she had longed for in her mind had materialized right in front of her, her heart plummeted. Even before she could calm her trembling insides.

 

Click.

 

There was a sound from the direction of the bedroom door.

 

“…Did it work?”

 

“Why is it locked…?”

 

“…What do you mean…? Weren’t they supposed to be out…?”

 

“…Get the key….”

 

From outside, she could hear voices, confused and hurried, as if someone was running down the opposite side of the corridor. The handle rattled as someone tested whether the door was indeed locked.

 

Lisbell snapped to attention. She quickly pulled out the gun and closed the box’s lid. She felt a prickling sense of urgency.

 

As she did when she retrieved it, Lisbell grunted as she pushed the box back behind the bed. She then reached into her clothes, pulled out the towel she had brought, and wrapped the gun in it. She slipped it under her skirt and secured it behind her with the tight waist strap she had tied. As she did, she heard the sound of a key being inserted into the door’s lock. A chill ran down her spine.

 

Lisbell quickly jumped onto the bed. She relaxed her limbs and went limp, assuming the appearance of someone deeply asleep.

 

Moments later, the door opened, and several footsteps hurriedly entered the room. The bustling noise of people checking on the situation came to a stop as they approached the bed.

“Who is this…?”

 

A soft, unfamiliar voice broke the silence. It seemed to be one of the maids.

 

“Sasha, go inform the master.”

 

“Yes, Butler.”

 

A butler? It seemed like the servants had business in the lady’s bedroom, found the door locked, and had called the butler. Lisbell had to suppress even the heartbeat she felt, hiding her anxiety.

 

“What should we do? Should we wake her?”

 

Someone asked hesitantly, wary of getting involved in something troublesome. Before the butler could respond, Lisbell furrowed her brow as if regaining consciousness amid the commotion. Slowly, she opened her eyes.

 

“Miss Osborne, why are you here?”

 

The old butler asked the moment their eyes met. It was a question Lisbell had anticipated, so she replied according to her plan.

 

“Why am I here… Ugh!”

 

She suddenly covered her mouth as if suppressing the urge to vomit. The startled servant approached her, then hesitated. He glanced at the butler and whispered, “She smells of alcohol.” The butler, seemingly understanding the situation, calmly stated,

 

“This is the lady’s bedroom.”

 

“What? What do you mean…? I was in Ulrich’s room…”

 

Feigning drunkenness, Lisbell mumbled, looking around in confusion.

 

“Ah…?”

 

She furrowed her brow, reacting as if realizing something was off. After a brief pause, she held her forehead.

 

“I… drank too much, and it seems I’ve made a mistake.”

 

“Let’s get you up. I’ll escort you to the master’s room.”

 

Lisbell didn’t resist as the servant helped her, making it clear she had no intention of putting up a fight.

 

As she walked towards the door, she felt the butler’s piercing gaze on her back. Her heart pounded in fear that the outline of the gun hidden under the towel might be revealed. However, they left the lady’s bedroom without incident.

 

The servant quickly left after escorting her to Ulrich’s room. Lisbell was more than happy with his lack of interest.

 

Once alone in the bedroom, her previously unsteady steps, mimicking the effects of a hangover, became stable as she entered the bathroom. She quickly crouched down and retrieved the item hidden in her waistband.

 

She unwrapped the towel and carefully examined the gun, which she hadn’t been able to inspect closely in the lady’s bedroom. The weight suggested it was loaded, so there was no need to search for bullets.

 

Suddenly, her vision blurred.

 

Confused, she blinked, but the blurriness persisted.

 

It took her a moment to realize that it wasn’t her vision but her hand holding the gun that was trembling. The weight of the weapon brought back memories of the day she first learned to shoot from a man, recalling the weapon’s deadly power.

 

“…No.”

 

I can’t be scared now.

 

I can’t have regrets.

 

She had come this far, focusing solely on her goal.

 

To give up now would be betraying herself. This was not only her resolve but also an atonement for her mother and revenge for Theodore. The lives he had destroyed were now in her hands.

 

You knew this would happen.

 

You already knew it wouldn’t be easy.

 

You were about to kill someone… ensuring they would never wake up again. It was murder. A crime so severe that the world considered it deserving of the harshest punishment.

 

That’s what she was about to do.

 

“Don’t tremble… don’t tremble…!”

 

She wanted to stop, but her fingers were stiff and unresponsive, cold as if frozen. Lisbell gripped her frozen hand, biting her lip hard enough to draw blood. Even as her conscience, though shattered, whispered incomprehensible words in her ear.

 

If you stop here… what then?

 

“I’ll make you the beautiful bride of spring.”

 

Her bloodshot eyes flicked up to the bathroom mirror. She saw her neck, the bandages removed. Though it had been a long process, the wounds had healed. All that remained was a long scar encircling her neck like a rope. The scar seemed to remind her that time was running out.

 

If you don’t kill him, you’ll have to marry him.

 

You might never be able to leave this place… for the rest of your life.

 

Can you bear that?

 

‘…No.’

 

I can’t.

 

So, she had no choice but to abandon her conscience.

 

If she wanted to avoid withering away, this was the only path.

 

After closing her eyes tightly and reopening them, Lisbell slowly put the gun down. Ironically, it was only then that the trembling stopped and her body obeyed her.

 

She wrapped the gun back in the towel and pushed it under the bathroom cabinet, in the same space where she had hidden the pills given to her by the lady. Since the pills hadn’t been discovered in the past few days, the gun was unlikely to be found soon.

 

Just a little more.

 

Just a little bit longer…

 

Lisbell left the bathroom after ensuring everything was in place. Without the weight of the gun hanging at her waist, her entire body felt lighter. But the intense fatigue that suddenly washed over her felt as though her entire body was being squeezed.

 

She climbed onto the bed, lying down as quietly as a dead person, barely breathing. Eventually, she wasn’t even sure if she was still breathing.

 

Although she was alive, it felt like all her physical functions were being filtered through a fog of consciousness. Her heart, still pounding wildly, seemed the strangest thing of all. As she mulled over it, the fact that she was alive at all seemed the strangest of all. Why was she still alive, enduring all this…?

 

She didn’t know how much time had passed.

 

Her mind only started to clear when she sensed someone outside the door.

 

“Lisbell.”

 

The door opened, and Ulrich entered. She remembered that they had been going to inform him. It seemed he had rushed back after hearing the news from the estate. Lisbell propped herself up on her arms and sat up.

 

“You went to my mother’s bedroom?”

 

“I mistook the rooms…”

 

“You confused this room with hers?”

 

“I had a few drinks… today.”

 

As Ulrich sat on the bed, closing the distance between them, he grabbed a handful of Lisbell’s shortened hair and brought her face closer. His sharp nose brushed her chin and neck. It seemed he could still smell the faint scent of alcohol, as he frowned slightly.

 

“The door to the bedroom was locked. Why did you lock it?”

 

“I don’t know.”

 

“….”

 

“I don’t remember.”

 

“…Has this happened before?”

 

“No.”

 

“First time today?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“You’re not just pretending not to remember?”

 

“I don’t know.”

 

As Lisbell continued to answer indifferently, Ulrich, who had been staring at her, glanced back at the door. There stood the old butler who had followed him in.

 

“Pavel, call the doctor.”

 

“A doctor?”

 

“Now that I think about it, you’ve been drinking too much lately.”

 

Ulrich looked quite serious. Seeing her confuse the bedrooms and forget her actions made him suspect she might be suffering from some alcohol-induced illness.

 

After a short wait, the doctor arrived. He had previously examined Lisbell in this bedroom at the lady’s request. After quickly asking a few questions, the doctor examined various parts of Lisbell’s body. Under Ulrich’s intense gaze, he even carefully inspected the burn on her neck before giving his diagnosis.

 

“There are no severe symptoms yet, so it’s hard to determine it as a disease. However, considering she drinks at least two glasses a day, I advise against alcohol for the time being. Also, Master, may I have a word…?”

 

After giving his standard advice, the doctor stood up and approached Ulrich.

 

Meanwhile, Lisbell stared at the long bottle of alcohol on the side table. She wouldn’t need it anymore. She had only been drinking to soothe the exhaustion she had to endure. After today, she wouldn’t need it anymore…

 

“What?”

 

A loud voice suddenly cut through her thoughts.

 

Lisbell’s head turned toward the sound. At the end of her gaze, Ulrich looked uncharacteristically surprised, unable to hide his shock. He seemed rather taken aback, a rare expression for him.

 

The doctor, who had been speaking to him, asked something in a low voice. Ulrich, lost in thought, finally snapped out of it and brushed his hand over his mouth.

 

“No… let’s keep this quiet for now….”

 

His face slowly turned toward her. At that moment, the sunlight behind him cast a perfect backlight. Half of his handsome face was shadowed, leaving only his lips visible to her.

 

A faint, curved smile…

 

 Lisbell felt uneasy, as if she had seen something unspeakably repulsive. The reason was unclear. Before she could fully grasp it, the fleeting image that lingered like a brief nightmare faded. As Ulrich took a step toward the bed, the darkness that had partially swallowed his face receded, allowing a bright light to seep in. His face, now fully visible, remained as composed as ever.

 

“Don’t worry. From today, I’ll make sure you don’t drink any alcohol,” he said, as if he had never shown a dazed expression. He quickly returned to his usual self, offering a seemingly fabricated smile along with his words.

 

“Has Mother returned?” Ulrich asked the butler, who was still standing there.

 

“Not yet,” the butler replied.

 

“Then let’s keep what happened today a secret.”

 

“But, Master…”

 

“Did you say my fiancée just mistook the room, Pavel?”

 



 

“Anything more would only break my heart.”

 

Although his tone suggested disappointment, there was a strict command hidden within, warning not to cross the line. He implied that he would overlook this incident but not to mention it to the lady of the house.

 

In the current household hierarchy, where the order had been overturned, Ulrich’s commands were absolute. The butler, understanding this, bowed his head and left the bedroom.

 

Lisbell, who had been watching the situation unfold from the bed, flinched when she felt an arm wrap around her waist. Ulrich, who had climbed onto the bed beside her, leaned against her, his small body collapsing backward. Their arms and legs became entangled on the sheets.

 

“There’s nothing to worry about. Mother won’t call you separately to give you a warning.”

 

…Worry?

 

When she raised her eyes, puzzled by his words, Ulrich burrowed into her embrace, his face melting sweetly like honey. He rubbed his face against her meager chest and whispered softly, as if wondering why she was staring at him like that.

 

“Lisbell, your face has gone pale because you’re scared.”

 

It wasn’t true.

 

What she feared wasn’t something as trivial as a scolding.

 

“Don’t worry about anything. Just sleep. When you wake up, we’ll have a meal together. We’ll eat something delicious, and then, maybe… we could go see a play after a long time. Or we could invite an orchestra to the mansion and hold a concert just for you…”

 

He mumbled like a child dreaming of impossible things. Meanwhile, Lisbell, who felt as if she had no more energy left, struggled to raise her hand.

 

She stroked his hair, which rustled near her chest. The smooth texture wound persistently between her fingers, like a man. Soft in form, yet with an intensity that didn’t match.

 

Ah.

 

Soon…

 

Lisbell slowly closed her eyes.

 

She could almost hear the sound of a heartbeat. She couldn’t tell whether it was hers or his, but one of them was a frail pulse that would soon be cut short.

 



 

When she awoke from a brief sleep, the surroundings were dim.

 

No lamps were lit, making the room dark. She felt as if she were trapped in a black forest, unable to see an inch ahead.

 

Lisbell tried to move but hesitated. Her limbs were pinned down, making it difficult to move carelessly. Her heart throbbed reflexively.

 



 

With eyes barely adjusted to the darkness, she realized it wasn’t shackles restraining her but Ulrich’s limbs. They had fallen asleep entwined like this. Ulrich, still asleep, breathed evenly with his eyes closed.

 

How strange.

 

Before falling asleep, her head had been bursting with emotions and thoughts, heavy enough to make her want to tear it off. But now, after waking up, her mind was clear, as if everything had evaporated.

 

All that was left before her was a man sleeping defenselessly.

 

Lisbell, sitting awkwardly, stared at his face. After what seemed like a long time, she calmly removed his arms and legs that were weighing her down. The act felt remarkably serene, almost like a sacred ritual.

 

She got out of bed and stood for a moment before heading toward the bathroom. Crossing the threshold that felt like a boundary, she groped under the bathroom cabinet. The gun was still there.

 

She removed the towel and took it out properly, feeling its weight in her palm. It wasn’t just the weight of the bullets; it was the weight of someone’s life. The realization made her shoulders feel as if they might give out at any moment. Even though she knew it was just an illusion, she couldn’t shake off the heaviness.

 



 

The unlit bedroom was as dark as a night that would leave no trace.

 

Lisbell walked toward the bed with silent steps. She felt as if she were walking through a sea path with endless waves, her breath gradually becoming more labored.

 

She didn’t know how she reached the bed and climbed on top of him. She simply blinked a few times, and it was done. A new, intense sensation pressed down on her neck, which had almost healed. Her breathing became uneven, as her inhales, exhales, and gasps crossed paths erratically.

 

Now was the time.

 

She had to shoot now to end this without any mistakes.

 

So shoot now.

 

Now, now, right now. Now, now!

 

“……!”

 

Her trembling hand was about to pull the trigger when a strong force gripped the gun barrel. Huh. The breath she had been holding slipped from Lisbell’s lips. Desperately, she tightened her sweaty grip on the gun.

 

A pair of blue eyes, now open, were looking up at her.

 

“What is this…?”

 

It was a drowsy voice, as if he had just woken up. Ulrich, who had been lazily blinking his eyelids, seemed to finally grasp the situation, letting out a drawn-out “Ah-” followed by a confused “Huh?”

 

Lisbell bit the inside of her cheek until it bled and pressed the gun firmly against his ribs, just above his lungs.

 

Finally, the strange sound that had been coming from Ulrich’s mouth ceased.

 

His hand was still gripping the gun barrel, but there was no struggle for dominance, as if he had no intention of taking it away. There was only silence, so tense it made her skin tingle and the fine hairs on her body stand on end.

 

“Where did you…”

 

After a moment, he spoke in a languid voice.

 

“I’ve seen this gun before.”

 

“…Let go.”

 

“Oh, I see.”

 

Ulrich let out a lukewarm sigh, as if he had only just realized something.

 

“You went to Mother’s room to find this, didn’t you?”

 

Does he not realize that a gun is pointed at him right now?

 

If not, how can he be so indifferent?

 

Lisbell’s finger was poised to pull the trigger at any moment. Despite his disadvantageous position, lying beneath her, Ulrich showed no signs of fear.

 

Instead, he chuckled softly, as if rolling his tongue inside his cheek. Lisbell felt as if she could no longer tell whether the thing she was pressing down on was a person or a lump of darkness.

 

“…I’m going to shoot.”

 

“When did you plan this?”

 

“I’m… I’m really going to shoot.”

 

“From the beginning?”

 

“So let go. Right now…!”

 

“Was your sweet behavior all an act, then?”

 



 

“Haha. I thought you might have really changed your mind…”

 



 

“I’ve been deceived, haven’t I?”

 

This isn’t right.

 

It wasn’t supposed to be like this.

 

Why was he so calm while she was the one feeling like she was about to lose her mind? The gun was clearly aimed at him, but she felt as if she was the one who was about to shatter. She didn’t understand. She couldn’t understand.

 

Lisbell, determined as if she were about to lose a finger, wedged her index finger into the trigger guard.

 

“Do you think I won’t shoot…? Is that why you’re so calm? Is that it?”

 

If so, she wanted to prove him wrong.

 

She would shoot.

 

She would shoot Ulrich Altahart, and she would dry up the shadow that clung to her ankles and refused to let go.

 

She knew it was an unforgivable act. So she would turn herself in afterward. For now, that was her only sense of freedom.

 

She didn’t care where she ended up. As long as it wasn’t next to this man who had ruined her life. No matter how much freedom she might have by his side, it would be no different from the sun viewed from a prison cell.

 

“If you want to shoot, go ahead.”

 

“…What?”

 

“Where do you want to aim?”

 

Ulrich, who had yet to release the gun, slowly moved his hand.

 

“Chest? Or the stomach?”

 



 

“If you don’t like that, how about the forehead?”

 

To prove he wasn’t joking, he used his own strength to raise Lisbell’s hand, bringing the gun to his forehead.

 Like the sky that indifferently gazes down on the violently surging waves as if it were someone else’s concern, Lisbell felt her sanity crumbling in front of his unnervingly calm demeanor. It was as if her vision wavered, as though she had been struck in the head.

 

She struggled to open her trembling lips, which chattered incessantly.

 

“What… are you doing?”

 



 

“I’m… going to kill you….”

 

I’m really doing this.

 

This isn’t a joke. Do you think my resolve is trivial? Am I that easy to push around? I’m really going to shoot you. Why do you think I can’t? Are you dismissing me as nothing but a weed you’ve trampled on so easily until now, thinking I won’t be able to?

 

“How… how little do you think of me? Do you think I can’t possibly shoot you, so you’re…!”

 

“I know you can shoot.”

 



 

“If I fell for it, that means Lisbell was just as determined.”

 

Lisbell stared down at Ulrich as if she had lost the ability to speak. A growing sense of emptiness quickly filled her.

 

But strangely, it seemed Ulrich felt that emptiness even more. His eyes were strangely hollow, and his expression, drained of any malice, showed no trace of resistance. It was as if he would even let himself be pushed over if someone wanted to topple him.

 

His face, now devoid of all sleep, wore a quiet smile as he calmly moved the gun barrel himself.

 

“You’re going to kill me, right?”

 



 

“Then aim for either the forehead or the heart. Those spots give the highest chance of instant death.”

 

“Why….”

 



 

“Why are you doing this….”

 

“What?”

 

“Why… why are you so calm about it… why…. Why!”

 

Is this person strange, or am I the strange one?

 

Which one of us is strange?

 

Lisbell believed she was the normal one. So the man must be the strange one. Yet, at the same time, he looked so utterly indifferent. With a face that was extremely composed, he looked up at her with eyes as still as the undisturbed surface of the sea, which only served to push Lisbell’s mental state into a corner.

 

Her thoughts, caught in a twisted chaos, flipped, overturned, and spun out of control.

 

This man is strange..

 

Is he not the strange one?

 

Is it me? Am I the strange one?

 

Am I the crazy one?

 

“Hmm, I was quite happy for the past few days.”

 



 

“It was fun, and I even thought a bit about our future together….”

 



 

“So, I must have had some expectations. Otherwise, there’s no way to explain the disappointment I’m feeling now.”

 

That’s why she couldn’t find any resistance in him. The seamless end of his will was, in another light, disappointment. He was truly expressing the deep-seated disappointment that had smoldered within him by completely giving up on resisting.

 

Her breathing quickened. It would have been better if he had grabbed her gun, thrown it away, and choked her mercilessly.

 

Why was he willing to accept everything now?

 

She couldn’t understand. The more incomprehensible points piled up, the more it felt like her brain was being pecked away.

 

Then the gun wobbled.

 

Ulrich had moved the gun he was holding to his forehead down toward his heart. Seeing the barrel of the gun resting like a dot on his broad chest made her feel a chill.

 

So, what I’m saying is, I just don’t understand.

 

Even though she, the one holding the gun, was this shaken, why was he…

 

Why is he….

 

“So, it would be thrilling to end my life by becoming your first target.”

 



 

“Now, hurry up and kill me.”

 



 

“Do you remember how to shoot? I taught you myself.”

 

Seeing him so calmly accepting it, as if he had swallowed resignation, only further unsettled her. Ulrich, as if to show he was completely surrendering, gently closed his eyes.

 

“Ah….”

 

At that moment, Lisbell realized.

 

No matter how much she struggled, she could never defeat him.

 

The reason she had sought weapons while wearing the masks of submission, compromise, and shame.

 

The reason she had wanted to firmly threaten him.

 

It wasn’t just her desire for freedom; deep down, she had a small, dark wish to see him suffer.

 

She wanted him to experience the threat to life, to feel his heart sink, and his chest tighten in despair, just as she had. She didn’t even hope to see him trembling in a weak state; she just wanted him to show, even a little, that he was feeling something like that, even if he tried to hide it. She just wanted to expose his ugly true nature.

 

“Why….”

 

Why can’t I leave any mark on this man?

 

Why is he still so dignified?

 

I’ve become such a wreck.

 

As long as I’m with him, I can’t avoid this state of constant downfall.

 

Is this… what I wanted?

 

Was this the outcome I wanted?

 

“To the point that I’d want to kill myself before I turn thirty.”

 

Her pupils, soaked in moisture, trembled.

 

Yes, now that she thought about it, he had said something like that. With each day filled with a relentless schedule that he handled as if it were his rightful duty, the self-destructive remark had been buried so deep in her memory that she hadn’t even thought to recall it.

 

Although she had initially thought it might not be a joke, she only now began to fully believe it could be true. Otherwise, there was no way to completely justify his current unflinching demeanor.

 

If that truly was his honest feeling, then what she was about to do would end up making him smile…?

 

“Lisbell, what are you doing?”

 

“Let go….”

 

“Shoot me. If you’ve aimed the gun, you need to fire it.”

 

“No. No, let go! Let go of it…!”

 

Frustrated by Lisbell’s inability to pull the trigger, Ulrich used his other hand to wrap around the hand she held the gun with. As her finger was pressed down and then released, the barrel slightly shifted.

 

Bang-!

 

With an immense noise, Lisbell felt as if her shoulder blade had been dislocated. The recoil, as intense as grabbing a rising flame, caused her finger to extend involuntarily, and the gun flew out of her hand to somewhere unknown.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Lisbell, whose body swayed from the unfamiliar pain, screamed. The moment she touched something, a damp sensation seeped into her palm. She quickly pulled her hand back in shock, but it was too late.

 

Her hand was already covered in blood. As Lisbell, trembling, flipped her hand back and forth, her breath caught in her throat as she rubbed it off on the sheet. It was a mistake. The sight of the red puddle soaking the white sheets made her convulse.

 

Gasping, gasping. She panted as if her breath was tightening, stepping back until she fell off the bed. Lisbell wiped her hands desperately on the carpet below. But it wouldn’t come off. It felt as though more was being smeared on, as if a blood-red rain was persistently dripping from the sky.

 

“Hmph, ugh….”

 

As tears suddenly burst from her eyes, she rubbed her cheeks to wipe them away, but the smell of blood became so overwhelming that it stung her nostrils, causing her to scream like a madwoman.

 

Then, a chilling sensation crept up her nape.

 

She pushed herself up from the floor and slowly turned her head back.

 

She saw the wide bed. The place where she had lain, slept, and read for the past few days.

 

She also saw the figure of someone lying there gracefully.

 

Unlike her, who had screamed and trembled all over, the person lying there was perfectly still. Only the brutal fountain of blood erupting from the bullet wound told of his presence.

 

There had been two people in this bedroom.

 

But now there was only one.

 

In other words, there was one person and one former person.

 

To put it more precisely, there was one person and one corpse….

 

“No….”

 

I… I didn’t mean to shoot.

 

If I killed him now, in the end, it would be Ulrich who would laugh, not me. I hesitated at the last moment, thinking that the victory would be his.

 

I wasn’t… going to pull the trigger.

 

“No. No….”

 

Then why is there so much blood?

 

Why isn’t he moving?

 

Why is there so much blood on my hands, and why do I keep feeling sicker and sicker? Why does my head throb with pain, and why does my chest feel like it’s caving in…?

 

“…Ah….”

 

This dangerous and cruel feeling forced her to face an undeniable truth.

 

I killed him.

 

I… killed him.

If asked about the feeling of killing someone for the first time, it was devastating. The indescribable horror surged both inside and out. My mind kept darkening as if the scribbles in it wouldn’t stop. Engulfed by that darkness, whenever I tried to muster any willpower, it would snap like a thread, leaving nothing behind.

 

“Huh…”

 

When what was once imagined became reality, the weight was unbearable.

 

The difference between “I will kill Ulrich Altahart” and “I killed Ulrich Altahart” might seem insignificant in terms of words, but the gap was insurmountable.

 

The difference was whether it could be undone or not.

 

The former had a possibility; the latter did not. Not even a little. Lisbell could no longer go back to the past, nor could she undo what had been done. He had been shot by her on that bed, and his unresponsive body was bleeding profusely, with the brutal evidence of the killing filling the midnight bedroom with a sickly scent.

 

It was an irreversible act.

 

She had…

 

killed a person.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

Her stomach twisted violently, bringing forth the urge to vomit. Curled up in a corner, she retched until her throat burned.

 

“Ugh, ugh, heuk, aah…”

 

She thought she was just dry-heaving, but when she came to her senses, she realized she was crying. Sobbing uncontrollably, tears poured from deep within her, where they had been building up, hot and relentless.

 

She had taken the gun she had stolen from his mother, gripping it with trembling hands, determined.

 

She thought she was ready, but it was all in vain. This was not something one could endure with a clear mind.

 

Surrender? What good would that do?

 

Even if she spent the rest of her life rotting in prison for murder, the memory of that day would remain a permanent scar. It would become a lump, embedded deep in her heart, unable to be expelled or forgotten, and she would live the rest of her life with it, breathing alongside her consciousness.

 

To live with that vile, nauseating lump hanging around her neck for the rest of her life…?

 

No, I can’t.

 

I can’t do it. I can’t do something like that.

 

Lisbell, dazed and staring at the blood and tears-stained ceiling, slowly lifted her head and began to crawl on her knees.

 

The gun. I need to find the gun.

 

She remembered throwing it to the other side of the bed. All she had to do was pick it up and shoot again. Calmly. They said if you shoot at the head or heart, it would be instant death. That would be enough. If she did that, she could be freed from this torment that felt like her insides were being torn apart.

 

Lisbell, pale as wax, crawled around the bed. Her skirt rode up, exposing her bony knees that bumped against the floor, but she didn’t feel any pain. Her mind had broken down, and her senses became irrelevant. The stench of blood that had filled her nose until it was raw had long since faded. All her senses were muffled as if she were submerged in water.

 

Just as she managed to crawl around the bed.

 

Thud, thud!

 

“Young Master, excuse me! I heard gunshots…!”

 

With a rough knock, the door burst open without permission. A fan-shaped light spread across the floor, creeping in. Lisbell, reaching out for the gun in the now slowly taking shape room, turned to look at the door.

 

Victor, panting as if he had run all the way there, flinched upon seeing her blood-stained hands and face, quickly turning his head away. Then, he froze upon discovering the figure on the bed.

 

“Ahhh!”

 

The maid who followed him also checked inside and dropped the lamp she was holding, screaming. At the sharp noise, Victor, regaining his senses, busily issued orders. Several people rushed into the bedroom.

 

Soon, Lisbell, who had been sitting down, felt a rough pressure on her back, forcing her chest to rub against the floor.

 

“A doctor! Quickly!”

 

Victor shouted at the top of his lungs as he rushed to the bed. In Lisbell’s sideways view, she saw a servant picking up the gun that had been thrown into the corner. A few drops of blood stained the ornate, gold-embossed slide.

 

Even though what she sought had been taken right before her eyes, there was no feeling left inside her. It felt as if her chest had been hollowed out. She merely watched the chaos erupting in the middle of the night with an empty gaze.

 

“What on earth….”

 

Altahart’s Madam arrived belatedly.

 

The Madam took a little longer than others to grasp the situation. But she realized the gravity of the matter more keenly than anyone. Otherwise, her face wouldn’t have hardened so much.

 

After a while, the Madam, trembling, held her forehead and staggered. The servant who had accompanied her quickly supported her.

 

She gasped loudly as if in hyperventilation and, with their help, approached the bed. She seemed to struggle with every step as if she couldn’t believe that her son was lying there like a corpse.

 

She gasped sharply as she reached the bed.

 

The area around the bed was already in chaos. A doctor, who had been called immediately since he resided on the estate, was already there, and Victor stood beside him, sleeves rolled up, while a nurse solemnly wiped the blood, and a servant offered towels for the bleeding.

 

Amidst the bustle where time seemed to blur, the Madam stood like a statue. As if wedged into the cracks of time, she was immovable until a moment later when she showed signs of life.

 

“Get her up.”

 

The dry voice from above her head sounded unlike her usual self.

 

Lisbell, pinned down by the pressure on her back, was forced to raise her upper body at the hands that pulled her shoulders up.

 

As soon as her skewed view righted itself, it swayed again.

 

Slap!

 

Her cheek flared with heat. The strike, delivered with force, was infused with a rage that had been accumulating. The raw emotion behind it was too intense to be quelled by just one slap.

 

Slap, slap, slap!

 

The sound of the hand striking her tender flesh resounded repeatedly, as if to prove the point. Soon, the room was filled only with the sound of Lisbell being slapped until her skin nearly tore. Victor and the doctor, who were near the bed, seemed too stunned to grasp what was happening until they rushed over.

 

“Ma’am! Please, calm down!”

 

Unable to touch her recklessly due to her status, Victor quickly stepped in front of her.

 

Shocked by the noblewoman’s violent behavior, the hands of the person holding Lisbell loosened. As Lisbell, who had been leaning against those hands, slipped and collapsed onto the floor.

 

The doctor quickly approached her, checking on her condition. The blood she had swallowed from the blows lingered in her mouth, tasting of iron. Yet, it still didn’t feel real. Her mind was foggy, as if it had been split off, and there was a clear sense of detachment as though she was observing another world.

 

“Move aside, Victor.”

 

“This won’t do, Ma’am. I understand how you feel, but…”

 

“You understand how I feel? If that were true, you wouldn’t be standing in my way like this.”

 



 

“This woman shot my child, Victor. All this blood you smell, it’s all my son’s!”

 

“You have every right to be furious. But there are too many eyes on you, Ma’am. You’re too agitated. Please, try to calm down…”

 

“He’s right, Ma’am. This won’t do…!”

 

The doctor, who had been cautiously examining the collapsed Lisbell, interrupted urgently.

 

“Miss Osborne is currently pregnant. Such a shock could have severe consequences for the fetus…”

 

The lady, who had been on the verge of losing control, seemed to freeze at his words. Her expression, barely contained, crumbled completely.

 

“What did you just say?”

 

And that shock hit Lisbell almost equally. The fragments of her scattered mind snapped back together under the dizzying blow.

 

Lisbell, her face still stained with tears and blood, hesitantly lifted her head.

 

“Pregnant…? Are you saying this woman is carrying my son’s child?”

 

The noblewoman’s voice, slightly trembling, had lost some of its strength.

 

“No, no.”

 

Denial burst forth almost immediately.

 

All eyes turned toward Lisbell, who was trembling as she pushed herself up from the floor.

 

“I… I took the medicine. There’s no way I could be pregnant. The medicine, you gave me, Ma’am. You know, you sent someone to deliver it to me yourself! I took it as you instructed, once a day, without missing a dose. So how could I be pregnant? How could there be something inside me…?”

 

“Didn’t you suspect anything? It appears to have been around two months…”

 

Two months.

 

Lisbell had secretly requested the medicine from the lady about a month ago.

 

Meaning, inside her womb, there was already…

 “Not at all.”

 

The denial burst out once again, driven more by instinct than by consciousness.

 

“No, it’s not there. There’s nothing like that in my, my stomach. It’s not there, so…”

 

Lisbell, shaking her head side to side, soon found herself thrashing wildly, her gray hair whipping around.

 

“It’s not there. I’m telling you, it’s not…!”

 

Madam watching her stepped back, signaling to someone.

 

“Check once more. Make sure to examine her in front of my eyes.”

 

The one who received the signal was the doctor.

 

Lisbell, with a face soaked in tears, fiercely swatted away the doctor’s hand reaching out to her. Then, two servants rushed over to restrain her from moving. Let go, let go of me. Don’t touch me. Don’t lay a hand on me! I said don’t touch me…! Her frantic resistance flailed in the empty air.

 

“As expected, it is true.”

 

The doctor, who had quickly examined Lisbell with the help of the servants, confirmed the diagnosis. By that time, the anger that had heavily colored Madam’s face had slightly faded. Her face, finally regaining its usual calm, turned back to the bed.

 

“…How is Ulrich’s condition?”

 

“It seems that the vital organs were narrowly avoided, but… the blood loss is too severe, so it’s uncertain what will happen next. There’s no disagreement that surgery must be performed as soon as possible.”

 

“Then take action quickly. And also…”

 

As the doctor, who received her instructions, returned to the bedside, Madam’s gaze fell downward. Lisbell, who had been writhing like a fish out of water, found it difficult to breathe when she met the icy coldness of Madam’s eyes.

 

The situation was so strange that the fact that Ulrich wasn’t dead barely registered. Instead, a gloomy intuition flooded her.

 

No, it can’t be.

 

Her instinct whispered those words from deep within.

 

“Madam, the doctor must have made a mistake. It’s certain. You gave me the medicine, didn’t you? You personally gave me the instructions! Madam, please, there’s no way I could be pregnant. Madam, Madam. So, please…”

 

“Take Miss Osborne to the cell for now.”

 

What…?

 

“Don’t forget to make sure she can’t leave on her own.”

 

Madam’s voice was read slowly. Engulfed by it, Lisbell sluggishly realized she was being lifted by the servants. As her vision, stained with tears and the smell of blood, cleared, it finally struck her. It meant they were going to imprison her again in another part of this mansion she thought she’d finally be able to leave…

 

This couldn’t be happening.

 

This wasn’t supposed to happen.

 

Lisbell braced her feet against the ground, resisting the force pulling her away. Then, with a harsh, cracked voice, she clawed toward Madam.

 

“I tried to kill your son!”

 



 

“I tried to kill him, to end his life completely, that’s why I stole the gun. Do you know where I stole it from? Earlier today, I sneaked into your bedroom, found the box where you keep things you don’t want to see, and took it from there. I shot him with that gun, me!”

 



 

“I’m confessing right now. I’m a criminal. I tried to kill someone. Your son, I… So please, send me to prison. I’ll go to prison. Even if you let me go, I’ll go there on my own. You can check later. I won’t run away. I’ll pay for my sins there. So, Madam… Madam! Madam…!”

 

Dragged along, Lisbell spewed out anything she could think of to provoke Madam. But Madam didn’t turn her head even once. Not until Lisbell was finally dragged across the threshold of the bedroom did she see even a glimpse of Madam’s cold face.

 

It felt as if the heavens had completely turned their back on her.

 



 

Lisbell, pacing anxiously by the window, turned desperately toward the sound of the door opening. Altahart’s wife, who had been absent for half a day, appeared with the secretary and two male servants in tow.

 

“Madam….”

 

Lisbell, who had been dragged into a room that seemed to serve as a guest room, had been waiting for her.

 

Having left Ulrich’s room, where the smell of blood had overwhelmed her senses, she found her senses gradually returning, allowing her to piece together the situation.

 

Now that she was more aware, a conversation with Madam felt crucial.

 

Surely, there was still room for negotiation. After all, Madam herself had provided her with the contraceptive. It was evidence that she, too, was not keen on seeing an heir born into this world with Lisbell’s blood.

 

Lisbell had already experienced firsthand how much these people valued bloodlines, given how Noah had been treated in the mansion.

 

Perhaps Madam needed time to collect her thoughts after getting so worked up. After all, the person who had been shot was her son—her only remaining family, child, and the pillar responsible for the future of the household.

 

Even if she had clashed with her son over Lisbell, underneath it all, there was still a parent’s love driving her. And when her child was shot in the middle of the night, it was no wonder her rage had flared up. The lingering warmth on Lisbell’s cheek from where Madam had slapped her was proof enough.

 

When Victor had urgently tried to intervene, seeing Madam slap Lisbell’s cheek had shown that it wasn’t her usual behavior. In all the time Lisbell had known her, she had never shown a sign of losing her composure. Not even when she faced Ulrich pointing a gun at her.

 

Ulrich.

 

Just thinking of his name made Lisbell’s heart clench.

 

She watched as Madam sat down in the chair the secretary had provided. Throughout the waiting period, the bits and pieces of information Lisbell had overheard about his condition swirled in her mind.

 

“It seems that the vital organs were narrowly avoided, but… the blood loss is too severe, so it’s uncertain what will happen next. There’s no disagreement that surgery must be performed as soon as possible.”

 

Although the vital organs were avoided, the blood loss was severe, and surgery needed to be performed as quickly as possible.

 

Perhaps the answer to that problem lay in Madam’s whereabouts during her half-day absence. Lisbell couldn’t help but feel her chest tighten.

 

“Ulrich is…”

 

Just as Lisbell’s thoughts were beginning to overwhelm her, Madam finally opened her mouth after what seemed like an eternity.

 

“He’s alive.”

 

Ah.

 

Lisbell felt a stirring deep within her chest at those words. She couldn’t quite grasp what kind of emotion it was.

 

She hadn’t killed anyone.

 

But she hadn’t succeeded in killing him either.

 

Was this a victory or a defeat?

 

One thing was certain: it wasn’t over. Like a king piece stranded in the middle of the enemy’s territory, her nerves were on edge, wracked with unrelenting anxiety and tension.

 

“But he’s unconscious.”

 

As Lisbell wrestled with her conflicting emotions, Madam’s next words came.

 

“There’s no telling when he’ll wake up.”

 



 

“He might never wake up again.”

 

Madam’s face looked like a shadowed corner. Just seeing it sent a shiver down Lisbell’s spine, as if the abyss itself were staring back at her.

 

“When the doctor gave that prognosis, a thought came to mind, Miss Osborne.”

 



 

“If the medical outcome is so uncertain… then what’s the difference between that and my son being dead?”

 

That abyss crushed her. Even though countless words were building up on her tongue, she couldn’t bring herself to say anything.

 

Lisbell could only look up at Madam with terrified eyes.

 

“Every minute and every second is precious now, but time is slipping away meaninglessly. The inevitable mess caused by the absence of the leader, the complex issues within the family, including the heir… Just the fact that this situation has arisen makes me feel as if I’ve already faced Ulrich’s death.”

 

Madam’s rebuke, as if asking if Lisbell even understood the gravity of Ulrich’s absence and its implications, was sharp. The calmness in her voice made it even more cutting.

 

Lisbell didn’t care about such situations. If Ulrich hadn’t pushed her to this point, none of this would have happened. All she wanted was to escape from him and this place. Why had it come to this, where she now faced Madam in such an unsettling confrontation?

 

“Miss Osborne, did you say you were willing to pay for your sins?”

 

Finally, Madam’s voice fell, crisp and clear.

 

“You can atone by giving birth to the child inside you.”

 Despite being so clear and straightforward, why did it sound like a cruel command for Lisbell to ascend the guillotine? The voice was as if it had already organized all thoughts, demanding that she meekly surrender her life and accept the fate that had befallen her, without even allowing her to struggle. This made her feel dizzy, causing Lisbell to stagger on the spot.

 

A massive earthquake seemed to erupt before her eyes as she clutched her forehead and barely managed to speak.

 

“When I said I would atone for my sins… I meant taking legal responsibility.”

 



 

“Not here, not by being treated like this… as atonement…”

 

No matter how much she tried to hold onto her sanity, it didn’t go as planned. It was too difficult. Suddenly, her whole body felt heavy. Her arms, legs, and even her shoulders all felt as if they were being dragged to the ground.

 

Above all, her belly, which she couldn’t bring herself to look at or touch, was so repulsive from the moment she began to recognize it.

 

Unable to endure it any longer, Lisbell collapsed to the floor.

 

“You didn’t like it either, did you? That the child born from my blood would become the heir to this family.”

 



 

“That’s why you gave me the medicine, right? Because you didn’t want a commoner to bear the Altahart’s seed, you agreed with what I said! But why are you doing this now? Why did you change your mind? How can you ask me to give birth to a child with the blood of someone dirty and low like me, the child of that man! Madam…!”

 

“Because Ulrich might not wake up.”

 



 

“Miss Osborne, think of it this way. We are making a compromise: we will turn a blind eye to the terrible crime you committed in exchange for you giving birth to the child. If you hand over the child to me afterward, we won’t hold you accountable for your crime. That would be far better than being dragged to prison after a capital trial and spending your life there.”

 

“What do you mean, better!”

 



 

“What exactly is better? Madam, how could you say that, how could….”

 

How could that be possible…

 

She started feeling nauseous again. Enduring the twisting sensation at the back of her throat, Lisbell glared at Madam. A bitter déjà vu hit her. His son always looked down on her as if he were examining her from above, and the same was true of his mother.

 

Altahart always lorded over someone else, casually breaking and shattering people’s dignity. In their view, there was no respect or guilt…

 

There would never be any respect for the unborn child or herself in this household. There were the times she had endured and the lessons she learned from watching Noah.

 

The unborn child would be an indelible curse on her life.

 

It would be the result of a relationship she never wanted with Ulrich, and a lifelong shackle that she couldn’t escape. It would forever trap her under the shadow of this family.

 

No… no!

 

Putting aside all these relationships and causality, she simply found it abhorrent. It was disgusting, loathsome, and repulsive. The idea of giving birth to Ulrich Altahart’s child, raising his child in her belly, made her shudder.

 

She wanted to deny it all. She wanted to believe that such a thing would never happen, that it couldn’t happen.

 

“Madam, please… please reconsider….”

 

Lisbell crawled over and clutched Madam’s knees. The servants behind her flinched for a moment, but since Madam gave no specific orders, they remained silent. Meanwhile, Lisbell clung to Madam’s knees and pleaded earnestly.

 

“Ulrich is not dead. He will… he will surely wake up. When that happens, you can have him marry the young lady of a family you desire and have a proper heir. There’s no need for me to get involved, no need for me to be in the way. Isn’t that right? Madam….”

 



 

“Please don’t do this. I was wrong. I was foolish. So please, let me atone for my sins in some other way… a trial, yes, I’ll stand trial at the capital and go to prison. I’ll live in prison for the rest of my life. It’s okay if I never come out. I’ll atone that way. I’ll always live with a heart full of remorse! So….”

 

“Enough.”

 



 

“Miss Osborne, any further discussion is just a waste of time.”

 

Madam, who had been gazing at Lisbell impassively, stood up with an expression that showed no trace of emotion. Lisbell, biting her lip until it bled, grabbed the hem of Madam’s dress as she tried to leave. Only then did the servants intervene to pry her off.

 

“No, don’t go. Let me out of here. Let me out…! Why are you doing this to me! Why, why!”

 

Madam, who had been heading toward the door, turned around at the sound of Lisbell’s desperate cries.

 

“Indeed…”

 



 

“Why did you shoot my son?”

 

The reproach was so simple. Madam’s words, mixed with both frustration and exasperation, were like a misfired bullet. Her voice carried the implication that everything that had happened to Lisbell was her own fault. There was even a hint of disdain in her tone.

 

As that blatant criticism hit her ears, something inside Lisbell snapped.

 

“Why….”

 



 

“Because… because he hurt me….”

 

Her voice, which had started out clumsy, gradually dried up. She could no longer bear the intense emotions that surged like wildfire within her. Lisbell’s features contorted in anguish.

 

“Because he made my life miserable…!”

 



 

“Because he ruined me like this!”

 

Lisbell sprang up and lunged at Madam. But she didn’t get far. The servants nearby grabbed her shoulders and arms, stopping her in her tracks.

 

Yet, Lisbell, as if she had nothing more to lose, started screaming and flailing her limbs at Madam. She had reached the end of her endurance, throwing everything away in desperation. Although she was eventually pinned to the floor, her back against it, Lisbell continued to scream her curses with a tightened jaw.

 

“He ruined my fiancé’s life, and he insulted my mother’s last moments!”

 



 

“It’s all Ulrich Altahart’s fault…. He brought it upon himself!”

 

So don’t blame me, she shouted, saying that he was merely punished according to natural order, that if someone commits a sin, it will inevitably come back to them. But her words never reached their intended target. Madam had already left the room.

 

The sound of the door clicking shut was immediately followed by long streams of tears rolling down Lisbell’s cheeks.

 

“No…”

 

She couldn’t let Madam leave like this. Struggling to free herself from the arms holding her down, Lisbell desperately tried to crawl toward the door. Perhaps because Madam had safely left the room, the grip of the servants holding her down had weakened slightly. Lisbell, as if she only knew how to move forward, crawled on her knees and pounded on the door.

 

“Madam, madam…! Just a moment. Let’s talk again…. Please, listen to me. Madam! You can’t leave like this. You can’t….”

 

There’s no one but you who can save me from here.

 

There’s no one else who would listen to me.

 

“Madam, I, I was wrong. I was angry and misspoke. So please forgive me. Please come back. Please open this door, don’t leave me locked up here. Don’t leave me here… Madam… Madam…!”

 

She pounded on the door so hard that it shook, but as soon as she grabbed the handle, it was snatched away by the servants who rushed over. Dragged back toward the bed, Lisbell could only stare at the door that grew farther and farther away. She watched, hoping that the door would reopen, with a desperate and persistent gaze. But the door did not betray her by reopening.

 



 

As she feared, there was no room for negotiation with Madam.

 

It was something she came to realize over time.

 

After conveying her message, “We will turn a blind eye to your crime if you give birth to the child in your womb,” Madam never visited the room again. She simply sent people to ensure that Lisbell was fed and monitored every moment of her actions.

 

It was around that time that the tormenting morning sickness began.

“Ugh…”

 

Even though she hadn’t eaten anything, her stomach churned, twisted, and retched uncontrollably. The only thing that came up was the bitter bile since there was nothing else in her stomach. She overturned all the food that was served in protest of this situation, but even if she had the will, Lisbell wouldn’t have been able to eat it, so nauseating it was.

 

Exerting energy without filling up with anything left her utterly drained. Lisbell’s days were mostly spent lying down. In any case, it wasn’t much different from before she knew she was pregnant, so nothing had changed significantly.

 

Cough.

 

Lisbell coughed softly, her eyelids fluttering. She saw the sunlight filtering in from afar. Perhaps because of the curtains around the bed, the light didn’t reach this far inside. Feeling as if she was sinking into muddy water, she stared at the area where the sun shone brightly enough to make the dust rise. She reached out her weak hand, but it didn’t reach. It was too far away.

 

So… why am I here?

 

Ah, I shot Ulrich with a gun.

 

Just recalling it made her whole body shudder from the recoil. It was still horrifying. No, the present was even more horrifying. If she had known it would lead to this… she wouldn’t have done something as crazy as shooting him.

 

‘…No.’

 

If she hadn’t left him on the brink of death, by now, she would have been walking into a palace-like wedding venue, dressed in an extravagant wedding dress that didn’t suit her at all. Could she have endured that? She would have pulled out the sharp stems of the bouquet she held tightly and stabbed him right in the heart. It was so horrifying, so terrible. The thought of becoming his bride was unbearably repulsive and nauseating…

 

‘And now…?’

 

Isn’t it still the same?

 

There’s no difference in the fact that it turned out to be a dreadful situation.

 

So, what exactly did I do…?

 

Even after committing the heinous act of intending to kill someone, finishing the sin with my hands soaked in blood, why do I still have to be here?

 

Ah, did I come to hell?

 

Is this hell?

 

If I had known, I should have made sure to kill him. Instead of being scared out of my wits, I should have held the gun steady and put a proper hole in either his forehead or heart. I should have completely… cut off his breath.

 

Would I then have been reported without question, handed over to the authorities, stood trial in the capital, and ended up in a prison? Spending the rest of my life locked in a cell, a place swarming with rats and dust.

 

But what’s the difference between that place and here? Both are prisons. Here is just a bit bigger, fancier, with meals served on time.

 

In the end, is it all the same?

 

The fact that I’ve fallen into hell alive remains unchanged.

 

“…Ugh…!”

 

No, it wasn’t the same. It wasn’t all the same. That was immediately apparent through her physical symptoms.

 

Lisbell, who had been lying down as if she was about to close her eyes, suddenly twisted her upper body. She hung her head over the side of the bed and started retching aimlessly.

 

Her mouth, which had opened wide and was now gasping for breath, was filled with nothing but vile saliva. Her stomach churned as if someone was pounding on her guts. Her energy, already at rock bottom, drained further. Lisbell’s thin arm, which had been clutching the edge of the bed frame, dropped to the floor.

 

“Ah…”

 

Why do I keep feeling so sick?

 

No.

 

It’s not like I’ve eaten anything properly.

 

No.

 

Is it because my condition is bad?

 

No.

 

If not, then…

 

You know.

 

Barely lifting her upper body, Lisbell curled herself up and covered both ears. She pressed her palms and even her index and middle fingers tightly against her eardrums. Even so, it felt like someone kept whispering ominously into her ears.

 

You know it well.

 

It’s just a little nausea.

 

It’s inside your belly.

 

It’s only being affected by your poor mood.

 

His child.

 

There’s nothing wrong with your body…

 

The sprout you must give birth to…

 

“No…”

 

No, no, no!

 

Lisbell, who had been curled up so small she might disappear in an instant, abruptly sat up. She was so terrified that the sound might get louder that her hands never left the vicinity of her ears. She slammed her head hard against the wall while still covering her ears.

 

Bang! Bang! Bang!

 

She intended to keep hitting until the hallucinations stopped, but instead, the more she hit, the louder the sound became. Above the eerie hallucination, someone’s mocking laughter began to echo, gnawing at her skin. A strange rhythm, made by slowly rolling the tongue inside the mouth, accompanied the sneers.

 

“Lisbell, if you think too much for someone as naive as you, this is what happens.”

 

Why was that phrase coming to mind now?

 

“You only make things worse.”

 

Did I… ruin everything again?

 

Did I try to do something, only to end up walking into the darkest depths on my own?

 

Lisbell’s head, which had been staring blankly at the wall as if she might collapse at any moment, gradually drooped.

 

No, there was still something worse.

 

‘I can’t… give birth.’

 

They’ll overlook the crime if I give birth?

 

Nonsense. If that seed grows inside me and eventually becomes a person, it will be the greatest sin of my life. It would undoubtedly become a wretched existence. The child, born between an inhuman father and a mother who receives such awful treatment, would have a future as clear as day.

 

If the child were already born, it would be different, but since there’s still time, I have to stop it somehow. Even if it means cutting open my belly and tearing it out, I’d rather die than give birth to Ulrich’s child.

 

This would be the last responsibility she would bear.

 

As if possessed, Lisbell raised her arm. She then slapped her stomach with a loud thud. Her other arm crossed and rose. And again, smack. Smack, smack. Her upper stomach began to throb as if it were being tugged, but she mercilessly continued to strike herself.

 

She hit and slapped herself at random, but her limits were quickly reached. She was exhausted in no time. It wasn’t the kind of parasite that could be removed with just this. Given that it had survived even the drugs the lady had given her, it was sure to be a tenacious, creepy life form.

 



 

Her lost gaze wandered around the bedroom. Soon after, she spotted a chair. With sluggish movements, she got off the bed and approached the chair. She lifted it up and then slammed it down hard. The loud thud shook the entire bedroom.

 

Perhaps due to her lack of strength, she wobbled after just two attempts. She had intended to break the chair and use its leg, but it seemed impossible.

 

In the end, Lisbell toppled the chair over and tried to use her own body to slam into her belly. She wished her stomach would burst open entirely. She wanted to bleed so much that she would have to be rushed to the hospital immediately. She wanted to use such reckless tactics to escape this bedroom.

 

But before she could carry out her dream-like plan, the door suddenly burst open.

 

“What the…!”

 

“What are you doing!”

 

Two strong men rushed in and grabbed her arms, lifting her up.

 

“Let go, let… let me go….”

 

Her desperate struggles were to no avail. As soon as she was safely moved back to the bed, Lisbell began hitting her stomach again. Terrified by her actions, the servants had no choice but to tie her hands to the bed to stop her.

 

As a temporary measure, they used a tieback, but after she passed out and woke up again, they replaced it with a rope that wouldn’t loosen no matter how much she twisted her wrists.

 

In this house, any object could easily change its purpose. Perhaps, in such ways, she wasn’t the only one who gradually lost her breath under this kind of oppression. If so, this mansion was indeed a swamp that devoured people.

 

Outwardly, it seemed like a flashy paradise, but in reality, it was the opposite. And she, too, would become a sacrificial offering to be devoured. Her flesh would be torn apart, her bones ground to dust, and her internal organs mashed into pulp. There was no doubt she would experience a pain equivalent to that.

 

“Excuse me…”

 

She stirred and called out. She thought she was using all her strength, but her throat was so constricted that only a raspy, metallic sound came out.

 

Excuse me, excuse me. She called out a few more times, but the closed door didn’t budge. It only continued to confine her in solitude. Lisbell tried to cause another commotion, but with her arms tied, she couldn’t move beyond a certain radius from the bed.

 

Bang.

 

Bang, bang, bang.

 

Eventually, she banged her head against the wall.

 

She didn’t think she had hit it that hard, but at some point, the smell of blood suddenly filled the air. Without even realizing it, the skin near her forehead had split, and blood began to flow. As Lisbell stared at the red stain as if it belonged to someone else, the door creaked open.

 

She was once again faced with the servants, who looked as if they had forgotten how to speak. Their faces were those of people who had witnessed something utterly bizarre. It was then that Lisbell realized what kind of misunderstanding they had.

 

Before she could say anything, actions were taken. The rope binding her arms was shortened, and this time, her ankles were also tightly bound so that she couldn’t move at all. She was left in a state where she could do nothing but roll slightly from side to side.

 

Around that time, Lisbell deeply realized that the lady intended to imprison her.

 

Lisbell spent the entire day watching the sun rise and set through the window, and as dusk turned into night, she bit down on her tongue with all her strength.

Once again, she didn’t feel the pain was that severe, but blood quickly filled her mouth.

 

Her vision became hazy and blurred. Even though her eyes couldn’t focus, Lisbell continued to gnash her tongue as if her goal was to sever it completely, panting with the metallic taste of blood. After a while, she couldn’t tell whether she was biting her tongue or the rapidly forming froth of blood.

 

Her consciousness faded in an instant.

 

When her senses finally returned, as if they had been severed and reattached, her mouth felt unnatural. Something was firmly lodged inside. It wasn’t until she sluggishly rolled her eyes and wiggled her tongue—still intact, despite her earlier efforts—that she realized a towel had been forced into her mouth as a gag.

 

So it doesn’t get cut off that easily.

 

At that moment, she made a vague resolution to bite down harder next time. Just then, the door in the distance opened, and for the first time in a long while, Madam of the house made her appearance.

 

The one who had stripped away her freedom and confined her here appeared as flawless as ever, to a maddening degree. She looked so perfect that she could have gone out and been treated with respect by anyone, exuding a living elegance that was like a textbook. Unlike Lisbell, who was bound hand and foot with a towel gagging her mouth, the difference was staggering. Lisbell cursed her own weakness for not fully severing her tongue.

 

“Miss Osborne.”

 

As Madam approached the bed, the servants tidying up around her retreated politely. Madam sat softly on the bed. Her calm, gray-blue eyes brushed over Lisbell’s arms, legs, and mouth.

 

“What is all this?”

 



 

“If you had only behaved, it wouldn’t have come to this…”

 

Her tone was as consistent as ever. Still flowing like water, she was quick to shift the blame onto others. It was your fault for not behaving, she seemed to say, that you ended up in this sorry state.

 

That was wrong.

 

Lisbell was no longer confused. The reason she was in this predicament was that Madam had imprisoned her here without her consent. And if she delved a little deeper, it was because she had shot Ulrich Altahart with a gun—and that, too, was something the man had brought upon himself.

 

Altaharts were all like this. Ulrich wasn’t the only cruel one. After all, where would such bloodlines go? They were all molded by the same family, raised within the walls of their shared blood.

 

“Don’t do anything foolish from now on.”

 

A voice warned her, telling her not to make an enemy of Madam. Who said that? She couldn’t quite recall. Was it someone she didn’t know? Someone she did? It was blurry.

 

“As long as Ulrich’s baby is in your womb, you must not die on your own accord.”

 

Why? She wanted to ask, but with her mouth gagged, she could only stare at Madam. Madam met her gaze for a moment, then reached out. Her neat fingers brushed away Lisbell’s disheveled hair and smoothed down her side locks.

 

“Miss Osborn, instead of continuing like this, why not change your mind?”

 

Ah, why do these Altaharts like to say that so much?

 

Ulrich had told her that several times as well.

 

They kept telling her to change. What? Her thoughts. Why? She didn’t know. They just kept saying it like that. Change. Ah, right. What? Oh, right, her thoughts. Change her thoughts… Does that mean what she’s thinking is inherently wrong? So, she should conform to the superiority they were born with? She didn’t understand. Why…? She didn’t understand. But what was she supposed to change again? Ah, her thoughts…

 

What will change if she changes her thoughts?

 

More importantly, she couldn’t overlook that the Altaharts were abnormal before thinking about changing herself. Someone had once told her this.

 

“All the people in this family are completely crazy.”

 

Who said that? It was a man… No, wait. Was it a woman? What… Hinse? No, that wasn’t the name. I can’t remember.

 

Whoever it was, what did it matter? There was someone who had boldly pointed out their abnormality.

 

Someone’s long fingers had circled near her head.

 

Round and round, round and round, round and round.

 

That’s right. The Altaharts were all strange. Not just that—they were a harmful, unhealthy bunch. They lived with a few screws loose that should have been securely in place.

 

They never considered how unvirtuous they were, instead, forcing others to fit into their standards. Naturally, I would be whittled away. I’d be left as just a torso, perhaps even a stump, with parts of my body bluntly damaged. If that happened, I’d be worn down to nothing, neither this nor that.

 

That’s how things came to this point.

 

“If you have any desires, feel free to ask.”

 



 

“Do you want an enormous fortune so you’ll never have to work again? Or perhaps the ownership of a building on Central Avenue? Or even jewels so rare they’re among the world’s most prized?”

 



 

“As long as you safely give birth to Ulrich’s child, whatever it is, I’ll place it in your hands. If you don’t trust me, we can even draw up a contract.”

 

Lisbell’s lips, forced open by the towel, trembled painfully. She looked like a land animal desperately trying to take a breath underwater. Even though it was obvious she would sink faster as water filled her lungs, she was blinded by the immediate sense of danger and couldn’t realize it… how foolish…

 

No sound came out. Even so, Lisbell kept moving her lips. It was a small movement, but Madam’s eyes caught something in it, her pupils rippling slightly.

 

Soon, Madam rose from the bed.

 

“Take your time to think it over. There’s plenty of time.”

 

Madam turned her back, but Lisbell continued to move her lips, as if still convinced Madam’s eyes were on her.

 

Freedom.

 

Give me freedom.

 

She kept mouthing those words. That’s all she wanted. She didn’t care about an enormous fortune, a grand building, or sparkling jewels. All she wanted was to raise her arms high, bask in the sunlight, and be carried away by the wind to wherever she wished.

 

It wasn’t just for herself. It also applied to the existence that had taken root in her womb, no matter how hard she tried to suppress it—a presence that had become an uncomfortable consciousness.

 

This child, as soon as it was born, would be swallowed whole by this mansion, which was beautiful only on the outside. It wouldn’t even be given a proper name, like Noah, and would be stifled by the smallest of things, withering away day by day.

 

That was a fate as clear as death. The obliteration of one’s personality is a death of a higher order. No matter how much she breathed and lived, it felt no different from dying.

 

So, am I carrying death in my womb?

 

If that’s true, isn’t it best if it’s stillborn?

 

Wouldn’t that be the greatest mercy I could offer this life?

 

But it seemed Madam thought differently. Her offer of compromise was severe. The process by which Lisbell would receive any material reward was predicated on the condition of ‘giving birth to the baby.’

 

Madam was determined to ensure this child saw the harsh light of the world, regardless of whether it blinded it or caused its skin to rot.

 

“Kkh…”

 

A sob burst out unexpectedly. Tears flowed freely. Lisbell wept with her mouth gagged. She wanted to persuade Madam, even with that pitiful sound.

 

Madam, it’s you who needs to change your mind.

 

Please, don’t ask me to give birth to death.

 

Please, return the freedom that your son took from me.

 

She gazed at Madam with eyes full of countless unspoken words. Madam, who had turned away, glanced at the bed. Lisbell heard a servant, who had been cautiously observing, ask in a low voice.

 

“If we remove the towel, she might try to bite her tongue again… What should we do about meals?”

 

“Try to coax her. If she doesn’t want to starve to death, she’ll eat something.”

 

“If that’s still difficult…”

 

“Just remember one thing. The baby in her womb is more important to me than the mother.”

 

“….”

 

“What I’m saying is, as long as the baby survives, it doesn’t matter what happens to the mother.”

 

That was an insult disguised in elegant words.

 

The comment was so blatant that even the servant fell silent. While Lisbell lay bound on the bed, there was no way she could have missed those words.

 

The movement of Lisbell’s lips, which had been faintly moving as if she were barely breathing, suddenly stopped. Her purple eyes, fixed on Madam’s back, soon slid shut. When her vision darkened, her senses became more vivid. She felt as though she was plummeting endlessly.

 

She had long since been abandoned by God.

 

Now, all that remained was to see how far she would fall.

“Whoo…”

 

Victor loosened his tightly knotted tie slightly and collapsed into the chair.

 

His eyelids, squeezed shut from frowning, felt like they were being pricked by needles. It had been so long since he last slept that he could barely remember—maybe three days ago, when he caught a brief nap in the office.

 

The moment he became aware of it, his eyes felt like they were about to pop out of his head. He lifted his arm and pressed his eyelids firmly. When he finally moved his hand and opened his eyes slightly, his vision was blurry. After blinking several times, the shapes in front of him gradually came into focus.

 

“…..”

 

His hand, which had been suspended in midair, hesitated before dropping limply to the floor.

 

Victor swallowed a sigh and stared at the bed with a complicated expression. On it, a man lay asleep, as beautiful as a preserved statue.

 

It was his superior, Ulrich Altahart.

 

‘…Has it been about two months?’

 

Since the sudden gunshot that led to surgery and left Ulrich in a coma.

 

Even in the midst of the chaos where days blurred together, Victor would occasionally fall asleep, only to dream of that day.

 

No matter when he recalled it, the scene was always terrifying. The bedroom, where moonlight shone unusually blue through the clouds past midnight, and the image of a woman sitting in a pool of blood, her face and hands covered in it, with a man sprawled lifelessly behind her.

 

It was as if a fierce light exploded in his mind.

 

Finally… something terrible had happened.

 

The moment he encountered the scene before him, a grim intuition ripped through his brain. And it was just as he feared. Ulrich, lying on the shadowed bed, had a gaping wound in his abdomen, with blood gushing out so profusely that it was impossible to even examine the wound properly.

 

The vivid marks of a violent death.

 

Even though his mind had frozen solid like a stone, his body moved on its own. He screamed for someone until his throat nearly gave out. It was only when a doctor appeared before him that Victor realized he had called for the family physician.

 

While the ashen-faced doctor barked orders at his assistants and the household staff, Victor’s head turned as if searching for someone. Among the people pouring into the room, his eyes landed on a woman sitting motionless.

 

There was no will to resist from the beginning. Lisbell Osborne, the culprit behind this disaster, did not resist being subdued by force. She simply stared blankly at the side, as if she had done what needed to be done.

 

Victor felt a chill so intense it made his hair stand on end as he watched her.

 

‘Was it all… an act?’

 

He wondered if she had changed her mind.

 

He thought his advice had been taken to heart.

 

According to Ulrich, he had said he no longer wanted to suffer and wanted to find peace.

 

Days that had finally begun to settle into calmness seemed to confirm those words.

 

But it wasn’t just Ulrich who had let his guard down. In some ways, Victor had been even more complacent than Ulrich.

 

‘Was she targeting him from the beginning…?’

 

This meant that Lisbell Osborne had steeled herself to this resolution. She had deceived even him, to the point where he thought he no longer needed to keep such a close eye on her… And then she had shot Ulrich.

 

The result was the ghastly scene in the early dawn.

 

Ulrich, who was rushed into surgery, fortunately survived, but he did not regain consciousness. Though the bullet had missed any vital organs, the delay in treatment led to significant blood loss, which caused additional complications. Even the doctors couldn’t predict when he would wake up. All they could do was wait in silence for him to open his eyes.

 

Ulrich’s condition was, of course, kept a secret. Every precaution was taken to ensure that no information leaked out. As his secretary, Victor had also been living a hectic life, working non-stop to fill in the gaps left by Ulrich’s absence.

 

While everyone around him suffered and toiled, Ulrich Altahart slept soundly, his face looking almost annoyingly peaceful. Despite having been unconscious for nearly two months, his naturally superior physique showed no signs of wasting away. He simply looked like someone in a deep, long dream.

 

“Young Master.”

 

Victor called out, half hoping against hope. The silence that followed was his only reply. A foreboding feeling trailed behind the quiet, whispering that Ulrich might never wake up.

 

If that were to happen, what would become of them?

 

Would the role of head of the family, temporarily reassigned, return to his mother? For now, they could manage with a temporary replacement, but what about afterward? The issue of succession was the most pressing matter. Would Gwen’s illegitimate child, sent off to Tukenia, return?

 

“…Ah.”

 

Victor was suddenly reminded of that unsettling early morning two months ago, which he kept trying to forget. It all started with the doctor’s comment after he had leaped out of bed, startled by his mother’s slap.

 

“Miss Osborne is currently pregnant. If she experiences such shocks, it will inevitably have a negative impact on the fetus…”

 

Victor guessed that this revelation had shattered Lisbell’s resolve. The expression on her face as she learned something even she hadn’t known, alongside others, was unlike anything he’d seen. Even if the world were to end tomorrow, he doubted she could replicate that expression. It was an expression of despair so intense that Victor, in his sober state, could barely bring himself to keep watching.

 

‘The Madam… said she would take her away.’

 

After that day, Lisbell fell under the control of Ulrich’s mother. It all happened so quickly that Victor didn’t have a chance to intervene. To be fair, he was already overwhelmed, focusing all his attention on Ulrich’s condition and the business issues that arose in his absence as the head of the family.

 

When he later asked the Madam about it, she simply said that she was handling it. Handling it… He didn’t know what that meant, but given the issue of succession, it likely wasn’t something harsh or merciless. Maintaining Lisbell’s mental and physical health would be essential for the fetus’s growth.

 

‘She did ask me to call for the Madam before… She must have had something to rely on, so she’ll be fine.’

 

Even though he couldn’t help but worry, Victor knew he couldn’t deal with everything at once. He was just one man, after all. No matter how many hands he had, they would never be enough.

 

It had only been two months, but it felt like two years had passed. Each day flew by so fast that Victor barely had time to catch his breath. He was running so hard that he couldn’t take in his surroundings. Lately, the only place where Victor could finally breathe was in Ulrich’s room.

 

‘It might be better than when the Young Master was awake…’

 

With his hands clasped between his knees, Victor stared at the bed with a somber expression. He knew deep down that this was just a rationalization to put his mind at ease.

 

Lisbell was the woman who had shot Ulrich to escape from him. Would she really accept his child so easily? It didn’t seem likely.

 

But what could he do?

 

With the Madam involved, there was nothing more he, as a mere secretary, could do. With Ulrich unable to fulfill his duties as head of the family, Cora Altahart had taken control of the Altahart family once again. Her authority was justified, and there was no one to challenge her.

 

“…How long do you plan to sleep?”

 

Victor knew Ulrich better than anyone, but the anxiety that had settled in his heart wouldn’t easily dissipate. The only way to alleviate it was for Ulrich to wake up as soon as possible.

 

“Please open your eyes, Young Master.”

 

I’m getting tired too. I don’t understand why I, just a salaried employee, have to deal with all these trivial matters. What’s the point of a large paycheck? My nerves are fraying, and I feel weaker by the day. Is that money supposed to be compensation?

 

Victor buried his face in his hands and let out a small groan. He slowly opened his eyes, resigned.

 

“…Young Master?”

 

This time was no different. He didn’t realize he had spoken until after the words left his mouth. But he didn’t have time to dwell on it.

 

Victor jumped up and rushed to the bedside.

 

Just now, Ulrich’s index finger had definitely twitched.

“Young Master, can you hear me? Young Master!”

 

Victor hastily opened his mouth, focusing intently on Ulrich’s breathing. He even leaned forward, closely examining every corner of Ulrich’s face. Yet, just as if he had caught a mirage, everything remained as it was before. Even the slight movement of the fingers, which had offered a glimmer of hope, had now stilled as if nothing had happened.

 

Nevertheless, clinging to the faint hope, Victor immediately called for a doctor.

 

“Did you say his fingers moved?”

 

“Yes. It was very slight, but I’m certain.”

 

The doctor closely examined Ulrich’s condition. Standing behind him, Victor anxiously watched, rubbing his lips. Not long after, Ulrich’s fingers twitched again, showing a lively response. Both the doctor and Victor let out gasps at the same time.

 

“Is he regaining consciousness?”

 

Victor asked, hesitating as he watched the doctor thoroughly inspect Ulrich.

 

“Not fully yet, but there’s a strong possibility he’s partially regaining consciousness. In these cases, the stimulus often starts in areas where normal daily reactions occur, like the fingers or toes. Regardless, it’s a good sign. He might fully wake up in a short time.”

 

Victor’s heart pounded slowly.

 

Finally, could it be?

 

It was the first good news in two months. To Victor, who felt those two months had dragged on for what seemed like two years, the news was immensely welcome.

 

He immediately left the bedroom to find the Madam.

 

“Where is the Madam? I have urgent news about the Young Master’s condition.”

 

“She is in her bedroom. I will guide you.”

 

It wasn’t until he stepped into the guided bedroom that Victor realized it had been a long time since he had been in this space. He thought it was always a place so grand it could leave one feeling small as he moved further inside.

 

The Madam was sitting at a table on the path leading to the terrace, drinking tea. She seemed to be enjoying her tea time, but a pile of documents, daunting even to Victor’s schedule, was stacked in front of her, and her personal secretary was seated across from her. As Victor approached and bowed in greeting, the Madam gestured for the secretary to leave.

 

“Victor, what brings you here?”

 

“I know you’re busy, but I came because I wanted to deliver some news to you personally.”

 

“News?”

 

“The Young Master has shown signs of life.”

 

The Madam’s hand, which had been about to pick up the teacup, paused.

 

“…What?”

 

“His fingers moved.”

 

“Does that mean… Ulrich is waking up?”

 

“Not fully yet. However, the doctor said it’s a good sign. He could regain full consciousness soon.”

 

Victor had imagined the Madam’s face as she received this news. She was a noblewoman through and through, one who understood the importance of dignity. But even such a person had lost her composure when her son had collapsed, spewing blood. The way she had struck another in a place filled with onlookers was proof of that.

 

At that moment, she had lost her reason, even if only for an instant. It was a side of her that Victor had rarely seen, a mother’s true nature.

 

Of course, he hadn’t expected her to react as she had that day, by jumping out of her seat or dropping the teacup she was holding in an outburst of joy. He had only hoped to see some joy flicker across her face. After all, Ulrich’s sudden illness had surely disturbed more than just himself.

 

However, the Madam’s reaction was ambiguous.

 

“…Madam?”

 

Victor spoke, bewildered.

 

Her eyes returned to him as if she had just come to her senses.

 

“Oh, yes. Victor. That is wonderful news.”

 



 

“My son is finally waking up.”

 

“…Yes, Madam. Indeed.”

 

Although he was responding, an uneasy feeling gnawed at him from within. Victor couldn’t shake off the disquieting sense that something was off as he forced a smile.

 

“You’ve worked so hard all this time.”

 

“No, it was only my duty.”

 

“I can’t tell you how relieved I am that someone like you is by my son’s side.”

 

Her voice was tender.

 

But what was wrong?

 

To Victor’s ears, it sounded like an empty shell with no substance. The Madam then smiled warmly, as if hoping to erase that thought from his mind.

 

“I’ll have my secretary look into giving you a bonus.”

 

“There’s no need for that, Madam. As I said, it was merely my duty.”

 

“Don’t refuse. It’s the least I can do for you. If it makes you uncomfortable, think of it as a token of appreciation for the continued care you’ll provide. You’ve helped me with Ulrich more times than I can count.”

 

Victor swallowed hard. The Madam’s eyes softened further.

 

“I hope you’ll continue like this.”

 

“Continue… you say?”

 

“Yes. I want you to keep me updated on my son’s condition.”

 



 

“I’m eagerly waiting for the day Ulrich opens his eyes.”

 

As the acting head of the household, the Madam was too busy, much like Victor, to constantly keep a watchful eye on her son’s condition. The stack of documents before her was proof enough of that.

 

Although she had visited Ulrich’s bedroom daily for about two weeks after his surgery, her visits had gradually decreased, and now she only received reports through the servants.

 

No one found this odd since there was no guarantee that her presence would wake Ulrich, nor did it benefit the family business to waste time like that. In fact, knowing her as someone who prioritized maximizing profits, it seemed more appropriate.

 

Indeed, the emotional reunion between mother and son could wait until Ulrich fully regained consciousness.

 

“Yes, Madam. I will do as you wish.”

 

So, overall, there was nothing particularly strange…

 

‘Why does something feel so… off?’

 

What was this nagging feeling?

 

Even though a strange aura seemed to surround him, he couldn’t quite grasp it.

 

His unsettled mind wouldn’t clear, so as soon as he left the bedroom and rounded the corner of the hallway, he leaned against the wall. His shadow stretched thinly across the carpeted floor. His rational mind knew he shouldn’t waste time like this. Even now, his tasks were piling up. But for some reason, he couldn’t shake the lingering unease…

 

“…Madam?”

 

He called out to her as if in a trance, prompted by something.

 

Back then, the Madam had definitely… frowned slightly.

 

Right after hearing the news that Ulrich was waking up.

 

The expression she showed after that, the one that seemed pleased, felt like a carefully crafted facade. Before rejoicing in her son’s recovery, she had first shown a troubled look.

 

Why?

 

Wasn’t Ulrich’s recovery something the Madam had also longed for?

 

Hadn’t she only resumed her position as head of the household because of Ulrich’s unexpected illness?

 

‘…Wait, hold on…’

 

That position originally belonged to the Madam. The official change of leadership had only happened because Ulrich, exercising his shareholder rights following Gwen’s death, had unilaterally pushed it through. The Madam’s opinion had not been considered in the process.

 

What if the Madam held resentment over that?

 

What if she wasn’t ready to step down from her role yet? From her perspective, she had been betrayed by the very child she had raised so well. While others might think she had passed on the leadership at an appropriate time, it might not have felt that way to her.

 

‘If that’s true…’

 

Suddenly, Victor’s shoulders stiffened. He heard someone approaching from around the corner.

 

He cautiously peeked out. The bedroom door opened, and the Madam emerged. She headed down the hallway in the opposite direction from where Victor was standing. He thought she might be going to see her son after hearing the news, but it wasn’t in the direction of Ulrich’s bedroom.

 

What was down that way again?

 

Damn it. His jumbled thoughts made it hard to think straight.

 

As he hid behind the corner, observing her movements, he cautiously followed her.

 

There was no real need to be this concerned, yet he felt compelled to follow her as if something had possessed him. Each time he was struck with a wave of self-reproach, asking himself, ‘What am I doing?’, the suspicious expression she had made in the bedroom quickly erased it.

 

After a short while, the Madam stopped in front of a door and entered.

‘Over there…’

 

Where was that again?

 

Although Victor spent most of his days here, he didn’t know every nook and cranny of the mansion. This was because the spaces he frequently visited were limited. Unless he had business that required him to visit Ulrich’s bedroom, he usually worked in the office attached to his private secretary’s space.

 

One thing was certain: even Victor, who had been with the household for a long time, had rarely ventured into this corner.

 

“Take Miss Osborne to the private room first.”

 

Private room. Now that he thought about it, that’s what she had said.

 

Was that private room over there?

 

“…Damn it.”

 

Leaning against the wall, Victor rubbed his face with his palm.

 

He had already heard the news that the lady would manage things herself. He should have just assumed Lisbell Osborne was staying there and left, but he couldn’t shake off his lingering doubts. He didn’t know why, but unless he confirmed with his own eyes what he was expecting to see, he felt he wouldn’t be able to sleep properly tonight.

 

Above all, if Ulrich regained consciousness soon, it was clear as day that he would search for that woman. It would be better to act now to avoid more trouble later. Having made up his mind, Victor hid in the corner and kept an eye on the closed door.

 

How many minutes had passed? The door opened again, and the lady stepped out into the hallway. Her secretary, whom Victor somewhat recognized, followed behind her. Since they had been talking when they came out, their voices softly echoed through the hallway.

 

“…Arrange it quickly.”

 

“Yes, Madam. Should we proceed with the purchase under a different name this time as well?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“I will look for a secluded villa as best as possible.”

 

A villa?

 

With his ears pricked, Victor caught the word. There was definitely something going on, he thought, turning his head the other way. The door from which the lady and her secretary had emerged was once again tightly shut, as if on alert.

 

Inside there…

 

He wanted to grab the handle and enter right away, but he couldn’t act so recklessly. If there was someone inside working for the lady, it would be problematic for both sides. There was nothing to gain from raising unnecessary suspicion at this point. Since he had caught onto something suspicious, he needed to be more cautious than usual.

 

After a brief hesitation, Victor turned away. He sought out the butler again and requested a serving of refreshments. Perhaps thinking that Victor was asking due to fatigue from several nights of staying up, the butler prepared it without a word.

 

Holding the tray, Victor crossed the hallway based on his earlier memory. Having roughly memorized the surrounding layout before leaving, he was able to return without much confusion.

 

Standing in front of the door, he took a deep breath. The lady hadn’t returned in the meantime, had she? By the time this vague unease surfaced, he had already knocked. Impulsiveness—it was a sign of how tense he really was. More importantly, there was no turning back now. Watching the door slowly open, Victor braced himself.

 

“What brings you here?”

 

He had been thinking about how to handle the situation if he encountered a familiar face, but in reality, he faced a stranger. Judging by the unfamiliarity of the face, it seemed the person was just a servant. Under the scrutinizing gaze of the servant, Victor remained nonchalant.

 

“The lady sent me on an errand.”

 

“Oh, yes.”

 

Just as Victor found the servant unfamiliar, the servant also didn’t seem to recognize him immediately and relaxed their guard. Perhaps judging by his neat appearance, the servant assumed he was the lady’s new secretary.

 

When the servant reached out to take the tray, Victor dodged slightly and said,

 

“It’s quite heavy. I’ll carry it inside myself.”

 

The servant blinked and then stepped aside, allowing him to enter. Victor flashed a polite smile and crossed the threshold.

 

The deeper he went into the bedroom, the more a peculiar tension swirled within him. He felt uneasy. An indescribable urge to flee, to throw away the tray and run, crept up on him.

 

The most unsettling part was not knowing the source of this feeling. However, a sense of duty as strong as his fear kept him rooted.

 

Nothing is going to happen. As long as he could confirm that the woman was living comfortably in luxury…

 

The bed, shrouded by curtains that made it feel like night even during the day, slowly came into view, and Victor’s feet froze in place. Perhaps it wasn’t just his feet—maybe his heart had stopped too.

 

“You can set the tray down here.”

 



 

“Secretary?”

 

Victor’s eyes gradually lost focus, as if unable to comprehend the reality before him.

 

What… is that?

 

The figure on the bed was grotesque, to put it simply.

 

Her limbs were tightly bound, unable to move, and her mouth was gagged with a towel, preventing her from ever closing it. The restraints that bound her in what appeared to be a torturous manner were alarming, but even more disturbing was the woman herself, who was tied up and lying there.

 

So what… exactly is that?

 

From his memories, Lisbell Osborne had grown increasingly emaciated—from the time she was brought as a hostage to the capital with her mother, to her disgraceful expulsion from the monastery where she had hidden, and finally to when she was captured and brought back.

 

It was like watching a living person wither away, much like how a flower wilts when deprived of water and nutrients. The reason why Victor had eventually advised her to give up was because of this.

 

At that time, he had only felt a vague discomfort. But now… it was as if he had seen something he should never have seen.

 

Is she… alive?

 

Doubt flared within him like wildfire, and soon it reached a dangerous intensity. That was problematic in itself. For if she were still alive in such a state, wouldn’t that be even more cruel?

 

Her eyes were sunken, her cheeks hollowed out as if someone had carved into them. The insides of her arms were covered with unidentified marks, like tiny dots, as if she had been repeatedly pricked by fine needles.

 

Her limbs were so thin that they reminded him of starvation, with skin shrunken around her bones, leaving her skeletal. The only part of her that was full of life, if it could even be called that, was her swollen belly. The grotesquely rounded shape looked so bizarre that it seemed like a parasitic life form growing inside her, devouring her from within.

 

It was beyond discomfort—it was revolting, to the point of inducing a dizzying sense of fear.

 

Unable to overcome the goosebumps creeping up from his feet, Victor took a step back. But then he noticed the servant watching him with a curious look, and he quickly composed his expression. He placed the tray on the table she had indicated.

 

What did I just see?

 

His fingertips trembled slightly as he withdrew them from the tray.

 

So, is she alive?

 

Shouldn’t I confirm whether she’s alive first?

 

Wasn’t the lady… the one who left Lisbell Osborne in such a state?

 

No, if the lady had personally set up such a closed-off space and visited in person, it meant she was directly managing her. In other words, the reason Lisbell had ended up like this was entirely due to the lady’s actions. The very same lady who had spoken of bonuses with such a noble demeanor and smiled so serenely was the one who had orchestrated this grotesque scene.

 

“…Secretary?”

 

Victor, who was suddenly struck by a severe headache, clutched his face. He heard the servant calling out to him with a puzzled tone, but this time he couldn’t respond immediately.

 

This is wrong. No matter what, this is…

 

It was as if he had finally confronted the truth he had been trying so hard to ignore. In other words, it was a feeling akin to guilt…

 

And Lisbell’s expression only intensified that feeling.

 

From the moment he entered the room, she had not reacted, despite the presence of another person. He thought she might be asleep.

 

But she was staring at the ceiling, her eyes open. She didn’t move, and it was hard to tell if she was even breathing. It was chilling to think that she might have already stopped breathing.

 

Just as her hands and feet were bound, it seemed her senses had also been cut off, as she didn’t appear to be functioning as a normal human being.

 

The empty expression on her face was haunting. Even in this bedroom, which was unusually bright for such a cruel scene, it seemed that if a little more light were taken away, she would soon turn into a skeleton and crumble into dust.

 

She looked like a wasteland—devoid of hope, crushed, and shattered, leaving no trace of will behind. The harsh marks on her body told the story of the many hardships she had endured over the two months she had been trapped here. Even worse, she was carrying the unwanted child of a man…

 Victor wiped his mouth, enduring his disgust. He closed his eyes tightly and opened them again to regain control over his frayed mind.

 

A baby.

 

It was the very thing that the lady desired, even if it meant driving Lisbell into such a miserable state. It was the presence inside that womb that sent chills down Victor’s spine.

 

The lady was trying to claim Ulrich’s baby.

 

Why?

 

The answer came more quickly than expected. It was a suspicion he had been mulling over even before he reached this room.

 

If the lady harbored significant resentment over being pushed out as the head of the family by a unilateral decision of the family council, she might see this as her perfect opportunity to reclaim her position by using Ulrich’s baby.

 

The woman carrying that baby was the one Ulrich had shown an unprecedented attachment to. Even if it meant a loss to him, if he wanted to bring the baby under his control, a deal could be struck at any time.

 

No, there was no need to go as far as involving the baby.

 

“Yes, ma’am. Should we proceed with the purchase under a different name this time?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Understood. I will try to find the most secluded villa possible.”

 

The sudden talk of a villa… Once Victor grasped the hidden motive, it became clear. The lady intended to hide Lisbell, who had not yet reached her due date, in its entirety. Just like the last time, when she sent Ulrich away to a distant country under the pretext of a foreign business trip and discreetly abducted her.

 

“Is it you?”

 

He still remembered Ulrich’s reaction to him during that incident. The sudden push against the wall with a thud, the pain in the back of his head, and the suffocating grip on his collar that left him unable to feel anything else.

 

Ulrich’s true face, stripped of the facade of sociability and manners, was that intense. His usually gentle demeanor became so ferocious that even Victor felt his whole body bristle. The mere thought that it might happen again genuinely terrified him.

 

“Secretary, are you alright?”

 

“…Yes, I just got a bit dizzy.”

 

Victor ran a hand down his arm, trying to shake off the goosebumps that wouldn’t go away. He quickly organized the scattered thoughts that had been settling deep in his mind.

 

He took a deep breath and looked at the servant.

 

“I’ll be leaving now. But I have one request.”

 

“A request?”

 

“Please don’t inform the lady that I was here today.”

 

“…What?”

 

Seeing the servant’s puzzled expression, Victor calmly added as if to hammer the point home.

 

“This is an order from the master.”

 

The servant, initially muttering “the master…” as if in a daze, paled as she realized what this meant. Whether it was out of habit or not, she hesitated, then quickly bowed deeply.

 

“Yes, yes. I will do as you say.”

 

After ensuring the servant’s compliance with a stern gaze, Victor hurried out of the bedroom. The light streaming through the hallway’s skylights crossed his face. Despite the shimmering colors, Victor’s expression was exceedingly grim.

 

It felt as if he had been sentenced, making it impossible to remain in this ambiguous state any longer.

 

Throughout his time as Ulrich’s secretary, Victor had never failed to report the lady’s actions concerning Ulrich’s movements. But he had never hidden this from Ulrich either. His superior was certainly aware of it.

 

Though it seemed like he was merely playing both sides, Ulrich had never issued any warnings regarding this. He probably saw it as a necessary management of family affairs and accepted it without much concern.

 

Victor felt the same. He never thought his actions would harm Ulrich. The lady’s interference was probably just her way of ensuring her son wasn’t doing anything that could harm the Altahart family, and if any issues arose, she would step in before it was too late. In other words, helping the lady was also a way to help Ulrich.

 

But this double game could no longer continue.

 

When Ulrich woke up, the conflict between mother and son, bound by the same blood, would be inevitable. As long as Lisbell Osborne and her unborn child were involved, there was no way to avoid it.

 

This time, the mother and son were bound to clash.

 

If that happened, Victor would also need to choose a side. Whether it was this side or that side.

 

The two strings he had been balancing on were now unraveling in different directions, and to survive, he would have to climb onto one of them properly. Failing to do so would leave him in a precarious position, swept away in the middle.

 

“…Haa.”

 

Thinking of Lisbell, Victor rubbed his face with both hands. It felt like being trapped in a sticky nightmare that he couldn’t shake off, no matter how hard he tried.

 

He hadn’t intervened, even knowing that the lady had taken Lisbell into her grasp… because he thought, at least, it would be better for her than being with Ulrich.

 

After all, she hated him so much that she even fired a gun at him. He thought that being with the lady, whom she once trusted and relied on, would be better than staying with someone she despised.

 

Given his own reasoning, he also assumed that the lady wouldn’t treat her too harshly, considering she was carrying the family heir.

 

But if it meant this…

 

‘If she’s to live worse than livestock…’

 

Wouldn’t it be better for her to stay with Ulrich?

 

She had never lost so much vitality in her face, not even when she was with Ulrich. Just watching her made Victor feel as if he wanted to end his own life. The harsh treatment she was enduring was beyond words.

 

If this continued, she might give birth to the child in her womb, but Lisbell herself…

 

Following the lady’s orders would mean becoming a willing accomplice in her moral murder. Victor had no courage to endure such an intolerable level of discomfort.

 

“Call the doctor, right now.”

 

Victor instructed the servant as he headed towards Ulrich’s bedroom. While waiting after arriving first, the doctor appeared shortly after.

 

Watching the doctor approach the bed, Victor swallowed dryly. The issue of the heir was crucial for Ulrich as well, so if he regained consciousness, things could be resolved somehow. No matter what method was used, it would certainly be better than the sinful deeds the lady was currently committing.

 

There were two things Victor had to do now.

 

First, he must ensure that the lady’s side doesn’t discover that he has learned about Lisbell’s condition in that bedroom.

 

Second…

 

“Doctor, earlier you mentioned that the young master would regain consciousness within a short period.”

 

“Yes, that’s correct.”

 

“How many days do you estimate that to be? A rough timeline is fine.”

 

“Well… If we look at statistics, once an unconscious patient shows any signs of life, there’s a high chance they will fully wake up within a week.”

 

“A week…”

 

The problem wasn’t just waking up. He had been unconscious due to a gunshot wound. After regaining consciousness, he would need time to see if he could move properly, make decisions, and recover to a normal state.

 

“Doctor, do you want the young master to wake up?”

 

“What? Yes, of course. Why would you ask such an obvious question…”

 

Victor, arms crossed, watched the doctor before glancing at the bed behind him. After repeating the dry hand wipe he’d done countless times that day, he lifted his head with resolute determination.

 

“Then please follow the request I’m about to make without question.”

 

The second task was to conceal Ulrich’s recovery progress.

 

“If you do that, I promise to help you secure your position for life.”

 

Victor and the doctor talked for quite some time after that. The conversation, though quiet, ended with the doctor slowly nodding. He seemed to accept the situation more easily than expected, as he had no doubt that Ulrich, the current head of the family, would soon wake up.

 

After sending the doctor away, Victor, now alone, let out a sigh and turned to look at the bed. Ulrich’s face was as peaceful as it had been in the morning. The image of a horribly battered face kept overlaying on top of his, causing Victor to frown as he sat down on the chair beside the bed.

 

“Young master, this is no time to be sleeping peacefully…”

 

Words piled up on the tip of his tongue, wanting to question whether Ulrich realized how many lives were hanging by a thread because of him. As if to echo Victor’s frustration, Ulrich’s fingers on the blanket twitched ever so slightly.

“… then….”

 

“… so, let’s do it this way.”

 

“Understood… then, let’s proceed that way….”

 

Voices settled over her eardrums like dust.

 

Lisbell slowly lifted her eyelids.

 

The ceiling that she had grown so familiar with greeted her, so much so that she could probably draw it without even looking. The delicate engravings on it undulated like waves. Despite being aware that she was awake, her consciousness felt sluggish.

 

How many days… has it been…?

 

It felt like a day, or maybe a month, or even just an hour. Since losing the ability to move her body at will, her sense of time had unraveled, with days passing unpredictably.

 

Every time she woke up from a forcibly induced sleep, her memories were fragmented. Whenever she tried to recall the moments before falling asleep, a severe headache would squeeze her mind. It felt like dozens of needles were piercing her head simultaneously. At the same time, her stomach churned as if she had swallowed a tumultuous sea.

 

As she took a small breath through her mouth, which was held open by a cloth, she felt the inside of her throat dry and rough. Nausea had become a daily occurrence, and vomiting was naturally accompanied. Her throat had long been raw from expelling nothing but digestive fluids, as there was nothing substantial in her stomach.

 

Ah, so…

 

How many days…

 

What day is it today…

 

Her struggling thoughts were abruptly cut off. This had been happening for a while. It didn’t feel like her mind was working properly. Not just inefficiently, but as if it was malfunctioning, creaking before coming to a complete stop.

 

It was strange. Thinking is supposed to be as natural as breathing, a basic cognitive function of a person, yet she couldn’t do it consciously. It felt as if an invisible hand had ripped open her skull and was scratching her brain into a mess.

 

How many days…

 

Has it been…?

 

As her thoughts repeatedly circled around this, Lisbell’s eyes, bloodshot and clouded with dust, rolled.

 

It wasn’t an intentional action, but her mind suddenly froze. The sight of her own bulging belly startled her.

 

Ugh…

 

A faint sound escaped from her mouth, which was held shut by the cloth.

 

She sensed the two people who had been conversing by her side, as if she were a corpse, turning to look at her. But they quickly lost interest, perhaps considering her reaction just another futile resistance, and resumed their conversation.

 

Lisbell didn’t look at them either. She simply stared in shock at her belly, which seemed to have grown even larger.

 

Why is my belly like this?

 

Why is it so swollen?

 

It wasn’t like this before. It was flat.

 

What’s inside? What could be in there to make me like this…?

 

Her broken thoughts surfaced in terror and anxiety, only to fade away. A faint gunshot sound brushed past her ears. It was a distant echo, as if it came from beyond the closed window.

 

Where is that sound coming from…?

 

Her gaze wandered aimlessly. If she followed it, would she find the man? If so, she wanted to ask him immediately. Did you know that something like this is inside me? It was a ridiculous question. Of course, he knew. He knew everything and had even used it to concoct his sinister plans.

 

But where is Ulrich Altahart now?

 

Is he dead?

 

Did I kill him…?

 

I can’t remember… Then where am I? Why am I here? How many days have passed? Why is my belly like this? What’s inside that’s making it twitch? Is it okay for it to keep swelling like this? What if it bursts? Will I… die? Will I die too? But did Ulrich die? I can’t remember well…

 

Someone kept crushing her mind without permission. Her thoughts and concepts couldn’t stand firm, crumbling like sugar. Soon, even that stopped. As if the blood coursing through her veins had ceased, all her bodily functions came to a halt, and she experienced a strange paralysis.

 

Twitch.

 

Only one place moved.

 

Her stunned eyes fell once again. Twitch. The center of her swollen belly, so engorged that veins were protruding, bulged out.

 

“Huh…”

 

A gasp of shock escaped Lisbell’s mouth. Whatever was lurking inside seemed ready to tear through the thin skin and burst out at any moment. It was definitely thrashing about, damaging her organs beyond repair.

 

“Hah, huh… Hah.”

 

She had no idea what was happening. Her belly kept swelling. What had already been larger than her head was now growing like a cunning parasite that had taken over her body. Her already emaciated limbs grew weaker as if deprived of even minimal nourishment.

 

When she regained her senses, her vision was wildly spinning. No one was shaking her. Lisbell herself was thrashing about so violently that her whole body convulsed. Ahhhh, ah. The scream that couldn’t escape stretched out in her throat.

 

“…Get the doctor…!”

 

“A sedative! Hurry!”

 

The footsteps that had been at a distance suddenly rushed toward her. Her arms, weakened and reddened from rubbing against the restraints, were grabbed first, followed by her wildly flailing legs, which were pinned down onto the bed.

 

In the strange, unfamiliar scenery where even familiar things felt alien, something sharp glinted. The pointed end, which looked like a needle, soon found a vein in her arm and sank deep into it. Lisbell’s quivering eyes locked onto it before they slowly unfocused.

 

Come to think of it, yes.

 

Even right before fainting, there was a syringe like that….

 

Before she could fully finish the thought, Lisbell’s head slumped onto the pillow. She had been so terrified that tears, which she hadn’t even realized she had shed, pooled in her sunken eyes like little ponds. As she closed her eyes, the liquid traced a path down her hollowed cheeks.

 

Madame Altahart, who had been watching the commotion from a step away, clicked her tongue softly.

 

“It seems we’ve been using too many sedatives lately… Is the fetus in the womb going to be alright? I’m concerned that there might be other complications.”

 

“Of course, it’s best to avoid administering any drugs to a pregnant woman, Madame. However, given Miss Osborne’s condition, I believe leaving her as she is would be much more dangerous….”

 

The doctor, who was drenched in sweat, barely managed to calm Lisbell down. Although Madame’s expression was not pleased, she eventually nodded, perhaps realizing that there was no other way to resolve this situation than through the use of sedatives.

 

“How is Ulrich? I heard from Victor that he might wake up soon.”

 

“His condition is much the same. Although his vital signs are stable, he’s still not fully conscious….”

 

Victor had given the same answer when he visited her last night. The Madame stood silently for a moment before rising from her seat.

 

“I should see for myself.”

 

There were many things to tend to, keeping her busy, and since Victor, her loyal servant who had never disappointed her, had been by Ulrich’s side, she hadn’t been overly worried. But now it seemed time to check on him herself. She intended to confirm Ulrich’s condition with her own eyes.

 

She had been anxious about when her son, who had been in a coma from a gunshot wound, would wake up, but it wasn’t just parental affection that stirred within her.

 

Hatred existed alongside love.

 

How could he quietly convene a family council and commit such an audacious act behind her back? The shock she felt when she unexpectedly received a notice from her secretary about the council meeting while she was enjoying a rare, leisurely afternoon still weighed heavily on her heart. It was absurd to think that all of this was caused by her son’s obsession with a mere commoner woman.

 

Ulrich had always been the type who couldn’t rest until he repaid tenfold for anything done to him. He retaliated against her for abducting Lisbell Osborne to secure his engagement with the Schwaben family by dishonoring her and stripping her of her position as head of the family. It was, in essence, revenge.

 

Madame thought the situation, especially her unconsented demotion, was incredibly odd.

 

Because none of it made sense.

 

She couldn’t understand how Ulrich, after deposing her and assuming the position of head of the family, would be so intent on marrying a commoner woman, nor could she grasp why he would go so far as to humiliate his own mother just to possess that woman legally.

 

What is strange must be corrected.

 

The news of Lisbell’s pregnancy, revealed at such an opportune time, served as both a good means and a justification. Since it was clear who was responsible for Ulrich’s unreasonable rebellion, he would not be able to maintain any superiority in this conflict. As long as Lisbell Osborne and the child she carried were in her hands, Ulrich would have no chance.

“I will take care of it.”

 

The doctor, who was packing a bag filled with medical equipment, spoke.

 

The lady followed him toward Ulrich’s bedroom. The doctor, leading the way, knocked on the bedroom door three times.

 

“Madam?”

 

Victor, who was sitting at the desk working on documents, jumped up in surprise at the unexpected visit. The lady walked gracefully toward him and gestured for him to relax.

 

“No need to worry, Victor. I’m just here to check on Ulrich. I’ve been too busy to visit for too long.”

 

Unlike the bedroom earlier, which had been intermittently noisy due to Lisbell’s seizures, this room was as peaceful as a flowing stream. It was so quiet that it felt like stepping into an entirely separate space.

 

Ulrich lay beautifully in that warm and cozy atmosphere, unchanged since the last time the lady had visited.

 

“Still no news?”

 

“No, madam…”

 

“And any signs?”

 

“The doctor expects something soon.”

 

The lady, sitting on the edge of the bed, looked at her son’s face, which remained pure and unblemished despite his two months of illness.

 

She slowly reached out, brushing her fingers over his prominent eyes and gently caressing his cheeks. Despite her tender touch, his beautifully sculpted features showed no reaction.

 

This is all for you, Ulrich.

 

I would never do anything to harm the family. The results I achieve will ultimately benefit you. I have no doubt about that.

 

Before my utterly blind son wakes up completely and ruins everything again for that insignificant woman, I must push ahead with my plans without delay. The lady whispered to herself as she withdrew her hand from the face she had delicately crafted like a masterpiece.

 

“You need to get up soon.”

 

“He will, soon.”

 

“Victor, I owe you a debt I can never repay.”

 

“There’s no need to say that, madam.”

 

The lady smiled kindly at Victor, who only ever said things that pleased her, and said she would be leaving. Victor bowed deeply to her as she walked away.

 

The lady, who had finished her business and seemed ready to leave through the door Victor had opened, stopped suddenly. In the next moment, she turned her head and looked back at the bed.

 

“…Madam?”

 

Victor cautiously called out, noticing her action. The lady let out a short gasp, as if she had been unconscious of her movement until she heard his voice. Smiling to reassure him, she then left the bedroom.

 

Click.

 

The door closed, and silence fell heavily. The lady had left, but Victor still had no intention of sitting down. Watching the stillness beyond the door, Victor’s head slowly turned.

 

At that moment, there was a response from the previously quiet bed.

 

“Hmm… I don’t remember anything because I’ve been asleep all this time…”

 

A man sat up, pushing off the covers, and slowly tilted his head from side to side. His muscles made cracking sounds as they stretched, stiff from lying down for so long. Despite the intimidating nature of the action, his platinum hair shimmering in the sunlight and his even more dazzling features softened any menacing impression.

 

“Seeing my mother react like that, I must have really been on the brink of death.”

 

“You endured well.”

 

“I almost laughed because it tickled.”

 

As if to display the smile he had held back while his mother touched his face, Ulrich pulled his lips into a grin, then slowly lowered the hand massaging his neck.

 

“So…”

 

The smile on the handsome man’s face began to fade.

 

“Tell me again. What did you say about Lisbell’s condition?”

 



 

“Administer a moderate dose of the sedative today.”

 

“Madam, by ‘moderate’ you mean…?”

 

The sound of a quiet conversation at her bedside reached Lisbell’s consciousness like a drop of water.

 

Though faintly aware, she had no strength to open her eyes, and given that she knew any effort would likely only reveal an unpleasant situation, she chose not to bother.

 

“As long as she doesn’t wake up during the transfer to the villa, it’ll be fine. She’s asleep now anyway.”

 

“Then should I administer half the usual dose?”

 

“Less than that… A third should suffice.”

 

Perhaps believing she had not yet woken, the conversation continued without disruption. One of the two presences that had been lingering like invisible stains above her closed eyelids vanished. The other remained, moving around as if preparing something.

 

At that point, Lisbell slowly opened her eyes, though only slightly, so that to someone looking down from above, it would still seem as though her eyes were closed.

 

Something caught her eye in the narrow field of vision. It was the syringe being handled by the servant.

 

Again…

 

Why, again…

 

“You just need to ensure she doesn’t wake during the transfer to the villa.”

 

The lady’s request echoed sluggishly in her mind. Transfer to the villa. After a slow process of piecing together the words, Lisbell finally understood what it meant.

 

Transfer… Where? Me?

 

The villa?

 

Where is that? Isn’t this the villa? Marnia Villa? Or is it the capital? The bright light makes it feel like the small room in the monastery… No, no…. Where is the villa…? I don’t know. I don’t know, but I don’t want to go.

 

Instinctively, she clenched her palms. Though she knew her hands were bound by ropes that made it nearly impossible to move, she had no choice but to try something. So, when she felt the slack in the ropes loosen just enough to pull out her wrists, she flinched instead.

 

The servant’s gaze pierced her face. He seemed to be checking whether she had awoken due to the sudden movement. When she remained still, he concluded that she had merely shifted in her sleep and resumed his task.

 

Lisbell’s thumb, hidden inside the pillow, twitched. Her eyelids, which had only been open as wide as her fingernail, opened halfway. She stared at the servant’s hands handling the syringe with eyes darker than those of a corpse.

 

Meanwhile, the lady, as always maintaining a certain distance, watched the situation unfold from afar.

 

From where she sat, she couldn’t clearly see Lisbell on the bed, as her view was obstructed by the servant’s back. Well, even if she woke up late, there was a sedative prepared, and her hands and feet were tied, so there wouldn’t be any major issues.

 

After returning from Ulrich’s bedroom, Lady Altahart hurried to push forward with the plan to move Lisbell to a new villa. She was in a rush to carry it out before Ulrich regained consciousness.

 

All that remained was to ensure that Lisbell didn’t have any seizures during the transfer to the villa by putting her to sleep peacefully. Then, she only needed to endure until Lisbell gave birth.

 

Everything was falling into place. As the lady observed this smooth process, she felt that the dissonance she had sensed earlier, like a cog turning backward, was being resolved one by one. It was the return to the original state she had longed for. The lady quietly smiled to herself.

 

“Madam…!”

 

The door suddenly burst open without a knock.

 

It was the secretary in charge of handling the villa arrangements. Usually calm, he hurried over and whispered in the lady’s ear.

 

“It seems it will be difficult to move Miss Osborne today. An unexpected issue has arisen in the villa acquisition process….”

 

“An issue?”

 

“Yes, and the area leading to the villa will be temporarily restricted today due to a military matter.”

 

“Restricted…?”

 

“If that area is blocked, we’ll have to take a detour, which will delay the journey. I’m not sure Miss Osborne’s condition can withstand that….”

 

It was as if someone had orchestrated these simultaneous disruptions. Everything had been going so smoothly just moments ago. The calm expression on the lady’s face subtly darkened. It was hard to ignore the significant sense of unease. She tapped the armrest of the chair and asked,

 

“Did you confirm which department is handling the restriction?”

 

“Yes, it’s the Miller unit.”

 

“Who’s the commanding officer?”

 

“Colonel Craxon.”

 

The lady sighed softly. Colonel Craxon was one of the connections Ulrich had carefully cultivated. That he had stepped in at such an unforeseen moment led the lady closer to a conclusion she had feared. However, even if that were the case, there was an undeniable mystery.

 

“Then why did Victor….”

 

The lady, murmuring quietly, closed her eyes briefly and then opened them.

 

So, he betrayed me.

 

Victor has betrayed me and sided with Ulrich…

 

“Kyahhh!”

 

A sharp scream suddenly echoed from far away.

 The Madam and the secretary hurriedly turned to look at the bed. At the same time, the syringe embedded in the servant’s hand was abruptly yanked upward. Blood began to stream out of the small puncture wound. The servant, who had fallen backward onto her buttocks, groaned and clutched her hand in pain.

 

And Lisbell, holding the syringe, pointed its blood-soaked needle towards her own neck.

 

The Madam quickly grasped the situation. It seemed that the rope binding Lisbell’s arms had either come loose or she had somehow untied it. Then, she had snatched the syringe aimed at her and stabbed it into the servant’s hand.

 

While she understood the sequence of events, the realization only made her head throb more. It was already overwhelming to deal with external obstacles, but now problems were arising even in this bedroom. And at such a critical moment.

 

“Miss Osborne.”

 

Lisbell, who had staggered back until she was leaning against the wall, fumbled with the towel in her mouth with the hand not holding the syringe. She tugged at the tightly knotted fabric with her fingers, and it slowly unraveled.

 

“Don’t…”

 

Lisbell managed to gasp out a breath, almost like a scream.

 

“Don’t… come closer…”

 

Her voice, weak from the dryness of her throat, sounded like pieces of metal scraping together.

 

The Madam, who had been approaching the bed, paused at the sound.

 

Lisbell kept her eyes fixed on her while moving her hands. One hand was still poised to pierce her neck with the syringe at any moment, while the other hand worked to untie the rope binding her ankles. It was difficult, as her fingers lacked strength and her entire hand was trembling due to malnutrition.

 

“If you come closer, I’ll…”

 

Cough!

 

She couldn’t finish her sentence. Her throat, dry and cracked from dehydration, felt like it was tearing apart with each breath. As her head shook from coughing, the syringe dangerously pricked her neck. A fresh drop of blood formed at the tip and trickled down.

 

“Okay. I won’t come any closer. Just calm down, Miss Osborne. Calm down and put down that dangerous thing.”

 

Exhausted from a few coughs, Lisbell looked at the Madam with a pale face, as if she might faint at any moment. As the standoff dragged on, the secretary behind her flinched. Lisbell’s blurred vision darted beyond her shoulder, and she quickly drew the syringe closer to her neck. The Madam clicked her tongue softly and turned to the others.

 

“Everyone, stay back.”

 

“But, Madam…”

 

“Do not provoke Miss Osborne any further.”

 

Judging by how she was lashing out like this, she might actually stab a vital spot in a fit of rage. If that happened, everything they had worked to achieve would be in vain. Her hopes, and the order that was finally starting to take shape, would all slip through her fingers like sand.

 

That had to be prevented. She couldn’t let Lisbell Osborne die just yet. Even if it meant a meaningless death, it had to be after every last bit of use had been wrung out of her.

 

“Talk to me, Miss Osborne. Didn’t you say you wanted to speak with me before?”

 

Having finally untied the rope around her ankles, Lisbell pressed herself even harder against the wall, as if the idea of being crushed to death by the wall was more comforting than getting closer to them.

 

Lisbell wrapped her bruised ankles inward and rubbed her eyes with one hand. Her vision kept doubling and tripling before merging into one again. Her head throbbed as if someone was hitting it with a blunt object. Even in the midst of all this, the awareness of the round belly she was trying not to look at was driving her insane.

 

“Madam, I…”

 

She was overcome with sorrow at the realization that there was no one on her side in this place. Lisbell had always been alone in this mansion.

 

Betrayed by Altahart, and while opposing Altahart, no one had ever taken her side. Even though it was only natural, she couldn’t shake the loneliness that made her feel like the entire world was against her.

 

Even now, she felt the same. If she let her guard down for even a moment, she feared her hands and feet would be bound again, and she’d be thrown back onto the bed. Then she would be helplessly robbed of her blood and flesh by the grotesque life curled up inside her.

 

Despite her inner cries to be rid of it, the wretched thing stubbornly clung to her. It had to be that man’s seed. Its very existence and breath were so loathsome and repulsive that she wished it would rot away inside her, such a monstrous thing.

 

If she was taken by the Madam now, that monster would come into the world. That must not happen. To prevent that, she had to end it here somehow.

 

But in her current weakened state, defeating him seemed impossible with the Madam’s people constantly watching for an opportunity behind her. The figures looming in her hazy vision seemed ready to pounce on her at any moment.

 

So that was why.

 

“Leave, all of you…”

 

Everyone except the Madam had to leave.

 

The Madam, who understood the short, barely coherent command, turned back to the others.

 

“Everyone, leave.”

 

“Madam…!”

 

The secretary, who had been anxiously pacing behind her, approached and whispered urgently.

 

“It’s too dangerous.”

 

“You need to go handle the villa issue immediately. The problem isn’t just here, after all.”

 

“But…”

 

“And look at Miss Osborne’s condition.”

 

Following the Madam’s instructions, the secretary glanced at the bed. It became clear what the Madam was implying.

 

She had spoken of the danger, but her own claim now seemed absurd, as the figure on the bed appeared extremely fragile. If she had to rely on threatening herself with a syringe, it meant she didn’t even have the strength to attack anyone else. She had been reduced to such a weakened state.

 

“Leave two people outside the door. If something happens, I’ll scream, and they can come in immediately.”

 

“…Yes, Madam.”

 

Reluctantly, the secretary withdrew, acknowledging that while this situation was critical, the villa issue couldn’t be ignored either. Even if they managed to take Lisbell out of here, the process could become complicated if the villa situation wasn’t resolved.

 

The secretary left the bedroom with the servants, closing the door behind them.

 

In the silence that fell over the room with only the two of them remaining, the Madam took a step closer to Lisbell.

 

“Miss Osborne, put that down.”

 



 

“It seems you have misunderstood something about me. I am not trying to put you in danger.”

 

Lisbell blinked slowly. What nonsense is she talking about? If that were the case, why had she been subjected to such repeated torment for what felt like an eternity?

 

“In fact, I’m going out of my way to save you. Do you really not see that?”

 

I don’t know. I don’t know… I don’t know.

 

Lisbell shook her head frantically, confused. As she did, the syringe scraped against her neck, leaving shallow scratches on her delicate skin. Blood quickly began to spread across her neck. The Madam, frowning at the sight, hurriedly spoke.

 

“Ulrich has woken up.”

 

Lisbell’s movements froze at the words.

 

Her eyes, which had been glaring at the approaching woman, became hollow.

 

“What…?”

 

“I said Ulrich has woken up.”

 



 

“My son, the one you shot and left for dead.”

 

“No…”

 



 

“No… No…”

 

He was already dead, so how could he still be alive? I killed him. I, personally, ended his life.

 

“That man, he’s already dead…”

 

“He’s alive.”

 

“I…”

 

“Ulrich is alive, Miss Osborne.”

 



 

“And now that he’s awake, he will surely come looking for you.”

 

Lisbell’s fingers tightened around the syringe. She trembled quietly, and the Madam, noticing this, narrowed her eyes.

 

“Do you think someone as stubborn as he is will leave alone the person who tried to kill him?”

 



 

“If you stay with my son, you will be in even greater danger than you are now.”

 

“Lisbell, this is what happens when someone as naive as you thinks too much.”

 

“So come with me.”

 

“You only make things worse.”

 

“I can protect you.”

 

“In times like this, not thinking at all can be a solution.”

 

Hah.

 

Lisbell felt like she was going mad from the whispers of the two demons echoing in her mind. One was urging her to choose, while the other was urging her to give up. She felt as if she were being crushed to dust between two immovable cliffs.

 

That wretched Altahart.

 

He had already worn her down to a smooth pebble, but it wasn’t enough for him—he wanted to grind her into sand.


Lisbell curled up even tighter.

 

In an instant, the tension that had been holding her mind together snapped. She was too exhausted to continue thinking. The hand that had been gripping the syringe slowly dropped. The woman who had been standing at a distance began to approach the bed.

 

“You didn’t want to be by my son’s side, did you?”

 

Step by step, closer.

 

“You were waiting for Ulrich to lose interest.”

 

Closer still…

 

“You told me that, didn’t you, Miss Osborne?”

 

Smack—the woman struck Lisbell’s hand. The syringe she had been holding flew out of her grasp and shattered on the floor.

 

“Now, Miss Osborne. You’re coming with me.”

 

Lisbell stared at the outstretched hand before her. Just days ago, this woman’s hand had seemed so hateful, but now her mind was blank. As she gave up on thinking, everything began to feel peaceful.

 

Perhaps, just as the man had said, it might actually be true. Maybe she had been overwhelming herself with too many thoughts, bringing unnecessary suffering upon herself.

 

As she refused to think, her thoughts became extreme and simplistic. Ulrich, whom she had nearly killed, had miraculously survived. He had awoken from his near-death state, and although he might inflict even greater pain upon her as revenge, the woman was offering to protect her from that—so she should follow her immediately.

 

As if hypnotized, Lisbell grasped the woman’s hand. The woman helped her down from the bed. Even just placing one foot on the floor felt as heavy as if the ground was splitting beneath her.

 

‘Ah…?’

 

It wasn’t due to her severely weakened state, nor was it the realization of whose hand she was holding.

 

It was the oppressive weight inside her stomach, crushing her as if it would drag her into the ground…

 

“You can atone by giving birth to the baby inside you.”

 

“Miss Osborne, think of it this way. We are willing to overlook your heinous crime in exchange for the birth of the baby inside you.”

 

Ah…

 

“Remember one thing. The fetus inside you is more important to me than the mother.”

 

So this hand…

 

“It means I don’t care what happens to the mother as long as the fetus survives.”

 

…was one that would allow this relentless creature to consume her.

 

It was foolish to have shown even a moment of trust. After all, the woman was still an Altahart. Cruel, selfish, power-hungry people. Corrupt, toxic, and unhealthy beings.

 

She was sick of it all.

 

Lisbell shook off the woman’s hand that was gripping her. But the hand came back like a claw, stronger than before, with a force that was uncharacteristic of a noble lady. It was clear that she intended to drag her out of there at all costs. Lisbell, feeling overwhelmed by the blatant malice of the misfortune that clung to her like a shadow, mustered all her remaining strength to push the woman away.

 

Thud!

 

With a heavy thump, the woman fell back, hitting her head hard on the edge of a table, collapsing immediately.

 

“…Ma’am…”

 

With a gasp, Lisbell, who was already disoriented from her labored breathing, sank to the floor. The woman, who had slipped under the table, lay there motionless.

 

“Ma’am…?”

 

A deeply unsettling smell suddenly filled the air. It was as if the scent that had been clinging to her neck was being overpoweringly layered over by something else. The source was the blood that began to pool around the woman’s head.

 

Memories of the past superimposed themselves. A man who had fallen after being hit by a vase… or was it a woman? No, a man? Who was it? Who…? Overwhelmed by the sharp pain of a sudden migraine, Lisbell clutched the side of her head, groaning.

 

She stared straight ahead, her eyes wide in disbelief.

 

“Ma’am…”

 

Lisbell began crawling toward the table.

 

“Get… get up…”

 

Her skirt, which clung to her knees, became stained red. Lisbell recoiled in terror, her eyes wide with fear.

 

“Why aren’t… aren’t you getting up, gasp, why aren’t you…?”

 

The overpowering smell of blood stabbed at her insides. Thud, thud, thud. Her heart, which had been racing for days, responded as if it was finally about to burst. Gasp, gasp. Her breathing became increasingly labored. It felt as if someone was gripping her lungs and squeezing them from the very depths.

 

“Get up, get up…! Get up! Get up, gasp…!”

 

Cough, choke. A fit of coughing erupted from her. She suddenly felt nauseous. Turning her head, Lisbell vomited bile and then desperately crawled, her eyes rolling in panic as she clung to the floor. The hand she used to scrape the carpet was already soaked with blood.

 

It wasn’t just her hand, though.

 

Here, there… everywhere.

 

She stared down in despair at her hands, which were so red they hid her natural skin color. Her head tilted back, her eyes rolling up toward the ceiling, where no blue sky was visible.

 

Dead…?

 

Did I kill someone… again…?

 

Why does this keep happening? All I wanted was freedom. Not something I didn’t have, but something that was originally mine. Something that belonged to me, not something stolen by force. How could the process of reclaiming it be so difficult and cruel?

 

How far do I have to fall?

 

How deep must I sink before this ends?

 

Knock, knock.

 

A knock came at the door, an unwelcome intrusion.

 

“Gasp…”

 

Lisbell’s dry, cracked lips parted. She hesitated as she glanced toward the door.

 

Knock, knock.

 

The knock came again, as if asking if something was wrong inside.

 

In that instant, memories struck her like lightning. She had shot someone before, and it had been discovered. She had been forcibly confined in a small room after her unwanted pregnancy was exposed, and no matter how much she pleaded, she had never been allowed to leave.

 

This time would be no different. Someone would capture her alive, interrogate her about the woman, and lock her up until she had performed the penance they deemed necessary, all while tormenting her mercilessly.

 

As soon as the realization struck, Lisbell scrambled to crawl away. Her bony knees knocked loudly against the floor as she moved. Her panicked gaze darted around the room.

 

Soon, she spotted a side table against the wall.

 

She wriggled her way under the table, as if wanting to erase her existence from this world, curling up as tightly as possible. Her stomach tightened with pain, but she didn’t care. She hadn’t wanted this child in the first place. If the pressure could make it go away, she would welcome it.

 

Creak.

 

The knocking ceased after only two knocks.

 

The door opened with a faint creak. From beneath the tablecloth, the world looked small and confined, as if more than half of it had been cut away. Lisbell pressed her back against the wall, trying to disappear into the shadows so that no one could reach her, no matter how close they got.

 

She heard footsteps approaching. Lisbell’s blurred vision refused to focus on one spot, her eyes rolling around in a daze. Her hands, clasped around her knees, trembled violently. The pain in her stomach was barely noticeable amidst the intense, spreading tension in her body.

 

The sound of the footsteps continued, flowing like water, then paused for a moment, and then resumed.

 

Lisbell knew exactly where the footsteps had stopped. It was near the woman, who had fallen to the floor, bleeding profusely. The smell of blood became so overpowering that it made her nose sting.

 

Soon, the footsteps grew louder. Lisbell squeezed her eyes shut, then slowly opened them again. She saw the tip of a shoe sticking out from under the tablecloth. The glossy black surface shone like a bright moonlit night.

 

As she became fixated on the sight, the tablecloth was abruptly lifted.

 

Blinding light burst in, almost violently intense. Lisbell instinctively buried her head in her knees, then slowly raised her face.

 

The man who had lifted the cloth bent down to look under the table.

 

Whether it was because of a sudden gust of wind or the man’s hurried movement, his brilliant platinum blonde hair fluttered before her eyes.

 

“Boo.”

 



 

“What are you doing there?”

Lisbell stood dazed, as if she had just encountered someone she never thought she’d see again.

 

But only for a moment. As she gradually regained her senses, she noticed Ulrich’s immaculate appearance, so different from hers. No matter how chaotic her situation was, just like the sky and earth could never switch places, the stark contrast between her disheveled figure, smeared with bloodstains, and Ulrich’s clean-cut suit became apparent.

 

It was more accurate to call it a sense of danger.

 

“I-I didn’t do it…”

 

If he was the one she sensed approaching, he would have already seen the fallen woman on his way here. If so, then the reason he came looking for her, the reason he lifted the tablecloth and peered underneath…

 

“It wasn’t me… I didn’t do it!”

 



 

“Sh-she, the madam, she tried to take me, without my consent, I didn’t want to go, and so… I didn’t… I swear I didn’t!”

 

Her words tumbled out in disarray. Lisbell clutched her head, shaking it violently. She couldn’t make sense of anything, but instinctively, she continued to defend herself. It wasn’t my fault. It wasn’t my fault. It wasn’t my fault…

 

“Lisbell.”

 

For a moment, her breath caught in her throat. It was when Ulrich softly called her name.

 

“Come here.”

 

Lisbell, who had been spewing words in a fevered frenzy like a sickness she couldn’t control, bit the inside of her cheek. Horrified, she recoiled even further.

 

“It’s alright.”

 

Ulrich reached his hand toward her.

 

Lisbell swallowed a ragged breath and shook her head even more vigorously. As soon as her legs gave out, causing her to fall toward him, she hastily pulled herself back in fear.

 

Ulrich’s eyes sharpened slightly at this.

 

“Come here.”

 



 

“I said come here.”

 

His voice dropped, as if frustrated by the situation not going as he wished. It felt like a demand that lashed at her, pushing her forward. Her mind gave up trying to think, and all that remained was a visceral resistance.

 

Lisbell screamed, her voice tight in her throat.

 

“You… you’re going to make me have it too…”

 



 

“This baby… you’re going to make me give birth to this wretched thing too!”

 



 

“You’re planning to tear open my stomach and pull it out, aren’t you?!”

 

That was impossible. If that happened, this being would become a detestable link to the man she loathed more than anything, a bond that could never be severed from this family. Like shackles, like chains, like a black necktie…

 

No, she couldn’t let it happen. She didn’t want to give birth to death. The despair she had felt, like a snuffed-out ember, suddenly rekindled.

 

Lisbell swallowed her sobs and hit her stomach. She hated the solid lump that had grown inside her. If she could make it disappear by striking it, she would hurt herself over and over. Her entire body felt unbearably heavy. It felt like she was carrying a fruit too large to bear in the shell of her own life.

 

“You don’t have to.”

 

Lisbell’s fists, raised high enough to almost touch the ceiling, hesitated.

 

Lies.

 

There was no way.

 

Given the nature of his family, the issue of heirs was an inevitable matter. The fact that he had rushed from Marnia to the capital, the fact that the madam had staked her life on protecting the child while imprisoning her—everything was tied to that.

 

Ulrich Altahart surely knew this. He wouldn’t pretend otherwise. This was just a scheme, a ruse, a ploy to entrap her once again and watch her squirm in discomfort.

 

After all, hadn’t he expressed a desire for this before? That he wanted her to carry his child.

 

So there was no way he would abandon the child now.

 

“If that’s what you want.”

 

Lisbell’s tearful gaze focused on the man in front of her. He crouched, peering under the table, his large frame hunched over.

 

Ulrich still hadn’t withdrawn his outstretched hand.

 

“I’ll take care of it for you.”

 



 

“You don’t trust me, do you?”

 

He laughed.

 

The curve of his eyes, the slight lift of his lips—it was as if his gentle expression was trying to convey some meaning to her. Even before he spoke, Lisbell could feel his intentions piercing her mind.

 

Thoughts…

 

“If you just come out, I’ll do whatever you want, Lisbell.”

 

…were clear.

 

“Okay?”

 

But…

 

“So, come out.”

 

I can’t believe him.

 

This man is as cunning as a snake.

 

“But…”

 

Then why were her lips parting so weakly?

 

“Somehow.”

 

His answer to her cautious question was deceptively simple.

 

Lisbell gazed at him with eyes that seemed to swallow the abyss. She wondered if he truly understood what she wanted at this very moment.

 

She wanted to be anywhere but here. She wanted him to understand that while she had harmed the madam, it was never her intention to kill. She didn’t want to atone, and more than anything, she wanted to rid herself of this unbearable weight in her belly immediately.

 

Such complicated desires—he said he would grant them all if she just came out from under the table.

 

It was laughable to think she would fall for it.

 

Yet, the memories, like pebbles, kept pulling her attention back to him.

 

“Will you kiss me? If you do, I’ll even prepare clothes for tomorrow and arrange a car to take you to the hospital.”

 

“Fine. You even spread your expensive legs for me.”

 

Requests, demands, and the resulting exchange—it had always followed this sequence. Ulrich had surprisingly honored his end of the deal every time. Whenever she complied, he would respond accordingly.

 

So, if she obeyed him this time…

 

Perhaps this time too…

 

The strength in the arms wrapped around her knees began to loosen. Her crouched legs settled on the floor. Ulrich was still reaching out his hand toward her. Lisbell stared at it. The hand that triggered her trauma, the one that humiliated her even in a casual chess game, had once defeated her.

 

The moment before she shot him came to mind.

 

That piercing realization that she could never beat this man.

 

The overwhelming sense of despair had briefly flipped into something else. If this monstrous man could return alive, despite being shot, maybe he could defeat the madam—someone she couldn’t compete with—and completely rid her of this cursed burden in her belly.

 

If it were him, if it were Ulrich Altahart, perhaps he could do it.

 

This man, who had no sense of humanity or ethics.

 

She had clearly lost her mind. Crawling toward Ulrich Altahart, what kind of contradiction was that?

 

Knowing this, she couldn’t stop herself. A mental axe kept chopping away at her thoughts, breaking them before they could take shape. The shattered pieces of her mind clattered around in her skull, sharp like someone’s scornful laughter, tearing her apart from head to toe.

 

As soon as she crossed a certain boundary, a flood of light poured in violently. She felt faint, and when her wrist was seized, her body was dragged out from under the table.

 

Ulrich immediately lifted her into his arms, clicking his tongue.

 

“You’re in bad shape.”

 



 

“Worse than I thought.”

 

He turned his head slightly, looking somewhere. Even in her dazed state, Lisbell quickly realized what his gaze was directed at. A desperate breath escaped her chest. Suddenly, everything turned red. Her mind was drenched in blood.

 

“H-here…”

 

“Hmm?”

 

“I don’t want…”

 



 

“I don’t want to be here…”

 

The iron scent wouldn’t leave. It was strong enough to sting her nose. The stench exposed her fatal mistake.

 

With trembling hands, Lisbell shook as if she were a sinner before the cross. I don’t want to be here, I don’t want to be here, I don’t want to be here… She muttered over and over, and Ulrich’s large hand gripped the back of her head, pressing her into his chest.

 

Her sunken eyes and gaunt cheeks buried into his shoulder.

 

Lisbell’s trembling hand clung to his chest. Blood smeared over his white shirt in a gruesome pattern.

 

Yet, Ulrich walked steadily, as if it were nothing. For a brief moment, his footsteps squelched as he walked. Even with her eyes closed, she could tell where he was headed.

 

Ah…

 

A soft sigh escaped from between her lips.

 

This man was truly… horrifying. The coldness with which he ignored his mother, who lay bleeding just a few steps away, was beyond belief.

 

Lisbell, despite feeling that coldness, could only bury her face deeper into his chest. She couldn’t deny that his indifference provided her with comfort.

 

As if saying that what she had done wasn’t worth the fuss.

 

As if shielding her despair, stained with blood, from the entire world.

 

His pure malice, ironically, concealed her.

 

An unspeakably uncomfortable sense of peace spread through her heart like a disease.

Ulrich opened the door and gestured inward.

 

Victor, who had been waiting outside, entered as though expecting the call, but immediately froze at the sight of the deep red pool on the floor. His face twisted in anguish as he ran a hand down his face, and he signaled a few of the servants to enter the bedroom.

 

While Victor tidied up the room, Ulrich walked out with steady steps. Before leaving, he gave a single order.

 

“I’ll be going to the hotel. Get the car ready.”

 



 

Alstad Hotel.

 

This chain hotel, directly owned by the Altahart family, was currently divided into two branches operating within Laurent.

 

The first branch of Alstad Hotel, built with a large initial capital investment, was located near the Alstad Department Store, also owned by the family. It was a shining example of the Altahart family’s successful business strategy of upgrading inns.

 

The second branch, constructed later, proudly stood in the new downtown area, which was flourishing with development thanks to the construction of a new government building. Unlike the first branch, the second branch operated strictly on a reservation basis, catering exclusively to nobles or high-ranking officials with connections to the family. As a result, despite its grand opening, the second branch was relatively quiet, making it ideal for a private and discreet stay.

 

Although the two hotels differed in business strategy, their internal decor also varied distinctly. Each branch had its own symbolic flower, chosen to create a luxurious yet light atmosphere. In the case of the first branch, it was the pale pink crabapple blossom.

 

The lobby, lounge, dining room, and terrace were tastefully decorated with subtle pink hues, matching the color of the symbolic flower. Artificial crabapple blossoms, which never withered, adorned dining tables, the reception desk, and even the central fountain, adding a touch of elegance that never faded with the seasons.

 

While the first branch exuded a fresh and vibrant feeling, the second branch was dominated by the calm but not overly somber presence of the purple cineraria.

 

Though the management styles differed, the two hotels were unmistakably branches of the same enterprise, as reflected in their identical interior designs. Where the crabapple blossoms decorated the first branch, the cineraria filled the same spots in the second branch.

 

The same could be said of the tea table in the social room, where fragrant tea was placed.

 

Artificial cineraria flowers, lightly placed in a wave-shaped vase, were darkening in the dim light. As Ulrich’s eyes focused on the flowers, he sensed someone approaching from behind.

 

“Sir.”

 

Of course, it was Victor.

 

Victor whispered softly into Ulrich’s ear from behind. Ulrich’s expression was unreadable, making it impossible for onlookers to guess the content of the report. From start to finish, he maintained the same composed posture, and only when Victor finished the report and stepped back did Ulrich’s lips curve into a smooth smile.

 

“My apologies for interrupting the pleasant mood. Something urgent has come up, and I must leave.”

 

Ulrich excused himself with practiced manners and promised to meet again another time before turning on his heels.

 

As he stepped into the lobby, the brilliant light from the chandelier above cascaded down, illuminating the marble floor and the carpeted staircase.

 

Ulrich’s black shoes glided smoothly over the floor, accompanied by Victor’s footsteps. The sound of their two pairs of shoes echoed in harmony as they climbed the long staircase.

 

The atmosphere grew colder as they approached a private area, where only one room existed per floor, heightening the already tense silence.

 

But the stillness was quickly broken. As soon as Ulrich grasped the sleek, gold-rimmed handle and opened the door, there was a loud crash.

 

Ulrich’s gaze dropped. The entryway was already a mess. Shattered glass from a picture frame and a sofa cushion, inexplicably displaced, lay at his feet.

 

He calmly stepped over the debris as he entered the room. Sunlight flooded the spacious room, designed to provide guests with a picturesque view from every window. Every room in the hotel was bathed in the same pristine light, tailored to satisfy even the most discerning guests.

 

Standing in the light was a frail figure.

 

Her body was still thin, so thin that it seemed like she would feel cold regardless of the season. Her skinny frame, fragile in a white negligee, appeared weak, trembling with irregular, harsh breaths. The tips of her bloodstained fingers, grasping at broken objects without fear, came into focus.

 

As the object in her hand flew towards the wall with a loud crash, Ulrich blinked slowly. Watching her stumble and fall, he walked over.

 

“Lisbell.”

 

He softly called her name and embraced her as she collapsed. Blood began to soak into the sleeve of his white shirt as Lisbell clung tightly to his arm.

 

“When… When will it go away…?”

 

Lisbell seemed unaware of who she was clinging to, her eyes wide and frantic. Her pale, ashen face and wide-open pupils, darting about aimlessly, signaled her confusion.

 

“It keeps growing….”

 



 

“It keeps growing! It won’t stop! It won’t stop! Aaaah!”

 

Lisbell screamed, clutching her head as she crumbled in his arms. Her voice, already hoarse from repeated outbursts, was rough and frayed, like a rag wrung dry.

 

Despite her loud, sharp cries, Ulrich’s expression remained calm, and he held her firmly.

 

“Lisbell.”

 

At the sound of her name, Lisbell lifted her head sharply.

 

A glimmer of light entered her pupils. Her fragile form seemed to struggle even with the brightness that reached her.

 

“You… You can do it, can’t you…?”

 



 

“You promised… You said you would make it stop somehow! You promised!”

 

Her blood-soaked fingers gripped his arm tightly, digging her nails into his skin through the fabric.

 

Despite her outburst, Ulrich showed no sign of pushing her away. He continued to watch her with calm, unwavering eyes. It was Lisbell who, feeling betrayed by his gaze, began trembling uncontrollably, withdrawing her hands.

 

Her hands frantically pulled up her negligee, revealing a belly that had grown too large to hide.

 

Even a glance was enough to see the weight she carried. Her fingernails scraped at the stretched skin, and patches of red appeared. It was hard to tell if the blood came from her earlier wounds or new scratches, but it was a disturbing sight.

 

Ulrich let out a soft sigh and raised his hand, signaling to Victor, who handed him a prepared syringe.

 

“I.”

 

Ulrich firmly grabbed Lisbell’s wrist, stopping her from clawing at her stomach. Her five fingers twitched compulsively, as if she wanted to cut out the growing presence within her womb.

 

“I promised I would take care of it.”

 

“Huh, huh… Let go… let go…”

 

Lisbell’s disheveled hair brushed against Ulrich’s chin. He held her close, positioning her arm. There was no need to search hard—numerous needle marks from previous injections made the spot obvious.

 

“So don’t hurt yourself like this.”

 

“It won’t… it won’t stop….”

 

“You need more rest.”

 

The needle slid into the familiar spot, releasing the liquid into her veins.

 

Ulrich handed the empty syringe back to Victor.

 

Lisbell, who had been thrashing in his arms as if fighting an invisible enemy, gradually relaxed. Her head finally drooped, and Ulrich carried her to the bed, accustomed to this routine.

 The body, emaciated overall, with a belly swollen out of proportion, was carefully laid on the bed.

 

There were many things cluttering the foot of the bed. He could see dishes sprawled along with the bedside table. There were traces of vomit here and there. It seemed she had suddenly started another violent episode during a meal. Before he even signaled, Victor called the servant to clean the mess.

 

While that was being handled, Ulrich pulled the pillow from one corner and placed it under Lisbell’s head, then tugged the blanket from where it lay crumpled. After tucking it around her up to her chest, with her arms placed out of the way, Ulrich stood up from the bed.

 

“I’ll go.”

 

“It’s alright.”

 

Victor spoke, sensing where Ulrich was heading, but Ulrich brushed it off lightly and walked toward the bathroom himself. Rolling up his wrinkled sleeves, he took out a towel, soaked it in warm water, and returned to the bed. Sitting back in the same place, he lifted Lisbell’s arm, laid neatly on top of the blanket, and carefully wiped the blood-stained fingers.

 

Victor watched the scene with a subtle gaze.

 

Lisbell’s thin arm looked like it could snap with the slightest force, especially in Ulrich’s large grip. It was a frightening picture, but watching it, one quickly realized how absurd that fear was.

 

There was no hint of threat in Ulrich’s actions as he cleaned the grime off her filthy hands, moving honestly, as if to rid her of these sordid marks. He continued from her right hand to her left. While he calmly cleaned her hands, the servants finished tidying up the room and exited.

 

“The nails aren’t broken.”

 

Ulrich muttered low as he thoroughly examined Lisbell’s cleaned hands, turning them this way and that.

 

Setting aside the bloodstained towel, he walked toward the study connected to the guest room, fetched some basic medication, and returned.

 

Pulling the blanket back, he naturally lifted her nightgown. Victor, instinctively turning his head away, internally chastised himself for his awkwardness and slowly returned his gaze. This wasn’t a new sight, after all.

 

As Lisbell, sedated with a tranquilizer, continued her labored breaths, her small, swollen belly rose and fell like a little mound. The sight of that undeniable proof of life pushed an observer’s emotions into a profound place.

 

Or perhaps it was the countless scars carved into that belly.

 

Ulrich rolled up the nightgown, carefully ensuring nothing inappropriate was exposed, and squeezed ointment onto his fingers. Then he applied it meticulously to each scratch, where her fingernails had ripped her tender skin.

 

The swollen belly was, in every sense, a mess.

 

Fresh wounds weren’t even the worst of it; some had become infected after being repeatedly scratched before healing. Even scars from past torments were vividly etched, refusing to fade. Despite being so brutalized, it hadn’t yet collapsed into ruins.

 

“Shall I call a doctor?”

 

“No need.”

 



 

“Even if you do, they can’t do anything.”

 

After finishing applying the ointment, Ulrich slowly scanned Lisbell’s body. He waited for the medication to absorb before pulling down her nightgown and laying his hand on her belly through the fabric. The feeling of something densely packed inside pressed against his palm, heavy and sluggish. He could feel the faint thud of a pulse, as if it were asking to be recognized.

 

“It’s too late, my lord. The time for inducing a miscarriage has passed.”

 

“Are you saying it’s impossible now?”

 

“Even if it had been attempted within the appropriate time, it’s a risky procedure. Now, with the pregnancy this advanced…”

 



 

“Any attempt could put the young lady’s life in danger.”

 

They had called a doctor as soon as they moved to the hotel, but his opinion had been pessimistic.

 

“No matter how much you wish to avoid childbirth, I cannot recommend such a dangerous operation as a doctor. The risks far exceed what can be avoided. Now that the fetus has grown this much, it would be better for the young lady’s health to carry the pregnancy to term and give birth.”

 

The doctor’s advice was clear: the safest course to avoid putting Lisbell in immediate danger was to calm her and ensure a safe delivery.

 

But Lisbell was desperate to rid herself of the child, even if it meant offering her life in return. Her chilling panic, like today’s episode, suggested as much.

 

“I’ll make sure the tranquilizers are as mild as possible. The more uncontrollable her episodes become, the more harm it does to her body. If she becomes unmanageable, sedate her. It’s for her own good.”

 

The first time Lisbell had thrown herself onto the floor, sobbing uncontrollably, the doctor had been summoned. After examining her collapsed from exhaustion, he had sternly advised them.

 

Since then, Ulrich had personally administered tranquilizers whenever Lisbell showed signs of panic.

 

“Prepare a few more tranquilizers and send them over.”

 

“Yes, understood.”

 

“Also, what about the hospital?”

 

Though he hadn’t specified, Victor immediately understood who Ulrich was referring to. The bitter taste in his mouth made him roll his tongue as he sighed.

 

“She remains unconscious.”

 

“The doctor isn’t lying, is he?”

 

Ulrich let out a small chuckle as he pulled the blanket up to Lisbell’s neck. Victor, unsure whether to laugh or cry at the joke, stiffened his expression.

 

It was a reference to Madame Altahart, who had collapsed, bleeding profusely, when Ulrich had tried to secretly move Lisbell to the villa after he had recovered from his gunshot wound and secret rehabilitation.

 

Though everyone believed she had died, she hadn’t completely passed away. While Ulrich took Lisbell to the hotel, Madame Altahart had been rushed to the hospital and underwent surgery.

 

The situation had reversed completely.

 

Now it was Madame Altahart, in critical condition, who was bedridden.

 

Ulrich folded his arms and reflected on the past.

 

It had been an especially memorable day with the pervasive scent of blood. The first thing he encountered in the bedroom, after entering to retrieve Lisbell, was his mother’s motionless body. The scene around her was, as always, intense. But instead of jewels or elegant garments, it was a dark, destructive pool of blood.

 

“I thought she died instantly.”

 

Ignoring the blood soaking his shoes, he had gone straight to Lisbell at the table. There was no point in panicking over a lifeless body; the dead wouldn’t come back.

 

“Both I and my mother… the Altaharts seem to have surprisingly long lives.”

 

“…The doctor said that while she remains unconscious, there are signs of blood pooling in her head. A second surgery might be necessary soon.”

 

“Should I allow it?”

 

“Pardon?”

 

“The surgery—should I allow it?”

 



 

“What do you think, Victor?”

 

Victor absentmindedly watched as Ulrich gently adjusted Lisbell’s blanket. Should he allow it? Of course… it was the only way. Without it, Madame Altahart might never regain consciousness.

 

Not only that. If the situation worsened beyond what could be managed…

 

“But… sir.”

 

Victor’s hesitant objection vanished as soon as Ulrich’s gaze met his. He realized immediately. This wasn’t a question.

 

“No one disputes that Mother was wise and intelligent. But I’ve often thought her greed went too far. Greed can sometimes lead to disaster.”

 



 

“This might be one of those times.”

 

Victor read the fierce current in Ulrich’s expression, like a flame burning quietly but intensely. His anger, compacted and buried deep, leaked out bit by bit, like a pressure too strong to contain.

 

Ulrich lowered his eyes. He recalled coaxing Lisbell out from under the table that day, soothing her and cradling her in his arms.

 

“Perhaps it’s best to end things now before I have to get involved.”

 



 

“Because of Lisbell’s mistake, this accident was inevitable…”

 

The feeling of disillusionment struck him as he faced the degradation of something he had carefully nurtured all along.

 

It was enough to unsettle him. That discomfort was one reason he hadn’t bothered checking on his mother before leaving the bedroom.

“I think you understand me.”

 

Victor bit his lips. It was a phrase that carried multiple layers of meaning. He stared at his superior with sunken, dark eyes before bowing his head slightly.

 

“I’ll report to you as soon as we hear from the hospital.”

 

In other words, he was urging Ulrich to take his time and think calmly before making any decisions. However, Victor’s attempt to intervene felt pitifully weak.

 

He couldn’t forget the horrible things that the lady had done to Lisbell while Ulrich was unconscious. Therefore, Victor had made up his mind to betray the lady and side with Ulrich. Given all these factors, the path he had to follow was clear, even if it wasn’t to his liking…

 

“And…”

 

Victor’s gaze moved toward the bed.

 

Ulrich was lightly patting his hand resting on his abdomen, as if he hoped she was simply sleeping peacefully. From one angle, it looked like he was stroking the child growing inside her. But to Victor, who knew the details of the past few days better than anyone, it didn’t seem like a harmonious scene at all.

 

“And?”

 

Ulrich, noticing Victor’s hesitation, turned to his secretary. Victor flinched slightly, his lips moving soundlessly before he brushed it off as nothing.

 

It wasn’t something he could ask.

 

“Are you serious?”

 

Are you seriously considering granting Lisbell Osborne’s request?

 

Are you really going to go through with her demand to get rid of the baby?

 

This doubt had arisen because of Ulrich’s recent attitude.

 

“I told you I would take care of it.”

 

Every time Lisbell became unstable, like today, Ulrich would leave such a responsible assurance. Not only that, but he had consulted with doctors several times about a miscarriage, far more than anyone could count. His approach to the matter was serious, not the kind of plot one would expect if he were planning to further devastate her.

 

But then again, there hadn’t been any proactive steps toward fulfilling her request, making it hard to believe that he truly intended to go through with it. It was as if he were gathering information from a distance, observing the situation without taking a clear stance. His actions were ambiguous at best.

 

Victor couldn’t ask because, no matter the answer, he would be in a difficult position.

 

Even though he had betrayed the lady, she was still part of the Altahart household. He hadn’t forgotten how significant the issue of the family’s heir was. Given his position, he couldn’t willingly support the idea of eliminating the potential future of the family.

 

On the other hand, he wasn’t comfortable with the idea of the child being born either.

 

After all, the person carrying the child wanted so desperately for it not to be born.

 

Lisbell was no longer the person she once was. Although she had a gloomy air about her in the past, she had at least seemed capable of holding herself together. Now, however, that was no longer the case… Wanting her to give birth in this situation felt no different from the way the lady had treated her like a mere animal.

 

In short, Victor’s sense of duty as a secretary was constantly clashing with his moral values as a human being.

 

That’s why he was so focused on Ulrich’s attitude. No matter how much Victor agonized over it, the words that came out of Ulrich’s mouth would ultimately be the right answer. His decision would become Victor’s decision, and that decision would shape Lisbell Osborne’s future.

 

Honestly, that was a relief. The more Victor thought about it, the more he realized this was beyond him. He wished his superior would make the call so he could simply follow, shutting his eyes and ears to everything else.

 

But with Ulrich’s vague behavior, it was driving Victor crazy.

 

It wasn’t the first time Ulrich had acted like this, but in the past, Victor could always figure out the answer by observing the situation and Ulrich’s demeanor. However, this time, his superior’s intentions were completely unreadable.

 

And time continued to pass…

 

“I’ll do my best to arrange the afternoon schedule to avoid any issues.”

 

“Sort out what can be handled via phone or written correspondence first.”

 

“Yes, understood.”

 

When Ulrich left his work for the day, he wouldn’t leave the guest room. Expecting the same today, Victor concluded the matter and took a quick glance at Lisbell’s belly before exiting the room.

 



 

Her mind was foggy. That was the first impression she had when she woke up.

 

A thick mist was spreading from the horizon, swallowing her ankles and calves, eating away at half of her body before seeping into every crevice and occupying her brain.

 

“Are you awake?”

 

A muffled voice, as though coming from underwater, landed on her cheek. Lisbell blinked her eyes, struggling to open them, and looked up with difficulty.

 

The man who had left the room that morning had returned without her realizing. His presence, along with the symptoms her body was exhibiting, revealed that the side effects of the sedatives were still at play.

 

Out of habit, Lisbell lowered her hand and touched her belly. Even the brief sense of hope she had felt had faded. The repulsive swelling remained. It stubbornly protruded, mocking the times when her body had been smooth and flat.

 

A slow sigh of disappointment escaped her.

 

If she could, she would have hit her stomach again. Whether with a bottle in hand, the frame hanging on the wall, or, if nothing else, her bare fists.

 

But she couldn’t even clench her fists properly. One of the side effects of the sedative. Her body was drained of strength, and nothing would work unless it was an unconscious act.

 

Why did it feel so unfair and heartbreaking? Maybe because of her unstable state, her emotions surged violently. Instead of gradually rising, they hit all at once like a tidal wave, only to vanish as if they had never been there. Then she would be left feeling like a lonely outsider, unable to adjust.

 

Lisbell finally understood what that felt like.

 

It was the feeling of collapsing, piece by piece.

 

Or, perhaps, it was like going mad.

 

It was evidence that anyone could see—she was no longer normal.

 

Even though she knew the storm would pass and things would calm down soon, she couldn’t shake off her current state of mind. Her emotions were impulsive and intense. The fact that her body wasn’t responding as she wished only made her more furious.

 

She wished her body would just break apart on its own.

 

Even if she wasn’t doing anything in particular, if only there was a way to destroy this body.

 

Lisbell became aware of the man’s hand stroking her long hair, which now reached her chest. She suddenly recalled all the harm this hand had done to her. The things that hurt her the most. The things that tormented her. The things that caused her suffering without her even having to move…

 

Lisbell, who had been staring straight ahead, stiffly lifted her head. Although she was lying lazily on the bed, she saw him sitting with documents in hand.

 

Their eyes met. His sea-colored eyes rippled slightly as he smiled, crinkling the corners of his eyes.

 

“What is it?”

 



 

“Are you hungry? Should I bring you something to eat?”

 

“Do it.”

 

“What?”

 

“Do it with me.”

 

“…Excuse me?”

 

Lisbell slowly lifted herself up, gathering what little strength she had. It was only then that she realized she had been resting her head on his lap. She had seen this scene so many times after waking up that it no longer fazed her.

 

“Hug me.”

 



 

“Hug me.”

 

Her hand, which had been gripping the sheet, slowly moved. It climbed up to his knee, where she had been resting her head a moment ago. Her delicate fingers crawled up to his firm thigh, fragile as if they might snap at any moment.

 

“Hmm?”

 

Ulrich raised an eyebrow, looking slightly puzzled, as if wondering why she was saying such things after just waking up. Meanwhile, Lisbell gradually straddled his leg. Ulrich’s upper body leaned back against the headboard. Her hand, which had been feeling around his thigh, touched the center of his pants.

 

The sound of her fingers tapping the buckle was less of a sensual signal and more of a desperate plea.

 

“We have to…”

 



 

“We have to do it now… right now.”

 

Ulrich, who had been staring intently at Lisbell as she spoke, let out a soft groan as if he had finally understood why she was acting this way. That groan soon turned into a sigh, followed by a short, throaty chuckle.

 

“This is the worst seduction I’ve ever encountered in my life…”

 

While Ulrich went through several stages of reaction, Lisbell dutifully undid the buckle of his pants. She pulled his clothes down to some extent, but the sheer size of his frame made it seem impossible. To make matters worse, his form was starting to grow the moment she touched him.

 

Throwing the documents onto the bedside table, Ulrich rubbed his face and chuckled, as if in disbelief.

 

“The fact that I’m even going along with this is ridiculous.”

 

Before long, his hand slipped beneath her negligee, lifting it up.


A hand naturally slipped down and caressed her lower back. The touch was sticky, as if proudly flaunting whose body it was touching. It was distinctly different from Lisbell’s desperate movements to survive.

 

Unlike her swollen, protruding front, he stroked her thinner lower back and then raised his arms. His hands felt her prominent shoulder blades. Having done this so often, he could discern the shape without looking. Perhaps they were even sharper than he remembered. Given her current condition, it was likely.

 

Every time he moved, wrinkles formed over the negligee, and the outline of her body became visible through the fabric. It was clear where Ulrich’s hand was placed and how it was moving. Soon, his hand shifted towards her chest.

 

“Huh…”

 

When he grabbed her left breast, Lisbell’s eyes flinched slightly. Her tightly pressed lips cracked open, letting out a sound that could only be described as unbearably cute.

 

Ulrich slowly wet his lips with his tongue, never taking his eyes off her face. Despite his intense concentration, his hand never stopped moving.

 

Like usual, he spread his fingers, trying to gather her small breasts. However, before he could grab them roughly, the soft flesh willingly filled his palm. Noticing how it yielded under his touch, he smirked slightly.

 

“Definitely.”

 

“Uh… huh…”

 

“It seems they’ve gotten a bit bigger.”

 

At his quiet, admiring murmur, Lisbell felt as if her mind was being crushed. An inexplicable chill surged from deep within her.

 

She took a long breath, as if experiencing hyperventilation, then firmly grabbed the flesh she had been avoiding. At that moment, as Ulrich scratched her nipple with his fingernail, he let out a feigned sound of pain.

 

“If you grab like that, even the firmness will disappear.”

 



 

“If you want to receive what’s mine, you need to be gentler.”

 

His cajoling words uncomfortably tickled her ears. Lisbell acted as if accepting his cock into her body was her sole purpose. Her lips, which had been making delicate moans, straightened into a line, and she clumsily began stroking his long dick.

 

Ever since his pants had come loose, his half-erect cock swelled quickly under her touch. The veins, prominent and beautifully raised, throbbed gently along with her hand’s movements.

 

“…Ugh…”

 

Suddenly, her negligee was lifted, exposing her completely. Ulrich took one of her breasts, which he had been groping under her clothes, into his mouth. Her round areola pressed against his moist inner cheeks, making a soft sucking sound.

 

The humid breath and his tongue directly stimulated her prominent coral-pink nipple. The sensation felt like invisible fine hairs standing on end.

 

“Harder… mm…”

 

While sucking on her nipple, Ulrich muttered in a slightly slurred voice.

 

Lisbell tried rubbing his cock with more strength than before, but it still seemed unsatisfactory. Ulrich overlapped his hand with hers, guiding the pace. His cock, which hadn’t entered her in a long time, was throbbing with excitement, leaking pre-cum drop by drop.

 

“Ha, ah.”

 

Lisbell gasped, swallowing hard. As Ulrich sucked fiercely on her nipple, he used his free hand to spread her buttocks. Although he didn’t seem to have any intention of touching her entrance, his fingers lingered ambiguously near her perineum, a sensitive area he usually wouldn’t touch, making her skin tingle.

 



 

As Lisbell turned her head, biting her lower lip, her eyes caught the large mirror covering one side of the room. The mirror was so expansive that it clearly reflected the way she and Ulrich were entwined on the bed.

 

Lisbell thought her appearance, rubbing herself against him like this, looked grotesque.

 

Her arms and legs were pitifully thin compared to his, and yet her belly was swollen, pressing down on Ulrich’s firmly erect manhood. Despite not being overly large for a pregnant woman, her small frame made her belly seem disproportionately big. To Lisbell, it all looked disturbingly strange.

 

Only after a moment did she realize that it had been a long time since she last looked at herself in a mirror. The realization of how much her appearance had deteriorated, so clear in the mirror, hit her hard.

 

Not only did she find herself strange, but the man clinging to her, sucking on her breasts and groping her buttocks, pulling her toward him like a child nursing, was equally puzzling. She genuinely wondered if he didn’t find her revolting. Objectively, she looked too worn out to exhibit any beauty or sensuality. She felt like a stiff, weathered piece of driftwood, barely making it ashore after being tossed around in the vast ocean.

 

Everything was disgusting.

 

Herself and the man who was aroused by her.

 

Ulrich’s eyes narrowed slightly as he twirled her nipple with his tongue. Lisbell had suddenly grabbed his shoulder, bending her knees to sit up. By changing her position, she had pulled away from the nipple he had been delicately caressing with his tongue. He looked displeased.

 

For a moment, though, the tip of his cock, which had been bobbing freely, slid into the soft gap between her thighs, nudging its way toward her entrance under her hand’s guidance.

 

“Huh, mm…”

 

The head of his cock bumped against her entrance as if obediently following her hand’s lead.

 

Lisbell slowly lowered herself onto him.

 

“Uh, ha… agh…”

 

The sensation of her flesh stretching as it was pushed open sent chills through her body. Ulrich realized that she intended to skip the foreplay and jump straight to the main act. But there was no stopping her. He merely gazed at her with a look that seemed to dissect her, bringing his hand to his mouth to moisten his fingers with saliva.

 

“If you think you can just shove it in like that…”

 

“Ugh… ahh…”

 

“You should know by now…”

 

“Huh, huhuhk…”

 

“Are you so desperate to tear yourself open?”

 

As he said, she could barely breathe. It felt inexplicably larger than before. In the past, she thought it would go in smoothly enough, but now, the girth of his cock struggled to even halfway penetrate her opening.

 

Seeing her struggling, Ulrich slipped his saliva-coated fingers between her buttocks. As he gently rubbed her tightly clenched entrance, Lisbell’s body flinched violently.

 

“Relax. Let me… put it in.”

 

Even though only the head of his cock was inside, the pressure was intense enough to drive him crazy. Fighting the heat building up in his lower body, Ulrich slowly massaged her delicate entrance. When he felt her tense flesh relax slightly, he carefully pried the entrance open with his finger, allowing the rigid cock to push in a little deeper.

 

Her tense, tightly clenching entrance gradually loosened, allowing his cock to slide in more smoothly. The veins along the cock pressed against her sensitive spots, causing Lisbell’s back to arch involuntarily.

 

“Huh…!”

 

“There you go. What was the rush?”

 

Once fully inside, Ulrich’s breathing became slightly ragged as he felt the walls of her insides squeeze him tightly.

 

Ulrich, now leaning back against the head of the bed, used his fingers to spread her further, letting his thick cock push deeper inside her. Both of them felt it as he buried himself to the hilt.

 

“Aah…!”

 

“Were we always… haah, stuck here? It feels like it should go deeper…”

 

The overwhelming pressure and a strange sense of vulnerability made Ulrich mutter under his breath as his gaze dropped to her swollen belly. It seemed to him that the tightness inside her was somehow connected to that.

 Lisbell couldn’t even properly track where his gaze was heading. Without even getting a chance to steal a proper glance at his face, she turned her waist impulsively. She wanted to thrust as hard as she could. She wished that, as the end of this organ that shouldn’t be touched reached the point where it flickered before her eyes, it would relentlessly scratch at the fragile interior.

 

She wanted to be left with irreparable internal damage.

 

She wanted it to be just painful enough.

 

There was no room for doubt. There had never been a time during intercourse with Ulrich when it wasn’t like this. It always felt like she was being broken, and she couldn’t shake the feeling of being damaged in some unknown way.

 

Even when she experienced sexual pleasure so intense that her peripheral nerves stood on end, the act always carried a sense of incompleteness.

 

“Mm, ugh…! Ha, ha…”

 

Lisbell had no patience to wait for it to come on its own. She began the rough act without hesitation. She wanted it to make a wet, slapping sound, but her body was too heavy, limiting her.

 

All she could do was push with her knees and move her entire body up and down. Even one movement felt like she was struggling to push through water, barely overcoming surface tension.

 

Lisbell soon began to experience tiny spasms in her breath, and instead of taking more of him, she rubbed herself against the inside, brushing her walls. Ulrich, watching her with disbelief in his eyes, suddenly grabbed her waist and pulled her sharply toward him.

 

“Ah…!”

 

For a moment, the round curve of his glans pushed against her tender flesh, driving deep toward the place she desired. Her hips, holding his large organ, trembled. Moments later, Lisbell’s hand reached up to his abs, groping towards his chest.

 

“More, more…”

 

Just once.

 

She felt like crying at Ulrich’s cruelty for stopping after just a single thrust that she so desperately wanted.

 

This wasn’t enough. She needed him to thrust deeper, more painfully. He had to be harsher, more ruthless with her. With this tenacious being, whom she couldn’t separate from on her own, only such brutality could be effective.

 

“More… harder…”

 



 

“Hurry… hurry, do it. Do it like just now… like just now.”

 

Ulrich, who had been watching her intently, suddenly sat up and pressed his lips against hers. All the breaths she had been barely releasing were drawn into him. As a result, her chest felt hollow. It was a cold sensation, so much so that she couldn’t even tell what she was breathing with.

 

As Lisbell curled her fingers, the posture she had been holding collapsed. Her body tilted back. Ulrich, who had laid her on the bed, climbed on top of her and adjusted her awkwardly folded legs.

 

“Even your impatience is cute.”

 

Ulrich, who had settled between her wide-open thighs, began to unbutton his shirt one by one.

 

“It’s been a while. Let’s enjoy this, together.”

 

A scar that looked quite rugged appeared as the front of his shirt gradually opened. It was a blemish left on his otherwise unmarred body, the result of a bullet that had torn through his flesh and muscle, requiring extensive stitches.

 

That scar, just below his heart and in a conspicuous spot, was something Lisbell had personally left on him. Seeing that it no longer seemed to hinder his movement, the scar had healed over without leaving any chance for it to disappear completely.

 

“Hah… ah, ouch…!”

 

Ulrich, tossing his shirt aside, grabbed Lisbell’s ankle and moved his hips smoothly. His organ, fully occupying her entrance, pushed deep to its root before pulling out again.

 

The act, which had initially only stimulated her in a gentle rubbing motion, now thrust deeply, bringing a new heat to her abdomen. As they matched their rhythm, an unmistakable wet sound echoed from below.

 

“Hah… ah, ah…!”

 

“Ha… lift your negligee.”

 

Lisbell obediently followed his command. She thought it would excite him more.

 

It still wasn’t enough. She needed to release Ulrich’s restraint even further.

 

As her body shook from the thrusts, her negligee, which had slipped down to cover half her belly, was pulled up to expose her breasts.

 

Ulrich’s gaze, momentarily softened by the pleasure building within him, fell on her exposed breasts. Even as he maintained his rhythmic thrusts, pushing and pulling through the tight passage, his eyes fixed on her gradually reddening nipples.

 

“Why don’t you touch your own chest? Focus on the nipples. It’ll feel even better.”

 

Lisbell moved her hands, which had been holding onto the lace of her negligee, to her breasts. She gathered the small mounds in her hands to create volume, gently rubbing her nipples with her fingertips.

 

Each time she did, Ulrich let out a low, raspy groan, filled with an uncontainable sensuality.

 

“Rub them harder, like I do. Enough to make the nipple roll inward.”

 

His instructions were precise. Even amidst all this, Lisbell remained acutely aware of the sensation of his length splitting her walls apart as she brought two fingers to her nipples.

 

She rubbed them gently, rotating her fingers before pressing down hard enough that the nipples nearly disappeared into her areolas. Watching her, Ulrich let out a dissatisfied breath.

 

“Hmph… I want to kiss you.”

 

Lisbell realized why he was hesitating. The problem was the large, round belly between them. If he pressed down on her and kissed her hungrily, her belly would inevitably be squeezed by his weight.

 

As soon as she understood, Lisbell reached out with both arms.

 

She pulled him down by his shoulders, and when he was close enough, she wrapped her arms around his neck, preventing him from pulling away. She brought his lips to hers.

 

Ulrich, following her lead, propped himself up on his arms and entwined his tongue passionately with hers. Before their lips met, his faint smile might have drawn a soft curve, but Lisbell wasn’t sure since she hadn’t seen it with her eyes.

 

“Mmph… mm…”

 

His soft tongue coiled around hers, his even teeth nibbling at her. He licked every corner of her mouth, from the palate to the sensitive inside of her cheeks, where his cock had made her flinch with every thrust. Finally, he pulled away, leaving behind a silver thread between them as proof of their passionate kiss.

 

Ulrich adjusted her legs, folding her knees, and thrust into her with a sharp angle. Her body, already slick from the messy act, welcomed his penetration with no resistance. Every time his substantial girth hit her insides, her lower body grew hot and damp.

 

“You seem to be enjoying this. You’re clenching much more softly than before… hmm.”

 

“Hah… ah, ah…!”

 

Their thighs brushed against each other endlessly as her open legs continued to rub against his pelvis. Each time their hips met, the wet sound of their bodies colliding echoed between them.

 

He occasionally wiped the fluids running down her inner thighs with his fingers and brought them to his lips, licking them clean. The ferocious hunger in his actions made it seem like he wanted to bury his head between her legs and devour her, but this was the only way he could satiate that thirst.

 

“Hah, hah, hah…!”

 

Her lower body was being relentlessly pounded. The force of his thrusts grew stronger and stronger. The intensity of the friction as he burrowed into her sent tingles all the way through her abdomen.

 

“Ah, ah!”

 

The climax was fast approaching, like an enormous wave rushing toward her. She knew she wouldn’t be able to escape it, and the anticipation twisted her nerves with tension. No matter how many times she experienced it, the overwhelming sensation was always new, biting into her entire body.

 

His thrusts quickened, mercilessly pounding into her.

 

The soft flesh inside her couldn’t keep up with the speed, clinging tightly to his dick before being pulled away, only to return to its place as he thrust back in. Their intertwined bodies were a vivid testament to the intensity of their coupling, with the pleasure seeping deeply into her waist.

 

His fingers, wet with her fluids, parted her folds and rubbed her swollen clitoris, stoking the pleasure that had already surged through her body.

 

Her walls tightened around him, squeezing his length with a desperate hunger. Feeling the direct feedback from the stimulation, Ulrich let out a ragged breath, thrusting deeply into her.

 

“Hah…!”

 

Lisbell’s jaw snapped upward as her trembling thighs spasmed. Her swollen belly shifted along with her body’s convulsions.

 

The once-narrow passage contracted tightly around him, clenching as though trying to trap him inside. The intense climax gripped her body, leaving her staring blankly at the ceiling as she came down from the peak.

 

“…Not yet…”

 Ulrich, who had stopped his movements with a small frown because her insides were too narrow, slowly raised his head.

 

“No, this is… this is… not….”

 

Lisbell muttered absentmindedly.

 

It didn’t hurt as much as she had thought. What was certain was that the pleasure was more powerful than the pain. That shouldn’t have happened. She shouldn’t be asking him to hug her, asking for something like this, humiliatingly so.

 

“This isn’t it. This, this isn’t it….”

 

What Lisbell wanted was pain. More pain than now. Living pain. That was why she couldn’t be satisfied with such a lukewarm level. Whether it was kindness or consideration, she hadn’t been hoping for such humiliation that was so different from normal sex.

 

“More, more.”

 

Lisbell, staring into space with unfocused eyes, waved her hands. At the end, when his shoulder was caught, she lowered herself and grabbed his forearm. She muttered with a face that couldn’t find her lost soul as she brought it up to her neck.

 

“This time, hard… make it hurt, make it hurt more. Squeeze my neck, my neck. Whether it’s with a tie, a hand, anything…. You were always like that. You’re not like this, you’re not this affectionate…!”

 

Her eyes, which were slit open, were getting wet little by little. Ulrich just quietly watched Lisbell’s actions as she pulled his hand and wrapped it around the nape of his neck.

 

It was too suffocating. She couldn’t stand it, and her insides felt twisted. So in the end, she used both hands and created a picture of him grabbing her neck.

 

“Hold it like this, hold it like this, squeeze it, make it so I can’t breathe….”

 

She tried to get him to squeeze her neck with the tie and with his hands. Every time, a dizzying sense of closure came over her, as if she was trapped in a small box without a single hole. She thought that she had to feel so much pain by suffocating, and only then would she be able to completely extinguish the being that was making her life miserable…

 

Ulrich, who had not responded the whole time, moved his fingers quietly. He groped a certain section of her skin. Lisbell vaguely realized that it was the part that had become scarred from the burn.

 

Just like the scars carved into Ulrich’s body, the same scars carved into her body.

 

The moments when they had tried to kill each other overlapped and came to mind. Lisbell blinked her eyelids at a speed slower than her breathing. The water droplets hanging from her moistened eyelashes flowed down her cheeks.

 

Ulrich’s hand, which had been caressing the long scar that seemed to have been cut on her neck, stopped when he found it. Soon, he came up and covered Lisbell’s cheeks, wiping away the tear stains. He licked the stain on his index finger with his tongue and let out a languid laugh.

 

“If you want.”

 

The body that had been lying in a proper posture turned to the side. He lay behind her, his chest pressed against her back, and pushed his penis, which had slipped out slightly while adjusting his position, all the way to the root. Unlike Lisbell who had reached her climax, the flesh that was still stiff because she had not yet reached ejaculation entered the hole that had become sloppy as it drank water.

 

“Ugh….”

 

Ulrich lifted one of her closed legs and held it in place, then pounded her buttocks. As the position changed, the area where the glans was pressing down slightly shifted. He dug in a little deeper than before, but perhaps because the speed had slowed down, a strange sensation continued to stimulate the nerves. The feeling of her insides being twisted and her toes curled inward.

 

“No, no…. More, ugh, harder… Ah…!”

 

“Harder?”

 

“Ugh, yes…!”

 

“Like this?”

 

He grabbed Lisbell’s pelvis and pressed his lower body against hers. He followed along as if he would listen to anything she said, but the speed of his thrusts was the same, and the force of his thrusts didn’t get stronger.

 

No, rather, it seemed to be slower, more gentle… thrusting. Not to cause damage, but as if he was going to make her melt completely.

 

The more she begged out loud, the more gentle it felt.

 

Ulrich leisurely and steadily drove the stakes as if he was risking his life to make her feel it. The hot sensation spread from the parts that were constantly touching without a moment to stop. The inside of his stomach contracted violently as if it was being squeezed, then released. Every time that happened, he could feel the flesh that smoothly wrapped around his p*nis getting wet.

 

A shiver so thick it made her eyelids shoot open and flowed down her spine. Her feet awkwardly stretched out.

 

This wasn’t it. What she wanted wasn’t something that would burst so slowly.

 

Something violent and destructive, like being hit in a vital spot, so easily surpassing her threshold of control…

Lisbell put her hand on his forearm that was holding her leg. Since words didn’t work, she had no choice but to urge him with actions. Her nails dug sharply into her torn forearm. The white skin was scraped and scratched, and a drop of blood formed in the spot where it had swelled slightly.

 

Despite such desperate signals, he never turned his waist teasing into something sadistic. Perhaps because the position of lying next to each other was uncomfortable, he later sat up and rubbed her lower body with one of her legs over his shoulder, but there was no difference in the way he shoveled.

 

That day, the man did not give Lisbell the sex she wanted until the end.

 



What is depression?

At times, it resembled a desolate green swamp. Other times, it was like a horizon with no end in sight. And at other times, it felt like a sudden shower falling from a clear sky.

In other words, it was an overwhelming surge of the senses.

Lisbell couldn’t clearly define this hollow phenomenon that persistently tried to consume her, but she vaguely understood where it all began.

It started from a very small doubt.

A doubt no bigger than the tip of a fingernail.



The light filling the room was blindingly bright. It was a peaceful morning that had returned in the blink of an eye.

She didn’t know whether it was due to withdrawal from the sedatives she took regularly or something else entirely, but her sleep duration had significantly increased lately. So she assumed the man had already left and she was alone in the room again—but that thought was erased instantly by the warm breath brushing her shoulder.

The one lying behind her slowly rose up. A shadow fell heavily across Lisbell’s face as she lay on her side. Confirming that she was awake, Ulrich gave a gentle smile and brushed his lips against her temple.

As always, he had woken up before her. From afar, the sound of running water suggested he had just gone to wash. It sounded like rain outside. That simple, trivial sound stirred up quite a few memories. For instance, dreams of her mother’s organs being torn out by the beaks of crows…

She hadn’t thought summer was completely over yet. But maybe it was. Suddenly, it felt like the temperature around her had dropped. A chill sharp enough to bite into her bones crept in, and Lisbell curled her feet inward under the blanket.

With that movement, the sound of running water that had been ringing in her ears abruptly vanished. In its place, the distinct clink of a chain extending entered like an auditory hallucination. A strange coldness clung to the area near her ankle, sharp and protruding like a bone.

Lisbell slid her hand under the blanket. She groped around her ankle but felt nothing. So why did she keep hearing it? This sound. Did others hear it too? This sound…

Puzzled, she shook her ankle from side to side.

It rang again.

She stopped shaking.

Still, it rang.

Strange.

She repeated the motion several times, reflecting again and again on her abnormal state, then suddenly gave up as if bored with everything. In the past, she might’ve slapped her own ear out of frustration, but now she was too exhausted—too drained from the lingering sedative—to even muster the strength.

Before long, Ulrich returned. Lisbell stared vacantly at him, loosely wrapped in a robe.

Doubt had a breath of its own. Once it settled deep within, its pulsing rhythm could no longer be stilled. And now, inside Lisbell, that same beat echoed.

To suspect something was always a terrifying thing.

In the past, Lisbell had feared that warped rhythm. And truthfully, she still did, to some degree. Doubt, the seed of depression, had a way of violently blooming, gripping and wringing one’s consciousness.

There was only one difference now:

Lisbell was no longer foolish enough to outwardly reveal such unstable emotions.

Without taking her eyes off him, she spoke suddenly.

“I want to go out.”

Ulrich, who had been opening the mail Victor had delivered early that morning, turned to look at her.

Without a word, he met her gaze, then deliberately placed the mail aside and circled around to the bed. Lisbell had wondered why he took such a roundabout route—only to realize he did so just to embrace her from behind, peppering small kisses on the nape of her neck, worn and frayed with old scars.

A droplet of water fell from his still-damp platinum hair and slid down Lisbell’s cheek. Ulrich gently wiped it away with his finger, as if brushing off a trail of tears, and asked softly:

“Where to?”

“Anywhere…”

Her voice was like a grain of sand—something so small it could easily slip through one’s fingers and vanish if not held carefully.

Ulrich laid down beside her, propping his chin on his hand, idly playing with her gray hair. It had grown longer since she was brought back to the mansion, but still not to his liking. Twisting the naturally curling ends around his finger, he murmured a suggestion:

“Then how about we have our meal in the lounge on the first floor today?”

Lisbell didn’t respond right away, but eventually turned to face him. Ulrich’s smile bloomed like a flower in full bloom, pleased that she had turned to him of her own will.

His fingers gently brushed across the hollows of her eyelids.

“But only if you promise to actually eat properly when we go down.”



“Lisbell, you’ve lost too much weight. No matter how much time passes, you’re not returning to your old self because you keep barely eating.”

“…So I’m allowed to leave this room?”

Ulrich tilted his head slightly, drawing out his reply playfully.

“Hm? Didn’t you just say that’s what you wanted?”

She had, indeed.

But still…

Lisbell moved her ankle again beneath the blanket.

The sound… Could she still hear it?

Or not?

She wasn’t sure.

Ulrich leaned closer, his lips briefly brushing her cheek before pulling away. Maintaining his ever-gentle expression, he rose from the bed.

“I told you, I’ll grant you whatever you want.”



“Come now, get up and get ready. The view from the lounge is different from the one here in the room. I hired a landscape designer to make it beautiful—you’ll like it.”

Ulrich moved around the bedroom as if he had been waiting for this very day. Seeing that Lisbell, despite being the one to suggest it, had no intention of moving, he ended up escorting her to the bathroom himself, helping her bathe. He then called for Victor, instructing him to bring suitable clothes for her to wear.

“Are we going out?”

“We’ll be heading to the lounge.”

Hearing this, Victor glanced over Ulrich’s shoulder. Slouched in a plush wing chair, Lisbell was unmistakably showing signs of pregnancy now.

After a moment’s hesitation, Victor leaned in and whispered so only Ulrich could hear:

“Shall I restrict access to the lounge while you’re down there?”

“No need.”

Ulrich’s swift reply left Victor visibly flustered.

“Pardon? But…”

Even if foot traffic was light, the hotel wasn’t completely devoid of guests. Other patrons were still staying on different floors.

And the first-floor lounge, in particular, was a highlight of the hotel—a glass conservatory with a flowing artificial stream, a scenic space that had been crafted with great care. In all his time managing the space, Victor couldn’t recall a moment it had ever been empty.

Yet Ulrich was planning to take Lisbell there. The implication of choosing such a public space was clear—it was a declaration, a public acknowledgment of their relationship.

“It’s fine.”

Ulrich’s calm response seemed to directly address Victor’s concerns. Watching his composed expression, Victor gave a small, respectful nod. It dawned on him—perhaps this had been Ulrich’s intent all along when he brought up the lounge.

If that was true, then Ulrich truly intended a future with Lisbell Osborne…

“Understood. In that case… I won’t take any special precautions.”

Victor quickly wrapped up the conversation and contacted a nearby boutique to prepare clothing suitable for Lisbell. Ulrich reviewed the selection before she even saw it, picking out a few outfits to dress her himself.

But whatever she wore, it looked out of place. Though some of the clothes covered her stomach well enough, the sleeves and pants were far too long.

“It looks like you’ve snuck into an adult’s wardrobe,” Ulrich said, smiling at her with a lightheartedness that didn’t quite match the absurdity of her appearance. He gently folded the long sleeves back for her.

Lisbell stood still in front of him, expressionless.

After brushing her cheek once with the back of his hand, he took her by the hand and led her toward the door, saying it was time to go.

She didn’t know how long it had been since she last walked anywhere, but her body had clearly weakened. Even going down one flight of stairs left her breathless. For the rest, she had to rely on Ulrich’s arm around her waist, descending step by step with great effort.

The lounge wasn’t far from the lobby. But from the moment they stepped into the open, anyone who caught sight of them turned their attention their way.

At first, people approached, smiling as they recognized Ulrich. But gradually, their gazes shifted to Lisbell, standing quietly by his side like a shadow.

She had experienced something like this before. It was the same in the hallway of the theater where she once went to see a play. But back then, many things had been different—both in how others perceived her, and in the actual circumstances.

“Well, I’m with someone, so I’ll take my leave now.”

Ulrich, caught in conversation, didn’t linger. After a brief exchange of pleasantries, he politely excused himself, clearly indicating that his reason for leaving was the companion at his side—Lisbell—by pulling her closer with the arm wrapped around her waist.

And just like that, the awkward gazes directed at him shifted, as if by reflex, to Lisbell, once again scanning her.

The curious stares varied in nature.

Some were laced with nothing more than pure curiosity. Others, however, carried an air of judgment, making her feel subtly uneasy. It was especially so when their eyes landed on the obvious swell of her belly, which no clothing could completely conceal.

How did she look in their eyes?

Ulrich was still unmarried—did they think she was a mistress he doted on so excessively that he got her pregnant? The mere thought of such an assumption made Lisbell feel sick, and she forced herself to stop caring.

Perhaps because it was still early in the morning, there were only a few guests in the lounge’s dining area. Still, it wasn’t empty. As they entered, just like before, all eyes turned to them. Ulrich handled the incoming greetings with practiced ease, guiding Lisbell toward a table bathed in warm sunlight.

“He’s the president of a major newspaper—‘Osvalley,’” Ulrich said suddenly.

“…Sorry?”

“The man who was smiling while staring at your belly earlier.”

He spoke as he sat down across from her, after seating her first.

“And the mustached man who looked like a desperate dog trying to speak to you—he’s a big name in the trade industry.”



“And… who else was there…”

“Why… are you telling me this?” she asked.

Ulrich smiled, as if waiting for her to ask.

“I thought you might be curious.”

But she wasn’t. Not particularly. She had never really been interested. What puzzled her was Ulrich’s behavior.

The overwhelming attention that followed them the moment they appeared—the way he nonchalantly exposed their affair to such eyes, almost as if asking the world to acknowledge it. This absurd situation where her private life could become tabloid gossip at any moment.

All of it would ultimately backfire on Ulrich.

Of course, he had been prepared to marry her and had even made arrangements for a wedding. But there was still a stark difference between an official announcement by the Althahart family and a media leak turned sensational headline.

And yet, after causing all of this so boldly, how could he remain so unbothered?

Yes, truly… Ulrich was unshaken.

Her belly was still very much visible.

He had told her to leave everything to him—but not a single thing had been resolved. And here he was, acting without the slightest trace of urgency. Meanwhile, Lisbell was terrified by the mere thought of tomorrow. Each new day felt like swallowing fear whole, just to open her eyes again.

That’s why it bothered her.

Not knowing what he was thinking—that was fatal. Most of the time she had fallen into his traps, it was because she couldn’t see what he was already watching.

That’s also why she had stubbornly insisted on leaving the room today. While he no longer bound her by the neck or ankles, she wanted to see if he was still silently keeping her confined. But Ulrich had simply said—

“Didn’t I say I’d give you anything you wanted, Lisbell?”

As if mocking her doubts, he said it so easily. And just like that, he took her out. Into a public space, no less, where she could mix with others. It was a tactic she knew too well to miss. He always used hope and despair like carrots and sticks, precisely and cruelly.

While she was lost in thought, someone approached the table. Maybe Victor had given a heads-up—though they hadn’t even ordered, dishes were served one after another. As plates filled the table, Lisbell looked across at him.

He sat back leisurely, legs crossed, holding a coffee cup. Taking his time, savoring both the drink and the moment.

“Eat up. You promised to eat well when you agreed to come out with me.”

Ulrich gestured toward the spread of food on the table. Lisbell slowly picked up her cutlery. The food smelled and tasted excellent, but the moment she swallowed a bite, nausea hit her. Still, she forced it down. She chewed and swallowed even the steaming hot dishes without pause, as if that alone could prove something.

Her throat felt torn, and her windpipe raw, but she kept chewing like it was a matter of pride. Seeing that stubborn defiance, Ulrich smiled faintly, as though amused, and gently wiped her lips with a handkerchief.

“Eat slowly. You’ll get sick like that.”

After carefully wiping her mouth, he effortlessly took the cutlery from her hands and began cutting her food himself—perhaps pitying the sight. Then, with practiced ease, he lifted the fork to feed her.

Lisbell stared at the fork he held up, then slowly opened her mouth. Ulrich, pleased, didn’t hide how happy he was. He smiled often and even hummed a little now and then.

Like a baby bird, she accepted the food, then glanced sideways. She had sensed sharp stares earlier, and sure enough, two guests at a distant table were whispering as they watched. Judging by their flushed expressions whenever they glanced at Ulrich, the scene must’ve looked blissful to them.

Was that how it looked to everyone?

Even in this wretched state, simply being next to a man carved from stone like him—did it really make her appear serene and beautiful?

“Ugh…”

Suddenly, a wave of nausea surged. Lisbell turned away and covered her mouth. A sharp clatter echoed as Ulrich set down the cutlery and came around the table, gently patting her back.

But his touch only made her sicker. She couldn’t believe this was the same hand that once strangled her, shattered her ankles. That duality was so repulsive, she felt like filth was being poured over her back.

“Wait here for a moment.”

When her condition didn’t quickly improve, Ulrich stroked the back of her head once and left the table. Curling in on herself, she panted for breath, then wiped her lips with the back of her hand and reached for the glass of water beside her.

Her nausea eased the moment he disappeared, confirming it had been his presence triggering it. It made sense. He was utterly revolting. The fact that her reshaped, repurposed self—molded to fit the Althahart frame—seemed “normal” just by standing next to him was so infuriating and absurd, she could weep blood.

“…Ha.”

Realizing she was sitting across from the very man who had caused it all made her let out a laugh—dry and empty. It didn’t last long, her energy already drained. Lisbell turned her hollow gaze toward the window.

Ah…

It was dazzling.

The light had been pouring in since earlier, thanks to the sunny seat they’d chosen.

She wished that light would shatter her into pieces. That the beams would bore tiny holes into her body until she faded away—smaller and smaller, like grains of sand, crumbling gently into oblivion, leaving nothing behind.

Then she wouldn’t have to sit here, fighting the urge to vomit. Wouldn’t be a spectacle for strangers. Wouldn’t have to choke down food she couldn’t even taste…



She knew it was a hopeless wish, yet still, it pained her. Lisbell bit the inside of her cheek hard and turned her head. Just in time to see Ulrich returning to the table. His previously hurried steps relaxed as he saw she had calmed, returning to his usual composed air.

Thud.

Something bumped into his leg.

A little girl, small enough that her head didn’t even reach his waist, had stumbled against him. She fell backward from the impact, and the teddy bear she held—adorned with a red ribbon around its neck—rolled to the floor at Ulrich’s feet.

The sudden obstacle brought him to a stop. After a moment, he knelt and gently helped the girl up. Then he picked up the fallen toy and handed it back to her with a kind smile that masked his true nature.

He even patted her head as she shyly murmured something in return—her voice barely audible.

Lisbell’s eyes were filled with that image—so vividly, so completely. And then, it twisted and twisted until it finally shattered with a crack. The nausea she had just managed to suppress seemed to surge back. Or perhaps it wasn’t nausea at all—perhaps it was something else. Something undefined was pounding in her chest as if trying to crush her heart.

Thump, thump.

Thump, thump.

Thump, thump.

He’s kind…

He smiled gently at the child.

So kind…

He picked up the stuffed toy that had fallen at his feet.

To a child—he did.

…Why?

Thump.

A strange reverberation.

Like something was scratching—or collapsing inside her.

Only now did she realize: it wasn’t her heartbeat. It was the sound of a seed, deeply planted in her core, sprouting into life—the seed of doubt.

Lisbell suddenly jumped to her feet. Ulrich turned toward her at the abrupt movement. She instinctively stepped back, like she wanted to evaporate from his steel-blue eyes that clung to her. Sensing something was off, Ulrich quickly approached the table.

“Lisbell.”

“Ah, I… I…”

“What’s wrong?”

“I… I’m leaving.”

“Lisbell?”

“I have to go… I’m leaving. I’m leaving. I’m leaving! Let go—let go of me! I have to go. I have to—hah—I have to!”

Lisbell violently shook off his grasp, pushing the chair back at random. Her legs gave out, and she fell to the floor, hitting the table and sending dishes crashing to the ground. Shouts of surprise came from all around.

As she tried to crawl away, Ulrich barely managed to hold her back. She thrashed like someone blinded, hitting and pushing against his chest and shoulders. Her screams were soaked with a wet, gasping sob.

“Let go! I have to go! I can’t stay here—I, I… Aagh! AAH!”

Out of her mind, Lisbell shoved her head under the table and screamed. Realizing something was seriously wrong, Ulrich turned his head. Victor, who had been waiting nearby during the meal, quickly came over and handed him a syringe he’d prepared just in case.

Ulrich rolled up her sleeve, found her inner arm, and inserted the needle. Lisbell, wailing and thrashing as if the world around her didn’t exist, began to quiet as her eyelids gradually sank. Not long after, they closed completely, and her limbs fell limp.

“I’ll take her upstairs. Clean this up.”

“Yes, young master.”

Leaving the chaotic mess to his secretary, Ulrich carried her back to the room.

The tranquilizer kept Lisbell asleep until deep into the dark night. When she finally opened her eyes, tears—she didn’t even know had gathered—slid silently down her cheeks. As she moved to wipe them away, a voice came through the darkness.

“Lisbell.”

Instead of replying, she coughed faintly. Ulrich, in a shirt and trousers, came over from the side table, where he had likely been working, and helped her sit up. Then he handed her a glass of water. As she sipped to ease her dry throat, he spoke again.

“You’re in the room.”



“Your condition suddenly got worse, so I gave you a sedative. Do you remember?”

“…Yes.”

She answered in a voice that barely came out. Ulrich took the empty glass from her and gave her a quick glance.

“How are you feeling now?”

His eyes searched her face for signs. But Lisbell didn’t respond. Instead, she looked at him quietly in the dim light.

Ulrich never asked questions. Not once, no matter when or how her breakdowns came, no matter how wild and irrational—he never asked why. Even as he rushed to administer tranquilizers before anyone else could react, he never once asked what had triggered her or what the reason was this time.

Until now, she hadn’t thought much of that silence. But suddenly, it stood out—so sharply, so unbearably—that she could no longer ignore it.

A chill spread through her, deep and cold.

“…The toy.”

“Hm?”

“That… from earlier.”

“What about it?”

“I want it.”



“The teddy bear…”

 Ulrich didn’t say anything—it must have been something he didn’t expect at all. Just for a moment, he ran a hand across his mouth, as if collecting his thoughts, then slowly spoke.

“The teddy bear… is it?”



“Alright. Got it.”

With that gentle response, he softly touched Lisbell’s forehead and cheek. It seemed like he was checking if she had a fever, likely thinking she was babbling nonsense under the influence of sudden heat. Lisbell didn’t bother to confirm or deny. Instead, she slowly lay back down.

“The teddy bear…”

Ulrich murmured to himself, clearly still surprised, then let out a small chuckle. His cool fingers tickled her bangs for a moment before retreating.

She had just woken up, and it didn’t seem likely she’d fall asleep again so easily—but once her eyes closed, drowsiness quickly took hold. She didn’t bother to question what was luring her back into sleep.

A few days later, several boxes were delivered to the hotel. While working in his office, Ulrich moved to another room at Victor’s call and gave a wry laugh at the mountain of boxes stacked before him.

“This many?”

“Since we didn’t specify the purpose to the department store, they sent a variety—gift sets, display pieces, collector’s items… all kinds.”

“Well, more options aren’t a bad thing. Open them one by one.”

Victor joined the staff already unpacking. One by one, the teddy bears, carefully wrapped to keep them clean, were taken out of the boxes. Ulrich looked at the parade of bears with a detached expression, then picked up one with a thin, long red ribbon tied into a bow at its neck—similar to the one held by the girl they had seen in the lounge.

“Let’s go with this one. Store the rest for now.”

“Yes, sir.”

Without much deliberation, Ulrich took the chosen bear and returned to the guest room. The moment he opened the door, a profound stillness washed over him. Without bothering to check the rest of the room, he headed straight to the bed. As expected, Lisbell was lying there, sound asleep.

He had planned to leave the teddy bear by her pillow as a surprise for when she woke—but maybe she was only lightly asleep. The moment she sensed someone nearby, Lisbell stirred under the blanket. As he waited quietly, she slowly opened her eyes.

“Did you sleep well?”

With a warm greeting, Ulrich held the teddy bear up in front of her face. Lisbell blinked slowly, staring blankly at the stuffed animal. Ulrich gently wobbled the bear side to side, just like one would with a child.

“A gift.”



“You said you wanted it, remember?”

Lisbell pulled her hand out from under the blanket and gripped the bear. It was a response, but an uncertain one. Her face showed no joy—so much so that it went beyond indifference and almost seemed like she’d been handed an unwanted burden.

Her hollow, violet eyes eventually turned slowly toward his face.

“Why are you looking at me like that?”



“You don’t like it?”

As he teased lightly, Lisbell stared at him for a long moment, then shook her head slowly. She fiddled with the bear’s thickly stitched black paw a few times, then, as if bored, suddenly pushed it away and buried herself under the blanket again.

Watching quietly, Ulrich tilted his head. He hadn’t expected an overjoyed reaction—but this wasn’t disappointment either. It was a vague, unreadable reaction that didn’t fit any label.

He was tempted to pull her up and demand an answer, but Lisbell had already dozed off again, letting out faint breaths. Feeling strangely unsatisfied, Ulrich gently brushed aside her hair and then stood up.

As he stepped out of the room, Victor, who had been waiting outside, approached.

“Did she like it?”

“Not sure…”

“Sir?”

Ulrich glanced back toward the room and said:

“Move everything that arrived today into the room.”

“All of it… sir?”

“All of it.”

Victor looked baffled but agreed. Afterward, Ulrich returned to his regular work with Victor assisting as usual. The sun that had lit the day gradually dipped lower, and dusk began to creep in like it meant to consume the world whole.

As Ulrich ascended the stairs to return to the room, he thought: by now, the guest room would be filled with teddy bears. What kind of reaction would Lisbell show at the childish display? It would surely be more expressive than that vague emptiness from before.

He imagined it as he climbed the stairs—one step at a time.

Ulrich’s steps suddenly came to a halt. The voice of Victor, who had been following behind and listing matters that needed Ulrich’s attention, also stopped mid-sentence.

Both men’s eyes fixated on the same spot.

In front of the closed guest room door, someone was anxiously shifting from foot to foot for some unknown reason. It was Lisbell’s personal attendant—assigned to assist her with meals, bathing, and other needs. There could only be one reason for someone like that to appear so nervous. Something had happened concerning Lisbell.

Victor, recovering faster than Ulrich, hurried ahead and grabbed the attendant to question him.

“What’s going on?”

“I… um… that is…”

“Is there a problem with Miss Osborne?”

“It’s not… anything major. Just…”

The attendant hesitated, clearly unsure how to phrase things.

A seizure, maybe? No—that couldn’t be it. If it were, someone would’ve already come running to report it. This wasn’t the first time something like that had happened. So what else could possibly make the attendant act like this?

Victor’s pondering led nowhere. Ulrich, who had followed them up the stairs, walked past them without a word and opened the guest room door.

The room was filled with a deep crimson glow of sunset. Inside, there were usually only two sounds: a sharp, piercing voice that seemed to torture her own eardrums, or faint breathing so subtle it was hard to catch unless one paid close attention—like from someone in a deathlike sleep.

But today, what Ulrich heard was an entirely unfamiliar sound.

Rip.

Something being torn apart.

Tear.

A sound like fabric being shredded.

Plop. Thud.

The sound of something bursting or dropping.

Those sounds overlapped occasionally, echoing faintly.

The room was soaked in sunset light so red it could’ve been a sea of blood. Perhaps that was why the sounds, usually easy to ignore, crawled their way insistently into Ulrich’s ears.

Then, something rolled to his feet.

He looked down quietly. It was a torn-off short arm, white stuffing bursting from the tear. It didn’t take long for him to realize—it was part of the teddy bear he had ordered brought into the room today.

Rip, rip.

The sound of fabric continued being torn. Ulrich slowly raised his head.

In the blazing red backdrop, he saw a figure slumped lifelessly on the floor. The stillness of her posture made her look like a corpse engulfed in flames.

Ulrich’s feet slowly moved toward her.

On the way, he saw arms and legs—unclear when they had been torn off—scattered about. Sometimes it was a head. Sometimes it was decorative ribbons or beads. White tufts of stuffing were splattered all over, soaked in the bloody hue of the sunset.

At last, he reached the scorched corpse that only her hands still moved.

At that moment, Lisbell violently yanked at the head of a round teddy bear. With her crude grip, the head tore off with a sickening sound. Despite her frail, thin body, the other hand ripped an arm sideways with surprising force and flung it away without a glance. A pile of similarly dismembered limbs had already formed nearby like a heap of corpses.

Rip, tear, pop.

Those grotesque sounds were all birthed from Lisbell’s hands. There were only a few teddy bears left intact around her. The number of mutilated limbs along the path alone was evidence of her relentless destruction.

After brutally destroying the one in her hands, she reached for the next target—but stopped midway. Her head slowly turned.

Her face was unusually flushed. It wasn’t just the teddy bears that were stained by the burning sunset. She too was glowing in raw, saturated red.

As their eyes met, Lisbell let out a confused, half-finished sound.

“Uh…”

“Why?”



“Why do you… look like that?”

The hand that had halted its massacre began to move again, sluggishly. Without breaking eye contact with Ulrich, her sunset-hazed gaze unwavering, she gripped the belly of a new teddy bear with both hands and pulled forcefully.

“You said you’d do this for me…”

 They sat facing each other in silence, not exchanging a single word. Lisbell, gripping the doll’s belly that stuck out like cotton, and Ulrich, gazing at her, seemed as if they were in a scene frozen in time. It was so still that it felt like they had all died, with each second stretching unnaturally long.

The first to move was Ulrich. He kneeled and aligned his gaze with Lisbell’s, then gently took her wrist in his hand.

“Your hand, is it hurt?”

The hand that might have snatched the doll away instead only checked on her, tenderly, as if signaling he never intended to stop her. Without hesitation, he withdrew.

Lisbell continued to stare at him without breaking eye contact. Ulrich met her gaze boldly and smiled slightly.

“So… do you feel a bit relieved now?”



“If it’s still not enough, I can bring more.”



“If you want, I’ll even move the entire doll store from the department store for you.”

Ulrich smiled slyly, as if saying she could have whatever she wished for. His charm was so smooth, there wasn’t a hint of discomfort. Lisbell, with a blank expression, threw the bear doll carelessly.

“Enough.”

Seemingly drained of all will, Lisbell tossed the bear’s shredded remains aside, climbed into bed, and pulled the blanket over herself lazily, lying down in the same way as before.

Ulrich, heading toward the door, gave orders to clean up the chaotic room.

As others moved quietly and busily in and out of the bedroom, Lisbell remained unmoving, her blanket pulled up to her neck. Soon, the bed tilted slightly. The only person who could get into her bed was one: Ulrich. Lisbell unconsciously closed her eyes.

Ulrich’s hand slithered under the blanket like a silk snake, touching her stomach. The cold touch grazed her skin, and after a few strange actions, he withdrew.

After fixing the disheveled blanket, Ulrich stepped away. The bed, which had been slightly tilted, returned to its original position. Lisbell slowly opened her eyes.

She continued to gaze at the side.

In an environment so comfortable, she could not shake the discomfort in her heart. Cold sweat, like a chill, ran down her back.

Thump, thump. The strange, persistent sound in her chest refused to fade.

She still couldn’t understand the man’s intentions.

Did he truly intend to make her stomach flat again?

The silent mental torment continued, leaving her uncertain and uneasy.

A loud, piercing cry woke her up. As soon as she opened her eyes, she found herself surrounded by pitch-black darkness. There was no light anywhere, just a world colored in black, with no indication of up, down, front, or back.

Another sharp cry assaulted her ears, and Lisbell felt a searing pain, as if her body had been torn apart. Before she could even curl her fingers, she screamed, but no sound returned.

Her twisted gaze fell downward, and she saw something perched on her swollen belly.

Flap, flap.

The flapping wings slowly diminished, and the dark, gloomy head bowed.

The next cry was shorter, followed by the sound of a drop of blood hitting the ground, splashing like rain.

Lisbell muttered a foolish sound, but it quickly faded into nothingness. The crow perched on her belly began tearing into her insides, pecking at her organs.

It was a brutal scene, too grotesque to bear. She struggled against the ropes, but they held her firmly in place. The crow spread its wings wide, seemingly enjoying her distress.

Screaming, Lisbell felt her consciousness slipping away, her pain intensifying, but no one came to help. She watched helplessly as her organs were consumed, her body deteriorating, and the crow grew stronger with every passing moment.

The more she died, the more the crow thrived, and the realization of this tragic fate made her feel powerless and despairing.

Her senses faded, and all she could feel was the overwhelming pain. Through her blurred vision, she saw the crow’s beak glistening with blood as it pecked at something between her ribs.

She realized then that the beating heart wasn’t hers.



Suddenly, she came to consciousness.

 

“Ugh….”

 

As soon as Lisbell woke up from her dream, she inhaled heavily like someone suffering from hypoxia. However, she did not feel full at all. As soon as she inhaled, her breath became rapid as if it was being sucked out through the pores of her body. The feeling of her hair, soaked in cold sweat, sticking to her skin was creepy.

 

After a while, she realized that she was lying down looking at the ceiling.

 

Recently, Lisbell had been unable to lie down in this position. Her stomach, which had grown so large that it seemed impossible to hide it any longer, was pressing down on her limbs like a rock. She could not sleep properly in this position, her stomach would often turn inside out, and she would constantly feel the need to urinate.

 

Although lying on her side would have helped her somewhat, she did not do so and barely sat up with her trembling arms.

 

She looked blankly at the window.

 

It was a quiet night, hard to find natural light, and I was alone in the bedroom. The man had not yet returned. If he had, he would have already slept next to me or done something else. Even though I tried to sit still and focus on the quietness of the room where I was alone, a part of my mind kept drifting apart. A chilling blue energy that I could not shake off with my consciousness suddenly rose up and surrounded my chest.

 

It was unpleasant.

 

Lisbell rarely had dreams. But there was a day when she had a vivid dream like today.

 

A crow had appeared there too. She screamed with all her might, but it did not reach anyone, and the sky and the ground were fiercely black as if covered in black raw materials. On that day, when she had a nightmare that made her sweat as she recalled it, Lisbell had captured the circumstances surrounding her mother’s death.

 

Thinking back, it might not have been unpleasantness but ominousness.

 

Because everything was so similar.

 

The crow’s eyes, which looked back at her while biting her heart, which was smaller than her fist, still had a splendid color. Now, just looking at it made her feel like drowning… .

 

The cold sweat on his body gradually cooled down and an uncontrollable coldness came rushing in. As she looked at the room that had been cleaned up in the gloom that made her want to deny reality, the man’s voice came back to her.

 

“Your hand, isn’t it hurt?”

 

It was a voice that seemed to be worried that she might have been hurt. How hypocritical.

 To be clear, she hadn’t intended for things to go this far.

What Lisbell did with the teddy bear had merely been to jolt him into awareness—to remind him of the promise he had made to her.

He had vowed to restore her belly to its former, flat state.

The reason she crawled out from under the narrow, dark table and approached him on her knees was born from that single, desperate desire.

Afterward, she stopped thinking as much as she used to.

Even so, her head would sometimes feel unbearably heavy, and the threshold for her thoughts to spiral had lowered.

Because she was still alive—still breathing—those inevitable thoughts would occasionally rise up like tiny bubbles, then surge into overwhelming waves that crashed down on her.

Whenever that happened, all that remained inside her was burning impulsiveness, leaving her unable to control her own actions.

Lately, there had been exactly one thing that could send her into such a state.

Lisbell’s gaze dropped downward.

Even standing straight, she could no longer see her own feet.

Her swollen belly blocked the view that should have been wide open before her.

He had promised to make it go away.

If he were truly the man who could do anything in her world, then it should have been gone already.

But it remained, stubborn and heavy, anchoring her limbs to the ground. And so Lisbell was in pain. Her wishes had always been simple, unchanged from the beginning—she just wanted a little comfort. She had even crawled across the floor, bruising her knees, in order to put an end to the pain that bound him. Yet all she received in return was the prolongation of that pain.

Moreover, Ulrich had shown glimpses—at times, in ways she couldn’t help but notice—of something unreadable and troubling.

Lisbell clenched her fists. It was clear that all she had left were impulsiveness and frustration. And putting an end to this dragging, miserable process was something she herself could do.

In truth, there was no need to drag things out. There was a quicker way to reach the peace she so desperately sought.

Silently, she moved toward the window of the guest room.

Outside the square window, pale yellow leaves were quietly falling. She had wondered why it had become so cold all of a sudden—only to realize that it was already the height of autumn. The time between the retreating summer and the coming winter. Whether she had intended it or not, whether she had been conscious of it or not, she had once again gotten trapped in a gap between seasons.

‘…What floor was this again?’

High enough to see the thin branches of the towering trees.
Her gaze slid down to the window frame.
Unlike the windows at the Alta Hart mansion, there was no additional lock installed here.
If she pressed down with a little strength, the window would open easily.

‘So if I fall from here…’

It would end.

‘Whether my head shatters, or my belly bursts…’

If she let go of everything like that, it would all be over.

If she could only leap voluntarily into that unknown, death that held no hesitation—

Then it would end.

But—



Lisbell could not go through with it.

Because—

I would just fail again.

Just as someone once said, she was full of thoughts, but even fuller of fear. Even now, she couldn’t help but imagine what would happen if her attempt at death failed.

What if she only ended up critically injured but survived miraculously? What if Ulrich, enraged by her actions, decided to revoke his promise to her? What if she was left, as she had been before when caught by his wife, unable to move freely and forced to await the day of her delivery?

Would today really be the first time she had been seized by such extreme urges? She had harbored them countless times. Whenever she saw a tall staircase, she thought about hurling herself down it; whenever she saw a dish, she wondered about smashing it and using a shard to slit her throat.

These impulses crept in as naturally as breathing for someone still alive.

And sadly, every single time, she arrived at the same conclusion:

She didn’t have the courage to endure what would happen if she failed. And so, she couldn’t even truly wish for death.

“…Haha.”

A hollow laugh slipped from her lips.

It was absurd.

To think there could exist a fear greater than death.

Wasn’t everything supposed to end once she died? And yet, she kept finding herself staring beyond that end.

Perhaps at the root of it all, there was a damp, heavy despair she had acquired after enduring so many situations. It was the sabotage of defeat, carved deep into her bones.

Having never once tasted a victory against Ulrich, Lisbell knew only this kind of bitter, pessimistic psychology. It awakened her dread, severed her thoughts before they could go any further, and left her trembling.

Shivering uncontrollably from the sudden cold, Lisbell hugged her arms around herself. She stumbled back to the bed and buried herself under the covers, pulling them up over her head. Underneath the blanket, she lay utterly still, like a stone.

Before long, she heard the quiet sound of the door opening. Ulrich had returned from his outing. Even as the faint sense of his presence approached, Lisbell stared blankly ahead, as if she could neither see nor hear him.

“Hm?”

A curious voice sounded from behind her. It was the reaction of a man who, upon stepping into the dark, unlit bedroom, had discovered her sitting ghostlike under a heap of blankets. Apparently, he had assumed she would be asleep again, just as she had been for days now, barely awake long enough to see him.

He loosened his tie with a finger and, abandoning his path toward the dressing room, instead approached the bed and sat down. Then, like someone amused by something he had found, he laughed lightly.

“Why are you sitting so cutely like that?”

Even as he came closer, Lisbell’s eyes, which had been staring into empty space, slowly moved toward him. With a faint, hollow expression, like a person stripped of all emotions, she looked up at him—

and with a voice barely above a whisper, finally spoke.

“…I woke up because it hurt.”

“Where does it hurt?”

“My belly…”

Ulrich looked like he was about to ask something else, his lips parting slightly—but then he shut his mouth. Lisbell did the same.

Whenever this topic came up, an indescribable silence always settled between them first.

With her lips pressed shut, Lisbell studied his face.

Ulrich, at some point, lifted the gaze he had lowered.

“Does it hurt a lot?”

Lisbell gave no immediate response. After a long moment, she shook her head slightly. He kissed her forehead, where it peeked through her hair, and whispered,

“I’ll have them bring you some warm tea. Stay lying down.”

Then he stood and made his way back toward the door.

Even though he had told her to lie down, Lisbell didn’t.

She remained exactly where she was, her eyes fixed on the same spot.

But when Ulrich, after giving his instructions, returned to the bed, she turned to look at him again.

He noticed her persistent gaze and teased her lightly, as if pinching at the invisible thread of her attention.

“What are you staring at like that?”

“…Your eyes.”

“Hm?”

“Your eyes.”

Those eyes that glowed blue even in the dark of the night. He looked like a crow from somewhere, covered head to toe in black feathers, with only his eyes shining so coldly and pale. Recalling that image made the dull, stabbing pain in the lower part of her belly throb heavier.

“My eyes?”

Ulrich, seeming not the least bit displeased by her interest, leaned in even closer, almost bringing his face right up to hers.

“Do you like them?”

Not stopping there, he even chuckled softly. Seeing herself reflected and rippling in his blue irises made Lisbell feel sick, so she tore her gaze away.
Ulrich found even that amusing; he chuckled again and left a soft butterfly kiss on her temple before leaning back against the bed’s headboard.

He tugged the loosened tie all the way off, reached out, and fumbled for something on the bedside table. A sharp metallic sound rang out. He had opened a cigarette case, pulled out a cigarette, and placed it between his lips. The motion of his hand moving naturally to light it stopped abruptly, like a short circuit.

As if he had suddenly realized—Oh, right.

Lisbell instantly understood the cause of that hesitation. She didn’t have to think hard about it. Because in the next second, Ulrich cast a quick glance toward her while holding the cigarette between two fingers.

At the moment their eyes met, at the moment he lowered the cigarette from his lips, at the moment he acted as if it were nothing, casually smoothing things over—

Those three blows struck Lisbell like a brutal, merciless beating.

“…Why aren’t you smoking?”

It felt like she had slipped off a crumbling cliff’s edge. The ground that had been holding her heart up gave way with a crash. From that gaping crack, doubts—sharp as thorns and growing long like whips—sprang up furiously, vicious enough to overturn her insides.

Ulrich, who had been idly focused on the bedside table, turned back to her at the sudden accusation. Lisbell’s face was half vacant, almost dazed.

“Why… aren’t you smoking…”

Her words dragged downward, drooping heavily. It was because her voice had started trembling uncontrollably.

“Lisbell?”

“…Because it’s harmful?”



“To me… no, no—to this baby…”

Her delicate features crumbled all at once. Her breath came shorter, more frantically, more wretchedly.

 Lisbell reached out with a broken expression on her face, grabbing the pillow that had fallen to the floor.

“You…”

By the time she dragged it up to her knees, her expression had already turned terrifying.

“You lied to me.”



“You lied to me…!”



“You lied to me! You lied to me…!!”

Lisbell slammed the pillow down on his forearm. In the violent motion, the blanket she had been wrapped in slid down her body. Her body, trembling uncontrollably from the pent-up emotions, became more noticeable.

Ulrich, who hadn’t reacted to the sudden situation at first, quickly grabbed the pillow as if it were going to strike his face.

“Lisbell, wait.”

“You lied to me…! You… you lied to me, didn’t you…! You did, didn’t you?!”

The force behind her refusal to let this go was overwhelming. Ulrich could already see Lisbell’s face, flushed and out of breath, struggling to hold herself together. Her pupils were wide and trembling, a clear sign that something was seriously wrong with her.

He tried to maintain control of the situation, using just enough force to remove the pillow without causing her further strain. Lisbell, however, continued to swing the pillow wildly, hitting him across the cheek and chest.

“What’s going on all of a sudden?”

“I thought… I thought something was wrong.”



“Why did you laugh like that when you looked at a child? Why did you suddenly embrace me so gently? Why did you stroke my belly like it was something precious? Why… why do you refuse to smoke in front of me… Why… why…!!”

The doubts she had been accumulating exploded all at once. The impact was immense. Every last bit of reason she had was shattered, her mind completely thrown into disarray. Her chest felt like it was engulfed in molten lava, as if betrayal and anger were spilling over, causing her vision to throb painfully.

“It was all… a lie. You said you’d… do what I wanted…! You said you wouldn’t make me have the baby…! You promised me… you promised you’d get rid of it…! You promised!”

She didn’t believe it. She should have trusted the person she should have trusted. Instead, she had trusted the one she should never have.

Her heart, as fragile as glass, collapsed, falling deeper and deeper into darkness. She felt as though her insides had been trampled and torn apart, suffocated by an overwhelming hatred.

“And still… you lied to me…! Again! You lied to me again! Again!”

Lisbell had completely lost her reason. She twisted and flailed her limbs violently, like a beast.

The pillow she had been swinging was finally ripped from her hands. Now, Lisbell used both her arms to attack him. Her nails, which had once dug into her neck and now mercilessly scratched at her swollen belly, tore into Ulrich’s cheek and jaw.

Crimson lines appeared on his fair skin. Despite this, Ulrich’s eyes remained unwavering, as if nothing could shake him. She hated it. His eyes, still pristine and untainted, were the exact opposite of her, who was falling apart.

“I… I’ll…”

In her frantic struggle, Lisbell almost fell off the bed, but Ulrich managed to catch her just in time. Twisting in desperation, Lisbell reached for his throat.

“I’ll… kill you…”

Lisbell poured all her energy into fighting him, but as she pushed against his thick arms, which seemed like solid walls, she resorted to biting him, sinking her teeth into his flesh with a vicious snap.

“This time, I’ll kill you!”

At that moment, the door to the room opened.

The servant, who had been bringing in a tray with tea at Ulrich’s instruction, was startled by the chaotic scene and hesitated, before quickly turning to leave. Soon after, footsteps could be heard running toward the room.

“Let go! Let go of me! I’ll kill you…! I will! You… you lied to me… you… you’re trying to torment me again… you played with me, didn’t you… I won’t let this go… I’ll never let you get away with this!”

“Lisbell.”

As the two struggled, Victor, who had been called for, quickly retrieved a box of sedatives. Lisbell, as if trying to completely destroy her voice, continued to scream with vicious intent, cursing him with every word.

“Why… why is this happening to me… I’ll kill you… I won’t forgive you. I won’t let you go… Everything… everything disgusts me. I hate it…! Why… why are you doing this to me…!”

“Lisbell!”

A hand, veins bulging, grabbed her shoulder tightly.

Victor, who had been hastily filling the syringe with liquid, looked up in surprise and turned toward the bed. It wasn’t just him. The voice was unfamiliar to everyone in the room.

Ulrich’s low, rolling voice, always sweet and pleasant, had never sounded so rough, so firm, as if he were shouting. It was something no one had ever heard before.

Even Lisbell, whose emotions had been torn to shreds, flinched helplessly.

Ulrich held her shoulder tightly, his voice sharp as ice.

“I told you I’d take care of it.”



“Why don’t you trust me?”

His voice was clearly coming from directly in front of her, yet there was a strange sense of pressure surrounding it, making it feel as though it were descending from above. It made her involuntarily lower her head and drop her gaze. It was a highly oppressive, almost delicately violent kind of pressure.

It wasn’t just his voice that was creating this sense of domination.

Unlike Lisbell, who could only tremble weakly, his pale blue eyes were firm and resolute. Even with their soft color, they radiated an unsettling, chilling uniqueness that couldn’t be ignored.

With a single, cutting remark, the entire bedroom froze.

Everyone stood still, as though enchanted, unable to move. The first to break the silence, however, was Lisbell.

“How…”

Her facial features, strained and twisted with too much force, contorted. The furious, overwhelming anger that had driven her to lose her senses faded, leaving only a whimper from the broken, crumpled inner turmoil.

“How… How could this… happen…?”



“It’s already… this big…”

Lisbell’s body, still held tightly by Ulrich, lowered slightly.

“I know… there’s not much time left, but how…”

She could not ignore the feeling of pressure, even in her crouched position. The pain in her stomach was sharp, piercing from the inside. It wasn’t just her own discomfort. There was something inside her, something that clung to her fiercely, unwilling to let go…

“I never… trusted you…”

Through her bitter sobs, the broken tone of her voice came in scattered fragments.

“At that time… I should have just pressed the gun to my head… No, no… in the monastery… I should have hung myself there so I’d never leave… No, even before that… I should’ve just… just died with my mother…”



“I should’ve ended it all back then…”

In the once icy atmosphere of the bedroom, the only sound now was the sorrowful, heart-wrenching cry that filled the space.

Lisbell wept uncontrollably, muttering words of despair, as if she had lost all hope for the future.

Ulrich, his face scratched from where she had clawed at him, looked down at her before pulling her closer. Her body, weakened from the emotional turmoil, followed without resistance, as if it had lost its center of balance. For a moment, it almost felt like she was being dragged like a prisoner.

With her face resting on the man’s legs, Lisbell curled her arms and legs, as if trying to return to the original state of things, and wept quietly.

“I don’t want to give birth…”



“I don’t want to… I don’t want to give birth… I don’t want to… I don’t want to… Ugh… I don’t… I don’t want to…”

Her actions, hugging her now obvious, fully visible belly, as tears streamed down uncontrollably, caused everyone in the room to remain silent. None of them dared to speak. It was more accurate to say that they couldn’t.

Ulrich, who was watching the wretched scene from closer than anyone else, gestured silently. Victor, who had been standing by on one side, noticed and set the syringe down. Then he instructed the other attendants who had been waiting with him to leave the room.

 

Lisbell cried until her throat was raw, then fainted from exhaustion. Perhaps the surge of sorrow that had been pent up inside her finally burst forth, because soon after, a fever took hold of her. It was a cold.

 

Ulrich postponed all his scheduled plans and cared for her for several days. That way, he was always by her side whenever Lisbell regained consciousness, even if only briefly, while suffering a severe fever that made her ramble in her sleep.

 

When she woke drenched in cold sweat, Lisbell would look at him with clouded, cracked eyes and, as if possessed, open her mouth.

 

One day—

 

“Mother…”

 

Calling him that, she voluntarily threw herself into his arms with limbs that creaked as they moved.

 

“Mother, it hurts so much…”

 



 

“My stomach… it’s so heavy… I can’t breathe, I’m dying… Please save me. Please, save me… Mother. I… it’s too hard. It really is… too much…”

 

In that way, she called out to the late Madam Osborne, and on another day—

 

“Theo…?”

 

She searched for her former fiancé, whom Ulrich had once impersonated while hiding in the darkness.

 

“Theo… Theo? Theo. Hey, I’m sorry. I’m really sorry. So please, stop. I’ve had enough. I’m already hurting so much. I… I’m sorry. I’m sorry… okay?”

 

She pleaded for salvation from one and apologized repeatedly to another. Whether it was a fever-induced hallucination or a mental collapse finally breaking through after being driven to the edge, no one could tell, but it was clearly not normal.

 

Yet Ulrich did not reject Lisbell when she mistook him for someone else and embraced him. As if it were the most natural thing, he held her, gently wiping the sweat from her forehead and the tear-stained cheeks.

 

“Stop crying.”

 



 

“I told you I’m weak to your crying face.”

 

She thought she heard him say that in her unconscious state, though she couldn’t be sure. Not just that—he seemed to repeatedly whisper that it was okay, that she needn’t worry, that she should rest easy and sleep well.

 

It was caring, but somehow lacking something. Perhaps that was why his comfort always came across as irresponsibly gentle, pushing her deeper into sleep again and again. Her mind faded into a fog, limbs wrapped tight as if being dragged somewhere. The sensation wasn’t of slowly sinking, but of falling. The feeling of descent now seemed almost normal.

 

And so, Lisbell was bedridden for a full two weeks.

 

When the burning fever finally subsided and her blurry consciousness returned to its place, the morning light streaming in felt incredibly pure. It wouldn’t have been strange if the first snow, the color of clouds, had fallen from the sky at that very moment.

 



 

The bedroom was deathly quiet, but Lisbell instantly knew there was a man lying beside her. She could feel the familiar hand that had been wiping her down, the one now toying gently with her loose, overgrown hair—twisting the ends, then letting them fall.

 

Lisbell didn’t reject the touch. She just stared into the blinding sunlight until she couldn’t take it anymore, and closed her eyes as if fleeing.

 

Then she slowly moved her lips.

 

“I’ll do everything…”

 

The hand playing with her hair froze.

 

“If you want me to stay by your side… I will. If you want me to be your spring bride… I’ll do that too. If you want me to pretend to love you like before… I can do that too…”

 



 

“I can do it all…”

 



 

“So, just this one thing…”

 

Tears, which she thought she had no more of, welled up again, cutting through her chest.

 

“Please, just… this one thing…”

 

Even with her eyes closed, she could feel the wetness spreading.

 

Because, because—

 

“Lisbell, how many times do I have to say the same thing?”

 



 

“I told you. Leave it to me.”

 

Hope had long since turned into a discarded scrap. Even hearing such words from a man who once believed anything was possible in this world, she no longer felt the desire to lean on him. She couldn’t rely on him—she had to accept that.

 

By then, Lisbell clearly realized that what she had tried so hard to hold on to was nothing but blind hope. Even with that realization, she didn’t get angry or lash out like before. Because no matter how much her trust had been shattered, the truth remained that he was the only one she had left to hold on to. Even if it was hope wrapped in lies.

 

In a way, she had begun to surrender completely. Her dreams, her future, her will, and everything else…

 

Ah, it had been a long time since she felt this itchy sensation in her throat.

 

‘No…’

 

It wasn’t her throat. Maybe it was her awkwardly protruding belly, or her twig-thin, dried-up ankles. The itching spread like invisible bugs crawling over every inch of her skin. If she could, she would have scratched herself raw with both hands.

 

But Lisbell didn’t touch a single part of her body. She only curled herself slightly inward.

 

The fact that she didn’t even have the energy left to do such a simple thing made one truth blindingly clear:

 

She was going to give birth.

 

She was—

 

—to this child.

 

Death would have been much better…

 

Day by day passed like fleeting moments, as if the absolute and physical concept of time had finally broken down.

 

A day could feel like a minute, and sometimes a minute like a week. After time had stretched and contracted in such chaotic and arbitrary ways, what came was overwhelming pain.

 

One night, Lisbell woke up screaming, her entire body drenched in cold sweat.

 

Perhaps she had never truly been asleep. The relentless thudding in her belly, like someone pounding her from the inside—thud, thud, thud—never ceased, making restful sleep impossible.

 

Once she became conscious of it, the pain surged out of control. Her stomach felt like it would tear apart. It was as if someone was stabbing near her navel with an awl as thick as an arm, slicing through her flesh.

 

Her mind quickly turned hazy. Lights in the once-dark bedroom flickered on one by one, soon brightening the space like daylight. Her vision stung from the deluge of light.

 

Her body, unable even to breathe properly from the pain, was lifted and carried somewhere. Unlike the guest room she had stayed in through several seasons, the new space felt slightly chilly.

 

She couldn’t think. She had merely been lying down, relying on someone else to move her—and just like that, labor had begun. She screamed as someone touched her belly. It was an indescribably grotesque and horrifying sensation. She didn’t understand why she had to endure such extreme pain, and a fear crept in—that her belly might really explode, and she would die.

 

Hiccups… tears burst out, soaking her face. Someone gently touched her features. In a brief moment of clarity, she saw a long, black necktie hanging down. If she could, she would’ve grabbed it and strangled its owner with all her might.

 

Why did she have to suffer like this? She wanted the one who caused it to feel this unbearable pain too. But she couldn’t even try to reach out.

 

“Ahhh…! Hrrng…!”

 

Somewhere, an impatient voice told her to push harder. Lisbell shook her head reflexively. It was too much. The pain was unbearable. She felt like she was dying. Maybe she already was. Every nerve in her body screamed like it had come unmoored. Her muscles were cramping so badly they couldn’t function properly.

 

“It hurts, it hurts… it hurts… It hurts so much…”

 

The sobs caught in her throat, as if trying to block her airway. It felt like invisible hands were strangling her. Her face turned pale. Cold sweat had barely dried before it welled up again, trickling down her temples. Her face was soaked—she couldn’t even tell if it was from sweat or tears anymore.

 

Then, someone held her chin.

 

Something soft pressed against her lips. Only after feeling the gentle pressure did she realize it was lips. Ulrich had suddenly kissed her.

 

Lisbell, who had barely been sustaining her breath with shallow gasps, lost focus in her eyes.

 

Yes, maybe she was meant to wither and die. The thought had barely formed when Ulrich exhaled sharply into her. Unconsciously, she drew in that breath. Like artificial respiration, he breathed into her several more times before slowly pulling away.

 

“Breathe.”

 



 

“Don’t try to die on your own.”

 

It was strange. It was clearly a different phrase, with a different meaning, but it sounded to her as if he were telling her: Don’t think.

 

That binding brand he had seared into the very depths of her heart…

 

Lisbell stared at him blankly, then with trembling hands, she grabbed hold of his tie. Her hand, skin taut and bony, quivered visibly.

 

The next moment, a firm command to push rang out like a roar, and she screamed, giving everything she had to bear down from deep within. Again and again, she repeated the motion. Her vision blurred with the pain of life itself. Her breath reached her throat—then, with sudden exhaustion, it was yanked away.

 

It was the moment she pushed so hard she nearly passed out.

 

Waaah—

 

Waaahhh—

 

A strange and unfamiliar cry rang out. Perhaps it was the sound everyone in that room, except for one, had been waiting for.

Lisbell’s upper body, which had been propped up nearly upright, collapsed backward with a thud. Hah… She breathed so harshly her chest heaved, blankly staring at the ceiling. Sweat that had gathered at her temples streamed down between her cheeks and ears.

 

It was over. It was all over. And it didn’t just mean childbirth. That being—finally, inevitably—had come into the world. That was why it was over. It was the worst possible outcome, the conclusion she dreaded most. Even the final line she believed she could defend had now been breached.

 

Why was it born?

 

Why hadn’t it been extinguished?

 

Why hadn’t it drawn its last breath in the womb?

 

It was predictable. Because even that was a part of Altahart. A stubborn, loathsome pit of toxic humanity. The very root of evil, nurtured by their tainted blood. Despite all her effort to tear it away, it had clung tenaciously to her womb…

 

“Congratulations. It’s a boy.”

 

So disgusting…

 

“Judging by the cry, he seems very healthy.”

 

So horrifying…

 

“May he grow to be as fine a young master as his father.”

 

A monster…

 

Lisbell stared blankly at the nurse’s arms. The being held there was a tiny, fragile lifeform. So small and delicate, it was a wonder how it was even breathing.

 

Disgusting and horrifying—yet utterly unlike the monstrous image she had always imagined.

 

The newborn, with traces of amniotic fluid still dampening its skin, was swaddled in a white blanket. Its minuscule mouth puckered like a baby bird’s beak, as if on the verge of crying. It curled its fingers the size of an adult’s fingertip, wiggling its tightly tucked legs. Every tiny movement absorbed into her gaze felt unreal, impossibly delicate.

 

The nurse turned slightly to show the baby to Ulrich. Unlike Lisbell, his expression went beyond calm to utterly dry. His gaze resembled that of someone evaluating a tool to be used out of necessity.

 

Then, straightening from his leaning position toward the bed, he approached the nurse.

 

Huh…?

 

The next moment, Lisbell doubted her eyes. It was because of what Ulrich did. He traced a cross over the baby’s body, stopping around its abdomen.

 

The sign of the cross.

 

To him, it had always been a religious gesture of blessing and fortitude to overcome trials—but only when done to himself.

 

Done to another person, it bore a completely different meaning. And Lisbell knew exactly what that meant.

 

A ritual most often seen… at funerals. The sign of the cross performed on someone else signified mourning.

 

“Is everything ready for Portley Church?”

 

Ulrich spoke as he drew his hand away from the baby.

 

Lisbell’s grip on the bedsheet tightened. Her pale, bloodless fingertips reflected the state of her heart perfectly.

 

“…Young Master?”

 

The uncertain voice came from Victor, who had been waiting at the side. As someone close to Ulrich, he clearly hadn’t been informed, and the confusion on his face only broke Lisbell further.

 

“Take the baby first.”

 

Unfazed by the reactions around him, Ulrich simply issued the command.

 

Just moments ago, Lisbell hadn’t even had the strength to sit up—but now she was slightly propped up with trembling arms, the tension in the room unmistakable. She didn’t know why, but a scene from a dream flashed through her mind. A crow clawing through her swollen belly with its sharp beak… The dread it brought was suffocating.

 

“Portley Church… why…?”

 

Lisbell already knew the place. Her mother was buried there. Just hearing the name was enough to fill her nose with the stench of death.

 

As if sensing her fear, the baby—held in the nurse’s arms and being taken out of the room—let out a piercing wail. It was as if it desperately wanted someone to know it was here.

 

That overwhelming vitality terrified Lisbell. She thought she had already burned to ash, but the fire rekindled, peeling flesh from her bones. Her face turned even more ashen. She sat on the edge of the bed, staring at the man’s arrogant smile with growing horror.

 

Ulrich reached out and brushed away strands of hair stuck to her sweaty face.

 

“Such a pitiful soul.”

 



 

“There’s family buried there. It won’t rot alone.”

 

As soon as he said that, Victor’s face hardened. He gritted his teeth and abruptly left the room. Not long after, the baby’s crying stopped. The silence that followed pressed in on Lisbell as if trying to crush her.

 

Just moments ago, that being had been here. The one she had guarded against and despised. The one she had thought of as a stubborn, monstrous parasite—yet when the mask came off, it had seemed anything but monstrous. It had been so small, so inherently in need of care.

 

But now, perhaps it was gone.

 

To be precise—

 

Despite his gentle smile, Ulrich’s eyes were chilling. As if digging into her very organs. Lisbell couldn’t look away.

 

Her lips parted. Ulrich gently grasped her chin and lifted it as he said smoothly,

 

“Why that face?”

 



 

“This is what you wanted, isn’t it?”

 

What?

 

Why…?

 

How could this be what she wanted?

 

“You said so… You said you wanted me to do something, anything.”

 

“You told me to take care of it.”

 

A shiver ran through her body.

 

“Why don’t you trust me?”

 

No. It can’t be.

 

“Lisbell, how many times do I have to say the same thing?”

 

“I told you—leave it to me.”

 

No… It couldn’t be that method…

 

“How…”

 

“However it takes.”

 

That confident method of his… Was this it?

 

Was this how he meant to handle it?

 

“Whether I get rid of it inside the womb, or after it comes out…”

 

He murmured it like a final, chilling blow.

 

Suddenly, her entire body felt clammy. Lisbell’s distant gaze dropped to her lower body. Only then did she truly grasp the state she was in.

 

Due to the childbirth, the sheets were stained with a large amount of blood and cold sweat dried in patches, leaving behind wrinkled creases. Her stomach remained excessively swollen despite the emptiness left behind from what had once filled it. These were all irrefutable realities that most directly proved the fact that she had given birth.

 

An event had occurred that could never be undone.

 

“No…”

 

And that’s why—no.

 

“Th-this is…”

 

This truly wasn’t it. No human should ever commit such an act. Even imagining it was horrifying—something no sane mind could endure. Even if that cruel man could do it, she—at least she—couldn’t.

 

“No…”

 

The end of her heart felt like it was burning in agony.

 

She had thought the pain earlier would kill her, but it turned out she was still alive. Now—this moment—felt far closer to death. Because now, she had no choice but to say the words herself.

 

“Don’t do this… please…”

 



 

“Please! Please…! Please, please…”

 

It only made clearer the fact that she would always have to raise the white flag in front of this man.

 

Why wasn’t she hearing any crying? Why had it suddenly cut off so abruptly? Just imagining the answers brought tears streaming hotly from her eyes.

 

She wanted to follow Victor and run out right this second, but having just given birth, even taking a single step was impossible. So all she could do to stop him was—

 

“I-I was wrong.”

 

—beg miserably.

 

“It was all my fault. I-I said something… I couldn’t be responsible for… I-I’m sorry, I’m so sorry. It’s all my fault. I was just overthinking, I was afraid… so please… please…”

 

That child, the seed of Altahart, had to die. Now.

 

But why?

 

What wrong had the baby done?

 

She couldn’t sever that looping thought no matter how hard she tried.

 

When she saw the life wrapped in the swaddle, she’d been stunned. What had she been so afraid of all this time? She even felt a strange sense of futility. But that thought awoke what should never have been awakened. That tender feeling swallowed the monstrous sense of duty that had once driven her to want to end that life—and now, it made the whole situation unbearably painful.

 

In the end.

 

Again.

 

Lisbell’s lips parted as she clutched her head with both hands, like she was going to vomit.

 

“Aaaaaah…!”

 

What poured out was a wretched scream.

 

It was herself—her own reflection before this cruel, unavoidable reality—that made her scream.

 

“Aaaaaah!”

 

Losing everything and gaining nothing. This cycle doomed to repeat until she withered away. Lisbell realized she could never escape it. The only way to survive now seemed to be smashing her own head.

 

“Ah! Ah! Aaaah!”

 

Her ash-grey hair flew through the air as she slammed her forehead against whatever she could. The despair was even deeper because she knew even this violent flailing would be useless in the end.

 

Maybe—just maybe—it would be better to die.

 

Yes, if only she had died sooner, she wouldn’t be suffering like this.

 

Lisbell, crawling and fumbling, rolled off the bed. From below, where nothing had yet been cleaned, blood had flowed out, leaving cruel traces along the path.

 

Thud. Just as her body was about to fall, something caught her, like cradling her. The strength of the grip filled her with revulsion. It was a vice-like hell from which she couldn’t escape once caught.

 

As soon as she realized that, Lisbell tried with all her might to bite down on her tongue. It was her only remaining option. There was no gun, and the window was too far away to throw herself from—so this was the only way left.

 

She braced herself to bite it clean off this time, to make up for her previous failed attempt where she had only ended up foaming blood. But what her teeth closed around wasn’t the familiar soft flesh of her tongue—it was something long and hard.

 

No. That’s not…

 

Something was wrong. Very wrong. She bit down harder, but the result was the same. The metallic taste of blood filled her mouth, but there was no pain.

 

Only then did Lisbell realize what it was: a man’s fingers, invading her mouth, were what she had been trying to chew through.

 

Ah… even her final act…

 

As her consciousness dulled, something pricked her arm. A tranquilizer spread through her veins, and Lisbell’s body slackened and finally stilled.

 

Ulrich, who slowly withdrew his finger from her slightly parted lips, gently brushed back her sweat-drenched bangs and whispered:

 

“This is why I can’t let you go. Truly, my dear…”

 

My conscience.

 

With that soft whisper, Ulrich placed a kiss on Lisbell’s forehead and laid her limp body on the bed, instructing the medical staff to treat her. The doctors and nurses rushed to the bedside.

 

As they examined her and stitched the torn wound, Ulrich loosened his tie. His finger—covered in bite marks, saliva, and blood—was a mess. He wiped it off carefully with a black cloth and pressed his lips to it, quietly smiling.

 

A moment later, as if all his earlier tenderness had been a lie, Ulrich casually tossed the tie aside and walked out the door.

 

Victor, who had taken the baby from the nurse, looked half in shock. The nurse, standing before him, explained with hand gestures that she had merely followed the young master’s instructions to sedate the baby for a thorough examination.

 

Ulrich pushed between them and took the baby into his own arms. As Victor, finally regaining his senses, hurried after him, Ulrich informed him while walking down the carpeted hallway:

 

“Inform the family.”

 

“…Sorry?”

 

Victor blinked in confusion. Ulrich, who had been walking ahead, suddenly stopped.

 

He slowly turned around—but didn’t meet Victor’s gaze. Instead, he looked down lovingly at the peacefully sleeping newborn in his arms.

 

“My one and only…”

 

Gone was the cold stare from earlier, replaced by a face full of warmth and affection.

 

“…heir has been born.”

 

Chills ran down every part of Victor’s body. Just as his eyes met Ulrich’s raised gaze, he finally understood the source of that dreadful sensation.

 

Perhaps this man… from the very beginning…

 

A gut feeling surged—so twisted and terrifying he dared not speak it aloud.

 

Before Victor’s stunned thoughts could fully coalesce, Ulrich turned and walked away again. Through the skylight above the hallway he was passing, the world outside came into view.

 

Under the high, blue sky, small snowflakes were falling ever so quietly.

 

The first snow of the year.

 

A pure, clear thing—plunging straight into the abyss.

 

<Fallen Fruit Under The Paradise> The End

 
 
